Collared Prompt List
And greentexts/concepts that I found interesting

Is it better to get a store-bought anthro or to catch one in the wild or on the street?

Depends what you want out of your anthro.
Store-bought ones are submissive and obedient towards humans, making them easy to take care of, whether you want a sex slave, a housemaid, or just a pet.
Street anthros are more intelligent, which comes with useful practcal skills and knowledge, but they are also more used to being considered 'people' and tend to get uppity if they feel mistreated. Regardless, they are still usually subby little sluts, and often their bratty disobedience is just an act to get you to 'punish' them. Fun if you're into rape correction, but I'd avoid sexual punishments if you wanna break them off the habit.

Wild anthros more difficult to handle than their domesticated kin, and I'd discourage picking them as your first anthro, unless you are ready to get your hands dirty. Their demeanor depends on species.
Prey species are skittish and might lash out and run away if you spook them. Being gentle and generous with them long enough to make them feel safe will lead to them becoming more eager to please as they come to depend on you for safety.
On the other hand, barring down on them with overwhelming force will break them in faster, but they tend to lose any trace of personality as they are forcibly reminded of their place in the world. Good if you want a piece of fuckmeat, or a menial slave, bad if you enjoy a more lively companion.
Predator species are proud and haughty, and much more difficult to tame than prey. You are pretty much guaranteed to get into a scrap if you wanna get one home. I'd suggest getting your rabies shots in advance before engaging. As with prey, how you treat them will affect their demeanor. Kindness will get you respect as they will see you more as an Alpha. Such an anthro can be a useful companion, but they may attempt to challenge you if they disagree with your rules. Wrestling them to the ground and asserting your dominance will get them to back down for a while.
If you can't be bothered to deal with such disobedience, using brute force to dominate them again and again will eventually break their spirit. This does take longer than taming them with kindness, however, and you'll suffer more bites and scratches. They will still try and act defiantly, but as soon as you raise a hand in threat, they'll shut up, and if you tell them to do something, they will do it with some grumbling, of course.

>Be Anon, the Human
>Be summon by anthro witch
>She is trying to order you to teach her about the stars and to kill some other bitch
>notice she made a mistake on the protection circle
>this will be fun

>Your wife is a wolf anthro, one very in touch with her instincts since she was a tribal before falling in love with you. She still has the urge to hunt and capture prey like her still-tribal brethren.
>And hunt she does. Your rural home together means ample woodland and privacy.
>Since she's married to you and has joined modern society, your wife doesn't actually need to kill her prey for a meal, so she does something a little more insidious.
>She drags them back alive.
>Something about the primal prey vs predator mindset means your wife, amongst other predators, doesn't really see prey anthros as people. They're little more than objects.
>The phenomenon still has both human and anthro psychologists alike scratching their heads.
>Tail wagging and a smile on her muzzle, your wife presents a bloodied, bound, and terrified doe anthro to you in the bedroom. From the paint in the doe's fur, she's a tribal.
>Then your wife forces the doe facedown, ass up down, spreads her legs, and looks to you with a smile.
>"Since I brought it here," your wife begins cheerfully, referring to the doe trying to cry past her gag. "I decided to present it to you as a gift, husband. Please..." she licks her chops and settles down on the bed. "...Show this prey what they miss out upon for being food."
>...Your wife wants you to rape this doe, and for some reason, you're getting aroused at the disgusting thought.
>The doe watches the rising tent in your pants with alarm, shaking her head and babbling something behind her gag. Under her tail, you see her hairless pussy quiver.
>You get even harder.
>Licking her chops again, your wife reaches out and undoes your belt, letting your cock pop free. She takes your length in her hand and kisses the tip, bringing you to full mast. "Ravage the prey, O' husband," she purrs.
>The damn breaks, and you abandon your doubts. You seize the doe's hips roughly and drive yourself into her in a single savage thrust. She's dry, and you know you felt something in her tear.
>Despite her screaming and sobbing, you brutally rape the poor thing, treating her with none of the tender love you would your wife. Meanwhile, your wife watches, her tail slowly wagging and her eyes wide with fascination.
>You're disgusted with yourself, but it feels so GOOD that you keep going.
>The doe writhes as she's forced into pain-laced, dirty orgasms over and over. Deer anthros are quick shots sexually, they have to be in the wild, where danger lurks, and the poor doe's brain is beginning to fry itself from overload.
>Once she forced herself to lucidity and tried to fight back, but your wife pounced on the doe. Your wife pushed the doe's head down and poised her fangs around the prey anthro's neck, stilling her.
>All the doe could do is sob quietly.
>When your peak hit, you hilted and flooded the doe's womb with a roar of animalistic satisfaction, and your unwilling partner cried out in shame as yet another orgasm rocked her body.
>The doe collapsed, exhausted.
>YOur wife was so riled up at the display she just saw that she ripped her own clothes off and presented herself to you. Her loins were sopping wet, and she looked back at you, panting like a bitch in heat.
>Neither of you bother to move the near-unconscious doe, and she's forced to suffer the extra indignity of having your and your wife's combined fluids spill across her back.
>The next day, the doe was released. Her spirit broken, she limped away.
>So began a sick game repeated every so often.
>Your wife would hunt, drag a tribal prey anthro back for you, and you would violate them as she watched.
>Mom was right. Marrying an animal turned you into one.

>Be dark lord
>Anthro heroes barge into your dungeon with the intention to slay you
How would you handle them?

>Lock the wolf Hero in dungeon and have your way with his party
>The tiger Amazon given to my personal guards, reduced to piece of fuck-meat to be raped and abused
>The rabbit Witch given to alchemists to experiment on, being reduced to braindead bimbo who can only think about sex
>The bull Warrior sissyfied by mages into a scrawny femboy to serve and be their fucktoy
>The goat Priestess mind broken by inquisitors, until she started preaching about human superiority
>The doe Hunteress used for training hunters in catching new slaves and raped by whichever recruit catches her
>The mouse Thief reduced to pet on leash, forced to walk on all four and used by anyone
>The mare Princess made into my personal sex slave and made to bear my children
>after half a year let the Hero see what his party was reduced to
>and if he breaks offer him a gender changing potion, so he can become a common whore to any human
>maybe even bring his mother so the Hero can be a whore to humans alongside her

>be me
>the dark lord
>working out in my personal gym while my underlings handle the completion of my plan to bring about the age of humanity
>these animals have ruled the world for far too long
>suddenly female servant comes into my gym
>whatthefuckdoyouwantbitch.html
>”master! Vile animals have breached the defenses! Its only a small group but they are very powerful! What should we do!?”
>set weights back on rack
>stand and wipe the sweat off my brow
“Go about your day… i’ll handle these pests myself”
>she stand there dumbfounded like a deer in the headlights even though shes a human
>smack her ass as i walk past
“Look alive girl, go do your duties”
>”aahh! That hur- i-i mean… yes master”
>smirk as i leave the gym, and walk down the stairs to the main hall
>reach the main hall and there they are… the animals who have the gaul to enter my home, try to interfere with my plans!…
>they notice me, and cock their heads in confusion
>”halt you… uhh… you! Were is your master!!” The leader says his thick accent makes his use of my tongue a butchered horrid sound… fucking Rinos.
>they don’t even know who i am as well… animals
“Your looking at him”
>they look at each other for a moment and then i use a spell, a purple summon sign appears and my black great sword fades into reality.
>i grasp the handle and it sparks to life with silver and bronze fire
>they take a step back and i crack my neck
“At least try to make this challenging for me you animals”
>the female elephant barbarian trumpets in rage and raises her two handed axe
>”what the fuck did you call us you bastard?!”
>smile and rush forward and jump in the air kicking the large woman in the stomach, she goes flying back and slamming into the wall
>swing my sword to the right clipping the shoulder of a female Cheetah rogue, the silver and bronze fire burning her arm for a moment syphoning a fragment if her soul into my blade

>Turn them all into room-temperature IQ thicc femboys
>regardless of original gender
>use magic to get them boy-pregnant
>use my femboy harem to breed an army of loyal femboy soldiers.
>world conquering intensifies
>use magic to turn all anthros into femboys, regardless of gender.
>expand my harem
>???
>profit

I know there's a hierarchy of anthros that goes along the lines of Female > Futa > Furboi
But how about within those categories?
Since anthros have no power and no possessions, anthros rely on physical assets instead to establish further hierarchy
So for >>53911103 the rankings would be
>Brown furred female for fattest ass
>Red/white female for having pussy and good markings
>White furboi for having best furboi ass of the three
>Grey and orange furboi being last and up to personal preference, grey for me since I like his turquoise boihole
Or for another example >>53913210
>Big titty kobold with large, ribbed and very curvy horns used as a pillow and allowed to feed her master with her body after assumedly being nutted in first.
>Second bustiest kobold with curvy horns showing her affection by licking her masters fingers after going second.
>Third kobold has average tits and is currently pleasuring her human, no obvious outliers beyond possibly wider hips and a second pair of horns and cheek markings like the first two kobolds but may also have a non visual attribute like being very energetic or having good pussy.
>Fourth and fifth kobolds by the foot of the bed going next, mostly average besides the one on the right having tiny secondary horns, most likely very well behaved and broken in.
>Sixth kobold watching respectfully, smaller than average breasts and small horns along with small cheek markings.
>Seventh kobold with smallest tits, no markings at all, and large straight horns (may be less status vs curved and work less well as handlebars) possibly a recent acquisition by her drooling from both ends and needing a hand to keep her from jumping on the bed.
Their attire follows this ranking as well.
>Big titty kobold in expensive form fitting lacy black lingerie with jewelry on her horns, fingers, and toes to reinforce her position.
>Second bustiest kobold in much the same, though her lingerie looks to be less expensive.
>Third kobold on top of her master is decorated like the first two, perhaps even more so than the second, there may be a struggle happening for the runner up spot.
>Fourth and fifth kobolds mostly naked save for earrings worth more than they are, the one on the right being above the left one due to her extra small horns and earrings.
>Sixth kobold in plain underwear and halter, would be bottom rung if not for the next one.
>Seventh kobold in only a metal collar, no clothes and no jewelry, probably being tried out and only kept for her enthusiasm and fat ass.

How would you rank the various species of anthro in a scale of /collar/ing ease?
>Dogs and Horses practically collar themselves. They're so domesticated that they totally live under humanity's banner.
>Rats, Cows, Sheep, Pigs and other common farm anthros need only the promise of care and safety to take the collar.
>Wolves and common Cats require a bit of convincing but never need force.
>Foxes, Coyotes, and Black Bears need coercion into wearing a collar, then need time to acclimate. Force might be required for feisty ones.
>Deer, Weasels, Rabbits, Racoons, Bats and other skittish mammal anthros need to be captured and tamed, sometimes with force.
>Big Cats, Brown Bears, Polar Bears, many Reptiles, and pretty much every anthro with an ancestral home in Africa needs captured, then forcefully broken.

>pic (https://desu-usergeneratedcontent.xyz/trash/image/1664/50/1664503534331.jpg)
>the assassin femboy flits across the enemy fortress, a shadow of death
>he plies his trade with the eager intensity of one promised everything he could ever want
>for every insurgent throat opened by his blades, his beloved Master will pound his prostate just as hard
>the fact this "enthusiasm" lead to particularly gruesome remains that would serve to cow their treasonous ilk for years to come is simply a happy accident

>Flip through radio channels and every one has thirsty anthros singing their love for human cock.
>It's impossible to tell if they're female, furboi, or futa unless they give something away as they all have silky smooth feminine voices begging for cum.
>Even the news and traffic channels can't help but comment that the rhinoceros girl should've found some human dick to use her energy on instead of vandalism or that if you're stuck on the I-90 it's a good time for road head and safe to hop in your human driver's lap as cars are at a standstill.
>There's even anthro NPR where anthros breathily whisper into the mic about their experiences with humans while wet sounds shlick and fap in the background.

>All Human Radio, All the Time!
>TAMED, 93.5 FM!
>Your source for all the hottest, wettest, newest songs to hit the airwaves!
...
>It's 4 PM, girls and bois, which means it's time to pick up your phones and tell your man the Rawdog what you wanna hear!
>[Ring, ring... Ring, ring...]
>You're live on the air, who'm I talkin' to?
>Um, Rebecca?
>Becky! What do you want in your ears today, huh?
>C-Can you play "Fuck Fur" and dedicate it to, um... Anon!?
>Sounds like a real lucky guy!
>Here you go, folks, for the 12th week running, here's YOUR favourite: "Fuck Fur!"

>Your furboy stresstoy came to you today, looking all puffed up and proud of himself.
>Amused, you asked him what the strutting around is for.
>"I got a date! With Olivia Green!" He said, smiling.
>You think for a moment. Olivia... Oh! She's a fairly well-to-do and popular anthro girl. Cheerleader and honor role to boot.
>Your runt isn't terribly popular. He's got his little clique of somewhat nerdy friends and he maintains good grades, but most know who he is because of his 'association' with you. How did he get a date with Olivia?
>...Oh. This bitch is setting him up. It seems obvious after a second to think about it.
>You raise an eyebrow and warn your runt, but he waves you off. "I know what I'm doing," he says, then hesitates. "Erm. Anon? I appreciate everything you've done for me, but I don't think we can..." He blushes. "I don't think we can do our... THING anymore."
>Well then, look who grew up and pulled the thong out of his bussy.
>"Okay then," you say, waving a hand dismissively. "Have fun. Don’t say I didn’t warn you."
>He tilts his head, confused and seemingly hurt that you didn't fight harder.
>Silly little thing. He does realize you can find some new ass before the week is over, right?
>The next two weeks go by, and you watch.
>Olivia is stringing your runt along like a professional whore. He’s dropped all of his allowance on her, and you saw him by the school office asking about the school’s part-time job placement program. He carries her books, passes her friends answers to tests, gave up most of his locker space to hold her junk, and you even saw him browsing beat-up cars on his phone so he can be a ‘better boyfriend’ for her.
>Meanwhile, Olivia has paid him back with a single kiss on the cheek and more than a few backhanded comments that the runt is too love blind to see.
>Then it happened.
>You were at home on a Saturday, enjoying a book alone since Mom, Dad, and your sister are out.
>There’s a knock on your door. You head over and open it.
>The runty furboy is there, his head low and his shoulders shaking.
>Wordlessly, you let him in and lead him to your room. You barely get to sit down on the edge of your bed before he throws himself into your lap and arms, sobbing.
>You wrap him in a hug and rest your chin on his head, letting him get the worst of it out of his system. “She hurt you, didn’t she?”
>He sniffles and nods into your chest.
>”I warned you.” You click your tongue. “What did she do?”
>Through his sobs, he explains.
>Olivia and her friends badgered him into letting them into his house, and once in his room, the girls cornered him.
>They tore through his closet, finding girl clothes and collars. Some gifts from you, others he bought himself.
>They found his journal, which had mushy, and sometimes sexually explicit passages within.
>Then they forced him amid tears to admit that he was a “little gay boy” with a cellphone camera stuck in his face.
>Finally, the giggling girls left, and the runt ran to your house.
>”That everything?”
>He nods again, shuddering.
>”And here you are, crawling back to me…” Your ire rises, and it colors your voice. “What's stopping me from kicking you out and telling you to deal with this yourself?”
>He tightens his hug and shivers, mumbling “No no no, please don’t.”
>Part of you wants to be sympathetic, but it’s squashed for now.
>He needs to learn.
>Your hand darts out and seizes his muzzle in a harsh, uncomfortable tight grip, forcing his head up so his red, puffy eyes are forced to meet yours. “What's stopping me from kicking you out and telling you to deal with this yourself? Answer me.” You demand.
>”N-Nothing?” He answers.
>Your let go and pull him back into a gentle hug, and he relaxes.
>”You’ve grown on me, that's what's stopping me,” you whisper into his ear. You can see the ear turning red in a blush. “But my patience has limits. I warned you, and you didn’t listen. What are you going to do next time I warn you about something?”
>”L-Listen?”
>”Good boy. Remember that answer.”
>His tail wags, batting your leg. His muzzle breaks out into a small smile.
>”I’m going to fix this for you,” you continue, one of your hands snaking under his shirt and rubbing the soft fur of his back. “From now on, you better remember who has your back, remember who you belong to, got it?”
>He nods, his eyes wide and shining in adoration.
_+_+_+_
>On Monday, you find Olivia Green and two of her friends loitering in the hallways after class is dismissed, so you saunter on up.
>”Excuse me? Olivia?” You smile when all three girls jump. “Quick question. What model of phone to you have?”
>You can see why your runt was charmed by the cheerleader. Olivia is a coyote anthro who obviously knows how to take care of her slim, canine frame. Her fur pattern is much more tame than a typical coyote’s too, adding an air of mysticism if one wrongly assumes she’s some kind of dog anthro.
>”Uh?” The question seems to catch her flat-footed, so she reaches into her pocket and withdraws her phone to look.
>Your hand moves in a flash and swipes the device from her hand. “Oh? Interesting stuff. I was also told that you have an interesting video on here. Mind if I see it?”
>”What the fuck is your damage?!” The coyote girl snarls, trying and failing to reach her phone when you lift it above her head. “Give that back!”
>You step into Olivia’s space, startling her into stepping back into the locker behind her. Looking up at you, she suddenly seems to realize that you’re a head-and-a-half taller than her, and likely twice her weight.
>On either side, her friends remain quiet as mice.
>They feel the danger in the air as well.
>Eyes locked on Olivia’s, you lower the phone. “Unlock it.”
>Your demand isn’t loud or forceful, it doesn't need to be.
>A shaking hand rises up, and Olivia presses her thumb to the paw print reader on the side of the device, unlocking it.
>Slowly, you take your time perusing the photos and videos inside. There are a lot of the usual things, like glamor shots of scenes or food, saved dick-pics, and Olivia and her friends posing for selfies, sometimes nude, a few close-ups of Olivia’s bare tits or between her legs, and a humiliating one of Olivia being spit-roasted in the boy’s locker room.
>The videos are much the same, until you come across the one with your furboy in it.
>You watch the whole thing, seeing your runt reduced to a crying mess by the girls. When it ends, you smile, delete the video, and hand the phone back to the shaken cheerleader you’re standing over.
>”Thats a funny one,” you smile, looking at the coyote and her friends. “But it’s one I only care to see once. Anywhere.” Your smile falls, and your eyes snap back to Olivia’s. “You get what I mean, right?”
>She nods once, too frightened to do much else.
>You return home, and your furboy is already there in your room, waiting with his hands balled in his lap.
>”It’s done.”
>He almost leaps into your arms, mashing his muzzle into your lips in a sloppy, delighted kiss.
>With a grunt, you grip the scruff of his neck in a puppy hold, and he goes limp, letting you shove your tongue into his muzzle with impunity.
>He is YOURS, yours to use, to humiliate, to do ANYTHING with.
>No one else is allowed to use him like you do.

A Frontier Operative's Guide to Tribal Diplomacy, Subjugation, And Domestication
Chapter 4: Rabbits
Part 1, Society and Physique
>Rabbit tribes are not as common as many others, but often have a suprisingly large population size. They tend to breed fast and often, and their communities are very closely knit with strong familial and community bonds, so they are more reluctant than other anthros to split off into separate tribes. Some rabbit tribes can reach absolutely shocking population sizes.
>Rabbit tribes are rather unique, in that they will often (but not always) construct a system of underground dens to live in just under the surface, rather than your typical tribal village. This, combined with their tendency to keep to themselves and remain isolated, can make finding their tribe tricky.
>Rabbit tribes are usually quite peaceful and passive, despite their tendency to avoid outsiders. However, be warned– when their community is pushed to the brink of destruction, I have seen them rally and fight back with a ferocity and determination seldom seen amongst the anthros. Thankfully, I do not think it likely that any of you readers would do enough to earn such a response.
>Rabbits also seem fond of keeping little gardens of herbs, and sometimes even vegetables or fruits. In fact, I would recommend nurturing a trading relationship if you have any desire to. It's an effective way to earn the trust of any rabbit community you seek to interact with!
>Physically, most species of rabbit anthros are small in stature (just how small varies between species and region). They are excellent at jumping, and capable of startling bursts of speed, though their coordination and strength is rather lacking. Do mind the sharp front teeth, though. They're not usually biters, but if they do nip you it can be quite unpleasant!
>As for the sexual performance of the men... well. To be perfectly blunt, they are possibly the poorest mates I've ever seen. You may wonder how this is, considering how adept they seem at reproducing. Well, that is because they have high libidos, eager to breed often. Unfortunately for the females, "often" does not mean long, or well. The male rabbit's genitalia is remarkably small, and they seem almost genetically designed to orgasm as quickly as physically possible.
>On the occasions I have had the misfortune of witnessing their attempts, I have never once seen one last more than 5 minutes. Most seem to last between 30 seconds to 2 minutes. You may currently be discounting this as the exaggerated mockery typical of the more boastful and fanciful traveler. I assure you, I am dedicated to accuracy in all my writings, and timed most of these encounters with my pocket watch.
The shortest lasted 4 seconds.
God deliver these women from the hands of their men.
Part 2, Domestication and Ownership
>Oftentimes, the hardest part of taming a rabbit anthro is catching the darn thing! They're small, fast, and their large ears and keen noses make it hard to sneak up on them. To further complicate things, many of them have a skittish nature, making it difficult to convince one to come willingly. My advice– take advantage of the tunnel vision they get when they panic and run. It's not too hard to make them trip up by leading them into difficult terrain, or a previously laid trap.
>Once you do have one, you'll likely find a female rabbit anthro fairly easy to manage. Taming can often be achieved simply through applying liberal amounts of dick. And even if your rabbit is more resistant than most, keeping one contained shouldn't be too hard.
>The advantages of a rabbit anthro pet should quickly become apparent. Like the males, they have an extremely high sex drive, and are quick to orgasm. UNLIKE the males, they do not suffer the curse of the one-and-done. In fact, experienced rabbit girls are sometimes capable of feats of sexual stamina that could almost compare to our own!
>They are also quite soft, cuddly, and dare I day– adorable. Just be mindful of their size, if you find yourself in possession of one of the smaller breeds. Getting used to the size of a human's member can be seriously challenging task for some. But the rewards, if you can manage to acclimate one to it... well. That should be self-explanatory.
>Rabbit girls are not only endlessly willing to fuck, but also easy to pleasure and perfectly capable of taking care of their carnal needs themselves, should you not have time to indulge with them. They are also more easily impregnated than the typical anthro, and seem predisposed towards having twins, triplets, or even more.
>I wholeheartedly recommend rabbit anthros as pets, especially for anyone looking to raise a family, or breed slave stock. Due to their hyperactive sexual appetite and sensitivity to pleasure, I also highly recommend them for anyone inexperienced or uncertain in their sexual abilities– OR, for the particularly skilled master who wants a pet they can make absolutely melt, provided they have the experience to identify their furthest physical limit and utterly demolish them without crossing the it.

A Frontier Operative's Guide to Tribal Diplomacy, Subjugation, And Domestication
Chapter 5: Four Major Felids
Part 1, Society and Physique
>Their are a great many distinct species of felid anthros, but in this chapter we will focus on the four arguably most well known: Lions, Tigers, Leopards, and Cheetahs.
>Tribes of these species tend towards being warlike and aggressive, along with having a distinct sense of pride in their own tribe and race. They are often ferocious, brave... and arrogant. The latter of which is occasionally their downfall.
>Each of these species have dangerous claws and teeth, natural weapons that any prepared frontiersman must be wary of! A wild felid is never unarmed. They also have quite long tails, which aid them in balance and agility.
>Lion anthros are the most prideful of the bunch. Some tribes will believe their race is superior to all other anthros, or at least to prey species, and are particularly prone to underestimating humans. They are strong and fast enough to match with your average human warrior, forcing us to rely on humankind's natural stamina advantage when fighting one. They are also the most cooperative in their tactics, preferring to hunt and attack together in groups more frequently than their independence-valuing brethren.
>The males of the species are particularly proud of their hair and manes, flaunting them as a status symbol. Strangely, the females are considered the primary hunters (though not the primary warriors) for the tribe. In fact, I would venture to say that many of the males seem downright lazy in my experience, delegating most of the active jobs to their women. Indeed, male lions have a dominance hierarchy, with their tribal leader typically amassing a harem of lionesses to cater to his commands.
>Tiger tribes are quite prideful as well, only a little less so than lions. They are even stronger than lions however, with the average tiger anthro matching or even exceeding the strength of most trained human soldiers (Though the upper potential of our two species' strength seems roughly the same). Again, stamina is our key advantage here, as far as combat is concerned.
>Tiger tribes are a bit more cautious than some of their brethren species, tending more towards ambushes and stealth as a preferred tactic. Their tribes are usually found in areas with heavy foliage, to facilitate this. They also value the thrill of the hunt to an extreme degree, becoming immensely excited by a good chase.
>In fact, on multiple occasions I have heard of tigresses working themselves into such a fervor during their hunting of a trespassing human, that when they manage to pin their quarry they end up succumbing instantly to the human's charm in the heat of their adrenaline rush, furiously mating with him instead of their original goal of killing or capturing. If the human is a skilled enough lover to effectively leverage their superiority as mates, this can result in the tigress effectively taming herself ON you, in a bizarre scenario reversal.
>Leopard anthros are not nearly as strong, but display superior agility and speed. They are graceful hunters that take pride in their skill, as well as in the beauty of their spotted fur and lithe bodies. The grace of a leopard can be beautiful, but don't let it distract you– they are not above striking whilst one is unprepared.
>Leopard tribes will sometimes construct their villages as a series of treehouses, and are particularly fond of using trees as perches to observe and attack from. One poor soldier I encountered after his centuria had come under arrow fire from a leopard ambush was ranting in terror that "the trees were attacking them."
>Leopard anthros are not nearly as strong, but display superior agility and speed. They are graceful hunters that take pride in their skill, as well as in the beauty of their spotted fur and lithe bodies. The grace of a leopard can be beautiful, but don't let it distract you– they are not above striking whilst one is unprepared.
>Leopard tribes will sometimes construct their villages as a series of treehouses, and are particularly fond of using trees as perches to observe and attack from. One poor soldier I encountered after his centuria had come under arrow fire from a leopard ambush was ranting in terror that "the trees were attacking them."
>Cheetah tribes prefer wide open areas and blitz tactics, and it's no secret why. Alarmingly, this is a species whose speed does not just match a humans– I must admit, it surpasses us entirely. However, this is not without it's drawbacks. The stamina of a cheetah is lacking, as is their strength and fortitude. If you are ever forced into conflict with a cheetah, I impore you: stand your ground. Let the Predator become the prey, and deliver itself to you.
>It should be noted that some Cheetah "tribes" don't settle into tribal villages at all, but rather live as nomads roving a larger area. Some of them even engage in raiding behavior, preying on other tribes and frontier settlements. When it comes to defense, however, they are often ill-prepared.
>Now, after singing many praises of the abilities of these species, I must broach the matter of their most egregious trait, something present amongst the males of ALL of these species: Their penises are covered in fleshy barbs. These barbs are pointed inwards, making it difficult to retract their shaft once it is entered, and severely hampering their range of motion during mating. Even worse, such an unpleasant attribute can make sex unpleasant for the female at best, and actually painful at worst.
>Perhaps it isn't fair to blame an anthro for the physical trait they were born with. But personally, I can't help but feel a tinge of righteous anger whenever I see one of those males claim a mate as "theirs," despite the physical incompatibility. I believe THAT is the true height of their arrogance. Wholly irresponsible of them, in my admittedly biased opinion.
Part 2, Domestication and Ownership
>There are a few effective tactics one can employ, when seeking to acquire a pet from one of these species. Their typical overestimation of their own abilities and inexperience with humans can be used to bait one into hunting you, much like as described in the tiger section. A prepared frontiersman can swiftly turn the tables on their supposed "hunter" and dominate them with either strength, stamina, or sexual ability.
>Another strategy is the tried and true "run them down" method, that works on so many different anthros. Even if they are faster than you initially, a human's stamina should prove superior. Pace yourself, and soon enough you'll find an exhausted anthro girl waiting for you, helpless and too spent to put up a fight.
>Additionally, I have found a rather unconditional tactic to be suprisingly succesful. You can try simply taking one of your other anthro pets out into the open, on the edge or within eyesight of the hunting grounds of your desired prey. Make love to your pet in full view of any curious onlookers, and you might just attract an admirer, who is so captivated by the sight of an anthro actually ENJOYING the act of sex to such a degree, that their curiosity may outweigh their caution...
>Once you have one of these species, I will admit, they can be tricky to tame. Prideful, independent, and often fiery in ddispostion, they can certainly be a challenge. I wouldn't recommend them to a beginner. There's no easy shortcut to taming them in most cases, I'm afraid. It will take timeand patience.
>But when you finally do– the result is worth it. Not only are they passionate and skillfull lovers, when properly domesticated they can display shocking loyalty and affection. Some will even become remarkably submissive for their masters, in stark contrast to their typical demeanor! And once you've gotten past any initial resistance, I assure you they will be VERY thankful for you having introduced them to non-barbed cock.
>Each species has their own unique appeals, as well! Lions are energetic and eager lovers, tigers are absolutely WILD in bed, leopards display graceful movements hard to find a match for, and cheetahs can move their hips so fast that it'll leave the BOTH of you panting!
>I definitely recommend these four felid species to anyone looking for a passionate lover, a loyal and loving companion, or just a challenge! Anyone capable and willing to put in the proper work and time will undoubtedly find themselves with no regrets– and no lack of excitement.

Another Frontier Operative's Guide to Tribal Diplomacy, Subjugation, And Domestication
Hello! I saw my colleague sharing his notes here, so I figured I’d add mine. I hope you don’t mind!
Chapter 1A : Tigers
Part 1, Society and Physique
>Tigers, unlike some of the animals previously researched, are solitary predators, naturally habituating tall grass savannas. Many areas such as these have been civilized by the Empire for their excellent soil quality.
>Tigers have large, clumsy, inflexible paws and are unable to make weapons or build effective shelter. They rely solely on their jaws and claws.
>Where some once hunted, there now exists a much more effective predator, Humans. Those too stubborn to leave have taken to stalking human roads for prey. Our beasts of burden, mostly.
>Be warned! Encountering a tiger at close range can be deadly if you’re unarmed. They often try to hide in high grass, but are surprisingly easy to spot if you’re weary.
>Local governments are now arming ranchers with tranquilizers and firearms to deal with this threat, which has been greatly successful. As a result, stylish tiger pelts now decorate the walls and clothes of many farmers.
>Male tigers are larger than their female counterparts, but not by a wide margin. They don’t actually seem much stronger, either.
>The male tiger's genitals are, forgive me for my breach of scientific composure, pitiful. They’re usually wide, around two or three inches long and covered in seemingly painful spines.
>Some of my colleagues say we don’t know much about their culture. However, it is in my opinion that we have already exhausted all avenues of research into their ‘society’.
Part 2, Domestication and Ownership
>Tigers, after failing a hunt on a human rancher, are often tranqued or shot. Ironically, they seem to be doing more good than harm to these frontiersmen, as many foreigners believe that their body parts can be used in their traditional medicine. There doesn’t seem to be any scientific evidence that they actually work, but they will nonetheless pay top dollar for the testes and penises of male tigers.
>As for the females, or males, if you swing that way, domestication is an uphill battle, but a winnable one by anyone with enough patience. They are highly defiant pets, but there is one thing that females submit to - human cock.
>Even the more modestly equipped members of my team are titanic compared to the males of the tiger species. Not to mention how tight and wet their slits are, designed to end sex, usually painful for the female, as soon as possible, makes it all the more enjoyable for humans.
>As a warning, if you lack a muzzle for your pet, tiger females tend to be very vocal during sex with humans. This is not observed when mating with their own species, however.
>Hybrids between humans and tigers, interestingly, only produce sterile females. Many such females now inhabit the brothels and whorehouses of these new frontier towns. More research is required to figure out just why this happens.

>...and that was this summer's hottest hit "Hard Candy Handy!", top of the charts for over twelve weeks and counting, right here on 107.4 FM!
>And now a sponsored message from AnthroCorp!
>Now introducing SpermX, sold in a convenient powder form for all your furboy sterilizing needs! Destroys sperm right in the balls! No more cum on the carpet when your caged Furhubby creams himself from watching you and your REAL husband fuck!
>Specially formulated to not affect our Human Daddies~!
>SpermX, breed Human!
>Alright! It's 2:00PM exactly, which means it's time to switch to Darcy for her Flower Hour! All yours Darcy!
>Thanks, Daddy! Flower Hour is when our lady listeners call in for a few tips they can use later tonight~!
>Our first caller is Sienna the Doe, calling from the small town of Great Woods just north of here.
>Miss Sienna, you're on!
>"Hey, Darcy!"
>Hey, Sienna! How's Great Woods!?
>"Not great to be honest."
>Ooh, ouch! What's wrong, girl?"
>"Everything! There's a single human in my high school and he won't look at me!
>Oh no! Only a single Humie?
>"Uh-huh! I'm still a virgin because of that!"
>Dang, your town is fur central! Wee-Woo-Wee-Woo! Any humans listening in, the town of Great Woods needed YOUR cock yesterday! So tell me, Sienna. How do you dress?
>"Um... I guess normally?"
>Like what's your style? Girly-girl or tomboyish? What are you wearing now?
>"Um... shirt... and jeans..."
>Yeah, I think I see the problem. If you really want to attract that humie boy you're going to need to show yourself off! Miniskirts and hot pink thongs! Go braless for a while and let those nips stick out! By the way, are you one of those deer with the white fur under your tail and butt?
>"Y-Yeah."
>Yeah show that off, human guys go crazy over that. Cut out a larger tail hole and give him the full view at the right moment!
>"I-I think I got it! Thanks Miss Darcy!"
>You're welcome, hun! And good hunting! Call us back later when you get that cherry popped!
>Coming up next...!

>Catch burglar bat trying to steal some of your shit.
>Easily overpower her as she's barely half your size.
>Give her a choice, either be your slave or be escorted to the police, where if she has a record, will not result in a happy ending.
>She's smart, so of course she chooses the former, surely she can find some way to escape right?
>After slapping a collar on her and chaining her to the bed, you demonstrate how little power she possessed now and had your way with her.
>She wasn't a bad lay, her small body was tight in all the right places and had surprisingly big tits for her size.
>Once the pleading changed from begging to be released to begging for your cum, you knew it wouldn't be long before you broke her.
>A few more days of this and you felt confident enough to let her off her chain, the newly liberated bat taking the opportunity to do some chores around the house.
>She liked to pretend she was your roommate, it made her situation more bearable for her, a little nugget of hope she could hold onto despite her circumstance.
>You reminded her every night that you owned her fair and square, unlike her trying to steal your possessions, which ironically she had become herself.
>One day, when you cared enough, you asked what she had even been after, you weren't super flashy and your valuables weren't exactly easy to get to.
>She simply points to a gem you had in the window, some cheap glass shit you had bought online.
>You laugh in her face, telling her as much as she flushes with anger and embarrassment.
>She insists it came from her land, and that it was obscenely precious to her.
>Apparently this three buck paperweight was something called a "chaos emerald", whatever the fuck that meant.
>There were several kinds and each had different colors, but were all still called emeralds for some reason.
>Humoring her, you pluck the cheap thing off it's stand and ask what it was worth to her, turning the gem in your hand so that it caught the light.
>She quickly replied with "Anything." to which you reminded her she had nothing you didn't already have.
>Dangling the green piece of plastic over her head, you taunt her with a few dollars that she couldn't hope to afford.
>Her eyes never left the gem as she came up with a payment, all her stolen items and riches she had accrued over the years, all yours for the rock.
>You had her write down the location so you could see for yourself, but weren't so naive to leave her alone and brought her along, keeping the emerald in your pocket.
>It was a long trip, eventually ending up at a storage facility of some sort, her large unit in the back.
>Expecting nothing, you were blown away when she opened the door, more money than you had seen in your entire life behind it.
>Jewelry, currency from around the world, luxury cars, even a fucking helicopter was in there.
>Tossing the piece of junk over your shoulder, the bat yelps and dives for it, barely catching the gem before it hit the floor.
>Stuffing your pockets with some money and easily pawned items, you look to the bat as she starts chuckling, cradling the emerald obsessively.
>All of a sudden the thing starts to glow, and she points it at you with a sneer.
>She says that she regrets being so sloppy in her theft, but that she won't have to worry about that anymore, the gem glowing brighter.
>You watch her stand there pointing the chaos emerald at you for a moment, a tinge of fear in your gut as you realize she might have been right all along.
>After a minute of nothing happening, your fear was slowly put to rest.
>The smirk slowly falling of her face, the bat shakes the emerald a few times, looking confused.
>As you march up to her, she then looks worried.
>Snagging the emerald from her, the light immediately goes out, turning back into the worthless rock it was.
>Protesting, the bat whines and reaches for the gem, claiming the two of you had a deal.
>You simply grab her with one hand and throw her in the back of one of your new cars, closing the door and driving off back home.
>She wouldn't shut up the entire way back, even after being threatened, so you eventually just let her have the glowing thing, a fair trade for silence.
>You watch her in the mirror try and do something with it, but everything she attempted only resulted in her making the gem glow.
>Once you got home, you turned in for the night, planning on how to spend your new fortune and telling the bat not to stay up too late with her nightlight.
>The next morning comes and it seemed like business as usual, the bat waking you up and having breakfast ready for you before you went to work.
>Well, not anymore now, you called your boss and told him in the most colorful way possible that you quit, hanging up and enjoying your bacon.
>You didn't have to worry about a job anymore, the money in your pockets from yesterday alone would let you live comfortably for a year.
>The bat was still obsessing over the emerald as you ate, it was the only thing she had done since you let her have it.
>Bags were under her eyes as it seemed she hadn't slept, assumedly having stared at the emerald all night long.
>Interest sufficiently piqued, you ask her name and about where she came from, and if everyone there was as much a rock freak as she was.
>She responds to your questions absentmindedly, her attention wholly focused on the glowing emerald.
>You get some interesting information, including something she had initially left out about the emeralds.
>Apparently they were incredibly powerful, able to do things that were basically magic and reality warping.
>You didn't believe a word of it, yet she seemed entirely convinced.
>Maybe the rocks were part of her religion or something, in any case it was good for another laugh.
>You made sure Rouge didn't forget she had duties to do and not to spend all day staring at the thing, getting comfortable on the couch as you enjoy a lazy day.
>You're woken up a few hours later by Rouge vacuuming, giving you a show in the process as she flits around the room in tight clothing.
>You saw she kept the gem in her cleavage, loathe to part with it as her sole possession in this world.
>She wouldn't let go of it even when you fucked her that night, clutching it close as the green glow illuminated your bodies in the dark room.
>A week went by and you couldn't be happier, you had gotten a sexy slave and enough money to last you until you died, your three dollar online investment paying for itself a million times over.
>Rouge had become much more docile since she'd gotten the gem, you had expected some escape attempts but there had been none.
>She still stared at it from time to time, still keeping the piece of glass on her at any given moment.
>She was so well behaved that you took her outside with you on occasion, always dressing herself in skimpy, revealing clothes.
>You commented on this as she was making lunch one day, praising her for style of dress.
>Rouge acted confused, saying all the clothes she wore were the same ones she had always worn, even as her nipples peeked out from under her shirt.
>When you point this out, she tries to pull her shirt down, only for it to ride back up and expose her nubs again.
>She shrugs it off as gaining some weight as she hadn't been as mobile lately since being in your ownership, something you shrugged off as well.
>A day or two later, Rouge splits her pants open as she tries to clean under the couch, the seam unable to contain her fat ass.
>Her weight had increased quite a bit since you had first fucked her, as you couldn't throw her around as easily as you used to.
>She didn't seem to be getting fat really, but she was definitely filling out, her shirts unable to cover her areola anymore.
>Another week and you're woken to the sound of her struggling, trying in vain to fit into a bra that was several sizes to small.
>She had asked for your help, and when you forced the back to latch, she struggled to breathe for a moment before the bra snapped off and shot around the room.
>Needless to say she went topless that day.
>After this, she found she couldn't fit in her pants any longer either, eventually convincing you to buy her an elliptical to work out on and burn some of her fat.
>The thing was, her stomach was just about as flat as when you'd first met, all her weight had ended up in her tits and ass.
>Still it would give her something to do in her "free" time other than stare at the rock, and you didn't mind seeing her get sweaty as her mostly nude body jiggled and wobbled while she exercised.
>Unfortunately for her, after about another week, not only did she not lose any weight, she kept gaining it, letting out a frustrated groan as she stepped on the bathroom scale one morning.
>It didn't bother you any, in fact her body fit her new life perfectly, going from a curvy thief to an extremely voluptuous slut.
>Her dexterity she possessed was completely thrown out of wack by the extra load on her chest and ass, making her quite clumsy at times.
>You had put together what was most likely happening a while ago, but Rouge seemed none the wiser.
>Once you had made sure it wasn't radioactive, Rouge's claims to the chaos emerald's power seemed more legitimate.
>Only they seemed to not work the way she thought they did.
>After a month, you decide to tell her your theory, thinking the look on her face when she realized what was happening would be hilarious.
>Sitting her down, you tell Rouge that you had figured out the emerald's power, and that if she wanted to know it, she'd have to willingly give herself to you, completely.
>She thinks about it for all of two seconds before excitedly accepting.
>Casually, you explain to her in simple terms that the chaos emerald was the one responsible for her fat tits and ass, that it's power was probably some fertility idol of her country.
>Rogue immediately rejected this idea, almost flat out calling you stupid.
>So you had a little bet with her, you'd keep the gem for a week or so and see if she stopped growing or not, if she kept going up bra sizes then you'd admit she was right and keep her as a simple slave.
>If she was wrong and she plateaued, you'd own her mind, body, and soul.
>She was less keen on this, but eventually relented, fishing out the emerald from her expansive cleavage and handing it over like it was a part of her.
>You simply plop the warm gem back into its spot in the window, the gem refracting light from the sun instead of making its own.
>Over the next few days, Rouge stopped working out and watching what she ate, no point in helping you win after all.
>But even as she got a little belly, her tits and ass mostly stayed the same, their growth pretty much halted.
>As the sixth day rolled around, Rouge tried to play it off, not wanting to admit to herself, let alone you, that her precious emerald only made boobs and ass grow.
>She eventually wanted to extend the time limit, and you agreed, certain in your victory but letting her deny it until the very end.
>After thirteen days Rouge was beside herself, her bust hadn't grown a single cup size the entire time and she couldn't stand to lie to herself anymore.
>It was in that moment, with tears in her eyes that she accepted her loss, giving herself to you wholly.
>The only thing she asked in return was the emerald.
>So, gently, you pluck the gem from it's spot and hand it to her, the bat holding it close as it glowed again as if to reassure her.
>Half a month later and you had the perfect slave, though she doesn't look at it that way, preferring to think of herself as your soulmate or life partner.
>She still never let go of the emerald, maybe out of habit or comfort you didn't know, all you were sure about is that her tits and ass started growing again.
>To what end you weren't sure, but the sight and feel of her nude body never got old.
>Every morning you wake up to rouge giving you a blowie or boobjob, sometimes finishing you off in bed or leading you into the shower where you paint her insides white before she washes you.
>She then sits in your lap at the table as you grope her obscene body, literally feeding you breakfast a forkful at a time.
>You hadn't needed to buy milk in months.
>Then she'd go about her duties for the day, usually completing them by the time you return home from wherever you went out to.
>If you didn't immediately bend her over a piece of furniture, she'd get on her elliptical, and after a few minutes of jiggling she'd finish her workout by bouncing on your cock.
>Evenings were up in the air, maybe you'd stay home, go out again, or take her with you in some extremely stretchy and accommodating clothes.
>But every night was the same, you'd end the day fucking her senseless, her gem illuminating her pleasured face as she came again and again.
>Rouge was content with her new life, the emerald doing exactly what it was supposed to, giving her everything she ever wanted and fulfilling her in a way she hadn't ever dreamed of.

>It was with drunken laugher that Anon and his friends stumbled upon the female anthro shopping for the wedding dress and gangbanged her in the store, along with the employee.
>However, what she didn't expect was to like it, or to, when asked, tell them where she lives.
>Even less so did she expect for Anon and his friends to regularly visit her while her fiance was away working.
>And when they asked for the wedding date, she didn't even try to stop herself.
>So the night before was spent by her with Anon and his dozen friends, leaving her quivering, ruined and leaking, covered in sweat, piss and male semen.
>They didn't even let her shower, they just pulled the dress on her and pushed her to her furboi lover while they stood in the crowd.
>And after it was all done, as the two made their way towards the bed, Anon and his friends came in aswell.
>They put a dildo on a chair, put the furboi on it and tied him to the chair, while a train ran on the girl until she passed out.
>And then they left.

>The tribal anthros that you've been hunting for the past few months finally gather up the courage to summon their primordial twin goddesses to stop you.
>They're so confident and haughty that they don't even bother to try and sneak up on you, they just announce their presence loudly and proclaim about how they're going to enact justice on you.
>They pull out their bows and pull back the drawstrings.
>Point your hunting rifle at the older one and blow her head off, covering her sister in blood and gore.
>Her string falls loose as she just stares forward confused, turning to watch her sister, who has protected these woods unfailingly for over a thousand years, slump to the ground.
>She stands motionless, in complete shock.
>Her hands shake as she notices the blood on them.
>It was so fast, so...effortless.
>She looks back at you and now you look so much larger, so much stronger than her.
>She doesn't want to die, she doesn't want to die!
>You walk towards her and her terrified hands drop her weapon.
>She falls to her knees and begs for your forgiveness, clearly, you're the superior god.
>Slam your cock in her ass as she tells you all about the weaknesses of the village that summoned her, alongside the location of dozens of 'secret, hidden villages' full of pure maidens untouched since the world was made, that only she can find and which she was sworn to protect.
>Until she met you, of course.

>She leads you to one of the hidden villages
>The woman stare at you in awe because they never have seen a human before
>You snap your fingers and the goddess goes down on her knees and starts sucking your cock.
>The woman start to gather around the event, all wanting to see their goddess working your shaft
>When you approach orgasm she lets go of your cock and you spray your load at the closest fur woman, marking her
>She begins to eat your seed. Aroused from this act she comes closer to you and starts to go down at you as well.
>The remaining woman start to masturbate as she works your shaft
>You look over to the goddess. With tears in her eyes she looks down in shame for betraying her worshipers and her race

>Go to Asriel's house to play vidya or do homework with him
>At a given point you go "to the bathroom" for an hour or a bit more
>When you come back, is time to leave so you pick your bag and go
>Toriel goes to say goodbye and close the door with her body covered by a bed sheet
>You are invited to stay the night on saturday
>Since Asriel brother's bed can't be used, you have to sleep on Toriel's room
>Your goat friend wakes up for breakfast the day after
>Toriel is on a cleavege-revealing coat serving the plates
>You look as if a truck just rolled over you
>She looking reluctanct with a big smile
At least you discovered that "six" is your limit

>This was her prize, her daddy's cock ramming her matured and as of an hour ago, completely unused pussy
>This month she had managed to recruit fifteen female students, all virgins, to join your exclusive harem
>You had enjoyed the steady supply of new teens to deflower every other night
>But for now the girl deserving all the attention was the english teacher, bent over her desk and drooling like a rabid dog
>A quick glance out the open door revealed the rest of the teachers glaring jealously at their colleague
>Not only at the cock she was enjoying but the new ring around her finger, something only the highest ranking of the harem was allowed
>She howled as she felt the intense warmth of her husband's sperm flood of dormant womb
>After so many years of cleaning up after other women's bastard kids she would finally be blessed with children of her very own
>From the man she actually loved, no less
>She melted onto the table, limp and unconscious from her orgasm
>You called the physical ed teacher in, she got second place
>More hisses and curses were vocalized by the others but none would say it to the face of a tall, muscled mare who could smash their ribs in with a single kick to their chests
>But even she knelt and submissively took your wet, still pulsing cock into her mouth
>She didn't care that it tasted of a thousand other females, even being allowed to accept it into her mouth was a high honor
>By the time you fed her your second shot of cum her arousal had created a puddle underneath her
>It eventually formed a mirror that gave you a good look at her desperately winking horse cunt
>Too bad, maybe if she worked a little harder you'd be willing to seed her as well
>In third was math teacher, a cute fox barely out of her internship
>She would be allowed to eat the dripping cum straight out of the english teacher's gaping hole
>Everybody else would have to settle with watching, a powerful incentive for trying harder

>Taking your deer gf out into the woods so you can 'hunt' her with paintballs while she ducks and dives naked through the undergrowth.
>It reminds her of how the two of you met.
>Fuck her in the backseat of your car while she's covered in paint, mud, scratches, sweat and tears.

You're a judge and you're being brought over to a difficult case. A jaywalker was recorded and identified as a male anthro of some variant. After the police reviewed all the proof, they narrowed down the list of anthros that might be responsible (from left to right):
>free anthro, physical worker, age 24,
>>clean criminal record
>>claims he was walking home after drinking in a anthro bar, denies that he would've been that drunk after 6 beers as to jaywalk
>>>might've been drunk enough to think we wouldn't catch him for this
>collared anthro, servant, age 19,
>>clean criminal record
>>>has served his master after voluntarily being collared at the age of 18 for no compensation
>>claims he was sent to the store to buy a pack of candy after his owner and his half a dozen friends "gaped" him, states that jaywalking never even crossed his mind
>>>he might have been "gaped" enough that he took a shortcut, owner revealed he was indeed "gaped" and that he had stuffed a massive buttplug up his servants ass before sending him on his way
>free anthro, office worker, age 21
>>criminal record reveals offences of:
>>spitting chewing gum on the sidewalk (age 18), was offered collaring, upon their refusal was re-judged into 1 year as public gloryhole for 20 hours a week in fox quarter
>>littering (throwing a bottlecap next to a trash bin during his celebration for finishing the previous sentence) (age 19), was offered collaring, upon their refusal was re-judged into 1 year as public gloryhole for 40 hours a week in wolf quarter
>>misdemeanor (aggressive posturing and looks towards officers when arrested) (now), offered collaring, punishment is chastity + muzzle in addition to gloryhole service for 1 year for 80 hours a week in stallion quarter
>>claims he was walking home after a tiring day at the office and that he would never, ever breach the law again
>>>repeated offences make him the prime suspect
It is left up to you, as the sole judge to assign any and all punishments.

The setting is pretty much our early 1970's, except there is global peace between nations as humans internationally primarily concern themselves with domming and brainwashing anthros into prime servants, completely obedient and subservient. The human population is slightly under half a billion, while the anthros count well over 3 billion.
The anthros are completely subservient, however the free anthros are allowed quite a lot of freedoms (of living space, of personal property and rights, of jobs...) and make up a bit over 2 billion, while the rest are the collared anthros, who give up their rights to everything other than not being mutilated/killed to a human in exchange for being able to personally and directly serve their human masters.
Anthros have a deep reverance for humans and will generally do what the humans tell them, short of truly retarded things. An anthro male would without much convincing let himself be tied up while an human takes his wife. Anthros have also greatly normalized sex and sexual acts.
The quarters are segments of the city where certain sub-species of anthros are expected/incentivized to live.
Punishments are expected to not (permanently) main/mutilate the anthro. The tamer punishments are usually exhausting/humiliating sexual acts, while the more extreme ones are more uncomfortable/exhausting/humiliating. The most extreme punishments may be long lasting and affect anthros, tho almost all punishments are very cruel and humiliating by human standards.
An anthro may expect to be put in a bitchsuit for half a decade for trying to commit small theft like chewing gum. Or he might end up having to anally service horses daily for a decade if he lies to a human. He might end up having to wear an armbinder with a anal hook to keep him in proper posture if he tries pickpocketry. Or he might end up wearing a chastity cage because he looked at a human with anger.
Anthros are very subservient and broken in to the extreme.

>tiger girl wanders into town
>there is a shrine worshiping a anthro goddess
>she decided to become a priestess at the shrine, thinking she devoted herself worshiping the goddess of her race
>it's her first sermon and there is a suspicious amount of human men in the crowd
>the new priestess is shocked as the others start to chant about human superiority and human supremacy
>the high priestess tells her collect offerings from the humans
>upon collecting the offerings the humans grope her breasts and slap her ass.
>one human tried to collar her because he liked how exotic she is
>the priestess manages to avoid the collaring and returns to the others on the altar.
>she chants now with them and can feel herself going in heat form all the excitement but she still has doubts if she should be even working in shrine.
>she goes to read the holly scriptures to find out if the goddess really told the others to worship humans.
>as she reads the scriptures she can here the goddesses voice in her head
>she tells her about how all anthros are prey and need to serve the Apex predators, how they should serve mankind
>as if like under a spell the priestesses hands start to wander under her robes, she sits now on the table where the holly scriptures are placed and spreads her legs out over them
>she starts to furiously masturbate as the goddesses voice echos in her head, telling her how worthless she is compared to humans
>she decides to stay in the shrimp after that ordeal, worshipping humanity

>discover that earth being controlled by reptilian ayys
>resistance time
>infiltrate cia, fbi, kgb something like that
>start working hard to get me promoted
>69 years forward
>69 years full of throwing a monkey wrench into aliums plans
>captured ayy agent and mating pressed her into mindbreaking, captured her superiors and mating pressed them too
>have small team of competent people which i trust
>together we are fucking (both literally and figuratively) reptiloids untill they are leave our planet alone
>these are my...
>x-cum files

"Meeeat, we-he-heeere fuck'ng Me-hee-hee-hee-eaat~" sobbed the Aquatic Kobold as she squirmed against her bonds. The hooks in her gills filled her with an oxyginated high as her senses were overwhelmed with the fate of her mutual slaves. A few moments ago, there were five little Kobold slaves. Now though...
>KVRRRRRRRRRRRRNGKRKRRRRR
The third one couldn't scream. Two others had gone in before him. They screamed. He screamed too, inbetween jacking himself off, at least before the gears had shredded his little cock and balls. It felt so good having them pulverized, Kobolds take abuse well like that. His lungs had been popped with the threshers like the others, but he couldn't go down further. A rib was stuck in the side, leaving the poor little mulcherbait to struggle. Held between oblivion and escape in vain, his organs slipped down the metal jaws like the chain of an anchor, whipping away. A sputtered gurgle escaped his mouth as he felt the end's precipice, his poor little body at the mercy of the world and its kafkaesque indifference to him. The human groaned, and retrieved a long metal pole.
"Ugggh, c'mon..."
As the Kobold struggled against the sides, the human Man took the stick and gently pressed it against the little meat's chest. The kobold's survival instinct overtook how much he loved being destroyed, loved watching others be destroyed, and he grabbed at the stick, not really even sure what for, as with a loud snap, a jolt of pain signaled the return of those chomping crushing gears. The Kobold's brain was again, flooded with crushing, and all thoughts but pain and becoming meat over took his mind. And nothing but the sharp crunching gears overtook the pointlessly firing slurry of neurons and bone that was that little Kobold's head. The aquatic pissed herself and squirmed, crying and begging;
"Meeeee~ Meee next, Pleee-hee-hee-eeeeese~"
Her final accompaniment was a terrestrial Kobold, and she'd been more apprehensive to the fate of the others. She tried to escape after watching the girl go in, but all she'd done was fall on her chest, leading to a few painful slaps on her ass, and the pile of flesh that was her mutual slaves was sludging closer, the sickly smell of offal, blood and guts wafting in through her snout. She was going to die. She was going to be turned into more of that sludge in the pile, there was no escaping this. So... now or never then, she considered. A portion of meat from one of the slaves has slid towards the snout, and she thought of taking a bite. She feared that would lead to her going next sooner, but what was a minute or two between meat? She slowly darted her eyes between the machine, the boy now well through the entry and being converted into fresh bloody chunks, the other girl threshing and sobbing in a predated blissout, and a warm piece of flesh just waiting for a little taboo. The apprehensive opened her maw, before clamping it shut. The Human was coming.
"Alright then..."
He sighed and reached down to grip the fins of the noisy aquatic, who gasped and eyes widened knowing, she was next.
"OH THANK YOU! *SOB* THANK YOU SO MUCH I'M C-*SOB* I'M GONNA DIE AND I'M CU-"
A quick punch to match her other shiner shut her and made her squirt out a little before gurgling a moan and squirming in her ropes. The Human sighed and, while readjusting his grip to the Aquatic's neck closing her gills and choking her, he pulled out a large sharp cleaver from a rack on the counter beside them. He made quick work of the edible twine the whiny grillbait was wrapped in (The Human didn't want to untie His morsels as He made them into meat.) and let her limbs and tail dangle loosely in his grip. They'd atrophied from days of bondage, waiting for their destruction, which now came personally to the little chatterbox. The Human laid this meat on the counter and...
KSHUNK!
"uuuooOAOAAAAAAAAGGH-"
KSHUNK!
"URRAAAGGGGGAAAAHHHHH, AAAAG-"
KSHUNK!
Her limbs sliced off like butter in his hands.
The cleaver cleaned flesh, bone and flesh again in one clean powerful hammer down. And as she tried to prop herself up with a barely functioning arm running on adrenaline
KSHUNK!
In moments, what had been a weepy aquatic kobold in love with snuff, into a weepy kobold fuckmeat nugget, spurting blood and cumming itself as she bit through her own tongue, spurting bloody moans and shrieks. The Human was merciless, and leaving the poor girl no time to breath, proceeded to slice her tail down the bottom and peel the meat right off her bone. That got her shrieking and wheezing, bucking about bloody. All the while, the Human was trick-shotting her limbs through the tresher, as more chunks of slave meat poured, now coating the snout of the oppurtunistic cannibal.
"Don't think I don't see you there," said the human as he put down the cleaver and retrieved a straight razor to dig at the Aquatic's neck. Her screams were literally cut short, and her eyes widened as she gazed in self-destructive ecstasy, screaming and mouthing the thoughts "I love you" to her Human. He barely registered her confession as she died for Him, still monitoring the last little meat to destroy.
"Go ahead, eat as much as you want. I was going to pump them into your gut as we fucked anyway."
The human took the bloody limbs of the other girl, freshly snuffed and started feeding them into the machine, rubbing the pussy of the last kobold with His foot.
"God, you're all such MEAT aren't you? You actually, like-"
The Human bent down and pulled up the little thing by its ear to see the decapitated head of the Aquatic. A look of bliss and release was frozen on her face.
"You freaks actually fucking enjoy this. You WANT to die don't you?"
The Human pressed the dead girl's snout to the living one's, slurry between her teeth.
"You want to BE like this."
She did.

>There is only one gender; Man
>everything else is vice and meat
>women are product, enbies, herm, little bottom boys are all product
>it is okay to do whatever you want to product if you are a Man
>rape it, breed it, keep it, eat it, do as you wish it's YOUR property, IF it's YOUR property
>there is no limit to your passions, no instruction on what your restrictions are
>only that no PRODUCT is allowed to exist in perpetuity for 30 years
>all product must die at least once every 30 years
>no woman has lived without being killed
>Product was meant to be used and discarded
>if certain emotional settings, or 'souls' as some people call them, entice a Man, he can elect to have a Black Box chip installed in his meat
>many countries grow meat only with this feature
>said memories and mental patterns can then be applied to new meat for mental 'continuity' between clones

>Men are sadistic and dominant, and are raised to embrace this world and their freedom
>they generally 'sample the platter' before settling on a few age ranges of lover to revive and reuse over and over. All in personal preferences
>90% of people are Product, and used in more than violent lover roles, providing medical subjects, testing for weaponry, parts for Men like organs and more
>eating product flesh, even brain, has no prion or other diseases involved, and women generally replace most domestic animals as various types of food
>modifications can be made to meat with each new clone

>it’s been a lonely couple years away from my family
>at first the solitude in its own way was liberating. But now it’s an oppressive fog of loneliness
>job, go home, make some dinner, bedtime
>over and over
>one afternoon after coming home from the soul crushing job. I decide enough is enough
>no more suffocating solitude, I need a companion
>but getting an actual girlfriend or something takes work, I’d have to find somebody interested and work my way up. What a bunch of bullshit that sounds like
>instead, I’m taking my ass to a pet store
>gonna have a freshly made little friend from one of their “specialty made artificed being” pods
>I go to my laptop. And I’m given a massive selection choices. I’m free to mix and match whatever I like with my product. And have as much functionality as I want, anything goes

>Isekai into what you think is some anthro jrpg world
>Occasional hyperadvanced technology around, assume it's just The Ancients™ and move on
>Get with a bricc shit house of a mare with a chainsaw axe in the meantime
>Life is good
>Then a golden spaceship with the Aquila shows up in the sky one day, and you realize you've been banging one of the primarch daughters of the Empress of Horse/Anthrokind
>Also you're in 30k

Thursdays were either my favorite or worst nights during the summer. Monday night was prize night for the anthros and humans in the Grudge Club. For the uninitiated saddleback grudge club is a vital component in the race war prone town of saddleback, letting humans and anthros tear into one another in a relatively controlled setting. Thursday night was fight night and Monday was prize night. During the school year the days were Friday fights and Sunday prizes, which meant that you were usually in some real pain and still exhausted from winning your fight, or worse from losing your fight. But tonight wasn’t a bad night to be me.
When the families meet for the Grudge Club, there is a drawing and those with the highest numbers drawn get to challenge their opponents. The opponent can accept the fight or just surrender right then and there. Men and boys can only challenge men and boys in their own age group. Women and girls can challenge women and girls in their own age group or any man or boy they want.
If you are challenged and decide to fight then both opponents get to pick a member of the opponent’s family to wave the flag. Only the flag waver can stop the fight during the first thirty minutes, if they do then both the opponent and the flag waver become the prize. After thirty minutes either opponent can give up and only they become the prize. You can make a challenge or accept a challenge only if you have one family member not already fighting or committed as a prize.
Thursday came around and off we went to the warehouse. One of the club sponsors was in real estate and had a warehouse complex nicely located. Families from four nearby states could reach it. Eighteen families showed up, a total of 79 fighters. It would be a long night.
Everybody filed in and took their tickets. The warehouse was hot. Everybody shed their clothes. Fighting was done wearing nada, bare footed, no braces, pads, rings or jewelry. anthros are nude at all times so it was only fair.
The computer generated its list and the names were printed out and passed around. Mom got number 5. Cindy got 12. Jessica got 20. Dad our best fighter got 48, a few out of town relatives got other numbers and I got the absolute tail end number of 79. Best for last huh.
There were four eight by eight foot chain link cages placed about five feet apart in a square in the middle of the big empty warehouse. The floor was heavily padded with white pads that bore the stains of previous fight nights. The areas around the outside of the cages were dotted with mats. Losers would be servicing the families of winners after their fights. Tables with water and food lined the back wall and there were two bleak restrooms, one on each opposing wall. It was bare bones and more than few unlucky losers were raped in them. Still, it had all the basic requirements for a night of sex and violence.
None of the first four numbers challenged any of us so we got to watch four spirited brawls: Moms, Dads, sons, and Moms again. Mom got to pick next. She chose Mrs. Doeling, an older, but strong Deer woman who lived next door and eats from our backyard garden. Early on in our membership Mom and Dad and Mrs. and Mr. Doeling had developed a grudge. They won more than they lost and the deers usually didn’t push their luck anymore, the deer must have gotten back into a spat with mom. Mrs. Doeling chose Dad as Mom’s flag waver and Mom chose Mr. Doeling as his wife’s flag waver. Now both couples’ fates rested in the hands of the women. It was sure to be a brutal desperate battle.
Mom was a firm, thirty-four year old woman. She had a round face and high cheek bones, full lips and dark eyes. She wore her brown hair curly to just above the jaw line. Tonight her principal weapons, her nails were painted red and silk-wrapped. She stood 5’6” and weighed 139 pounds with a slightly soft figure. Her bush was trimmed and vent just barely visible as a line of pink. Her nipples are brown, thick and rubbery. They’ve taken a lot of nasty abuse and held up. Her weak spot is her belly and crotch.
Doeling was a lean forty year old deer. She had a boney face, long nose and twinkling eyes Her well groomed pelt was cut short and glistened in the spotlights. She had grown our her nails tonight and they were savagely long, not always a good thing since they could snap off to easily, those she probably didn't think about that. and her legs are stronger from a lifetime of forest prancing. At 5’4” and 123 pounds she is a well refined athletic machine with a pair of musclebound breasts still diligently lactating when needed for her many fawns some of whom have come to cheer on their underdog mother. Her nipples are tiny little points hidden under the while fur.
The fights are meant to be brutal but not deadly or even permanently maiming. Fists, feet, knees, elbows, biting and scratching to the head and face were supposed to be forbidden, but if one fighter did it they would be broken apart and asked if they wanted to go to the face. A second occurrence meant it was all out no matter what. About half of the fights went that far. The only things truly forbidden were eye gouging, biting off body parts and purposeful bone breaking. These fights were brutal and the purpose was to hurt the opponent so much that their flag-waver would wave the flag before thirty minutes were up. Few fights lasted longer than ten and it helped keep random outbreaks of violence down across town and putting all that animal brutality in a relatively controlled setting.
Mom and Mrs. Doeling really hated each other and early on in their history Mrs. Doeling beat Mom badly, but Mom has turned the tables on the deer bitch. Mrs. Doeling looked a little scared as they waited for all four fights to start. The sweat was already rolling down her tits and dripping on the mat like juice from a honey ham, or in this case Venison.
The flags were distributed. Each fighting ring had a referee standing outside. The single timekeeper counted down from ten and the fights started with a roar.
I was watching Mom and Mrs. Doeling. Doeling crouched and circled as Mom moved forward trying to take her down and use her reach. Mom faked her out with a rush and dodged a snatch at her hair. She kicked and missed. Mrs. Doeling rushed in herself and rammed into Mom driving her backwards. Mom groaned as the middle of her back hit the cage wall. Mrs. Doeling hugged Mom to her and sank her flat teeth and nails into Mom’s upper right breast.
Mom cried out and jerked the animal by the ears back hard with both hands. Mrs. Doeling moaned as the ears on her head was stretched back giving her a ring of tinnitus Mrs. Doeling tried to crush Mom’s ribs and hurt her back, but the two of them were locked together in a stalemate.“Leave our gardens alone you woodland twig!” Doeling huffs and pants like a horse keeping mom pinned up against the cage even with her head pulled back in a spine bending arch and getting gut busted by the other arm while Doeling's arms still blindly claw and yank at wherever they can get a grip on.
As they grunted and groaned chest to chest, Doeling ripped out a tight fist of hair and Mom howls in agony and elbows her in the side of the face with an impulsive reaction. Doeling steps out and yells for a break and the ref separated the pair to asked them if they wanted to go all out. Mom and Doeling said yes and no at the same time and the fight started again with Doeling getting to take a free swing as mom's penalty.
A pair of refs are sent into the ring to make the transition a smoothone as they line up mom for doeling's free swing. Sure enough the deer's right hand exploded against mom's cheek and the refs disengaged as the announcer alled "fight" in time with the *thunk* of deer knuckles impacting mom's face. Her head snapped around and I thought it might be over, mom looked like she could drop then and there and the ecstatic, suprised smile of deerling said that she thought the same, a great turnaround for a girl who came into this thinking she was going to lose.
Her possie of children whooped and hollered and Dad nearly woze the flag for mercy right then and there. While doelight turned around to raise her fist in a pose for her family Mom turned halfway around and then came back like a coiled spring with a backhand that hit knuckle first to Doeling's smiling lips. The anthro's head snapped backwards and she spat blood and a tooth, the match was back on this time with both girls on the attack.
Mom met the charge, won the resulting battle of body weight physics and grabbed one handful of the deer woman’s muzzle, she shoved her head back and kicked her in the back of the knee. Mrs. Doeling fell hard into a kneel and crotchpunched mom. Mom gritted through the pain and rolled with the hit, jerking her deer foe across the mat by her grip spinning doeling around. mom kicks doeling in the back and applies are armbar around Doeling's neck. The audience watching Mom’s fight cheered her for that relatively high skill move.
Mrs. Doeling bleats in surprise and claws at Mom’s wrists. Mom keeps a wide stance for balance and double gripped the neck to really double down on her suddenly quite advantageous position. Mom now intermittently drives her knee into the brown hide of Doeling's back as she still wrestles to keep a hold of the thrashing animal woman who was really beginning to panic. Mrs. Doeling huffs and writhes while her back gets tenderized.
Doeling suffered for 2 full minutes in that brutal dance as welts of blue and black bruises covered her back and she screamed curse after curse at my smiling Mom. "Hu-*Umph*-man i'll kill you you hea-*huff**r me!" Unable to get Mr. Doeling to wave the flag Mom suddenly gave up on trying to break the deer's back and lets go. Mrs. Doeling feels an anguishish soreness of pain as she suddenly has mom throwing her onto her back and dropped her selfdown on the anthro woman’s biceps
Sitting on Doeling in what is almost a headsit and riding her arms, Mom was in perfect position to oblitterate the doe’s boobs. Mom jerked the girl's tough tits straight up by the nipples. Mrs. Doeling had small bags and they were rightly exposed. Mrs. Doeling screams and kicked. Mom worked her teeth into the fleshy milk bags and extracts a few trickles of milk meant for her babies all while hammer smashing on the deer's exposed belly. The deer woman's howls of pain from all this were however still very flavoured as cries of a fighting rage and not a crying grovel and between the *whump*s of breath being pounded out of her the clacking of her jaws were ringing out as Doeling now tries to repeatedly bite at mom's vaginal bush and lips which mom had to stay mindful of.
She tried to knee Mom as well, but Mom's hands had the leverage and gravity on their side to shove those hooved legs away every time the deer's legs got lively. Mom yelled for Mr. Doeling to wave the flag or she’d tear off his brittle ass wife’s tits. He cursed back at her.
Mrs. Doeling kicked her feet blindly and rolled back and forth. She got her right arm free and immediately reached up and grabbed Mom’s right tit at its base and squeezed. Her long hoof nails worked into Mom’s flesh. Mom groaned and took it, twisting the deer's nips back and forth.
Still writhing on her back, Mrs. Doeling got her other arm free.
Mom tried to put a knee across Mrs. Doeling's shoulder, but the deer grabbed the back of Mom’s hair with her newly freed hand, jerked it down and back. Mom yelped, and was forced to lean backwards a bit. Close enough to get in a bite. Mrs. Doeling sank her teeth into Mom’s pussy. Doeling’ teeth clamped down getting a good mouthful of Mom’s hairy hanging pussy lips.
Mom screamed and let go of the deer’s tits. She stomps the deer's belly and clawed at the lower part of Mrs. Doeling’ face. She got a finger inside Mrs. Doeling lips and used the woman’s mouth to pull the teeth away causing a her bush to rip. Mom wails like a Banshee and stumbled away from Doeling to then falls over clutching her crotch cussing like a sailor and checked her pussy for blood, there was none yet. Doeling for her part convulses on the floor a few times before getting back up in a slow agonizing process as her bruising really sets in. She's chewing Mom's black bush like it was any other cud of grass. Silently taunting her. Mrs. Doeling was exhausted but smiling. So what if she was worse off, she had got Mom in the cunt.
Both families cheered telling their matrons to get their heads back into it and attack. I heard the sound of fists on faces and turned back to the cage. Mom and Doeling were pounding each other again. Mom’s bare crotch was an irritant pink. Mrs. Doeling’s well fists were connecting again and again. Mom had to retreat. The deer followed through with a a pursuing tackle. Mom lashed out with a low kick and connected with a jarring heel to Mrs. Doeling’ leading knee. The anthro woman staggered forward grabbing for Mom as her knee wobbled on her. Mom sidestepped the charging bitch, grabbed the back of her head and propelled her face first into the cage wall.
Slam! Mrs. Doeling had been falling forward and Mom gave her a big help. As her knees hit the mat her face rammed full force into the fence. The watching crowd roared with appreciation.
all except Mr. Doeling. It was the loudest roar around our cage. The grudge fight was still the loudest as both women had a great deal of support and were clearly among the most spirited bitches at this time
Mom drove her knee into the doe woman’s shoulder blades crushing her against the cage wall. Her tits flattened and dimpled through the bars of the cage. Mom screamed for Mr. Doeling to wave the flag. He called her a cheating cunt and told her to fuck off.
Mom scowled through her swollen lips and grabbed the back of Doeling's head by her ears and dragged the deer woman’s face back and forth across the bars. The crowd roared and pushed to get a better view. Doeling groaned and her forehead ripped open on one of the bars. Her snout was raw. Her lips soon started bleeding. Mom scrubbed the poor deer’s face across the wall only once more for worry of the clause against truly permeant damage and her husband toughed it out.
Mrs. Doeling got her left hand between the bars and her bloody face. Mom jerked back on the dear’s ears and then pushed forward banging her face first into the back of her own hand. Doeling groans and slumps over like a drunk. Mom howled in triumph and used her knee into the back again. It was a total ass whipping now. Mr. Doeling looked at the time keeper who flashed five fingers three times and then one finger telling the man his wife had sixteen minutes of beatings to go unless he waved the flag.
Mrs. Doeling was now. Mom continued kneeing the beaten whitetail, jarring her and crushing her tits to the fence. Mr. Doeling cursed and finally waved the flag. Mom stepped back and an angry delirious Mrs Doeling writhed on the ground demanding to keep going. Mom and Dad celebrated with a big hug a dad ran into the cage to hug mom. Mrs. Doeling was
fireman carried by dad to thr trunk of our car out of the ring on mom's behalf while Mr. Doeling gets and tied in ropes by staff til deemed 'safe to handle.' by mom.
Cindy versus Jane croc was a guaranteed grudge match and fights with history got the biggest crowd. The other three fights included sons, dads, and moms. Whoever held number thirteen got to fight in the twelve spot since Cindy’s number had lost its value. I really didn’t care what happened in the other cages because quite literally my ass was on the line and Cindy had been Jane’s whipping bitch for a long time.
Cindy and Jane were relatively well matched, both being in the youngest age class. Cindy had long brown hair, brown eyes, red short but sharp nails, a smallish set of tit buds and a small tiny still developing ass. She stood near five feet and weighed 95 slender pounds. Jane was closer to 4’11” and weighed 120 pounds. She was sturdier, but the real difference was she had 33C tits already, solid, firm, up tilted, pert balls of flesh under those scales with long thick green nipples seated in a marble sized raised bumpy aureole. Jane was a real beauty even with the two week old bruises she had on her tits and ass from her habitual schoolyard scraps. If she grew up she would have basketball tits and a fabulous figure. The genes for those honkers certainly cam4 from her mom’s side of the family, speaking of the croc mom, she was on temporary observer status with a broken hand, she was a fat bitch.
The one thing about our club is that everybody loves a winner and Jane was a winner. She had at least ninety percent of the crowd shouting for her. Cindy looked determined. I hoped the hell she was ready for a beating because I wasn’t waving that flag. I didn’t care if Jane took Cindy’s nipples home as trophies and ate em, my sister wasn’t going to get to quit until the thirty minute flag period was up.
Both agreed right before the start that this was all out and they would go to the face from the beginning. The crowd loved mean girls!
The timekeeper started the battle and the little bitches flew at each other like wildcats. Screaming, clawing, grabbing hair and kicking they leapt together and fell into a tiny ball of fury. The crowd went apeshit. I couldn’t tell who was winning. A large ball of blonde hair was soon on the mat and Cindy of all things was on top. I yelled with surprised pleasure and not a little relief. Now if she could survive for twenty eight minutes I was off the hook.
They were plastered together. Jane had one of Cindy’s legs in a scissor between her thighs. She was clawing at Cindy’s back with her left hand and ripping at Cindy’s long brown hair with her right. Jane was screaming too because my sister had sunk her teeth into Jane’s right bicep, had her right hand tugging at Jane’s tail and her left hand in between them mauling Jane’s right boob. The crowd started to shift to Cindy. They really don’t care who wins usually. They just like to see a nasty fight and these little bitches in training were giving them one from the start.
Jane bucked and pulled at Cindy’s long blonde hair until she had Cindy rolled onto her side. Their legs scrambled in a tangle for control and the top position. Cindy kneed and got kneed. Both girls took hard knees to their young cunts and kept on going like nothing had happened. Cindy lost a wad of hair above her left ear. The amount of hair on the mat was making everyone cringe in sympathy imagining the stinging in her scalp she must be experinceing, but as Cindy’s feral roaring and sceaming overshadows it most didn’t care beyond momentary observation.
The side-by-side bitter fight continued. Cindy got four nasty scratches down the side of her face. She smacked Jane in the eye three times with her fist until the croc had to grab Cindy’s wrist in her jaws.
Crawling on top was tougher than the bitch croc had hoped. As Jane lifted her right leg across Cindy’s sweaty flat belly my sister drove a knee into the croc girl’s ovaries. This time Cindy must have scored perfectly because Jane moaned and flopped back on her side. Cindy climbed onto Jane mounting her hips. Jane still had Cindy’s arms so the mount wasn’t perfect.
They struggled in this position for some time. Both were slick with sweat, all from cindy since lizards don’t sweat. The human girl with covered in scratches and bruises while jane’s armoured scaled were keeping her comparatively well off. The bites on Cindy’s arms wept droplets of blood.
Unable to gain control, Cindy dropped her mouth to the side of Jane’s right breast. Jane yelped and twisted away, but my savage sister caught the side of the fleshy ball in a nasty bite of her own. Her belly was an easy target for a stomp which sinks deep into her soft underbelly, Jane screams and rolled onto her belly freeing Cindy’s wrists and guarding her chubby gut by exposing her rigged back.
Cindy’s freed hands seized the back of the croc’s head by the lips and rammed her face into the mat. Holding Jane down by her head, my sister got mounted on the small of the girl’s back and rode her for a few minutes. Jane lost some stamina from wild thrashes and got her face smashed around, but it could have been far worse. In truth, Cindy spent most of the time sucking in air and regaining her strength while she had a superior sitting position. I think she was so surprised to be on top she didn’t go for the immediate finish.
I checked my watch. The two wildcats had been at it for fifteen minutes. All my sister had to do was last fifteen minutes and I’d be off the hook. If she lost she’d get fucked and I’d be free to enjoy whatever other fight prizes my family brought home. Grudge Club does not teach the milk of human kindness or make you your brother’s or sister’s keeper!
Jane clawed Cindy’s left forearm bloody, but it was locked in. Jane twisted and writhed, but there was no escape. Her motions became more and more pathetic. She was floundering.
The referee got close to the door and appeared ready to intervene. A fight could be stopped when someone was knocked out or choked out. Jane’s mother yelled for her brother to wave his flag. He shook his head, the little bitchboy coward. I couldn’t believe he’d let his sister suffer. Okay, I was planning to do the same thing, but I didn’t have to now. So nobody knew I would have let Jane maul Cindy to unconsciousness. So he was the coward, not me. Everybody loves a winner. Go Cindy!
Jane whimpered and waved her hands desperately in the air signaling her surrender. The referee turned to the timekeeper. Six minutes and thirty seconds to go! The referees started to approach the cage door. If Jane was choked out the hold would be broken and Jane revived with a ten second break. Cindy would then be let loose on her.
But before the referee opened the cage door, Cindy released Jane off onto her belly. The croc writhed and wheezed. She had been close to being out.
Cindy climbed on top again, grabbed the anthro’s jugular with both hands and jerked her upwards in a nasty backwards arch. Jane gargles as her neck and back is stretched in the wrong direction. Now my triumphant, sadistic sister held the beaten swamp beast in the boston crab with her left and started punching the side of Jane’s face with her right fist. The angle was bad, but my sister tossed in one looping down stroke after another, pounding Jane’s ear and cheek. When Cindy’s right arm got tired, she switched hands and gave the other side of Jane’s face a beating.
At the two minute left mark, Cindy let Jane drop to the mat. She stood, grabbed Jane’s claw feet and lifted her legs up bowing the girl's back again and exposing her young scaly pussy for all to see.
There was a brief cheer at the move and then a collective groan as Cindy’s foot kicked Jane in the cunt. The empathy was soon replaced by a slow count to ten as my sister put her feet to her rival’s cunt ten times without much tangible response by the croc outside of some hissing and thrashes which cindy can't keep control of so she steps back.
When her legs were dropped, Jane curled up into a tiny ball begging for relief. Her brother shook his head, what a little shit! His sister had given him free rape sex with cindy a dozens times , but he was going to let her take the full thirty minutes. I felt vastly superior to the cold blooded bastard now. I hoped he did wave the flag. I planned a particular brutal introduction to my cock, no holes barred.
Cindy stomp kicked Jane in the small of the back again and again until the girl was against the cage. Then Cindy knee dropped onto Jane’s ribs. Jane groaned, hissing. Cindy grabbed Jane’s useless arm, raised it and let the thing drop, the brother of the losing lizard had a red stiffy poking out of his groinscales he was trying to hide.
There had been a couple of brother versus brother, sister versus sister and sister versus sister matches in our club. They were special events and had all grown out of situations where a flag waver had let a sibling suffer rather than become a prize. I hoped Jane got her chance to take revenge on her shit for blood brother. I was feeling really superior now!
With a grunt as the timer ticks down Cindy pools her energy and lifts to Jane to full height. Hands reach down to grab the croc brawler by the back of her head and reaching forward, her arms hook around her waist to sweep the battered girl into the air upside-down, hugging her cold, scaly back against her skin before dropping the croc girl's head and shoulder into a collision to the mat in a piledriver.
Lke a deflated balloon Jane would go slack.
Her eyes suddenly glazed over. Her jaw open and drooling, arms fenced out unnaturally, vibrating for a moment incoherently. Jane croc was dead to the world. Another reveal of Jane’s virgin cunt is put out for the rowdy crowd as her upside down legs split open and that floppy tail drapes over her head.
At that final, Cindy would be absolutely giddy like a school girl, hugging Jane’s body like a giant plush toy unwilling or just forgetful to let go of her opponent. When the ref bluntly told Cindy she had to let Jane go, she pouted like a child. "Oh, alriiiiiight," she sighed. Cindy Stepping over Jane's defeated body spanked her scaly ass and propped her croc’s vag to the wooping crowd.
The ref, a big human man cracked open the smelling salts for Jane and straddled the croc to do some cpr until Jane is brought back into the waking world kicking and screaming. Jane writhes on the mat delirious for ten seconds begging her brother to throw in the towel for her but he declines the request and Cindy resumes the fight.
Cindy straddle’s Jane and mauls the groggy girl’s tits for a full two minutes. It was already bright red. Now deep scratches appeared. Dark bruising started where Cindy’s fingers had penetrated deep into the tit flesh. It went on and on. Jane howled in total tit agony until the timekeeper rang a bell. At that point Jane whimpered out her surrender. Cindy released the croc and ran around the cage. She’d just overcome her greatest enemy.
Ciny put a foot on Jane’'s ass and made a pose for the crowd to take pictures. The pose was... well, very cute. Extremely cute. Like, she even looked like an innocent, cute pin-up, despite how she was battle scarred and how she was stood over her vanquished croc rival in a gladiatorial victory celebration. She deserved the applause. It had been a long time coming for cindy to take a victory over jane.

>Force her surrender with superior human weaponry
>Chain her up in the middle of town, naked, and let all of the humans have a go at her until she's broken in and worships Humanity as her Gods
>Take her home after purchasing her
>Naked and chained, after a day of training her in domestic duties -while disciplining her as necessary-, watch as she so eagerly learns how to serve in sexual ways as well.
>Frequently need to discipline her to correct her ego
>Eventually set her up on a maintenance spanking schedule, bending her over your lap or over a desk for your hand, paddle, and/or more to spank her ass red at least once a week, even if she behaves
>Sometimes spank her at bedtime or randomly just to exert your authority
>Always put her in the corner afterwards to enjoy the sight of her red ass

So I started writing a story after being inspired by this pic (https://desu-usergeneratedcontent.xyz/trash/image/1598/36/1598361090474.jpg). Basically it’s about a confident bird businesswoman whose life is thrown into chaos when her younger human coworker finds some dirt on her that she believed to be long buried. He demands sex in return for his silence and even though she initially swears that she’s simply going to give him what he wants and move on, she discovers things to be more complicated than she thought when he turns out to be much, much better at sex than she ever imagined
So one question I’ve got is, should I give her a bird boyfriend/husband for the human to cuck? I’m not sure if it would be hot or if it would just slow down the pace
Also slightly less important questions but A: can bird girls make out with humans to begin with? And B: Are bird blowjobs even possible or is that just a recipe for disaster and getting your crotch stabbed with a beak

My fantasies always hold a setting where the world is majority populated and dominated by anthros. There are different kingdoms that are species exclusive, and some that are multi-species. Since this whole fetish is just a giant male power fantasy, I believe it's best if humans are super rare individuals that are powerful because they are just basically competent. The furry races can become advanced and grandiose, but for plot reasons humans can just breeze through heavy, convoluted situations. Furries don't know what the trick is, so they just see humans as super valuable, minority resources.
>Wolf Queen sends you, her platonic (real) nobleman as an ambassador to some Lion country.
>Lions aren't that into what you're selling.
>You seduce the Lion court mage casually since things weren't going to work out anyway.
>Rock her world so hard that she's easily convinced into using her magic to help you out.
>She casts a spell to make the Lion Queen more agreeable.
>Because of this, you're invited to the queen's chambers. ABC123 you're fucking her raw into her bedding.
>Go back to your own queen after getting the Lions to agree to whatever you wanted, and after leaving two cubs in some royal bellies.
>Wolf Queen is, once again, amazed at how well of a job you do. Doesn't fuck you, but teases a sequel with "Gosh, anon! You will just have to show me first hand how you manage to get your way."
>Anon turns to camera, winks, credits roll.
I didn't really write this very erotically, but I'm sure the point is across. I also prefer that humans can only ever have female children. So they never create more furboys to deal with. If you need to ask where fresh human men come from, well congrats you can just get isekaid there. Thank you for reading my post.

I had one where it was similar to our world, but a lot grittier. There was a new crimewave in the 90s, large economic recessions, and large-scale conflicts in the 2000s. In the middle of this, some megacorporation starts experimenting with human and animal DNA and creates anthros, which they start selling as playthings for the rich (after lobbying the US government to alter the Constitution, to allow for artificial beings to be treated as property). Flash forward to the modern day, and anthro prices have gone down enough for the upper middle-class to afford it. Anthros are used for multiple purposes, such as maids, artificial surrogates, the service industry and of course, as concubines.

>Immortal warrior guardians without equal sworn to defend the tombs at any cost.
>Their loyalty knows no end, when anything living enters their domain, it's life is forfeit.
>That is, until a lone human enters.
>Their timeless forms which have required neither drink nor food for thousands of years suddenly have an instinctual and insatiable need.
>Sharp eyes and sensitive noses pick up on his form and scent, and yes he is definitely MALE.
>Every second he lingers and picks over the treasures they had defended for lifetimes is more time to fan the achingly hot flames inside.
>The clatter of several century old weapons landing on the floor ring out in the tomb as vicious warrior sisters who fought side by side for countless years giggle playfully as they push each other out of the way to be first to the human.
>Armor was stripped off and discarded as the anthros descended on the man, revealing their fertile and aroused bodies.
>Hands that had taken countless lives grope at their owners breasts and wet pussies, desperate to cool the heat within.
>Mouths that had ripped out throats, ordered executions, and commanded armies hung open with tongues lolled, begging for the human to use them however he saw fit.
>In the span of a few seconds, the human had been surrounded by the kneeling warriors, all masturbating and pleading for him to breed them.
>Marriage proposals ring out before quickly changing to concubines, then prostitutes and then eventually offering themselves as slaves, their words getting more and more desperate as mere seconds tick by.
>Not even the empress they were tasked to guard had ever received this level of devotion, and they didn't even know his name.
>As if feeling some disturbance, the empress herself materializes from the afterlife into her tomb, seeing her fearsome warriors worshiping an intruder.
>Her harsh voice is ignored as she commands them to kill, enraging her that she was forced to defend her own tomb.
>She moves toward the man with murderous intent, yelling at her subordinates to take up their arms.
>But with each step closer her voice loses more and more of its edge until it's a purr, her angry stomping changing to an inviting sashay, and her hands finding their way to her breasts and moistening crotch.
>"Intruder! You shall suffer at- e-excuse me honored guest I- oh, forgive me my husband- ah, a thousand pardons m-my king- no, your worthless slut does not d-deserve your absolution masterrrrr~"
>As she keeps interrupting herself, the empress joins her warriors on her knees before the human, coming to a realization.
>The empress looks up at him with awe and complete adoration, before falling to her back and spreading her legs wide.
>"P-Please use my unworthy body my GOD!"
>Following her example, the warriors also get on their backs and present themselves, chanting the human's divinity through the empty halls of the tomb.

Reminder that the nichomachian ethics makes it an axiomatic imparitive to impregnate your fox wife and for your fox wife to love it. This then involves the Cooperate entity (corporate as in corpore, body) to once again function as that signular body with organs. as a body without organs simply does not function. the lungs of the city require the vesicals and veins and arteries of the societal organism to distribute and collect the human (and anthro) gross capital to sustain itself and its continued existence. the existence that exists to know itself and become itself. The "I" of Descarte where his cogito ergos his sum and his id est's. The I that IS indeed in TEAM despite what the less auromaticly advanced or enlightened may say.
You should hark the call of this conscious form, for it is god knowing itself through the experience that we experience. we are both the word made aware and the lense through which the forerunner of the word made awares. For in the begining it was the word, and the word was "God". But do away with the abrahamic nature if you must, similar framing tools, as mentioned, can be found in the platonics and aristotilean branches as well. I really dont find this at all a laughing matter even though it is kind of funny. Foxes are serious business.

>You will never spend a decade of your life fighting in a cold forested land far from home all for the sake of your people's pride or to simply fill your stomach.
>You will never build a genuine mixture of bitter resentment and appreciation for a place that's whole breath works to end your life.
>You will never find your shallowly simple key to happiness through the life of some furred person you've forced into your power.
>You will never revel in the hard earned soothing luxury that comes from the warm hands of a furry slave.
>Luxury which you rightfully paid out in full from ceaseless hours of biting cold and storms of violence that hounded to send you into oblivion.
>You will never get to see the face of your furry wife/slave look up at you with adoration. Yet, when you look at hers, every heartbeat you can feel the biting memory of those ten years. All to bring out the hardest nut of your life as you make the memories of that life which wanted to break you completely defeated by seeding your furry slut.

>Run an auto shop
>Stuck up Pomeranian girl brings in a pink escalade
>Rude, on her phone the whole time, and bragging about who her father is.
>The car hasn't gotten so much as an oil change 3 years.
>Says yes to all the service it needs.
>Signs on the dotted line.
>4 hours of her impatient whining later.
>Time to pay.
>Daddy's credit card isn't working.
>Looks like she's been cut off.
>You escort her to the "financing department." In the back.

>Buy a pair of 'mated' 'lesbian' anthros.
>It's hilarious they think they can still label themselves.
>They got picked up at some protest, two of several dozen, so they were cheap.
>Most guys would tell you it's a bad idea to buy them both.
>You had an interesting thought though, and two custom collars made just to test it with them.
>You really weren't much of a slavedriver.
>As long as the chores you spelled out got done, the food got made, and they obeyed the occasional orders you gave, they could cuddle up and relax together with the spare time they had.
>But if either of them earned punishment, they'd both be punished, and you only planned to have one kind of punishment.
>Their collars, shocking them both whenever they got within a dozen feet of each other.
>You were happy with your house, but it wasn't massive.
>They could keep the distance with effort, get their chores done still, but they would be zapped if they were ever within sight of each other.
>You have this funny feeling they'll start playing nice pretty quick.

>anthro woman travels through time to be with you
>she also broke a lot of laws on the way here so she's kinda a criminal now

>that perfectly simulating AI from last thread gets made
>except instead of being a petty bitch to people in the past for some fucking reason, it uses its vast and ever expanding computational power to do something slightly more worthwhile and determine which humans are the perfect Masters for every anthro alive
>usually it works out for the best and the collaring commences happily
>but sometimes a Master is from ages past and is long dead now
>you are one such human, living your normal life in the 21st century, but your perfect pet wouldn't be born for centuries after your death
>not to worry though, the Singularity is a hell of a drug, so the AI just casually invents time travel all for the purpose of making sure these anthro bitches get the good humie dick

One idea I had is for a NEET scumbag of a human who has rich parents getting a live in anthro maid to come take care of him. She’s very cold and unemotive while he sexually harasses her. She takes it all in stride, making remarks about how she finds humans repulsive and annoying, but her duty as a maid trumps such feelings, so she allows the human to toy with her body and unleash his lust at her with zero resistance. While she focuses on cooking, the human will grope her breasts from behind. He forces her to blow him, and while she insults his monstrous cock in a very monotone way, she effortlessly swallows it to the hilt and doesn’t let a drop of jizz escape. Far easier for her to simply swallow it than let it get all over her uniform. When he finally forces her down to fuck her In the hopes that he might finally illicit a rise out of her, she comments plainly on how the idea of her prime, pristine genes mixing with his loathsome human semen to form a child makes her sick, she leg locks him claiming that since he’s so reviled, she’d take on the burden of being his seedbed, so that no other woman or anthro need suffer such a fate. After being creampied, she casually slips a plug inside her pussy to keep the cum from dripping out and making a mess, and continues about cleaning. At a later point, the human would see his anthro maid on her day off walking about town where she runs into a rich, affluent anthro male. He tries hitting on her at first until he learns she’s a maid, at which point he offers her a job, double the pay. She viciously turns him down, stating that she would never think to leave her current master, and curtly walks off.
Later at the human’s home she reveals to her master that she is indeed carrying his child and she’d like to know what he wants her to do with it. He strongly wishes for her to keep it, and vows to start looking for proper work and help around the house. It’s basically implied that she actually does care about her master and that with a child on the way, he’s going to straighten up and be better. So happy end.

Idea #2
There’s a female anthro who does compensated dating. She normally has a policy against humans or sexual acts, but one shows up offering an insane amount of cash for sex. He’s very rough with her, using and abusing her holes and body to the point where she passes out during the act. She vows not to see him again. Jump cut to maybe a week later and she’s strapped for cash. The human has asked to see her a couple times now, so she finally relents. They fuck again this time for her usual rate, and it’s still rough. But this time she maintains consciousness and experiences wonderful orgasms. He pays and they part. She continues doing compensated dates with anthro clients, but it’s fairly boring. So she gets in touch with the human again. However, he claims that her price is too high and he isn’t interested. She’s aching for it pretty bad now, so she gives him a discount, and they fuck again. She gets paid and they part. After a while, she cuts off her old anthro clients, exclusively seeing the human, but he’s decided he’s over paying to fuck some anthro pussy. So she says it’s on the house. The fuck again. At one point when she tries to come over and surprise the human, he says he doesn’t have time for her, he’s got to get to work. So she offers to pay him to fuck. He calls out, and they do. This continues for a while, with the human requesting more and more money from her as time goes on.
She complies, completely hooked on him. She starts selling things she owns, taking out loans just to make the payments. Eventually she realizes she has nothing else to offer, and the human turns her down. At this point, she tries to come to her senses and it’s a couple days before the human hears from her again. She shows up to his doorstep one night with a small suitcase in a trenchcoat and hands him a piece of paper. It’s her power of attorney, along with several other legal forms basically removing her sovereign status as an adult individual to that of his property. Under the trenchcoat, it’s revealed she’s wearing nothing but skimpy underwear and a collar. She professes how she’s willing to give up her life for his cock. That’s kinda it.

Idea #3
I’ve just really liked the idea of a popular click of human girls who sexually bully a female anthro. She’s the new girl and on the day she’s introduced to the class, the most popular girl in school sets her eyes on her. The popular human girl, along with her two friends invite the anthro to hang out some time, and when she shows up, what starts as playful teasing quickly turns to cruel insults and physical harassment. After that at school, the anthro tries avoiding them, but the popular girl finds her and feints innocence, asking her to hang out again. She agrees hesitantly, but the same thing happens again. Over the course of each hangout, they subject her to some different form of sexual bullying. They play a stripping card game where the girls team up to make the anthro lose, then hide her clothes. They make her kiss and worship their feet. They tie her to the bed and force her to squirt until her pussy’s sore and red. They give her wedgies, titty twisters, and spankings until she cries. All the while the popular girl is basically gaslighting her into thinking she deserves it and that they’re the only people who’d put up with her. Eventually, the anthro starts getting aroused at the abuse thanks to the psychological manipulation. I figure it could end with her seemingly being accepted by the clique, as a new anthro girl show up to the school, and they all set their sights on her. In reality, the first anthro girl just acts as a lure now for new girls, having become the popular girl’s pet, with a matching sparkly collar.

Idea #4
One idea I’ve really liked is a sort of double cuck scenario, where there’s specifically a deer couple who start becoming friends with their new hunter neighbor. The hunter neighbor starts making passes at the buck’s wife, like saying sexually derogatory things about her, groping her in front of him, and so on, but he’s too much of a pushover to really do anything about it. But at the same time that the hunter’s starting an affair with the wife, he’s ALSO starting one with the buck. The buck, wanting to be less of a pushover, asks if the hunter could help him work out, and he agrees. But while they’re exercising, the hunter is emasculating the buck the whole time, pointing out how he's more fit to be a female than a male. There’s some sexually charged work outs, along with rubdowns and shower sessions. It’s not long before the hunter has dirt on both sides. But in an attempt to not let the other know of their affair, the couple pretend to not notice how the hunter’s slowly worming his way into their lives. Random things like them all sitting down for dinner, but the wife’s food is covered in what looks like jizz, yet she casually eats it. Or how the husband’s chest has started to fill out with small breasts, but he plays it off like it’s from his change in diet. It continues to escalate to the point where they both basically know they’re being fucked by the hunter each, but pretend to not notice until one day the hunter invites them both to the same hotel at the same time and they both show up dressed like total whores, just enough that they could deny being themselves. Then they debase themselves fighting over a chance to worship the hunter’s cock, turning into totally lost anthro sluts.
The disguises fall apart at some point and there’s a brief pause of acknowledgement about the situation before continuing. In the end, the hunter ends up moving in as the new man of the house, while the wife is pregnant with his kid, and the husband has gone full sissy.

Idea #5
Kind of your standard boss and subordinate story. Boss is a bitchy anthro woman, subordinate is a hapless human stooge who manages to get some juicy dirt on his boss. He uses this to blackmail her into all sorts of sexual situations, focusing largely on humiliation. He makes a deal with her that he gets to do whatever he wants to her for a month, and if she agrees, he’ll get rid of the blackmail evidence. While she’s initially against it, her body can’t resist the human’s touch after years of forgoing intimacy for the sake of her job. This idea is pretty straightforward. It’s really the little end scene that I keep imagining in my head. One thing the human did is take tons of pictures of them together, but per the deal, he gets rid of them all. He’s not that bad a guy. He stops showing up to work for a couple days after the month’s up, thinking he’ll be arrested for what he did at worst, and fired at best. But he gets a call from a work buddy that the boss is asking for him, and to make sure he’s dressed for work. He goes in to see her and she acts as if nothing happened between the two of them. She’s back to her bitchy self, and simply demands he get back to work. So he does. After a moment, she comes back to his little office and hands him a secret file for review, after which he’s to report to her once he understands it’s contents. He does review it and follows up with her moments later. He’s a bit confused, as inside the file are pictures of the boss in all sorts of degrading sexual situations, in bondage and collared, covered in slurs and writing, just like what he'd been doing to her over the course of the past month.
She seems upset at this revelation, claiming that she’d meant to dispose of all those images, but now that their in his possession, he’ll no doubt blackmail her all over again, turning her into his filthy anthro breeding sow. He realizes the angle she’s coming at, and agrees that she really is nothing more than a dumb animal if she let this sort of stuff fall into his hands again, and that he won’t let her off easy this time. Of course, he does also point out the fact that these pictures appear to have been taken some time AFTER the whole blackmail event had begun, to which she casually dismisses. I just really love the idea of the anthro admitting in their own roundabout way that they’re falling for their human in question.

What is your favorite /collared/ setting?
>Humans and Anthros are totally different societies on the same planet.
>Humans and Anthros are the same society on the same planet, and have roughly equal standing.
>Humans and Anthros are the same society on the same planet, but anthros are 2nd class citizens/slaves.
>Humans or anthros are aliens to the other
>Humans are modern, anthros are tribal / Anthros are modern, humans are tribal.
>Ultimate Wish Fulfilment Mode: Humans and anthros have interbred so much that they've formed a single species with Extreme Sexual Dimorphism™, something that still baffles modern scientists. All males are born human, and all females are born anthro.
Some more because it hit me afterward
>A portal joins human Earth and the anthro Earth, so both societies meet on equal terms.
>Adventure mode: A single human finds himself on a planet of anthros
Ad your favorite flavor of your favorite setting?
>Weenie Hut Jr Mode: The anthros are all in touch with their animalistic side, and that animalistic side has fond ancestral memories of humans. Most anthros crave your affection, and forming relationships is easy. Anthro lovers practically /collar/ themselves, as they prefer you to take charge in most matters.
>Normal Mode: No overt special treatment for being a human. Some anthros with unusual taste might seek you out, but an equal number aren't thrilled to be around you, while the majority are indifferent. It's up to you to prove you're worth something.
>Nightmare Mode: Many anthros are fearful of humans and will resist anything beyond a civil relationship. You have a long road ahead of you and a harsh style of /collar/ing might be your only option.

>Decide you want an anthro
>Ignore the advice of your friends to settle on a dog or a cat.
>No no. You want something more exotic.
>You go to the nearby native reservation.
>Normally, there are at least a few tribals who are curious enough about "The World of Man" to risk a collar.
>You meet a spunky young wolf girl burning with curiosity for you and the outside world. You quickly grow to like her, and she returns the affection.
>After a few meetings, she agrees to be your anthro and wears a jingly collar with an eager smile as you take her home.
>Then you realize why your friends tried to warn you.
>God damn. A wolf is a handful.
>She eats enough for two grown men, Needed to be taught how to use a shower, always wants to play-fight, wrestle, or make out like a high-schooler, gets restless when indoors too long, spurns clothes, wakes you up each morning by licking the inside of your mouth, is wildly horny even out of season, and keeps dragging back dead deer from the woods.
>...At least she's mostly paying her own food bill with that last one, though. She's also a good cook, as you've found.
>Now she's actually going into her mating season, and everything you own smells like her, now. She's taken the liberty of doing your laundry for you, mostly as an excuse to rub her scent on your clothes. You asked why, and she just scoffed.
>"Husband, it is as ancient wisdom says," she would say, waggling a clawed finger. "Better to prepare and not need it, than... Than..." She then spewed out a line in her native dialect and shrugged helplessly. "Know not the words in this tongue, Husband, but you understand, yes?"
>That answered nothing.
>Now she's piteously begging you for pups in her half english / half native tongue, and giving you looks of longing.
>God, her scent isn't even geared towards humans, yet you can smell just how aroused and fertile she is.
>You're going to need to budget for puppies soon...

i was thinking of a setting earlier. i don't really have any pictures to go with it, sorry! anyway
humans are tribal, intelligent but very low tech, live out in the woods and other remote locations. civilized anthro society doesn't want to go anywhere near such places, obviously, but there are some who see humans as the ultimate challenge to hunt...in particular, deer anthros tend to talk a big game about human hunting, although to date not a single one has any evidence to back up their wild stories of 'baggin' a huge one'. in fact, pretty much every single buck or doe that has gone out hunting, actually been documented leaving and heading into the woods...has never returned. and yet around the bars, all the bucks and even a doe or two will claim they get one every season, and no one wants to call anyone else out for obvious reasons.
>big strong buck with a cute doe daughter go out camping in the woods, hunting gear brought but not really intended to be used.
>buck wearing typical mountain man looking clothes, like the brawny paper towel buck. his daughter dressed in long sleeves and pants to protect against the winter chill.
>making their way through the dense forest, just enjoying the crisp winter air and the scent of nature.
>sudden movement nearby, behind a thick tree.
>buck quickly signals to his daughter who pulls the rifle off his back and gets ready...her first human! this is why it's good to be prepared in the forest!
>they drop low and creep very slowly towards the tree.
>when they are only a few feet away, he comes out from behind the tree.
>tanned skin, surprisingly clean but definitely looks like he lives outdoors, simple loin cloth (made of deer fur) around his waist, no other clothing. not nearly as buff looking as the buck, but definitely well toned, and tall, at least six feet, maybe a few more inches, only a couple inches shorter than the buck and at least a foot and half taller than the doe.
>the gun falls out of the doe's hands as the human steps closer...the scent...one whiff of the human's musk and she feels like she was struck by lightning or something! a jolt of sensation that starts at the base of her tummy and spreads through her like fire...she drops to her knees, the sound of crunchy leaves underneath.
>she looks to the side and sees her father in the same condition! the big, strong, human hunting man she was raised by, on his knees, drool running from his open maw and an incredibly obvious tent in his pants!
>she looks back at the human, who seems amused...this is clearly not the first time he's found deer in his area of the forest.
>he steps closer, the scent intensifying to the point that both buck and doe are ready to cum without even being touched, being molested so heavily by his musk alone...
>the human reaches out with both hands, the deer flinching but staying in place, unable to really move it seems.
>he gently begins to stroke and pet them both, treating both the powerful, manly buck and the slender, beautiful doe the same...like animals.
>the pleasure from merely being touched is enough to set them both off, the father/daughter pair both letting out lewd, embarrassing moans and whimpering sounds as they orgasm just from the human's touch and scent...
>the buck's hips quiver and shake as he spurts the biggest load he's ever cum in his life in his pants, so powerful it looks like he wet himself.
>the doe fares even worse, squirting so hard she actually *does* pee herself, the hot mixture of arousal and urine soaking her pants and adding to the lewd scent in the air.
>the human just chuckles, giving both extra scratches behind the ears before he pulls away again, to fiddle with his loin cloth...
>the cloth drops away, revealing his human cock...it is hard as steel and leaking pre. it isn't as big as the buck's, but it is at least ten inches long, and thick.
>the scent in the air seems to nearly double in potency, both father and daughter now panting like mutts, staring at the twitching human cock in front of their eyes.
>the human merely gestures to his crotch and they go to work, all other thoughts removed from their head besides 'pleasure the human stud.'
>father and daughter, working together, their lips frequently bumping together in an obscene kiss around the human's cock as they slurp and lick and suckle with hungry need.
>the human stands with hands on his hips at first, though after a few minutes he leans forward and uses their heads to rest his palms.
>the human moans and grunts with pleasure as the pair of lips and tongues work so fervently over his shaft, up and down, coating him in messy drool as he starts to hump and thrust as he gets closer...
>the taste is even better than the smell, both buck and doe feeling as if they were drugged, pleasurable dizzy sensations with their minds drifting and dancing in their heads as they work up and down the human's shaft.
>after another few minutes the human takes control again, grabbing the buck's antlers and guiding his cock into the man's surprisingly soft, burning hot mouth.
>the buck looks up at the human with such submissive, burning need, it's honestly adorable~
>the human smiles and starts to ruthlessly fuck his face...this is why he picked the buck instead of the doe...there's simply no way that petite little daughter of his could handle this...this human brutality!
>but the doe doesn't get off easy just watching, no no...the human's other hand grabbing her by the ear and guiding her around behind him.
>she gasps as she realizes what he wants, but does not hesitate. grabbing his furless cheeks and spreading them to stick her narrow muzzle between so she can lap at his asshole like a salt lick while he rapes her father's throat.
>the pleasure quickly builds for him like this, the girl's talented tongue slurping away at his backdoor while the buck's impressively tight throat clenches around his cock with each thrust.
>in no time at all he lets out a bellowing moan that seems to shake the trees as he cums, his load far more impressive than the buck's was earlier...flooding the poor deer with so much seed he simply has no hope of drinking it all.
>the excess gushes back out his nose and down his face, making quite the mess as the human humps and grinds against him, making sure to feed him every last drop whether he can handle it or not.
>when he finally finishes, he pulls away to let the buck breathe, while yanking the doe back around and pushing her towards her father. "clean him." the first and last words they will hear from him.
>the doe obediently gets to work, licking the cummy, drooly mess out of her father's fur.
>by the time she's done, she looks back and the human is gone...leaving the father and daughter to collapse in a cuddly pile and rest after their "human hunt~"
>the father and daughter both agree it was their best camping trip ever, and can't wait for next year!

>New drug, a penis shaped candle
>Anthros everywhere get addicted to the lust inducing frenzy that it causes
>Even the queen a drogoness gets addicted and finds out where these candles are produced
>She finds herself infront of a whore house, inside she is greeted by the heavy smell of the candles and giant orgy
>The humans give her tour of the building
>As she watches anthros being fucked in all kinds of ways, the human explains how the candles are made
>They use mixture of human cum and anthro love juices from the finest of woman
>Explains how the spices and amount of sex the anthro has dictates the purity of her juices
>The queen will be lead to a room where she starts sucking cock to harvest semen, all the while she uses a candle as a dildo to harvest her own juices
>She will forever help in the production of candles until her pussy runs dry, which will hopefully be never

>get a job as a farmhand working for the Hopps family
>they're good people, treat you nice
>especially the Hopps daughters
>all 200 of them
>always bringing something the to eat or drink while you're working
>always complementing "those big strong muscles" of yours, as you're hefting produce
>end up impregnating every single one of them before the year's done

>Proud anthro girl starts dating a human.
>Her human bf is a zoologist, and knows how to use his knowledge on anthros. He pushes all her buttons like an expert, and before long her subconscious is looking at him like prime mate material.
>After their first date, she can't even get to sleep before rubbing herself off, feeling dirty the whole time. She's not sure she can make it to the third date before putting out.

>a VP of a major company who has never felt the touch of a man
>she will be initially resistant but will melt at your touch, send her to that meeting stinking like human and you'll probably end up with some powerful women on your dick by next week
>a schoolgirl in the midst of maturing into a woman
>she won't know how to do anything but she will always remember her first human as unmatched, will also bring her friends into your embrace
>an office wagie in great need of relief
>anything goes as long as you're the one ordering her around, she's already here with a leash for you on her collar and is willing to make things permanent
>a sexually neglected young wife
>it might be taboo to fuck a married woman but her husband clearly isn't, wants to breed as many children as possible and if she needs to be impregnated by a human to kick start her family so be it
>the young wife unmarried cousin
>has repelled every other man due to her height and resting bitch face but clearly wants to be dolled up, held down, submissively bred, and eventually married to a strong man
>the pervert
>your absolute bro of a wingwoman who gets on at the first station, stealthily gropes and fingers all the girls so that by the time you get on they're ready to jump on your dick
>you'll probably have time to fuck two of them before you have to get off
>of course you could just forget about your job and continue smashing pussies for the entire day but that's bad for your career
>then again so is fathering a literal army with pretty much every single female in the city

>every time Micky leaves her home, she opens her backdoor to a group of humans waiting to run a train on her for free.
>when she announced her pregnancy, he was overjoyed, thinking it was his.
>no one knew who the father really was, so it suited them and her just fine.
>she'd be damned if she let a furboi continue his worthless bloodline.

>be you
>moderately wealthy landowner in world where numerous species reached sapience
>due to human intelligence, discipline, and sweat, humanity is largely on top of things
>most of the known world is encompassed by a sprawling human republic, with a loose caste structure of inferior species
>nonhuman states are backward and of little relevance, human politics are stable and reasonably transparent, and its culture is primed to maximizing human strengths
>that is, humans are trained from birth to fight and learn, at minimum every adult man can handle a weapon, work at a trade, do arithmetic, recite the last few centuries of history, and speak several languages
>you are likewise, and while the republic is incredibly strict, toward humans its laws are lenient and preferential
>poverty for a human family is only owning a three-room house, plot of land for subsistence farming, and less than five servants
>you're fairly shrewd, passed all of your exams, and have done well for yourself in your business of choice, able to afford a decent estate
>it's relatively near the coast and its crops do extremely well to supplement your income
>apart from your (human) family, you have some twenty servants of various species, (a handful of them more intimate), a handful of up-and-coming human fieldhands, and little over two-hundred mice tending the fields
>most prefer sheep for their reliability but for the crops you're growing, the murid's nimble fingers are ideal and their timid disposition makes them easy to keep in line
>to say nothing of the rock-bottom price at market and rapidly maturing, homegrown savings
>you're relatively prosperous, all things considered, and humanity as a whole seems to have solidified its hold for centuries, if not millennia to come
>one day, you're laying in your bed with a worshipful, illiterate concubine or two, mildly drowsy, mulling over a possible anonymous shitpost in your regional newsletter when a human barges in without knocking
>he's bloody and seems panicked, but you know him to be a solid lad with little in the way of strong emotions, you slide out of bed and ask him what's going on
>in response, he stammers that the mice are revolting, they've armed themselves from the tool shed, already killed most of their enforcers, and are attempting to launch an assault on the estate proper
>immediately alert, you check the window to see several dimunitive mobs torching your crops and scaling the fences, as he explain that he and his coworkers barely managed to escape the fields with their lives
>you know there are around a dozen fighting-men you can depend on, possibly twenty, counting loyal nonhumans, and ten minutes at most to prepare before the rioters are on you
>the training of your youth kicks in, you dismiss all panic, grab your musket and saber, and start to form a plan as you button your coat, exit your bedroom, and descend the stairs
What do?

>Anthro boss shows you a vacation photo he took together with his wife
>Make a respectful and polite compliment about your boss' wife
>"Do you want to fuck her?"
>wat.jpg
>fast forward, one talk led to another, and now you have his wife enveloping and massaging your cock with those feathery mounds

Toriel is meant for filling with half-human children, which due to the magical physics I made up entirely in my own head, would always look like Boss Monsters due to them being literally peak performance for magic-based organisms and the sheer disparity between the strength of Monster and Human souls, regardless of the "species" of monster the mother is
This of course implies that Boss Monsters and (presumably) the Dreemurr family once had a significantly different appearance, but that all changed due to a political marriage introducing at least one human to their bloodline, and forever altering it

Bumping with the fact that this all stemmed from a mass effect/Undertale crossover that never happened, centered around (or at least named for) a floating mausoleum/cruise ship of human souls that travels around the galaxy named the "Lux Aeterna", and that humanity may or may not have spread out significantly more, to the point of first contact coming "up" towards the citadel from the galactic plane humanity had explored and colonized
Anyway, back to interbreeding
The first instance of this was to be a human woman and monster (probably dog) man having a child that looked like neither of it's parents. Quite the scandal ensued with Asgore being the only known male boss monster, but also never having been anywhere near the couple at any point. This continued until other couples reported the same "issue" with their children, until it was hypothesized that it had something to do with the hybridization
At the same time humanity was rediscovering spellcraft due to the Barrier having succed up all ambient magic, including what was being used to cast spells. Now that it's gone magic was once again accessable by everyone (fuck you Harry Potter) and being treated as another field of physics by the scientific community
This eventually cumulated into the "discovery" that humans are capable of creating magical bodies for themselves and accessing the full power of their souls (avoiding the Boss Monster bottleneck), but they must know themselves in their entirety. Enlightened, if you will.
These enlightened humans were not just powerful mages, but "biologically immortal" due to no longer having biological processes that can fail.
By the time Earth contacts alien life, there are three distinct peoples that have emerged
Monsters, which due to the above bottleneck have all "evolved" into boss monsters due to all of them having some level of human ancestry
"First life" humans, who have yet to create an immortal magical body for themselves
And "second life" humans, who are immortal mages. Reaching this stage is considered a cultural imperative for every human, seen in a similar light to both learning to walk and body improvement
And I guess those souls on the Aeterna would presumably be from First Lifers who died before they were able to make a body, maybe they could continue that study depending on how capable of action they are after death
Alright that's my autism done for the morning

>decadent feline empire with intricate slave system, akin to the ottomans
>scattered boar tribes and clans, preroman barbarians on a steady diet of meth and creatine
>fragmented, remote mouse empire taken semi-seriously due to its sheer weight of numbers and indoctrination
>steppe-dwelling horses that are doing the mongol strategy and represent a genuine threat
>fox kingdom that gets by through careful politcking and sly use of foreign mercenaries
>various petty rabbit states in constant intercine strife over their minor divisions, too unified to conquer trivially
>humans that view all species as equal and exist in a multispecies democracy, but happen to be most of the leadership through simple meritocracy
>humans that have gone full abhor the animal and militantly purging other species under a rigid stratocracy
Do you guys have any other ideas for rival factions of an anthro-dominating human polity? I feel like this is plenty but I suspect I'm missing something obvious.

>Get into a scuffle with a tribal coyote/wolf girl in the woods.
>"Can't hurt me, motherfucker!" You grunt as you pull her off.
>Come to an impasse in the fight.
>You have to admire both how ballsy she is and her wild charm.
>"You're beautiful, though."
>She knows just enough English to understand the compliment. She blushes and her tail wags a bit.
>You had no idea you had just met your wife.

I'd imagine, although that's the whole appeal.
>Imagine, a thriving city that discovers an all female skaven population underneath.
>Rather than going all vermintide on them they decide to go the economic route.
>A campaign of enslavement begins. The rats are rounded up, put into training facilities, tormented and taught to be submissive.
>Rats are social creatures, as they start to learn and be around other horny slaves they start to domesticate faster.
>They breed like...rats. Their legendary hornieness makes them much sought after.
>Some are sent to the front lines to boost troop morale, with their durable bodies and crazy libido a single slave girl can service an entire camp of soldiers.
>Some are installed in public stockades and used day in and out by the pesentry. The populace is happy.
>Getting your own lithe dancer rat girl is cheap asf
>This ends in tragedy as birthrates plummet.
>Skaven wins again. Dammit.

>anthro hands
>anthro fathers presenting their daughters for a lifetime of servitude under a human master is an ancient tradition
>some scholars say it was one of the first
>at first it was a simple transaction to trade females for food, water, and medicines from a more successful human tribe
>then it was for more advanced products they could not make themselves
>iron and steel, pottery and wheels
>then the first great wars happened
>families, cities, and entire empires would be spared if they willingly surrendered their women
>girls with powerful pedigrees were highly valued, a defeated warrior would be allowed to live honorably if he allowed his new master to violate his precious daughter
>as they learned to surrender their females to avoid annihilation they soon also learned that having their girls join powerful families and birth human-sired children had certain advantages
>the streets in front of the homes of human aristocratic families began to be flooded with hopeful fathers selling their daughters
>those that weren't accepted were then shown off to the middle class humans
>and then even to the poor as they were seen as still having potential, just needing some help in the form of a young wife to start a family with
>thankfully in the modern age it is seen as a formality than an actual requirement, most marriages happen with all consenting
>the proposal of marriage between an anthro girl and a human is begun by her father
>she is made ready by her parents, her usual clothes replaced with lingerie and jewelry
>she is then "sold" to her future husband and the new "slavewife" is led on a leash to her new master's home, publicly naked to show off her new status as a taken female
>no money is actually paid but most humans take the opportunity to exchange gifts at this time
>the next week is nothing but hot nights of hard fucking by the new couple
>and then the unified families all go for pizza next weekend
>/collared/ weddings tend to be pretty casual

Okay, /collared/, would you prefer;
>2-6 anthro slaves of your choice.
>All of them are meek. Your opinions are their opinions.
>They're dull as individuals.
>All of them are subservient. They won't disobey even if they're reluctant to follow some orders. This can cause them to freeze up if they aren't sure how to interpret your words.
>Open to sex any time, any kink, any fetish.
>Being a group means lots of hands to help with any children. You don't have to do much for your children to be well cared for.
>All of them are well in-tune with your general needs and wants, and don't expect a reward for catering to you.
>They're educated enough be literate and do basic math, but that's it. While none of them are mentally deficient, they aren't the brightest, either.
>They can perform low-skill labor, but will be poor at holding jobs that demand them to learn new skills. It may fall to you to pay for them.
>Short of prolonged abuse or an official banishment from your household, there is nothing that will drive them away.
Or...
>1 anthro girlfriend/wife of your choice.
>Though she agrees with you on most things, she is not shy about speaking her mind and defending her argument when she doesn't.
>She's witty, fun, and has interesting hobbies.
>She is independent, but will yield to your decisions unless she is 100% sure you're wrong. Her judgment is good, but isn't perfect.
>Often open to sex, but can refuse if she's not in the mood or if a requested kink is too extreme.
>You're expected to help with children, no excuses.
>She knows you well but is not a mind reader, and needs to be told about your less-obvious problems before she can help. She expects you to be available for her as well.
>She's well-educated and has a sharp mind. She's as intelligent as you, if not more.
>She has a well-paying job with plenty of time-off to spend with you. If you can afford it, though, she'll agree to be a stay-at-home mom.
>She'll be unfalteringly loyal so long as you treat her fairly.

A short for /collared/
>You're a human orphan who was adopted by a kind family of fox anthros as a baby.
>Your adoptive mother and father were having trouble conceiving after the birth of their firstborn daughter, and wanted another child, so they took you in.
>You have a good relationship with your family. Mom and Dad love you like you were their own.
>The "I'm adopted?" drama was short lived when you realized it as a child, as it was clear to you the moment you were old enough to understand that you're different.
>Now, Lana, your sister?
>Lana loves you to bits.
>She was your faithful little minion in your childhood antics and always had your back. In her eyes, her big brother could do no wrong.
>You returned the favor, of course. Humans are a fair bit larger than most anthro species, and in school, you were the largest boy, second only to the dumb rhino kid.
>If your sister complained about someone teasing or bullying her, you sorted it out quick, fast, and in a hurry. God help the perpetrator if she ran to you on the playground with tears rolling down her face.
>Lana is YOUR pretty little sister, and no one is allowed to touch her on your watch. You were willing to suffer detention and a dressing down from your parents if it meant bloodying the noses and blacking the eyes of anyone who harmed her. You told her that word for word when you were both 12.
>"I'm YOUR pretty little sister..." she mouthed to herself, seemingly mystified at the words.
>Lana loved you all the more for it. You're her hero, after all, but you had no idea what kind of seed you planted that day.
>Now, in your teen years, you are not ashamed to say your sister is your best friend. If anything, you've only grown closer.
>She showers you with affection, like hugs or kisses on the cheek, and spends more time in your room than hers. If you’re lying on your bed reading or scrolling on your phone, she’ll drape herself on your back and talk to you. If you’re in the living room watching TV on the couch, then her favorite spot is laid across your lap. In the mall or otherwise out and about, she likes holding your hand. During nasty storms or after an unpleasant dream, she’ll nervously ask if she can sleep in your room. When you wake up, she’ll be wrapped around you, snoozing like she’s getting the best sleep of her life.
>Sure, Lana can be a bit bitchy like any teen girl, but she does her best not to be snippy with you in particular. There are a few times mom or dad, exasperated with fighting with her over something, needed you to be the one to rein her in. The one time she was upset enough to keep yelling after you told her to calm down, she went deathly still and lowered her head when you raised your voice in return. Meekly, she said: “Sorry, Anon…”
>Recently, she’s been having dating troubles. She’s pretty as they come, and plenty nice, but she’s never had a boyfriend last longer than two weeks, and never gone beyond a kiss. Her relationships fizzle out, and when you ask, she shrugs and says: “I dunno. He just wasn’t what I wanted.”
>Despite feeling a little guilty, you’re glad for it.
>Lana’s YOUR sister, and the thought of a boy other than you having her attention does not sit right with you. Maybe its a bit creepy, but it’s the way you feel and you can’t deny it.
>It’s summer break, and you’ve just returned home early after hanging out with a few friends. Your plan to sneak into an R-rated movie went up in smoke when one of your puppy-faced pals made the ticket attendant suspicious and ask for IDs. Busted, everyone scattered and headed home.
>Mom and dad are still at work, as their cars aren’t home. Slipping inside, you walk down the hallway towards your room, only to pause when you hear something.
>Moaning, and something that sounds wet.
>...Holy shit. Did Lana bring someone home? Is she fucking them?!?
>...No, you hear only her voice. The twisting in your gut transforms into something less angry, and more nervous.
>She’s not masturbating, is she?
>Part of you wants to leave and pretend you never heard this. This is your cute little sister, and something inside you rebels at the idea that she even has the sexual capacity to masturbate.
>Another part of you… Wants to go look. A shameful, but excited erection pushes against the fabric of your jeans.
>Your sister obviously feels secure around you, and it's had the side effect of showing her body off. During lazy days when it's just you and her around the house, Lana will don little more than a t-shirt and panties. She has no issue sitting with her legs spread like that, or bending over in front of you. You lived in her room for about two weeks a few months ago, as dad tore into your bedroom walls to redo some vents, and she had no issues stripping down to her underwear without even asking you to look away. Hell, on days where you're both short on time, she’ll slip into the bathroom with you, and you and she will shower with your backs to each other.
>”We bathed together as kids. It’s not weird,” she insists.
>Do you leave, or do you see whats happening?
>Another moan, this time muffled by something, makes the choice for you.
>Slowly creeping down the hallway, you peer into her open bedroom door and blink in bewilderment.
>She’s not there.
>...No…
>You stealthily walk, stepping over the creaky floorboard to look inside YOUR room.
>Your jaw drops.
>On the floor are a pair of damp panties, a rumpled shirt and skirt, and an unclasped bra, but thats not what has your attention.
>No. That belongs to your sister. She’s there on your bed, naked as the day she was born with her fur ruffled. Her face is down in your pillow, and her ass up with her fluffy tail raised. Between her legs, her fingers furiously piston her slick sex.
>She draws in a deep lungful of your pillow through her nose, shuddering at the scent. “I’m YOUR sister, yours…” She mumbles. “All yours… Anon, please…” She sniffs the pillow again, moaning your name, not at all noticing you in the doorway.
>...Holy shit. Holy shit, it all makes sense now…
>You step back… right onto the creaky floorboard.
>Lana freezes, her head snapping around to you. Her face transforms into abject horror. “Oh my god…” She raises her head but is too shocked to hide her shame. “Oh my god… Anon, this isn’t what it looks like, I swear!” She scrambles up and covers herself with her hands.
>That excited twist in your stomach transforms again, this time into something else.
>Want.
>She wants you? You want her, too.
>No one else can have her.
>You step back into the room… and close the door behind you.
>Lana’s panic stills for a second, her tear-filled eyes looking at you, desperate for anything that isn’t judgment.
>”Are you sure it wasn’t what it looked like?” You ask, making her pause for a second longer. “What if I liked what I saw?”
>”A-Anon?” Lana asks, a blush crossing her muzzle. “What are you-”
>You step forward, right up to the bed, and into Lana’s space. You loom over her, and she gasps and falls backward onto the bed, letting you lean over and plant your hands on either side of her petite, vulpine form.
>”I told you before, Lana,” you begin, your lips inches from hers. “You’re MY sister. I’ll take care of you no matter what you need.”
>Before your nerve can fail you, you press your lips to hers in a rough kiss, tasting her cherry lip balm.
>Lana’s eyes bug out, then she sags in relief and wraps her arms around your neck, returning your kiss with needy fervor. She moans into your mouth, submitting without a fight when you poke your tongue into her mouth and explore her sharp canine teeth.
>When you and she finally break for air, you only have one one word on your mind. “Mine,” you growl.
>”Yours!” Lana agrees between breathless pants. Her eyes are starstruck, happier than you’re ever seen them, and it’s beautiful. “All yours!”
>Lana is your sister, and yours alone. No one else can have her.

>Be me
>A man in love with my beautiful anthro bunny wife
>I adore her and will do anything for her
>We've been married for some time now and have always had a healthy sex life
>One day she shyly asked if we could explore something new together, something she's never told me before
>"I want to try petplay," she whispers timidly
>I'm not one to kink shame and am intrigued by her proposal
>We start slowly, with just a collar and leash as I lead her around on all fours
>But as we delve further into it, my bunny wife becomes more insatiable and eager for increasingly rougher play
>And much to my surprise, I find myself enjoying the control and power I had over her
>My petite bunny wife slowly transformed into a submissive pet before my eyes, begging for attention and praise
>The more I controlled and dominated her, the more excited she became
>Soon enough she is begging me to fill up her wanting pussy with my throbbing human cock
>I fuck her hard against the wall as she whimpers beneath me. My hand grips tightly at her collar as she loves every second of pure domination radiating through my veins
>As our most primal passions reach an orgasmic peak we're both shocked by how turned on we are by the level of control and submission
>Both breathless and panting we collapse onto the bed while cuddling tightly
>"That was amazing", bunny whispers sweetly as she nuzzles her face against my chest
>Our newfound fetish became a staple part of our sex life. Bunny transformed into an obedient slave at my command and never complained about my rough treatment
>Soon enough our relationship grew stronger as we explored each other's kinky side more and bunny enjoyed her submissive role even outside of the bedroom
>From then on, all it took was a gentle kiss to her ear and she turned into my lovely submissive pet once again

>Post first-contact earth in the future
>Your wife is from an alien species that has an uncanny resemblance to earth canines
>They're naturally bipedal, but have a special adaptation they used often on their homeworld. They can return to being quadrupeds.
>By shifting some bones and curling their short fingers into paws, they can run on all fours. When they're in "4x4 mode" as you jokingly call it, they look like wolf dogs, so much that telling the difference is nearly impossible.
>Your wife developed a pet play kink when she learned about dogs. She likes to strip naked, shift, wear a collar, and be treated like an animal when the mood strikes her.
>Acting like a dog and being nude around other people who have no idea turns her on something fierce. Her most recent delight is roleplaying as an innocent pet being taken advantage of by her deviant owner, aka you.
>She'll literally howl in ecstasy and gush like a leaky faucet when you play along and fuck her like she's a dumb animal. Pulling on her collar to get her to quiet down only makes her cum even harder.
>The things you do for love...

>See your brother-in-law at the dog park
>He's on call fours
>He's lured a dog off into the bushes for some easy pussy
>Pretend you didn't see that and start using The dog park across town instead

>Despite being unrecognizable to humans as the alien lifeform, they can recognize each other
>Your wife subtly points out whenever another alien engaged in this sort of voyeurisitc play is walking about
>There are all sorts of high profile members of her species walking around like simple collared animals
>Government officials, high ranking intergalactic military officers, even a alien who has become infamous for their anti-human rhetoric was seen on their back writhing in ecstasy getting very explicit belly rubs from a human
>When she made eye contact with your wife she froze up before involuntarily shuddering as the petting became more intense
>You share a laugh with your wife before continuing on your way

>Be female. An anthro wolf.
>Take part in the greatest war your kind has ever known. Find pride in standing up for your kindred.
>Training seemed simple. Uniformed for all subraces.
>NoSpecializedWolfTraining.jpg
>Be sent to the frontlines. Nervous but bold. You will not go out without a fight.
>Battlefield is quiet.
>TooQuiet.mp3
>It begins. Roar of artillery. Scores of aircraft. Your training never covered this. Why are they so advanced?
>Command has fallen. Your squad is routed. You're alone, left in one of the countless craters that fill the field.
>Boots come near you. You look up, expecting a friend.
>You find us.
>Welcome 'home.'

>Be an occult nerd.
>Try to summon a hell hound to be a pet.
>Don't expect the hell hound to be anthro.
>You came this far, so you're not going to let this be wasted.
>Your summoned demon is pissed, but pauses when she sees the summoning contract you drafted.
>There is a clause in there saying you'll care and provide for her if she obeys you and keeps you company.
>She realizes this is essentially a safety net for her, and after mulling it over, reluctantly agrees to enter your service.
>Whenever she's not busy with something, you're free to summon her and she's obligated to respond.
>You're not an asshole, and treat her well whenever you call her, occasionally treating her to gifts or surprises. In turn, she obeys your commands faithfully, if a little unenthusiastically. It helps that many of these commands equate to housewife work or "free up time in your schedule, I want to go [do X] with someone and my usual friends are busy."
>She didn't expect to enjoy it... but it's not long before she's spending time with you of her own free will.
>You're not sure when she cuddled up to you on the couch one night, but you're not complaining. She smiles when you let a daring hand rub her thigh.
>A week later, she's taking your hand and sliding it up her shirt. You're palming some warm, furry tits tipped in pokey, aroused nipples. You open your mouth to say something, but her muzzle is covering your mouth.
>Before you know it, she's throwing her head back in your bed and howling in ecstasy as you take her virginity.
>From then on, she happily spends most of her time with you.
>It hits you that this turned from a master/servant relationship to... Still a master/servant relationship, but on the surface, you're a guy supporting a life-in girlfriend who is working her way to college.
>The collar you got her on your anniversary thrilled her to no end.

God I love that. The idea of either furboy being extreme quick shots and so can't compare or the girls being extremely sensitive or easy to please like some animals are is really hot.
Just imagine some girl getting collared when she realizes humans can make her cum like 10 times before they even cum ones.

So, last night I went to bed thinking about that pic/scenario, and I literally had my first furry dream in my life, where a 7 feet tall crocodile lass forced me on a date because she made a bet with her friends to disprove the myth that "sex with human men is something else", and I, their neighbour, was about the closest non-threatening human acquaintance. In my dream the group was a bunch of young delinquent furgirls that had been a nuisance for a while around the neighborhood.
I had no say in the matter because I'm a manlet and the girl was a mass of scales and muscle that probably doubled my weight. Hell, her massive tail alone probably weighted almost as much as me.
No, nothing happened, I only had enough time to dream about the first date. But it was nice: awkward at first, but once we broke the ice and found some tastes in common we were suddenly having a fun time chatting and joking around. Except for that part where she randomly started ranting about wrestling and I had no fucking idea what she was saying but kept listening and nodding because I didn't want to ruin the mood.
Anyways, I woke up before any real progress happened, but it was going well and it left me wondering how the bet would've ended, so I looked up crocodilian mating...
>crocs courtship can last hours
>but when they finally copulate the penetration only lasts a few seconds
....I think I had some good chances in there. Damn...

>Hermaphrodite anthros usually pick one gender and only swap as a result of social status changes. They build large clans like this with some confusing family webs.
>You are a well-off man with a large swath of land to your name, and one day, you're approached by an anthro messenger
>In the message you've received, an anthro clan nearby lost a land dispute between themselves and the government over an illegal agreement made generations ago. They need a new place to settle and came to you, hoping to hash out a deal.
>You know this clan. They're mostly hermaphrodites.
>You're sympathetic, but anthros don't think entirely like humans. If you just give them what they want, they likely won't be as grateful or respectful as humans would. There is a lot of animal dominance psychology involved here. You have to take something in return.
>That in mind, you call for the clan's patriarch to meet you.
>He's decently masculine by hermaphrodite standards, though you can still see the traces of androgyny in him.
>When he and his wife show up, looking all proud and important, you tell him what you want in return for letting his people build on your land.
>He's got all the parts for it, so 'as a symbol of their unity', you want to impregnate him and 'Properly become family.'
>He grimaces and his wife gasps.
>If your knowledge of hermaphrodite powerplay bullshit holds up, such an important figure with a firmly male persona submitting to bear an outsider's children is almost screaming "I am lower on the totem pole."
>Still, between his clan being homeless and personal humiliation, he makes the hard choice and agrees.
>You take him to bed, and take his female virginity. Despite presenting himself as a male, he howls like an animal in heat the whole time.
>It might be mean, but you rub it in some by referring to him as a female, just so he, now she in your eyes, doesn't forget.
>No one else forgets either, as her belly and breasts swell over the coming months.

>be collar store owner
>Anthro woman come daily to buy hand made collars from you
>They are very expensive but there is a way to pay without money
>Anthro woman who don't pay get whipped and trained and even breed
>Last girl was buying a shock collar so you torture her with that
>She begs for mercy after hours of training
>You give her a ultimatum, take of the collar and live a free life or press the button herself to get shocked and admit defeat
>She presses the button and exclaims how happy she is to have found her master before passing out

>Be teen anthro
>Your mom is an anthro like you, and your dad is a human.
>Your family is a little weird, because mom is a fair bit older than dad, but dad is still firmly in charge of the family.
>Go through the attic one day.
>Find a box of old stuff. Inside is a bunch of old documents, including adoption papers.
>Fear that you were adopted and read them.
>...What the fuck
>These aren't your adoption papers. These are DAD'S adoption papers.
>The guardian listed? Your mom.
>You suddenly realize why mom is older than dad.

>tie up mouse to trap
>set a vibrator between her legs
>tell her if if she cums the trap will go off and she will be broken in half
>she is now terrified and sweating
>you slowly turn the vibrator up and watch her squirm to try and pull away from the stimulation
>after ten minutes you turn it up higher
>her eyes are wide and she begs you to let her go
>you play this game for the poor mouse girl for an hour driving her further and further
>she's now clinching everything trying not to climax straining her limps to get away from the vibration
>you look at the clock and tell her "it's time"
>you crank the vibrator up to the max and the girl then shrieks as a powerful orgasm tears through her
>her hard clit grinds on the plastic as she spasms and rocks her hips
>she's crying and closing her eyes waiting for the trap to snap her
>it doesn't come
>she opens a teary eye to you laughing
"April fools"

>innocent cowgirl moving to the big city
>doesn't even know what molestation is
>all she knows is that her body is reacting very positively to this stranger groping her ass
>she'll go from a pure daughter of the farm to blowing her new master as he drives her to his home

>it's said that for increased energy, endurance, and fertility a female anthro should switch over to the cum diet
>a diet consisting of literally nothing but the cum they suck out of the human master's cock
>not even drinking water
>but this is only half the truth
>the truth, you see, is that anthros were never meant to consume meats and grains and vegetables
>their primitive ancestors, perhaps
>but not the modern anthro
>as pets and slaves in antiquity, they were bred and evolved to survive off of cum in order to maintain their submissiveness
>after all it's much easier to lord over property when all were forced to kneel and accept a cock in their throats multiple times a day just to survive
>and the rebellious would either starve or humiliatingly lick dropped cum off the floor and out of the well fucked holes of their fellow slaves
>it also helps that that human semen is nutritionally dense and full of fluids with each human produces more than enough cum to feed an entire family of anthros on a diet of pure semen
>even during pregnancy the master can feed the mother enough to birth a healthy, strong baby to grow his family who is both seeded by and completely made from their father's jizz
>the modern anthro, consuming human foods that their bodies cannot fully process, is weaker, impotent, and sometimes even infertile compared to their slave ancestors
>their new diet only allows their bodies to return to their original, natural strength
>right now this secret fad is limited to certain exclusive clubs and behind closed doors between a master and his pets, but in time it may return as the new normal
>so if you've got an anthro at home, do them a favor and finish inside
>human sperm belongs in anthro stomachs and wombs

>Waifurs is extra fluffy and sweet
>Whenever you're in public with her everyone around you is in complete disbelief that you're with her
>She's out going and charismatic while you're emotionally dead and distant
>Sometimes a furboy will make a snide comment that she should be with him instead of a loser like you
>You don't say anything but get a little upset about it
>After all she's perfect and deserves the best
>She barks at the furboy and then openly kisses you passionately
>Practically tongue fucking your esophagus
>The furboy fucks off as your cock bulges your jeans from her rough handling
>She's wagging her tail erratically and gives you the fuck me eyes
>The sultry look you seen every night, accompanied with a pair of drenched panties
>She pulls you back home and wants you to express your appreciation in your creative way
>Her body's a playground when you reach the bedroom
>Ropes, chains, and toys line the wall
>"I'm ready for everything," she says already stripping
>The little furry wife had never experienced how you show your love
>When you first slapped that collar on her she melted and knew she couldn't go back to a normal relationship
>Now she was your fuck puppy
>You strapped her down and kissed her neck
>She howled in anticipation and thrusted her hips on the empty air between her thighs
>"I've been a good dog haven't I?"
>You kissed her nose and flicked her nipples listening to her sweet moans
>She was a dripping waterfall as your hands caressed her pussy
>Her clit was hard as attention
>The pebble rolled in your palm as you molested her folds
>She whined when you pulled your wet hand away
>You move down to blow sweet air on her sodden cunt
>She bends away trying to escape the icy chill but it's know use
>When you tease her enough you place your lips over her jewel and suck on it
>She howls and bucks as you treat her
>A finger is inserted into her pussy to give her muscles something to suck on as they contract on through the orgasm
>The chains rattle and the rope is pulled taught as every muscle in her clenches
>She pushes her cunt further into your face before letting out a single satisfying sigh
>But the work isn't done
>She looks at you with big soulful eyes as she trembles at what's next
>You give her little time to cool off as you expose the massive erection you were hiding
>It slaps her furry stomach loudly
>"Wait. Please..." Her panting is so cute
>Her tongue bobbed out to the left of her muzzle and drool dripped to the sheets with her other fluids
>You wasted no time and shoved it in her soaking wet hole
>Her muscles gripped you like a vice
>Like it was trying to suck you off
>She winced and tensed up
>Having just came left her a little more sensitive
>You were done with her body yet
>She was after all yours to do with how you please and she couldn't do a thing about it
>You picked up the massage wand and showed it to her
>She shook her head, "Can. Not. That."
>You ignored her and pressed it to her stomach right where her womb was located
>The vibration felt wonderful to you
>Nothing like a twitching vibrating cunt to unwind after a day of visiting friends and errands
>You slid the wand to her clit as you viciously hump her
>The bitch is quiet, just the sounds of the wand and wet meaty slaps
>She was enjoying it though, her eyes rolled back
>Her muscles were still hard at work trying to get you off as soon as possible
>The pressure built up and you slam forward to unload
>You drop the wand and pull her fur toward you as you release every drop inside
>You pull out of here in a huff, wiping the sweat from your brow
>You pull the single bow that's keeping her bound and she collapses to the bed
>She opens her arms weakly becoming to her fluffy embrace
>"Thank you for treating me like a good girl."
>The two of you slide your arms around each other and drift off on afterglow.

Elias was an arctic fox. And he had just turned 18. So when his mother told him to show up in a bar, he thought he was going to a birthday party, to celebrate his last day on earth before being shipped off as a soldier to wage interstellar war.
However, when he entered the bar, he found his mother naked and on a table, cum drooling from her vagina, while a man was ramming her ass.
“You Elias?” The man asked.
“Y-yes.” The arctic fox stuttered out a reply.
“Your mommy just earnt you a job.” The man said indifferently as his penis shot out white ropes across her face.
“A job!?” Elias asked, extremely excited.
“Strip.” The man said as he untied Elias’s mother and helped her off the table.
“Thank you so much.” Elias said as he started stripping himself, his eyes sparkling in joy. He knew how much a job would do for him. Anthro males would be shipped off to wage interstellar warfare. Except the ones with jobs. They would get to stay and survive.
Eliases mother watched her son as he stripped naked and stood in front of the human, repeatedly thanking him. Then, as she had previously agreed with the human, she took a chastity cage off the bar and started putting it on Elias. Within a few moments the chastity cage was on him and locked. The human took the key. “You won’t need this anymore.” The human said.
“Now, let me show you to your work station.” He said as he walked into the male toilet, Elias after him.
“There.” He pointed to a bathroom stall with a small pile of items on the floor. He then helped Elias into them. A buttplug into his ass, a collar around his neck, a chain connecting the collar to the wall, a ring gag, and finally, an arm binder behind his back.
“You suck dick, each day, whole day.” The human said, while Elias waggled his tail with the joy of knowing he’ll remain here, rather than be shipped off to war. And he happily watched as the human closed the door, leaving him squatting there, in the dark, waiting for someone to fuck him in the mouth.

>"Hello Miss Greene," the synthesized, yet feminine, voice coming from the ceiling stirs the tigress out of her sleep.
>Realizing she's been gagged and bound to a metal chair help her in waking up the rest of the way and she begins to squirm to escape as the mask on the screen before her continues.
>"In front of you is a dildo and a pot. When the pot is filled, the door will open and let you go to the next room," Haylie shuddered as she gazed at the large human-style dildo jutting out of the wall.
>"The dildo will only start releasing cum once you have taken it down to the base. Do not spill any and waste my husband's kindness," with this new knowledge she looked at the dildo with a new sense of revulsion.
>"In ten minutes, a gas will start to fill the room. Ten minutes of exposure to the gas will dramatically increase fertility and induce paralysis. In twenty-five minutes, the gas will be removed from the room and the door will open."
>"In thirty minutes, my husband will enter the room, ready to breed. The time begins now," Haylie's bindings and gag unlock and pull away from her.
>"Tick tock Miss Greene," and with that the screen winks off.

Date: 8.12.2312.
Observations on the life of Anon, human, male, 29.
Monday, 5:00, alarms wake up Nol’Fassal, Yinna’Fassal, Silea Phosis, Nipia Phosis, Ulba Phosis and Raninsha. They hurriedly go on about their slave duties.
Nol’Fassal, quarian male, age 24, thoroughly feminized, locked in a innie chastity cage for the past 6 years, rushes as quietly as possible to prepare breakfast for Anon.
Yinna’Fassal, quarian female, age 42, bound in a bitchsuit for the past 11 years, with intense nerve stimulation (edging) is lying on the floor next to the bed, experiencing the first effects of a massive dose of aphrodisiacs just injected into her organism.
Silea Phosis, turian female, age 65, the head slave, decides she desires to entertain Anon, so she forces her two daughters, Nipia, age 32, and Ulba, age 28, into taking massive doses of aphrodisiacs and inserting a duo of dildoes into each.
At around 6:00, Anon wakes. He motions with his hand and Yinna, after a brief period of struggle makes her way onto his bed, then positions herself to suck his penis, her rear presented to him. Both she and her son are wearing the latest in the quarian fashion, a fully transparent and extremely strechy suit, strechy enough to allow a human to fuck a quarian while feeling as if they’re only using a condom. Yinna, by now dripping wet underneath her suit, hopes Anon will fuck her, vaginally, and bring her to an orgasm, but Anon lays back and lets her suck him dry. After Anon comes in Yinna’s mouth, she starts to gag, due to the inability to swallow semen, now stuck deep in her throat. She will not orgasm today, just like she hasn’t orgasmed once in the past 11 years, despite the constant edging, vibrations and drug dosages administred in her and meant to make her more horny.
Then, into the room enteres the duo of Ulba and Nipia, both naked, Ulba carrying a set of clothes, for Anon to wear after he showers, while Nipia manhandles Yinna off the bed, inserts a long dildo into her mask to prevent her from gagging the cum package out of her throat without help and rushes to tidy the bed.
Anon then makes his way to the dining table, under which Silea is already waiting for him, her tongue stuck out. Anon pulls his penis out and Silea eagerly gets to licking it. On the table is laid a wide assortment of prepared dishes, while, on a special chair, sits their chef, Nol.
Anon tries a few different dishes and upon being satisfied with them, dismisses Nol, who slowly makes his way off the chair. It takes him roughly a minute and a half to push himself off the massive 40cm long dildo leaking estrogenic fake cum. He rushes to the toilet to quickly wash himself out, before rushing to the bedroom to help his mother. He removes the dildo from her and spends the next 5ish minutes clearing her throat.
Then Anon heads into the bathroom, for a shower. Inside of the large shower, is Raninsha, asrai, age 208. She is held in place by two parallel bars, going from the floor to into her vagina and ass, each topped with a large vibrating and cum dispensing dildo. She also has a massive dildo gag in her mouth. She had been standing here, motionlessly, for the past 36 hours. As Anon enters and turns on the water, Raninsha starts massaging and caressing him. If Anon doesn’t like her performance, he’ll leave her there. If he does, he’ll give her an 12 hour break, before putting her through the same again.
Meanwhile, Nol is putting Silea, Ulba and Nipia into bitchsuits. Anon dresses himself and exits his home to walk his three pets. In a nearby park, the three turians get to relieve themselves for the only time today.
While that is happening, Nol is home, preparing lunch.
After about half an hour, Anon returns home, leaves the trio of slaves for Nol to free and heads off to work out. Silea, after being freed, decides to not free the two of her daughters and inserts them into a fuck machine each.
In some three hours, Anon returns, showers yet again with Raninsha, who finally earns her break after some 40 hours, and eats one of the many dishes prepared by Nol. Underneat the table, once again he is sucked off by Silea.
After finishing the meal, he inquires with Silea about the whereabouts of her two daughters and upon following her to the slave chambers, is pleasantly surprised about Sileas conduct to her own two daughters. As a reward, Anon proceeds to take Silea to his room and have her continuously suck him off, ride him or jerk him off for the following 6 hours as Anon, alternatingly plays games, reads and rests.
Then, as evening approaches, Anon decides to go out to a bar with his friends, taking only Silea with him. Silea spends the entire time bound in the fuck machine at the slave pen. At roughly 22:00, Anon leaves without picking up Silea, that spends the night in the fuck machine. Anon showers yet again and falls asleep. The next morning, Nol serves Anon alone, due to Silea, Ulba and Nipia all still being in the fuck machines.

>after the war a cult arises among the sangheili that still worships the Forerunners, but now acknowledges humanity as the rightful Reclaimers
>they believe that they have signed against the gods, and must now redeem themselves by serving the Reclaimers in whatever way they can
>a sangheili female will happily let a Reclaimer treat her as his fucktoy, and will perform whatever act, no matter how humiliating or degrading
>when the UNSC discovered a way to allow cross-species breeding using Forerunner tech, the cult was overjoyed, and sangheili women by the millions clamored to volunteer
>now the greatest honor a sangheili female can aspire to is to become a broodmare for human children, helping the Reclaimers rebuild their population, and take their rightful place as Master of The Mantle

>Get a Sanghili from this
>Knock her up again and again and again as part of humanity's new recolonization efforts of space.
>Continue amping up her fertility, meals, and treatments.
>Before long broodmare has become almost literal, she's breaking 10 this pregnancy and her breasts have swollen so large that she'd need a custom bra if I bothered to give her clothes.
>Her thighs are always bressing against each other and she takes up two seats whenever she is (often) sitting on my couch.
>Hips have required the widening of doors and hallways so she stops getting stuck, although I'm wondering if getting her too big to stand would be easier.
>And she herself is so lost in her hormones and the moving of her brood that its not uncommon to hear a sudden orgasm slip out from her lips.

>deer who know to present themselves to be fucked when challenged by a human survive
>they will return to their tribes with human sperm dripping from their faces and gaping holes
>pregnant and humiliated
>but alive
>deer who resist are shot
>the survivors will teach the young fauns how to survive an encounter with the humans
>eventually it becomes an evolved instinct and the standard culture instead of just a survival skill
>to a deer, the human's orders are absolute and unquestionable
>no matter where, no matter who is watching, no matter if she's a virgin not looking for a baby
>if a human even hints that he wants her, she will start dripping and getting hot
>the usual feeling of disgust at being molested does not happen with a human as the perpetrator, only an intense and irresistible arousal
>firmly wrap your fingers around her neck and she will submissively drop to her knees, even if she herself doesn't know why
>it's evolution, baby

Dang, so in the modern age, 1000's of years of inbuilt instincts
>Dog girls spreading their legs slightly each time a big human man snaps their fingers and not understanding why
>cat girls wondering why they feel safe when they nap in the presence of you
>Horse girls bending over backwards (sometimes literally) for human men they don't even know

>Apparently, there was a lot lost in translation before the Sangheili and the rest of the separatist covenant allied with humanity.
>One big thing was how the Sangheili words for 'male' and 'female' got mixed up.
>Most serving Sangheili are female, while the males are smaller and usually more subservient.
>It shocked the Sangheili an equal amount to realize they were fighting an army of mostly males.
>With this information out, tensions ease quickly as each side hesitates to be hostile to what they see as the 'fairer' sex, even with the still sore and open wounds the war has inflicted.
>After several years, tensions ease rapidly. Military cooperation between humanity and the Sangheili is as smooth as silk, blowing away the expectation that several generations would need to pass before they could reach this level.
>Reports of 'unprofessional relationships' during joint-ops are swept under the rug and politely ignored in the name of inter-species relations.

>The worgen rogue yanked out her buttplug from her sore red rose bud
>Her utter humiliation finished
>She picked up another set of clothes from her personal hideout
>Her crotch was still wet from the paladin's semen
>"Fuck him," she snarled, "bet it was some gnomish tech that made me follow through with the bet."
>It would be sometime before she could show her hide in Elwynn forest again
>No one would want to let her join their adventure after seeing her paraded around like a pony
>She grabbed some gear and set off far away till folks forgotten
>If she was lucky she could backstab the human that dominated her
>In the dead of night she caught a flight on a gryphon to stranglethorn vale
>There she could gain some of her fame back and make some gold
>As dawn crept over the horizon she arrives at the quest board in booty bay
>Goblins always need a subtle hand or in her case claw
>To her luck a perfect quest had just been posted
>The ink had just finished drying
>Some troll trouble in the forest ruins
>Dumb savages are quite easy to take out
>The who and the why weren't important to the wogen
>She took one of the papers and quickly left
>Past lions, tigers, and panthers she arrived at the entrance to one of the many ancient troll cities
>Deep gutteral humming could be heard from deep inside
>As she entered the humming increased in volume and voices
>There were no guards
>Her fur bristled under her leather corset
>It was unusual to see a place like this so empty
>In the heart of the ruins she found the source of the humming
>Several trolls breathing cursing poisonous smoke while reaching to the heavens
>They encircled a sacrificial slab, some poor goblin laid sliced open like a cantaloupe
>Their eyes were closed tightly as they continued their chant
>The perfect time to strike, backstab, and assassinate
>She approached stealthily her hind quarters nearly touching the bare earth
>One of the trolls shot her eyes open at her
>The woman's neck cracked when she turned to face the stealthy attacker
>The worgen's blood ran cold as her beady troll eyes peered through the unsettling tribal mask
>The rogue struck out with her daggers drawn, she was wound up like a spring
>the daggers found home but it was like sinking the blades in dried meat
>"Yous vill be perfect for our next tribute"
>She laughed at the worgen who was trying to retrieve the daggers from the her chest
>Each laugh spewed out a purple dark cloud that fell over the struggle like a cloak
>When she awoke everything was in a deep blue haze
>The deep throaty humming echoed through her very core
>She tried to look around but couldn't move
>She felt cold and numb
>Purple smoke burst forth and cleared the blue haze
>She was floating above the alter
>The trolls were in their deep trance again
>In the center of the alter her body laid stripped and vulnerable
>She cried out but no voice escaped
>Chills vibrated her soul as she was now going to be sacrificed to some horrible troll god
>All she could do was watch in terror as they readied the sacrificial dagger
>They touched the blade to her temple and she could feel the cold iron scrape her fur
>She winced and even her body twitched in response as they trailed the blade to her nipple
>Each little scratch and bump could be felt by the suspended soul
>As they toyed with their victim poking and prodding the ceremonial dagger on her hide she prayed
>She prayed to someone, anyone
>The only voice that returned to her was a pair of vicious red eyes that peeled open from the smoke
>It spoke in the gibbering troll language
>Laughing at it's prey as if she was just a grape ready to be plucked
>Her essence shuddered begging for mercy
>The daggers was raised above the troll woman's head ready to dive down through the worgen's chest
>A bellowing warcry interrupted the affair
>Thunder and shocking sparks soon followed
>The trolls stopped mid sacrifice when the battle horns and drums disrupted the chants
>A horse neighed and boisterous laughter approached
>The worgen heard this voice before
>Half of her was happy to be rescued the other half rebelled and twisted a knot in her suspended spirit
>The human was chased the entire way through the crumbling remains by fleet footed trolls
>They threw spears and blew poisonous darts into the man and his steed
>He stopped just short of the praying circle and a blinding flash carried his horse away
>Clad in full silver armor and the illustrious alliance symbol he shrugged off the attacks of the trolls
>The tribal trolls surrounded him crude axes and spears ready
>He pulled out a golden ephemeral hammer and struck the ground
>They spasmed and cried out in pain
>Each one fell to their knees only to get their head swiped by the paladin's hammer
>It was a decisive victory
>The paladin made his way to the alter checking the bodies as he went to ensure they were dead
>Then he saw the worgen upon the slab
>He reacted quickly and removed his helmet
>His face had the look of concern and worry
>He removed his gauntlets and pressed his fingers to her throat
>The sensation felt wonderful
>She relieved despite the dark god still keeping it's gaze on her
>He felt for a pulse, his worry melted away when he pulled away
>He then dispelled the cursed air by kicking the incense pots, scattering the powder along with shards of sacred pottery
>The purple mist vanished and she was still floating in the blue haze above her body
>The paladin looked her over and peeled back her eyelids for examination
>It felt weird but with every warm touch left her more relaxed.
>Her sense of smell was also returning
>Despite her previous objections to this man she felt comforted by it
>The last time being when she had her snout buried in his pubes as she sucked him off
>"Don't worry," he said petting her unconscious furry head.
>His hands began to glow a brilliant white light
>Like the purple smoke this light tore away at the blue haze
>She could see clearer than normal like a wonderful sunrise
>Her silver hide shimmered as he passed his hands over her
>She felt the warmth run across her body touching her collar bone down to her breasts
>She felt her nipples pop up from the sensation and she let out a stifled moan as his palms grazed them
>Her heartbeat quicked as the hand moved on to her stomach
>The body betrayed her state as it tensed up
>Twitches under the eyelids and clinching of her claws and toes as he moved over her womb
>The light penetrated her and reached out to her spirit
>It wrapped around her like silken ropes
>She wished to latch onto them like a struggling sailor desperately trying to escape the sea
>While she was unable to move the stings of light caught her and reeled her back
>His hands pressed firmly on her mound
>"Gaah!" Her body cried out taking in a surprising breath
>She felt wetness between her legs
>Close, she was getting close
>Her spirit was now a few feet from her body and the pleasure intensified
>Her body was now twisting and pressing her thighs tightly together
>Her aching pussy was being teased by the paladin's aura
>The air was now heavy with her scent
>The paladin then slipped a few fingers between her furry white thighs
>The wet hole accepted them greedily
>He fondled her soaking wet lips to the hymn of the light
>"Mmm, ah..." Her body arched and gasped for more air
>She was so close now her soul was inches away from returning
>Her maw was now open panting eyelids tight
>"Gaaaaaaa!" Claws dug deep into the stone slab
>Her fluffy ass was in the air as her body bowed entirely spraying her fluids out of her spasming cunt
>"Hnng yes! Yes!"
>She was now one being again body and soul
>The paladin continued his treatment feeling the contractions on his holy touch
>The worgen struggled to keep up twisting and gasping as his crusade continued
>He pulled his soaked fingers out and flicked the fluids away
>"Welcome back to the material world," he said with a smug smile
>She was dazed, eyes unfocused
>"Thank... You..."
>He chuckled playfully, "can't have my mount die to some spear chucking savages"
>She made a half hearted laugh trying to play along
>She rested on the stone slab a little longer as he gathered her belongings
>Once she was more cognitive she saw that her stuff was now placed in his bags
>"Hey!" She protested
>"What?" He played coy
>She growled and stamped her feet, "You know how hard I worked to get that?"
>"Once I get my reward for killing the savages I'll let you have it back. Might even give you a percent for keeping them busy while I bulldozed through."
>The naked wolf covered herself and wrinkled her snout
>"Now don't play like that, you were practically cumming your brains out last time I strolled you through a city."
>She shook her head denying such accusations, "you used some bullshit potions and gnomish gizmos"
>The paladin laughed and then stepped a foot away from her
>She was taller by a bit but he had a holy strength that could easily topple her
>Her nose flared and she inhaled the mans scent deeply
>"I don't rely on petty gnome toys," he said , "and those potions were quite expensive and only enhance what you were already feeling."
>Her eyes were already dilating looking at him
>She shook it off and took a step away trying to hide her arousal again
>He continued, "Just admit you love being under my control."
>That stabbed at her heart, she refused to believe such nonsense
>"N-no," she said hesitantly
>The paladin then struck her with golden hammer that vanished into her chest
>"Now tell me the truth, you wanted to lose that bet."
>Her mouth started to move as she tried to refute the claims
>Only the truth came out
>"Yes... I loved it when you did that to me."
>"I took the bet because I wanted a man that could take me."
>"I was soaking wet when you stripped me and I wanted to have everyone watch me cum on your hands."
>She slammed her paws on her muzzle to keep it shut
>It shot open with another deep secret truth, "I want to be treated like a dog on a leash."
>"hahaha! looks like you really are a sub rogue!"

>humans have the legal right to grab and fuck any anthro they want, anytime, anywhere, and nobody can stop them
>an anthro couldmjust be sitting at a cafe, chatting with her girl friends, when all of a sudden a human comes up from behind and has his way with her in front of everyone
>no words, no hesitation, just bend her over the table, hike up her skirt, and go to town
>her friends just sit there and try to go on about their conversation as if their friend isn't being raped right in front of them
>after he's satisfied the human just walks away and leaves his anthro fucktoy bent over the table, legs trembling and seed leaking from her abused cunt
>he also left his number and address

>oppossom girl barely worked enough to pay rent
>As property tax increased rent got too expensive
>A week of wandering she ended up squatting in the large unkempt backyard of a human's home
>She was completely miserable
>She curled up during the day behind his shed and ate blackberries from the overgrowth
>The human knew this unbeknownst to the girl
>Hard to ignore her when she would spend at least a few hours sobbing into her dirty hoodie
>The smell of a warm plate of food catches her attention one night
>The human put out a bowl of leftover food
>She cautiously approaches it careful to not be seen
>The human peaks carefully from the other side of the house
>She's kind of disgusting looking
>she looked like she was on the streets for half a year from her barely cared for life
>She had a bit of a chubby belly but her features were feminine
>There might be a cute girl under her matted fur
>She devoured the food and scurried back to her nest
>the human thought it was about time he got a pet
>The next few nights he kept setting out a plate of food
>Scraps of chicken wings, tendies, with slightly cold leftover rice
>Enough to keep the girl around
>He kept the food coming, watching her eat and hide like a wild animal
>Then he decided to let her see him as she ate
>He gave her a bowl of warm soup and a sandwich
>Unlike the rather small scrap portions it was a full meal
>When she ran to have her fill she saw this change and looked up to the human who stared back
>She trembled, and her nose ran
>She didn't want to be seen like this but the food made her mouth water
>She hunched over and started to eat trying her best to not look at the human
>But he just stood there silently judging
>She felt so small that moment, her lowly status on display
>She avoided looking at him, afraid to see if he was laughing
>When she finished she returned to the bush
>The following day the same thing happened
>She grew used to being watched as she ate
>It was demeaning, but it kept her belly full
>Then he opened the sliding glass door
>There was no longer a barrier between the two
>As she ate she finally asked him a question, "why do you feed me?"
>"Not sure," he replied "why are you in my backyard?"
>"I don't know"
>Her eyes were glazed over like she was dead
>"You stink pretty bad."
>The truth stung her pretty bad
>Her once pink tail has been dragged through all sorts of filth and she has yet to get some toilet paper
>He stepped aside, "let me wash you up."
>The invitation was welcomed
>She entered the home and saw the sparsely decorated house
>He waved her to follow
>It was so warm she wanted to collapse on the carpet and sleep
>When he got to the bathroom he started the bath
>Warm steam flooded from the tub as it slowly filled
>The opossum imagined how great it would feel
>Then the human got close to her
>He was a full head taller and skinnier than the girl
>She froze I place unsure what he was doing
>"Arms up," he ordered in a friendly tone
>She lifted her arms and then felt his hands caress her out of shape figure
>Her hoodie and shirt were tossed aside in one smooth motion
>The sharp change gave her chills
>She crossed her arms defensively hiding her bra that held her sizable bust
>she could smell herself
>"I'm sorry," she said wrinkling her nose
>He didn't or wasn't listening
>She felt her tail strap come lose from her jeans
>The chill that took her torso spread to her legs as her pants were pulled down
>She took a step as a way to get away but tripped and fell to the tiled floor
>He took the opportunity to pull the pants completely away
>She was now in just her dirty underwear
>"Come on,"he said while motioning her to stand, "can't get clean if you're wearing that."
>Her eyes were locked to his
>She slipped off her bra revealing her nipples to the human
>The sagged from her size but the fur helped make them presentable
>The bra was discarded to a pile
>He smiled as her paws made their way to her elastic waistband
>She remained seated as she took off her panties
>"You have a cute mound"
>She parted her legs to see what he was talking about then blushed as her puffy bald pussy lips were exposed
>She closed her legs and watch as he took her clothes away
>She was naked in this humans house
>Her heart raced as he returned
>"Alright, in you go"
>She listened and picked herself over the edge
>She didn't even have hot water when she had an apartment
>She leaned back and nearly fell asleep instantly
>Then a brush caressed her head and moved to her neck
>The human held a luffa and was scrubbing her down
>"Lift your arms"
>She swallowed and obeyed, watching the once steamy clear water turn a disgusting brown
>he moved down her body careful of her sensitive areas
>He lifted up her breast to get her underboob area
>She was in a mix of emotions from the experience
>She felt like she should do something to help but he just gave her orders
>"Lift your other arm... lean forward... Turn to face me"
>She didn't think she just obeyed it was easy
>He pulled the drain and let the fetid water out
>A dark ring remained on the edge
>She tried to apologize but was promptly ignored
>He took the shower head and turned it full blast
>The hot water relaxed everything
>She could barely hear the human
>He just nudged her to get where he needed
>When he passed over her breasts her nipples peaked
>She accepted it and let out a soft whimper
>"Legs spread"
>She opened her legs letting the water rush between her legs
>She couldn't help but be turned on from the treatment
>He washed away any filth with the shower head while his other hand held the luffa
>He rubbed at her pussy causing her whole body to shiver
>Each stroke was bringing her closer to the horizon
>"Turn around ass up"
>She spun in the tub and got on her hands and knees
>Her long pink tail was lifted out of the way giving him access to her asshole
>He was much rougher with her balloon knot
>She moaned louder as the water splashed on her erect clit
>She rocked her hips with each movement
>Just as she mindlessly approached the edge the water was shut off
>She turned to the human wondering what was going on
>Her empty itching pussy tightened as all the stimulation left
>"Alright time to dry"
>As he dried her she wanted more
>He patted her back dry and then smirked
>"Let me get a better look at you"
>He looked her up and down examining the work he did
>The thin fur on her pink belly trailed down to her beautiful pussy slit
>Grey fur capped her limbs and she no longer reaked
>"Now put on your new clothing."
>He handed her a collar
>She took a hard look at the strap of leather wondering if there was more
>"Put it on," he smiled as stroked her sides
>The teasing itch didn't let her focus
>She wrapped her new clothing around her neck
>"Good girl, I think you're going to love your new life as a pet."
>He slid his hands around her back grabbing two handfuls of her white furred ass
>She melted into him
>If all she had to do is obey and get free food, hot baths
>Beats living clothed outside

>She-wolf was once a proud member of a settlement
>Respected member of her colony
>She sees a few pods fall many miles away
>Sets up a traveling party to check it out
>Colony waves farewell to wolf and her friends
>The horrors that befell them turned her heart bitter and her fur tear stained
>It first looked like a small village
>Bring neighborly she was going to greet them with smiles
>Her companions followed without a second thought
>It looked to be few humans
>They held a hunger in their eyes that made her hide twitch
>She hesitated as they approached
>The attack was sudden
>Before she could cry out to flee they were captured
>Shackles were attached to their ankles
>Specifically designed for digitigrade legs
>Made movement near impossible
>Their clothes were torn to shreds
>They begged for it to stop
>She wished they stopped at the raping
>The horrifying men were too strong
>Each time they used them the pain seemed to be worse
>They lost their names next
>Denigrated to just numbers
>They would eventually give up talking, voices hoarse from night after night of abuse
>Then one night the wolf was drugged
>When she awoke a terrible pain and emptiness shattered her
>Stitches on her abdomen sent shivers of what they done
>She was pulled out to the eating area to be used by the leader
>What she saw decorating the steel hall froze her
>A plaque with her number under an intact fleshy womb
>There were two more empty frame slots with her friend's numbers
Yeah RimWorld can make anyone a sick monster. I don't think this should be done.

>Limbless Mewtwo is caught
>The laboratory she was "born" in was destroyed
>She doesn't want anything to do with humans that not only created her but tore at her body to implant mechanical limbs
>Her body now resides in a master ball
>A lowly snake that can only get around with her psionic abilities
How would such a hurt being be comforted?
Your Blazinken Delphox and Lucario seem to want to help.

They'd try to comfort her and tell her that the humans must have had a good reason to do so, which she'd resist.
She'd question them and ask if they would still think the same way if they had their limbs removed as well.
She's shocked when all three nod, citing if their master wished it, they'd go even further than that.
Curious and a little mortified, she assumes they've been psychically brainwashed and tries to free them with her own mind.
Looking into their minds with her powers she can't deny their overwhelming adoration for their master is pure, seeing their lives before and after he had caught them and the many adventures they had all been on.
And the many breedings that they had enjoyed.
She's enraptured by the care and virility of their master, reliving all three of the pokemon's years of sexual experiences over and over again as if they were her own.
Delphox using her tits and mouth to please her master, giving the Mewtwo a taste as she took him in her throat and swallowed his essence.
The strong Blaziken bent over a table and taken roughly, the feelings of overjoyed submissiveness overwhelming her.
And the Lucario, who just today had been put into a full nelson and had nearly passed out from the exertion of cumming so much.
Mewtwo couldn't stop watching, even as the trio tried getting her attention as she spaced out and drooled from her mouth and pussy, orgasms ripping through her limbless body one after another.
They all smile and look at each other knowingly, picking up the cumming pokemon and carry her to their master.
She was addicted to the feelings of joy and pleasure the three seemed to be filled to the brim with, their lives an endless source of happiness she drank up like a dying man in a desert.
Countless mornings waking up to a warm embrace, closely followed by being filled with morning wood she was now intimately familiar with.
Her painful feelings of mistrust and fear, turned to the same adoration as the pokemon carrying her for a man she had never met.
The only fears she had about her missing limbs now were if he wouldn't mind they were gone, or that she couldn't hug him back.
Seeing his face before her in the flesh knocked her out of her gooning, and was the only thing that could've.
She couldn't wait for words and peered inside his mind next, seeing a limbless Mewtwo just like her, being bodily fucked in several positions, a blissful smile on her face.
His hands gripped her wide hips and pulled her tail, the only appendage she had been left with, making her scream as she came on his cock.
Without any limbs to get in the way, he could be as rough as he wanted, calling her his cumdump, fleshlite, onahole, pocket pussy, etc.
Each of these names felt right to her, as did the feeling of helplessness that had once tormented her, her vulnerability being something that excited her now.
Mewtwo initially thought that he might've somehow had a Mewtwo like her before, but then she realized that what she was seeing weren't memories at all, but ideas.
About her.
Overjoyed, all the Mewtwo could utter was a choked "M-Master!" as happy tears rolled down her cheeks.
Unzipping his pants for him with her mind, Mewtwo presented her swollen pussy as best she could for him.
It was time to make memories of her own now.

>Karenfur is yelling at you for messing up her order and is demanding to see your manager
WYD?

>She doesn't see that all the baristas are wearing collars and the owner is the only human working
>They look at her flinching remembering the last time an anthro said something
>She accepted the apology and got a free custom coffee
>Before the Dobbie knew it she slumped back in the chair and passed out
>The girls helped carry her to the back, a few of the girls were excited to participate being the other end of the punishment
>She remained asleep as they prepped her
>Stripping her, tying her down, strapping vibrator controls to her leg
>Stuffing rotors in her lips and then taping up her entrance so they could fall out
>One girl giggled and painted 'I'm a Karen bitch, watch me cum' on the woman's toned stomach
>When the drug wore off she regained her senses
>She blinked at the harsh sunlight
>First she tried to rub her eyes, the rope kept her from doing such actions
>She twisted and pulled as the park the coffee shop was located in filled her view
>Her heart raced when she looked down at her perky black nipples and toned stomach
>Her naked body was inside a glass case in full view
>The same glass case the cafe had in the front window
>Arms and legs bound spread eagle
>Visitors human and anthro pointed at her and laughed
>She tried to yell out to them but there was no response
>Tingling started between her legs and then she shut her muzzle
>There was intrusions deep inside her vagina
>She tried to close her legs but the vibrations just intensified
>She thrashed and kicked trying everything to get free but the ropes just taunted her with the sounds of clinching leather
>The visitors gathered around to view her body
>Eyes leering over every crack and crevasse
>The fear and shame turned to pleasure as the vibration continued to intensity
>She could feel her moisture drip down her inner thigh
>She tried to fight it
>She wanted to cover herself from the flashes of the visitors cameras
>A moan escaped her throat
>Her walls tightened around the many bullets that clicked together inside her wet walls
>Her blood pumped to her clit and made direct contact with another plastic torture device
>The pleasure was inescapable
>Flashes from behind got her attention
>The interior of the cafe were now taking pictures from her back
>Spectators were surrounding the Dobbie
>She whimpered and begged for help
>No one helped they just waited till the karen crossed the line
>She pulled on the ropes as hard as she could to fight it
>Trying to ball up but it was a futile effort
>The buzzing vibrators got their way
>She threw her head back as a humiliating orgasm crashed over her
>Her walls tightened and clenched on the toys like they were candy
>A stream of fluid splashed the glass as she came
>Her hips uncontrollably shuddered and rotated as her entire cunt was simulated
>The sensation numbed and she picked up her head
>Her muscles throbbed from the exertion
>But the vibrations only strengthen
>She looked down and shouted loudly as her vagina clinched down again ready to give up another one
>One turned to three, three turned to six
>She lazily looked up at the visitors, different faces than the ones who started
>The front plate of glass looked like it had been rained on
>She rolled her hips as her continuous orgasm continued
>Lines of drool dripped off her panting tongue
>The sun was down and the street lights came on
>She heard some female voices open a side panel
>She was hauled out of the warm box and fresh cold air touched her furry flesh
>Something was wrapped around her neck
>"You really bring in customers," the male voice said, "come back at anytime for more."
>She was then unceremoniously dumped on the grass outside with just a collar

>have prey GF
>the fact that you eat meat triggers her natural fear instincts, but she loves you anyway
>eventually those wires become crossed and it becomes a fetish
>seeing you rip into a strip of beef jerky has her almost ready to disrobe on the spot

>"Are you enjoy it, babe?"
>"Lay down. You're blocking view at the game."
>"As you wash, babe."

>moving out to a flat in a mostly anthro neighborhood
>your new flatmate makes wide eyes at after meeting for the first time
>"Sorry, I didn't realize you're human."
>The next morning you find her in the kitchen like pic related (https://desu-usergeneratedcontent.xyz/trash/image/1676/18/1676186696750.jpg)

This calls for a plan of action...
>Limit yourself to things like slapping her butt and flicking her tits in passing for the first week and learn if her personality isn't annoying as hell.
>If her personality is palatable, pull her into a sudden forceful kiss, preferably when it could be played of as you being drunk and/or high.
>If she reacts positvely to the kiss, push her down and fuck her silly, preferably on the spot. Don't move to the bedroom first, that makes you look soft.
>She's no longer your flatmate, she's your pet. Make certain the flat allows keeping pets.

>coming back from the gym
>you hear that your flatmate is taking a shower, she seems to not notice you coming and the bathroom's door is unlocked, even slightly ajar
>yet you know that she learned your consistent schedule and she should know damn well you will be back at this hour and it's a unusual time for her to take a shower
At this point do you strip down and join her in the cabin to give her a good pounding or sneakily steal all her clothes and towels and then watch from the living room as she has to walk butt naked from the bothroom to her room ?

Ok, let's get into laws:
>What are the rights of the female anthros?
>Should the laws protect them, or the owners?
>What should we do with the males?

More broadly, anthro rights should protect their lives and keep them free of unnecessary suffering. At large, however, anthros are deemed less sapient, having less capacity for reasoning, higher thought, or moral agency. So, their well-being is seen as less important than well-being of humans. Likewise, what constitutes 'unnecessary suffering' is up to debate. Still, stuff like right to liberty or protection from discrimination are thrown out of the window. Speciesism should dominate the discussion.
More specific, anthro rights should be build around humans and domestication process. For example:
- Right to humane treatment. Food, water, enough sleep, being free of repeated physical harm.
- Right to training. If an anthro requests so, the owner is required to rent a certified trainer or have them take a course at a certified training facility.
- Right to education. If an anthro requests so, the owner is required to provide the anthro means of learning more about human culture, history, and mutually beneficial relationship between anthros and humans.
Long term goal would be building legal landscape that internalizes speciesism in anthros up until it becomes the societal norm they accept. Bonus points if somewhere along the way the concept of free anthro is abolished and every one is owned by someone or some legal entity.
I don't think anthro males should have different rights if the system is to be stable.

submissive subordinate who's into spanking and commits minor offences just to recieve "punishment" after work

>She makes a minor error on purpose
>Tail is wagging excitedly even though her ears are laid back and she is whimpering in a pathetic tone
>Her butt is turned toward you ready for punishment
>You hike up her skirt to see whe isn't wearing underwear and her puffy vulva fur is drenched in lubrication
>She is still whimpering in the phony tone
>But her intensions are clear with her ears are blazing red from blushing and her tail is flagging high ready for your hand to strike her
>You only strike her once right between her round fuzzy ass
>It's all that it takes for her legs to quake under her
>She moans like a whore in heat
>She begs for more but instead you have her lick your hand clean from her pussy juice

Another thought exercise: What are some ways anthro species might go and express themselves when going stir crazy if you kept them in a shitty zoo enclosure?
Pacing or circling: Anthros that are confined to small or inadequate enclosures may develop repetitive behaviors, such as pacing or circling. This is often a sign of frustration and can be an attempt to relieve stress or boredom.
Aggression: Anthos that are stressed or unhappy may become aggressive towards other anthros or even their keepers. This can be a sign of pent-up frustration and a lack of stimulation. Pay 20 a pop to have some guy pay for the opertunity to lay the beatdown on an undangerous prey anthro like deer or rats having an episode, predators require handicaps to safely(mostly) clean their clocks. They usually go back to sulking in their misery for a good 3 months before the possibility of another taming is needed.
Self-injury: Some Anthos may engage in self-injurious behaviors, such as biting or licking themselves excessively. This can be a sign of stress or anxiety, and may also be a way for the animal to cope with the lack of stimulation in their environment. Goats running full force head on into walls for example is really funny.
Excessive grooming: Anthos that are bored or stressed may engage in excessive grooming behaviors, such as licking or biting their fur. This can be a sign of anxiety or frustration, and may also lead to health problems such as skin irritations or infections.
Tic behaviors: Anthos that are confined to small or inadequate enclosures may develop repetitive, stereotypic behaviors, such as head bobbing, weaving, or making beastial calls into the sky, yearning for another of their species to so much as call back let alone meet.

>be CEO of a company
>only hire anthro women

>already a billionaire from other companies and assets
>offer every worker a full-paid long maternity leave
>whenever one worker gets on maternity leave, hire a new one in her place
>the whole company is actually just a ploy for you to sire as many offspring with anthro women as possible

>The girls all have their corporate photos taken every year
>It's just their measurements and spread pussy
>If a girl misses her deadline she's forced to give up more clothes until she makes it up
>If she continues she is demoted and is forced on all fours to deliver mail/water/snacks around the offices
>All her clothes are forfeit except a chastity belt
>She doesn't even get the dignity to get plowed by the boss or even shlick herself in the restroom
>The other girls get to feel better about themselves despite their varying levels of undress because they aren't in the corporate cunt cage
>They haze the poor girl further by having her drink water laced with aphrodisiacs

>Be a trainer in the Sinnoh region
>Bill comes over from Kanto to test his new and upgraded time capsule
>It works best in Sinnoh because of the Arceus shenanigans
>You and your gardevoir watch in awe as the machine starts
>Gardevoir is a bit scared because human technology and clings to your arm.
>Time capsule locks on to your gardevoir
>Turns out her ancestor was on this exact same spot back in Hisui times
>Audiovisual portal to the past opens up
>Said ancestor turns out to be an alpha gardevoir with a mean streak
>Telepatic communication ensues
>You gardevoir (YG from here on) links the humans present so they can listen in
>Alpha recognises YG as her descendant
>Calls her weak for clinging to humans
>YG starts tearing up
>Alpha calls her a traitor to her own kind
>YG starts sobbing, hugs you hard
>Alpha is disgusted by the display
>Alpha is also distracted by it
>Backstrike!
>Alpha is caught by your ancestor
>Proof that history repeats itself

>Gardiebarian is considering human's proposal.
>The ~*spirits of her ancestors*~ appear before her.
>"Make no pact with man, he will lead you down a path of darkness! Observe the nightmare to come if you take this deal!"
>She is shown a vision of the future, her distant descendant being railed by her trainer as he yanks her collar.
>"Harder, master! Make me faint with your cock!"
>She is speechless, having seen what may come to pass.
>"Do you see now? Give man not an inch, or he'll give you several."
"...we still get the free food, right?"
>The spirits sigh in annoyance.
>"Yes, you get the food, but you will pay in the dignity of your bl-"
>Having heard "Yes, you get the food", she has already immediately headbutt the pokeball.
>The spirits of her ancestors cry out in despair as she falls prey to the siren song of man.
>She doesn't hear a thing.

I think I want the title of this story to be ‘Buyer Beware’:
>dear mental diary
>today wasn’t great
>I haven’t been taking care of myself the past couple of weeks to get through my cramming sessions for exams at my shitty community college
>with barely passing scores
“Learn fusion they said, it’ll be stable they said”
>I grumble to myself. Whoever told me that needs to suck some eggs
>almost 50 years since the first cold fusion power plant, and I struggle to get passed fission class
>and all I’ve got to show for it is a C- and a dirty ass apartment that coming home to us gonna stress me the fuck out
>I don’t wanna clean that shit. It’s not even that bad but… Im just overwhelmed
>I need to relax
>or better yet someone to just handle that for me so I can work without worrying
>like a maid
>those are expensive thou-
“I’ve got an idea”
>like a lightning bolt. And some convenient timing, one of those “generate a GF” or “build a bitch” or whatever their called vending machine pulls into view as I round the street corner
“21XX problems…”
>I say halfway as I approach the terminal to this huge vending monstrosity
“… requires 21XX solutions…”
>the machine chimes at my presence. And asks for a swipe of my ID card
>I comply as it verifies I’m of-age
>something like this might be pricy. But having a maid that’s basically free labor and a pet for therapeutic reasons, who all I need to do is feed and clothe doesn’t sound like a bad deal
>I make enough money on the code-ripper market anyway
>who would’ve thought selling old software would make money
>tangent aside, the machine chimes again
>please select your ideal companion or partner~!”
>partner? It doesn’t mean like…
>oh Christ above it does
>”please select your preferred species.”
>funny how they get around human rights laws by making these things “animals” but whatever, they’re cuter this way anyhow
>but what species to choose from? There’s so many
>I can mix and match what the companion might be. But that seems a bit overkill
>remembering what species might be most appealing, I remember the little grey bunny I used to have as a little kid
>a huggable fluffy grey and brown one
>i Know I said to myself I just wanted a maid to keep the house clean. But it’s still a pet too. And I’ve been touch starved
>I select the lagomorph option with no extra mixing
>the machine makes a little ditty as it opens a new menu
>”please choose your companions extras, all standard options are free of charge”
>my face must have turned a bright red. All these extras were some of the seediest, smutty ‘little extra traits’ I’ve laid my eyes upon
>some of them even came pre-selected, among them: working wombs, flavor-scented sweat glands, daily heat cycle, and something called “deep partner imprinting” whatever that means
>the unselected ones were also pretty out there, flavored pussy juice, flavored lactation… options for instincts and bodily functions that would make even the most degenerate of Roman emperors blush
>but… something about editing a living being to my fantasies like that, it awakened something within me
>I’m not sure what happened when I was looking at the kiosk terminal. But I started to play with all the options to my hearts content. Keeping the pre selected ones and just having at it with the possibilities of the things I could do to my yet-to-be created little companion
>I made her a thick-fleshed brown bunny. So naturally her breast milk should taste like chocolate
>oh! And those things gotta be total milk tanks. Puffy areola and all, I’m talking bigger than my head with fat nipples
>and of course if the tiddies are huge I gotta balancer out her hips, legs and of corse her caboose. All need to be BIG to handle that frontal mass
>I don’t know how long or how deep I was in my lustful fugue.
>it was only until after i looked at the 2d model of my companion that would be made did I second guess myself, and the fog of my mind begin to dissipate
“Christ, I can be a real degenerate when I’m not careful”
>without paying attention. Trying to press the reverse button to start again, maybe with something more normal. Some fluke of luck made my misjudge the reverse button and the finalize button on the touch screen
>”thank you for you’re purchase! Your bundle of love comes with a certificate of basic pet rights, as well as a complementary silver-tier healthcare insurance for all her option related needs. Thank you for choosing MateLove(tm)!”
>oh no
>the machine whirrs to life. Opening like a fridge to expose a large glass tube filled with water. Its surface was hot. Not scalding, but internal body temperature hot.
>a pair of robotic arms reached into the waters. Once dispersing something that made the water a more suitable amniotic cocktail for growth.
>Another terminal to the tube’s side activated. Showing the zygote cell be generated. It was basically en empty cell membrane being injected with material that when all the components were together it suddenly began multiplying
>”congratulations! You’re now the proud (owner) and (mate) of a (bunny)! What would you like to name (her)?”
>I see this machine still has the display bug. Whatever, no big deal
>thinking back to that pet rabbit I used to have. She was always such a soft and gentle little creature, like a flower…
“Juniper…”
>without skipping a beat the machine says in response
>”happy birthday little (Juniper) [user last name]! Have a very warm, happy and long life!”
>whoever programmed this was a very sentimental kinda programmer
>if only they could program the UI right
>the zygo-… Juniper; was developing quickly. A third arm came down that had this very plush kind of sphere on it
>Junipers’ cellular self suck to the sphere like glue
>it’s most likely the artificial placenta judging by how she connected to it so readily
>within the first 30 seconds my educated guess was proven right. I no longer needed the camera to see her and she was connected to it by her little umbilical chord
>she was a tiny spec that quickly grew to full size within the advertised wait time. About 30 minutes
>she looked exactly as I designed her. Massive breasts that sagged from her chest with puffy areola and nipples.
>her ass and hips were made huge too to balance out those melons
>and her thighs were full pillars of meat with that thin, even layer of fat the make them both meaty, strong and plush
>her ears were on the shorter side. Not massive flop fests but plenty for a hare of her stature
>she was a smattering of musty grey and white with light and dark brown in the right places
>watching her grow had me so enthralled I almost didn’t pay attention to the machine chiming again as two new mechanical arms came down and caressed her head
>”what would you like her to know how to do?”
>sexual skills was pre-selected for me. And upon trying to unselect the option I was immediately stopped
>”this model has been designed with inherit sexual needs. If you unselect this skill, (Juniper) will still make sexual advances toward you without proper knowledge, and may injure you or herself. Do you want to continue?”
>guess that means she needs to know how to do the deed. I back out, and just start filling out the other skills she’ll need
>basic knowledge was cooking, cleaning, and for a little extra I payed for her to have a minimum highschool diploma knowledge suite
>now for hobby knowledge…
>anybody can watch tv and movies. Maybe she’d like stuff that suits her extra flesh.
>Something she can do sitting down, or at least doesn’t require her to exert herself…
>painting sounds nice, let’s give her a talent for that.
>maybe she should have something to do that doesn’t need resources either…
>I’ll give her a love for baths, besides. Since she has both fur and a full head of hair she’ll need to enjoy the water to stay clean
>as I’m scrolling I notice one of the preselected talents again
>child rearing…
>take a wild guess why that one is preset as on
>my curiosity gets the better of me and I unselect it to read the warning
>“lagomorphs with working wombs, imprinting, and/or heat cycles *will* eventually bare your offspring. This option is required to keep your free silver tier healthcare guarantee”
>guess MateLove expects me to knock up their products
>no wonder more than half the female population is anthro now…
>i opt to keep the free silver plan since those don’t come cheap
>after a while I settle on painting, baking, baths, and ‘gaming’. It was this more or less universal option for all things game related. From tabletop hobbies to video games
>after pressing enter the same two arms that made Juniper returned. Gently caressing her cranium with two ends of semi circles.
>for the last time the computer spoke
>”thank you for choosing MateLove(tm). Based on your selection: (Juniper) is awarded one maid uniform, one pregnancy moomoo, one artistry apron, and one sweater and jeans casual outfit! Warning: all purchases are final, MateLove products under “Construct Protection Act” are guaranteed rights in accordance to their level of sentience and factors of their individual design. Failure to accommodate these rights may incur penalties, further information provided in product handbook tailored to your MateLove purchase provided now.”
>the machines printer spat out a handbook with a picture of none other than juniper on it, as well as a certificate of birth.
>another dispenser under that one dispensed All but one of Junipers clothing sets
>looking back to Junipers cloning tube explained why her sweater was missing by what it did next
>first the tube’s original fluids were flushed out with clean water. That process probably took the longest since Juniper was suspended in the stuff, floating peacefully
>the robotic arms made their last comeback, holding her up and dressing her after draining and air drying her. Umbilical chord still attached
>held up by the arms, she was dressed in her sweater and jeans getup. As well as a little purple collar with a gold tag that has her first name and my last name on it
>I don’t know why. But seeing those names together probably made me more flush than knowing how I made her body…
>I gotta reevaluate my priorities there…
>the umbilical chord was finally cut. And the tubes glass was raised while the robotic arms still held her. Almost like a parent would
>”please receive your product. Pat her back gently to wake her, and to begin her respiratory function”
>I let the arms deposit her into my own, I have to kneel down so she can lean on me in her torpor
>I do as the computer says. And pat her back until she draws her first breath
>it’s a bit of a gasping one. And she twitches a bit.
>suddenly she abruptly wakes. Eyes not yep opening as she whines.
>guess being born even like this makes you wanna cry. Kinda poetic
>she calmed down in short order though. Her paws clasping about as her face buried into my shirt to shy away from the dim street lights
>I put my hand in her paw for her to grip, which seemed to jolt her into awareness
>her paws started feeling me up all over frantically. Like some sort of pat-down
>I’m glad I was alone on this street corner here or else this might really look weird to bystanders
>then I could feel her little nose twitching back and forth, making little sniffs still buried in my chest
>which, again… glad it was just me and her
>she was kinda rough until she realized I was a living thing. Then she suddenly got extremely gentle and used the soft squishiness of her paw pads to the fullest
>those feminine paws of hers worked their way up to my face. Her thumbs caressing my cheeks
>she finally braved the light of the world to lean into me some more and face my eyes. Slowly opening her own
>pools of almost incandescent blueish violet stared into my soul
>and she spoke
>”… your eyes are beautiful, marry me.”
>before I could even comprehend that she stole what was probably supposed to be my line. She began to shiver profusely
>“y-you’re my owner right? You held me so nice and even gave me your hand when I needed to be held, please say yes. MateLove said I would have an owner who made me, is that you?”
>she’s clearly frightened herself over the notion of being an orphaned MateLove pet
>I can’t resist the urge to comfort her by stroking the back of her head where her mane of hair meshes with her plush fur
“It’s okay Juniper, yes I’m the one who made you with the MateLove vendor right there, you don’t have to worry about a thing”
>she calmed right down after that. Still holding onto me tight
>”t-thank you. Can we head home? Wherever that is? I think I can walk now. Let me get your things from the machine for you”
>she gets up on her wobbly legs. Eventually stabilizing enough to stand and slowly saunter to the vending machine to retrieve the shopping bag of her new clothes and that handbook, and her certificates inside
>once up she offered her paw to hold on the way home. She didn’t know the way and I was her only lifeline
>I took her paw and we started walking. She wanted to break the ice with smalltalk
>”thanks for choosing so many options for hobbies, honeybunches. Though I hope that doesn’t mean you plan to leave me on my own for too long. Can I call you honeybunches by the way?”
“I see no problem with it, though I’m not very used to this much affection”
>“that’s okay, I’m your little bu-”
>she looked down at her ample flesh. And her height being basically 1-to-1 with my own save for her ears
>“-big bunny… I’m your big bunny. I wanna give you affection. You put it in my nature. Which also makes it my unique right to give you lots of love”
“Really? A right huh?”
>“yeah, it’s got to do with the Constructed Being Protection Act. Basically so long as it doesn’t hurt anybody in the process I’m allowed to act on whatever nature was given to me by my makers. Which is you, and my nature is to love my maker. One of my natures anyway.”
>her thumb is running gently up and down my hand as she holds it. She really is affectionate
>the allure is too much, I can’t help but reciprocate
>I’m staring. It’s like I’m under some pheromone. Which is odd since I’m pretty sure I didn’t include pheromones in Juniper’s biological structure, just the erm… the chocolate flavored lactation.
>maybe I’m just easily infatuated, I’m not sure, God forgive my ease to temptation
>enough about that though. I’m curious about how knowledge is just crammed into her head with that machine
“So what did it feel like downloading knowledge and all that?”
>“not sure, I don’t think I could call it a memory of anything happening per-say. My first memory is your face and… sparkling eyes. Other than that, the rest of the things that I know are just sort of intrinsic. I know the information, and I know it’s from the MateLove database. But other than that I have no idea how it really works.”
“That’s kinda neat. Do you think it could be used for getting normal knowledge?”
>“oh I don’t think so. Just suddenly knowing stuff is a teensy bit too jarring I think. Plus there’s concerns over security even with Love-Mates like me.”
>we eventually made it home. Instantly like a sleeper agent upon seeing even the slight messes in the house threw off her causal clothing and put on the maid uniform, looking back to me as she got to work. Her eyes going half lidded to say something to me before beginning cleaning
>with a low, sultry tone. She murmurs
>“my uniform has no panties and it’s skirt is nice and short. If you need to breed I’m always eager, shnookums.”
>without skipping a beat she got to work. She maybe spent 30 minutes on getting everything cleaned. Mostly trash like energy drink cans that had missed the trash can after a week of cramming for exams. Or vacuuming the carpet of errant crumbs
>the entire time she bayed me either relax on the couch, or come fuck her stupid
>I chose the former out of shyness
>after she was well and done with cleaning. She stripped naked and snuggled right on top of me
>Much to my dismay of ideally taking it slow
>“hungry? I’ll make anything. You. Want~.”
>it’s like a switch flipped with her. She want from a frightened little creature to the complete inverse
“What’s gotten into you Juniper. Only an hour ago you were a timid little thing”
>“I’m in “my den” now. And I’m with my sweet owner who made me. What’s there to be afraid of? I’m nice and comfortable now.”
>even cuddled up to me she gets closer. Her massive heaving breasts squished on my chest, and she’s got her eyes half lidded staring into mine again
>“speaking of confidence. Baby, is something wrong? You didn’t make babies with me at all while I was cleaning. My body was literally designed to be one with yours. When will we make love?”
>seems she’s all in on day one. I probably should have expected as much since I made her this way
>Even when I pressed enter by mistake- part of me wanted her this way
“I’m just feeling a little shy. Truth be told, I made all those options when I was feeling a little got under the collar. And I went ahead with them by mistake. Not that I think you’re a mistake. I don’t- it’s just I erm… was a little hormonal, when I designed you.”
>“…”
>she stares at me for a few seconds too long to be comfortable. It looks like gears are turning
>then she gets a mischievous grin
>“… I think I understand. Sweetie.”
“You do?”
>“yes, I do…”
>she says in the most motherly, kind voice possible before caressing my face lovingly
>“even though you didn’t mean to. giving me the traits you did means I more accurately represent your deepest, darkest desires. Even though you think it’s improper. Even in private to yourself. Im *really* what you want~… at least as far as your subconscious is concerned.”
>oh fuck
>I think I made her a wee bit too smart
>she’s psychoanalyzing me right now
>I gave her a highschool level knowledge
>Is that just the new standard since I graduated or it she just clever?
>“I’ll wait for as long as I can, or as long as you need. Whichever comes first. Thank you, you’ve just told me I’m not just what you wanted. I’m what you needed. I’m irreplaceable, just like you are to me…”
>she pulled me in to French kiss me. I’m getting dizzy by this point
>“I love you, let’s cuddle. I’ll make a father out of you yet, sugar-lump.”
>father? Oh fuck that’s right!
>she has a compatible womb
>I really fucked myself didn’t i…
>In silence, cuddling my bunny, I’m mentally running around in circles freaking the fuck out
———————————————————
>this is perfect
>I’m his deepest dream
>his wildest desire
>I’m all his
>I hope my daily heat cycle doesn’t drive me to insanity before he’s ready
>I’ll just have to contain it until he’s ready to give in
>he clearly just needed some love to get him this far, so a little more genuine love should do the trick
>I wonder if there’s any recipe his mom made for him
>if im gonna be mommy of this home and his kids now. Im gonna need to do a little homework
>in the morning I’ll make him whatever I can think of…
>anything for my sweet. Loving owner
———————————————————
>at some point I must have dozed off
>I awoke to the smell of rich food on the air
>before I could even open my eyes the voice of what my half asleep brain thought was the cadence of a goddess welcoming me to the afterlife rung through my ears
>”good morning sugar-lump. I’m almost done with our breakfast. I hope you like protein in your pancakes! I decided something simple like bacon pancakes with some last of your eggs was a good plan. So here we are!”
>it smells heavenly
>I’m not one of those guys who forgets the last night thinking it was some dream, so I expected her to be around
>but this is a pleasant surprise all the same
>I’m glad I bought bacon and eggs when I did
>even though bacon is always a little pricey…
>I have a seat at the table
>Juniper saunters over with a triple stack of pancakes sets it down with a glass of milk
>it looks amazing too. All buttered up, and with an ample drizzle maple syrup poured over it with its delightful amber color
>sunny side up *and* scrambled egg next to the stack on the side of the plate. Ever so slightly runny
>how did she know I like my egg just a little runny?
>as the finishing touch she returns with a tall glass of fresh white milk. Setting it by the plate along with a fork
>”eat up honeykins. But not too fast. I’m serving up my plate to join you~”
>the plants the loudest, cuddliest, kiss on my cheek
>twitching bunny nose and all
>with great restraint, I begin sampling each of my bits of food
>it’s…
>it’s nirvana… it’s the biblical heaven, it’s Valhalla and Jannah
>perfection incarnate doesn’t begin to describe how good this stuff is
>it’s nothing short of the work of a culinary avatar of the mighty chef Ramses himself!
>the prophet guy fieri would indeed dub this meal a one way ticket to flavor town…
>maybe I was exaggerating a bit. fact is, food was great
>while in the throughs of this culinary transcendence, I went for my glass of milk
>I was so distracted I couldn’t quite catch what Juniper was saying just then
>“I ran out of milk from the fridge using it on the pancakes and scrambled eggs. Don’t worry though, I made do.”
>it was only when glass of milk was pouring into my mouth did what she say registered with my consciousness
>the very warm glass of milk…
>the very warm and chocolate tasting glass of milk
>well, well, well… if it isn’t the consequences of my own actions
>I have traumatized myself with my own degenerate capacity
>“took me all morning to figure out how to actually get it to taste like chocolate, turns out I gotta sort of turn this mental switch on or off. Otherwise I just lactat-… honey are you okay?”
>she said, finally sitting down with her own food
>realizing her chocolatey nectar is still in my mouth. I nervously swallow
“Y-yes I’m fine, juniper. Thank you for worrying about me”
>“what are wives for?”
>she replied with a smile before digging into her food
>she’s already self-graduated to wife now it seems
“Hey wait a second. You’re a rabbit, how are you eating meat?”
>“pfft, oh silly! I know I’m designed to be your honey-bunny. But I’m definitely an omnivore like you. It’s in the protection act, something about being able to participate in human society since humans are omnivores.”
“That… makes a lot of sense actually.”
>we ate together for a few minutes in the pleasure of each others company
>“mm, hmm”
>she puts up her finger, swallowing her bite of food
>“speaking of society. What’s your schedule like? I need to know.”
>she’s smart, and diligent
“Well I’m still in college, so there’s classes I go to. And I run a small online software business, it’s basically just an online game and software store that makes some extra money for the things I want or a rainy day situation.”
>“ooh what are you going to school for, tell me!”
>she’s got these dilated sparkling eyes of blue-violet staring into my soul with an excited grin
>what’s worse is that I only now just notice a cowlick in her golden brown hair, contrasting her dark grey and white fur
>god why did I have to make her be so fucking cute
>doesn’t help she had a body that would make the most buxom fertility goddess seethe and cry with the most bitter and raging envy
“I’m learning to code professionally so I can make my own software. Maybe get a job at some sort of firm, I’m not sure yet.”
>“ooh that’s super technical sounding, is that why you gave me so much artsy fartsy stuff? I’d love to use my talents for you when you come home to get you to switch gears and unwind. Though…”
>she starts getting closer, her eyes dilating even more and her iris color feels like it’s growing more intense
>“I’d also really appreciate it if you used *me* to unwind. We’d both get to feel good~…”
>her paws are creeping onto my shoulders. Massaging them gently but with a hungering need in their motion. Like I’m being pulled in
>“nature designed you with needs, and you designed me with needs… I’m willing to wait. But we should satisfy them *together* and bear some fruits, if you catch my meaning… shnookums.”
>she’s less than an inch from my face now
>and she hits me with a surprise bunny-Eskimo kiss
>not at all a fair play. I feel like putty in her hands and I’m fidgeting at this point
>when did she manage to mount me on my lap again?
>“since it’s a need, the protection act says I have a right to meet it. I will wait for you as long as I can sweetie, but I need you to know I won’t be liable for what happens when my ovaries start thinking in place of my brain, my love~. You’ve been warned.”
>she said what she needed with not even an iota of malice, but still in a serious tone
>as serious as a tone as sultry cadence as what she used could be
>like a seduction ultimatum
>she drew her head back again
“Juniper I…”
>she puts a paw finger to my lips to silence me
>“I was made to be your fuck-pet, your mate, and your wife. I’m aware that’s what I was designed to be, and I have every right to reject it, it’s in my own little laws made just for me and creatures like me. But I don’t wanna, I don’t care if it’s some sort of programming. I’m standing by my owner, lover, and *husband’s* side. Do you understand sweetie?”
>her finger slid away from my lips and to the side of my face. Her thumb tracing my cheek
>I can’t help myself. Juniper… she’s so sweet
>I enter an embrace with her. I’m not good with words. But I do my best to pour my heart out
“I know… I know juniper. I just… need a little more time. That’s all”
>I can hear and feel her warm, inviting heartbeat just passed her heaving, voluptuous breasts
>her paw is rubbing up and down my back slowly as she coo’s
>“that’s all I needed to hear, my sweet man.”
>we stayed like that a while
>just in each others good company
———————————————————
>such a gentle man…
>I’ll have his babies soon. I can feel it
>I’m trying my best not to push him too hard
>But I can’t help but swoon over my sweet huggy-human
>he has good reasons to be conservative about opening up right away
>I wonder if anyone hurt him though
>if I learn that they did… I *will* find them
>that doesn’t matter right now though. I’m getting love from my special man
>and he’s mine
>all mine…
>I do hope he’s ready to come ravage me soon though, I’m already getting that breeding itch
>not looking good on my end of this waiting game…
———————————————————
>eventually, my phone alarm interrupted our secluded moment
>damnit, I was enjoying my time just being close to Juniper
“I’d better get ready for school, I’ll need a bit”
>she smiles. And gets up- walking toward the fabricator
>”you go ahead and have yourself a nice shower. I’ll make you a nice lunch to eat with you on campus! How does an egg salad sandwich sound? Ooh I’ll make it with some home made potato wedge fries!”
>she’s two steps ahead of me at all times. I can’t even protest over her coming to school because she’s already herding me into the bathroom to clean up
>“nggnmphff… you look good undressed, and smell great already. But I know you’re feeling a little too unclean for being presentable. So you go on ahead and I’ll get to prepping lunchie munchies okay sweetie?”
>she said, with her paws lingering wrapped around from behind me on my inner thigh for just a bit too long
>she’s still a blur of speed, and I’m still in a tizzy for anything to properly register
“I, what? No, wait, you, I. Oh forget it…”
>I resign myself to run the water, and take my shower
>I could hear a melody coming from down the hall from the kitchen. It’s Juniper
>it’s a lovely melody but I wish I understood any of the lyrics from here
———————————————————
>“mine eyes have seen the beauty and the glory of my man, he holds out his arms and into them I ran, my husband built me out of all his whims and plans… god I can be so corny with these songs. Maybe I’ll just make my own Melodie’s next time…”
>she murmured the last part, teasing herself for butchering the lyrics to suit what she was thinking about
>“wonder how many kids he wants… hmm… can’t be more than what I want though, I’m gonna give Genghis Khan a run for his money! Put his whole harem to shame just with my pluming and hubby’s special tool.”
>she looks off to the left and right. Considering the size of the current living space
>“this little college students cheapo apartment isn’t going to do though… maybe I should use my talents and hone them to make a living…”
>”and speaking about living… I should probably introduce myself to his parents, they might be apprehensive to know that their sweet boy is courting the smut bunny he made out of a sexual-hormonal fugue…”
>she allows a grin to crack a little, a hint of mischief on her full lips that just barely hide her two rodent front teeth
>“they’ll sweeten riiiiight up when I tell them how many grandbabies I can *pump* out for them. Even the most judgmental of mothers always soften when they hear talk of the coveted grandkids…”
>she giggled to herself. Satisfied in the knowledge hubby built her to be like this
———————————————————
>what a refreshing shower
>after a quick dry and dress montage I’m back in the living room. Ready to tackle my day
>and there little junebug was waiting by the apartment entrance with a large lunch cooler
>little junebug? Where did that come from, me?
>”hi babe, I thought I’d try the sweater and mom jeans combo you got for me, you know the stretchy kind of jeans that fit my big ol rump. But I guess for now they’re just “jeans” for now. Hold the mom part. I’m rambling- you ready shnookums?”
>on some sort of laden instinct I grasp her free paw and we head out. She and I just kinda jive on the same wavelength
>one car ride and walk to class later. She and I sit together while I take notes for today, I chose the most laid back professors in my community college, so they didn’t mind an audit attendee sitting and listening
>after classes were over. It was about time for lunch before home since I took a lot of online classes
>“oh I wish you’d told me that there were lots of cozy grass lawns. I could have brought a picnic quilt.”
“Oh, sorry. I probably should have thought about that since you put so much effort into making something to eat here”
>“dawww~ it’s no big deal honeybuns. Wherever you sit, I sit. Lawns be damned.”
>suddenly, a fist mock sucker punched my shoulder
>it was Donny, my classmate. We’ve been friends since I was enrolled on campus
>“ay look at the lady killer over here. Sorry I didn’t sit by you this time. Didn’t wanna interrupt your special time!”
>he jeers with a bravado I know well
>so you an item with her? GF? You get married behind my back? I know we’ve had some crazy adventures but how can you leave me out of the one that involves laying some oats man!?”
>no point in not telling him, so I hit ‘em with the cold hard facts
“I caved man. I caved hard.”
>his eyes go half lidded, a deadpan smile on his face
>“mate love machine? The one right on the corner of the minimart on the road to your place?”
“Oh yeah.”
>“you got most of the options…?”
“Most likely”
>“… bring it on.”
>he and I break our deadpan for a laugh. I don’t know how he doesn’t take a single thing seriously
>“jokes aside, didn’t really answer my question. Aside from the massive PR brownie for men in a 100 yard diameter she is.”
>juniper chimes in. Filling the blank space I would have otherwise left unanswered
>“it’s a little complicated. It’s been less than 24 hours.”
>Donny is quick to pick up
>“not ready for titles and all the chains that come with it?”
>juniper is still matching with him beat for beat
>“nails head, meet hammer.”
>Donny’s shoulders relax even more than usual
>“well he’s always been that way. Doesn’t commit to things. Not because he’s a coward, nah it’s because he takes it seriously.”
>his stare beams back to me. Like the eye of Sauron, only this time the gaze is that of an energy drink addicted friend rather than a servant of forces most foul
>“you two don’t have too much fun now, though consider your friend SOLD on if he’s ever feelin’ the pangs of lonesomeness.”
>he walks off to only god knows where. Donny is bound not by mortal men, or mortal physical boundaries
>though there were lots of spaces more public for right now, I could feel Juniper pulling me towards some more private sections of the campus
>there was some seating and a lot less traffic in this one spot. We sat at a little bench and table under a tree
>she opened the cooler she’d kept shoulder strapped and bouncing as it slung at hip level basically all day
>and boy that thing bounced thanks to *those* hips
>and just as she promised, our came an egg salad sandwich. Several were in the box, cut into triangles
>”say ahh~. my man must be starving from using his big brain today from all that work and lectures that sorta went over my head, I won’t stop pestering until you take a bite honey!”
>her smile was to the effect of ‘I know you’ll take a bite’
>and what can I say? I’m an easy to please man
>the sandwich was delicious, it helped a lot that it was being hand fed to me by a bunny version of Aphrodite though
>a little while later I grew parched however. And I couldn’t help but notice a distinct lack of any sort of beverage inside that cooler of hers
>as if picking up what I was thinking on instinct alone she said
>”you seem a bit dry in the mouth sweetie, how about something to drink?”
>without skipping a beat she removed a her top. Her massive mammaries that triplests might have trouble tackling free and dangling
“Wait juniper you can’t-“
>”on the contrary sugarlump, I absolutely can and am, we’re in a nice little private place where you won’t get embarrassed too badly and I’m well within my rights to quench you with the breasts you gave me, now lemme just…”
>she straddles on top of me, lifting one of her heaving tits to my face and pulling her body into mine
>“let your honey bunny serve you the way you made her”
>her eyes in that purple-blue shimmer were half lidded now
>I opened my mouth to protest again, but instead juniper was quicker than I could even get a word in edgewise
>in went her huge leaking nip right into my mouth
>”there, don’t be afraid to be a little rough with me. I was build for it!”
>she gives a loving but sly grin
>”there. That’s it, your bunny thought of everything. I suppose you don’t have more classes after lunch do you? We should hit the supermarket and get something I can cook up. I also wanna talk to you about something kinda important when we get home”
>she’s casually jabbering on as if she isn’t trying to breastfeed me, her paw rubbing my back all the while
>I let out a sort of mumble with her fat tit in my mouth in acknowledgment
>”ngh! Ooh your voice kinda vibrates my booby honeybunches. If we were home I’d let you vocalize to your hearts content but for your sake I think it better to nod or shake your sweet head if you wanna say something, alright handsome?”
>I give a short, single-motion nod while part of me is still trying to process why I’m just letting myself suckle from juniper like she’s a chocolate fountain
>she gabbles on about a few different things today, eventually retracing her steps about asking me something important when we get home
>“I was wondering when it was a good time to see your folks, I want their blessing to really make being your little bunny-bride a reality”
>I almost choked
>my parents…
>how am I gonna explain this to them
>juniper didn’t miss a beat and just kept talking
>”I was thinking that as soon as possible would be good since I want your babies so bad. And it might be improper for their son to come home with somebody knocked up before they can even say hello.”
>she’s got a point there
>I guess it’s better to rip that bandaid off at the earliest convenience so there isn’t some sort of hashing out of grievances related to impropriety
>I gently pat junipers back to let her know I’m finished drinking
>she finally relents and allows me to pull back my mouth from her very engorged teat
>”aside from your parents, there’s one other thing”
>she wipes my lips with a handkerchief, when she had the time to get one at all, let alone bring one with her is beyond me
>”take a guess what it’s ultimately about”
“Babies?”
>”lots and lots of them. Specifically how we’re gonna take care of them, I have those artsy talents you gave me so I think I’ll get an education starting here as a graphic designer or something! That way we can afford a house with lots more rooms.”
>she’s giving me that cheeky radiant grin that women like to give sometimes, the one where she is about to or already has dropped massive good news that she knows is gonna also make one blush
>“on the honor of my pretty little collar, we’ll have a nice big house by the time the little ones are born”
>so much for going slow I guess
>but I can’t complain
>genuine love whether she was born with it or not feels good
>she puts her shirt back on and packs up what’s left of her little cooler
“There’s nothing else going on today, wanna head home?”
>”that sounds good, every second of alone time is another chance for us to- you know~”
>she doesn’t finish her sentence as her big brown paw wraps onto my hand
>we go home and I don’t even get the chance to do a smidge of homework
>the second the door is closed she’s undressed me and herself and is pulling me to the bedroom
>“cmon even if I don’t get to have you turn me into a cross eyed mess I still want some skinship, it’s cuddle time!”
>maybe it’s time I took the initiative
>I bought a lusty breeding bunny, and by god she loves me so much I might as well get my money and her love’s worth out of this
>only after cuddles, though
>god, she is so warm…
>Im undecided if I want Juniper to be my cuddle blanket, or mattress
>I’ll settle with body pillow on my flank 
>she put her collar on the nightstand as she let my face sink right into her cleavage
>her paws rubbed my back. gently, up and down as I slowly fell asleep
>I think she’s lulling me into slumber on purpose
>not that it’s unwelcome
———————————————————
>heaven
>pure heaven I’m touching right now 
>he has no idea the things I’d do for him
>the lengths I would go
>the heights I would climb
>even the depraved depths I would dive down if he so much as gave the word~
>I really should let him no he can go nuts with my body
>ooh maybe he’s a biter 
>that’d be hot
>he really should decide to make love to me pretty soon here, each day passing I’m getting under the collar
>literally, I might need to leach myself to a post so I can stop myself from trying to suck at his joystick like it’s candy
>for now though, I’ll just let my “flower” drip it’s nectar onto his leg as I get my needed intake of skinship
>he’ll get the idea~
———————————————————
>I wake up to her slumbering, subconsciously grinding herself on my leg as she holds me tight
>seems like she’s been at it for a while too. She’s mumbling in her sleep
>”mmm… inside out… ngh…. Zzzzz, so good that…. It hurts… mmmm zzzzzzz”
>I bet I know what her dream is
>later, after some extra snoozing in her embrace on my part, I’m currently finishing the homework I didn’t get to the day before. As well as finishing an update for an emulator to run some old games I plan to sell on my software store
>that should make some money, and I’m gonna need the money if I plan to feed Junipers impending ravenous baby rabies
>after I get up and have my shower and start for the laptop in the living room, I hear juniper doing the same, following shortly after me
>”bayboo, are you hungry? Let me make you something, at least a cup of coffee”
>she’s already in the kitchen, the smell of Java in the air before I even had a chance to reply
>“cream, love?”
“Sure. I prefer a lot of cream so don’t be afraid to go nuts”
>“a man after my own heart!”
>the fridge never opened
>looking over she was nonchalantly just milking herself into my cup
>how she was so deft at it- I didn’t know
>usually that sort of thing can get messy. But it all went into the cup
>and it flowed well too, like heavy waves spilling out of her with each pull of her hand on her large areolas clowning around on her nipple
>it was all pretty erotic
>but I had work to do, and things to code
>I looked away, and dug myself in my focus
>she puts two coffee cups on the table by the couch, and gives me a hint of a troubled expression
>she’s kneeling at my feet now, both paws on my knee in a reverent gesture
>“honey, my urges have been getting more and more demanding faster than anticipated. I’d like you to give your parents a phone call today so you can introduce me. And from today on I’m probably not going to think as clearly for a while unless we’re in public or in open air. Or until you stuff and cream me like a chocolate bunny doughnut”
>I take a second to put the laptop to the side
>I half expected this to come with her dream mumbling
“I’ll give them a call the moment I’ve finished the home assignments for classes today, then we can visit them as soon as possible”
>she lit up with a smile and jittered and fawned all over my leg she was holding
>“thanks you! Since you started nursing from me yesterday it’s been getting more intense.”
>she gets up. Her breasts heaving with a bounce as she quickly stands
>“oh! If it’s gonna be soon I need to make sure my daytime outing clothes are clean”
>she rushed to the bedroom, and returned with her collar and extremely skimpy maid clothing
>like the dress isn’t even a dress anymore. It’s just a frilly thing meant to draw attention to her “party in the back”
>of which she was most certainly showing off as I sat there, Bending over with no sense of covert seduction. This was straight up a dressing tease
>she didn’t put on the collar though
>as it turned out, that was a task for me to do
>kneeling before me once again, she presenting the collar in both hands
>“it’s my man who puts the collar on his woman. And that’s me! I’m your woman.”
>her little cotton tail was going nuts. Moving the fabric of the dress on her hindquarters
>as I put it on, the had this deep, trusting gaze she was beaming from her eyes directly into mine
>the kind so devout and lovestruck that I could strike her and she would still be hypnotized
>knowing her, she might get the idea me hitting her is sexy
>she breaks the silence, one of her paws after the collar is put on her pulling one hand of mine to her cheek
>my other hand with her other paw pulling to kiss it
>“I can’t help to want to be like this, this feels right. The only thing preferable to this is you in my arms, or you inside me~”
>she closes her eyes, and sighs. Like letting go of an aspiration in one breath
>“just a little longer. Just a little longer”
>she got up in an energetic bound to her feet, all the sunshine and mirth coming back to her in a flash
>“off to do the laundry then, I wanna look good for my sweet owner’s mom and dad~!”
>she skips, or more of does a rabbit-like jaunting stride to the bedroom to grab her dirty clothes
>just before she left the field of my vision, she stopped and looked back
>“oh, and honey”
“Yes Jun?”
>“if you ever decide to skip to the fun part first”
>she sweeps her hips to bare her rear at me, spreading her leg stance just enough for me to see everything
>“you know I’m already *all* yours. Mind, body, spirit. Everything. I love you.”
>her declaration of love caught my mind off guard and on instinct from my heart I replied
“I love you too juniper.”
>then I catch myself. I don’t retract what I said though, it was true. And dad didn’t raise a liar
“it won’t be long June, just hold on tight.”
>her smile was as soft as silk, and she stood upright to face me fully before leaving again
>“I know honey. I know.”
>with that she left for the laundry room, and I drowned my arousel with work and code
———————————————————
>he loves me
>he loves me
>HE *LOVES* ME
>I knew it already. with how he created me
>with how he held me
>with how he looks into my eyes
>with how he listens and so deeply respects any boundries he might think exist between us, even when I’d NEVER give him any boundary. I’d like him beat me with iron rod and string me up my the neck and I’d still be choking out blessings for him
>but to hear him *say* it
>to hear him announce it to the open air
>to testify it to anyone, especially me
>I’m gonna cum
>ohmygodimgonnacumso-HARD
“Ngyoumph!!!”
>my moan was like a little squeak that I muffled with my sweater and jeans
>and a wet splatting noise that fell to the ground
>Oopsie…
>oh well, I’m already in the laundry room anyway. I’ll just soak it up with a spare towel in here and wash that too
>I thought about my sweet, handsome master as I loaded up the washing machine with dirty clothes
>then I thought about those boundaries he would allow me to put up even though I’m made for him
>boundaries he would let me make
>anything I could say no to…
>or even ask him to acquiesce to…
>as I left the lid to the washing machine open, while the water filled and contacted the detergent and made suds of little bubbles…
“I’ll ask for only one boundary, one wish, one request. And only one…”
>as the machine started moving the drum in a back and forth spin, making get more infinitesimal little bubbles. I murmured
“my one boundary will be we will never use birth control, and never stop having babies…”
>I must’ve looked pretty evil when I started smiling, looking down at the white foam of suds
“our kids will outnumber even this legion of little bubblies… and every last one will be beautiful like him. I’ll birth for him a nation of angels”
>I must be hornier than I thought
>being his breeding bunny brood bitch to the point of raising up a whole country sounds hot though, I must admit
“it’s settled then! Master is not allowed to stop getting me pregnant once we begin having kids”
>ooh it sounds so naughty to say something like that. To think I might defy him
>I few tugs on my collar and a few slaps on my fat butt should whip me right into shape
>though I have a feeling he’s gonna reeeaaally like the idea of turning me into a baby factory
>promising to make lots of grandbabies should help satiate the grandparents too
>god I can be such a bad girl when I want to be, naughty Juniper!


The pokemon aren't the only ones getting trained, the trainer starts out as a little shit of a child, turns into a horny hormonial teenager who will discover sex with his also horny and confused midevo pokemon, and then finally approachs the gates of the championships as a fully evolved sex god surrounded by his harem of ultrasluts, breeding bitches, and that one childhood friend who's been with you from the start.
Your very presence will drain the oceans with the amount of thirsting the pokemon will have for you and them fill them right back with all the spilled pussy juice from the trail of furious masturbation you'll leave in your wake alongside the faintest traces of your scent.
Low level pokemon stand no chance at resisting and are driven into a frenzy, swarming you with numbers as that is their only chance. The woods will never be the same.
High level pokemon need to be beaten down first to show your true strength and how strong you can develop your own pokemon. Some will even require your team to hold them down as you fuck them. But once the first drop of semen hits their womb they'll surrender, accepting you as their superior.
There are millions of pokemon for every human that exists, enough pussy to last multiple lifetimes. Sure most of them are weird talking plants but give them some love and they'll grow beautifully.

>going to uncontacted primitive planets and choosing the thiccest bitches to carry your seed across the stars
>its no longer just a family tree, but an entire family constellation

>your bat anthro pesters you about getting more females for the harem
>helps you find and seduce suitable anthros

The doorbell rang, chiming throughout the quaint suburban home. Jack, a young grey wolf, one of a whole family of wolves in the neighborhood of an anthro community came bundling down the stairs, nude like the rest of the race, his fur tufts obscuring his skin and bits. His shaggy pelt flutters as he nearly slammed into the door in his excitement to let in their visitor.
Jack swung the door open to reveal a human, dark brown skin under a generic gray shirt and jeans. Seth was not so much new to the town but he had wore glasses and carried a backpack, late teens. His overall posture was drole in contrast to the ecstaticism displayed by the eager to please animal, annoyed more than anything by the attendant wolf’s excesses to try and make a good impression on the visitor.
"So Jack.. How many lamps did you break on the way to the door?'' Seth said with a little chuckle, almost making the wolf blush.
"Hey, that was one time, three years ago dude.''
"Your whole family came running the first time We came over to say hello after checking out the property but I still hear a freight train rush through your house when I ring the bell.''
Jack crossed his arms and stuck his tongue out, "It's just to get there first, can't let my sister greet you. She's liable to turn you away just because she doesn't like to take arisk being around humans to much lest she let herself get enamored the guy who’s got her brother in the palm of his hand.''
“You don’t actually mean that right, i don’t need the hassle of legally owning you because you are already a total pet Jack.”
There’s a pregnant pause and both laughed a bit, Jack trying to not stand to attention as if that was a gleaming compliment before he rather comically shrinks away from Seth as the smaller male walks by. "Yeah, she takes the whole ‘taming.’ thing way too seriously. I remember when last she was practically rubbing her legs together at the sight of me what happened over the summer?''
The wolf glanced back with a sly look, "She’s just 'taking a stand to save herself for a good canine boy..'' He said with heavy air quotes. Then with a quick look around the foyer to make sure nobody else was around, he grinned back to his friend with a quiet voice. "But she still watches human on wolf though, i checked her computer.''
Jack had to really try to not bust out laughing after a slight processing time before the grin spread over his friend's face, "Ew, gross man.'' Wait she has a computer? Your house is halfway into the grave. "Jessica is the only only of us wiling or able to work the elecicity. She say she'd go crazy if she had to deal with me all the time"
As seth stepped inside, a musty odor enveloped him, mingling with the faint scent of decay. Dust particles danced lazily in the air, illuminated by feeble rays of sunlight that managed to filter through the grimy windows.
The interior of the house was a haunting sight. Once elegant wallpaper peeled off the walls, revealing faded floral patterns that had long lost their charm. The wooden floorboards creaked under Seth's weight, as if whispering secrets of the past. A thick layer of grime covered every surface, testament to years of neglect and abandonment.
The two kept walking, progressing towards the dining room and linked kitchen. Two adult wolves were at the counter, standing and writing a few things on notes. They were nicely groomed, the male wearing a tie and nothing else, denoting some formality.
Both turned to face the boys as they walked up, looking at the human with toothy smiles. "Seth! How are you? Ready for your long weekend sleepover?'' The two beastman hummed amusedly, "Just try to actually eat food and stop bullying the local prey anthros you to, animal control is on our case about that time you chased down and raped that rabbit across the street, good hunting by the way son" Jack beams with pride at that with Seth rolling his eyes.
"Come on dad, we're not kids anymore, we're in grad now! We have some sensibility.''
Jack's mother giggled lightly, "Sure, that's why you were up till midnight last night doing homework, because you put it off to the last minute. Just full of sensibility and responsibility, that's my young alpha alright.''
The young wolf just crossed his arms and puffed out a breath, playing it off like the teenager he was. Seth was chuckling lightly as he looked between the trio of anthros.
With a hearty huff the father put an arm around his wife. "Well, now that your guest is accounted for, I suppose we'll be on our way for some wild vaacationing out in the mountains to really let loose for once. Jack, your sister is upstairs and has authority while we're away. We know the two of you are mostly harmless, but try not to make this sleepover the kind that causes damages? We left notes on how to reach us and what hotel we're going to be at, and Seth you can always call your own folks if something happens too.'' The head of a pretty wolf teen rounded the corner of the hall upstairs, Jack's sister popping out to show them off.
The parents waved to her, "Bye sweetie! Call us tomorrow okay? And I hope the boys don't keep you up too late!''
She scoffed a bit, standing at the top of the stairs in a casual outfit, she was insistent on wearing clothes unlike her family of comparative nudists. Short yet acceptable shorts with a tank top that showed the straps and shapes of her bra, the sister was one of the hottest anthro seniors around, but kept her public appearance to hide that a bit.
Half punk, half princess, the sister liked how she looked but liked her little group of 'outcasts' better than having guys fawn over her. "Don't worry, I won't let those brats get into trouble. They're staying in the house even if it means i have to keep them here by force"
Her personal and social life were two different coins, but the constant between the both was her distain for anything relating to the humans who surrounded her small clique of schoolside anthro mean girls who worked to spite as many anthros who hooked up with humans as they could. She waved back to her parents.
Everyone said their goodbyes, the adults looking back to the boys in the hall to inform them of the pizza money that was left, then after reaching out to ruffle Jack's headfur they departed. The click of the door sounded the freedom from both school and parents, for the most part, and the teenage boys instantly shared a devilish grin as Jessica plopped herself down on the couch.
"Yo, when's dinner loser?'' Jack said confidently, casually.
Jess matched his crossed arms and leaned forward, she was larger then Jack, raising a brow as her long fur shaped like a lock of hair hair filtered down her shoulders. "Whenever you stop being an idiot brute anthro slave to that human.''
"Seems we have an impasse then.'' Seth said with narrowed eyes, backing up jack.
With a hearty roll of her eyes, Jessica twitched on her own ears annoyedly. "Shocking.''
The two wolf siblings eyed each other down, the small hints of white in their pelt accentuating their grey undertones. The faintest of smiles followed a short exhale, replaced with a glare the girl scoffed. "Fine, I suppose I'm hungry enough to order pizza.'' Keeping her leer locked to her brother's now smug face, she pushed off her lean and shut her door behind her, quickly thudding up the steps to where her desktop computer and the only working phoneline was in the house. as she passed Setth jessica snarls at him. She despised specificly for 'turning' her brother specifically. She had her whole gang of mean girls on duty to harass Seth and no doubt Jessica was calling in every favor she had and many she didn't just in case the two boys did something crazy and she'd have to drag them back home...
The muted morning sunlight streamed through the window, casting a warm glow on the coffe table.
With an excited grin, Jack pulls ran his finger along the map, tracing the familiar streets and landmarks.
"Check this out, Seth! The abandoned mansion just north of us," Jack exclaimed, excitement lacing his words. "Rumor has it that it's haunted. We could explore it."
Seth leaned closer, his eyes gleaming with a mix of curiosity and thrill. He followed Jack's clawed finger, studying the marked location on the map but it was just demonstrative.
"Sounds intriguing," Seth replied, a mischievous grin playing on his lips. "And what about the nebhors I know there's been some hot pieces of ass we could go chase on this very street, try for a round two with those rabbit Jack?
Jack's eyes widened, his imagination already painting vivid scenes of the last time he did that but alone. He nodded eagerly, his red rocket alread poking out at the idea of spitting bunny ass again and the photographs they could capture. The prospect of spending the weekend exploring town was like a treasure trove of possibilities. They continued to reveal more highlights. The picturesque park with its serene pond, where they could relax and watch the ducks glide by. The local diner, known for its delicious milkshakes and vintage charm, where they could indulge in some guilty pleasures. The towering clock tower that offered panoramic views of the entire town, where they could admire the landscape from above. Jessica is nearly done ordering the pizza, Seth and Jack need to get moving.
Seth and Jack lock eyes and give each other a knowing nod. The mansion was in easy walking distance. Seth slung on his backpack and marches out the back door while Jack scampers upstairs to stick a piece of 2x4 wood under the handle of Jessica’s door, locking her in her room. The two young males were off sprinting through the undergrowth so as the hose now well behind them droops into ruinous howls of rage from Jessica, realizing she had been duped. But for Jack and Seth that was an immaterial matter in comparison to the adventure that awaited them. The cool breeze brushed against their faces, carrying with it the scent of nature and the promise of exploration. excitement twinkling in their eyes.
The forest welcomed them with a symphony of rustling leaves and the scent of damp earth. The air was cooler here, and sunlight filtered through the canopy in sporadic beams, casting dappled shadows on the forest floor. Their footsteps were accompanied by the soft crackle of twigs and the occasional chorus of birdsong. “Any of those tweet-tweet noises coming from an anthro?” Seth asks. “Probably not.” Jack admits. Any wild anthros around here are more than likely to have been shot and made trophy mounts. The old owners of this place were scary hunters.” Jack say with a slight shiver on his part, his fur standing on edge. “You are just such a gullible thing Jack, The mansion as I heard it was really a place where they summoned demons!” Seth said with a completely straight face making his canine flunky turn spooked. The deeper they ventured into the woods, the more the sounds of the town faded away, replaced by the symphony of nature.
The dense undergrowth occasionally brushed against their legs. Their senses were heightened, every rustle and whisper adding to the sense of foreboding that filled the air. Seth's heart raced with a blend of excitement and caution, his eyes scanning the surroundings for any signs of their destination.
And then, amidst the towering trees, they caught a glimpse. A faint outline of an abandoned mansion emerged, its grandeur juxtaposed with the encroaching vines and the wear and tear of time. The sight spurred them on, their pace quickening as they closed the distance between themselves and the mysterious dwelling.
As Seth and Jack approached the dilapidated mansion, giddiness swirled within them. The walls stood as a silent witness to forgotten stories, and they were about to unlock its secrets. The pair standing outside the old fenceline to the property gave them pause at least until Seth shoved the dumb wolf over the fence and he crashes into the yard past the thresholdwhile Seth vaults the fence. ready to explore the forgotten depths of the abandoned mansion and uncover the truths that lay within its decaying walls while Jack is thoroughly scared.
The exterior bore the scars of neglect. Gray stone walls crumbled in places, revealing the skeleton of the building beneath. Moss and ivy clung to the walls, creating a haunting tapestry that seemed to bind the mansion to the natural world. Windows, long shattered, stood like empty eyes, reflecting the desolation within.
The grand entrance beckoned them forward, its towering double doors slightly ajar. The wood was warped and aged, marked by the passage of seasons and neglect.
Inside, the mansion was a labyrinth of faded grandeur. The grand staircase, once regal and imposing, now bore the weight of cobwebs that stretched across the banisters. Dust danced in the rays of sunlight that managed to seep through cracked windows, casting a hazy glow on the worn floorboards.
Rooms stretched out before them, each one a time capsule of forgotten lives. Tattered wallpaper clung to the walls, Broken furniture lay scattered, a testament to a life interrupted.

>Dragons look forward to wearing a saddle
>As soon as they find a nice human their worries of the wilds and poaching melt away
>Their seductive nature is satiated as their human holds their tail high plowing their upper half into the mattress of the comfy bed they share
>All their friends get to watch on with jealousy as she strolls around heavy with human musk and leather straps tied around her flanks
>She boasts and sings about all the lovely activities human and dragon do together deepening the seeds of envy
>The warmth of human arms
>The surprising softness of abode
>The very lengthy wet passions of kissing and love making
>The overprotective nature of being looked after
>By the time she finished the other dragons would take flight to see if this human would take them in
>Or if he has friends that could use a lovely scaled mount

>Dragons stealing saddles and putting them on to protect them from poachers and sneak into towns
>authorities have to start asking for licence and registration from lone dragons
>Need to verify they have an owner and that their saddling fees are paid

>"Alright, Sparky, you'd better show me some registration."
>"Of course, officer."
>"...This is a placard that says "Proud, noble dragoness seeking girlfriend-free rider"."
>The dragoness winks and points a finger-gun at the officer
>"Interested?"

>A dragoness is flaunting herself in front of you. Not even trying to deny her crimes
>"I need you to come with me"
>"Oh absolutely. Am I being detained?"
>"Lower your head and let me put these bridle on you"
>"Ooh taking the reins already. Kinky. Want to parade me around like some pony?"
>"Your head"
>Light shifts on her scales as she moves her neck and opens her jaw.
>"Do I get to take you on patrols? I could serve as yo aont aht mmph!"
>You fasten the bridle behind her teeth and she lifts her head back up. You grab the reins hanging in front of her.
>"You will be taken into the holding stables where you will wait while your case is being processed. You may be deported or forced into labour if this is a repeated offence for you."
>"Sir ah ohly... "
>Yank her reins to silence her
>"By knowingly breaking the law, you do not get to plead your case. A citizen may request for you to be released under their care and supervision, while being held accountable for your actions. Do you understand?"
>"Yehs... "
>Trudging along after you she's sounding notably less enthusiastic, wings and tails nearly on the ground.
>"If anyone would be to take that responsibility, they can plead your sentence to be transformed to domestic service by going through the process of claiming ownership and registering you as their mount. Do you understand?"
>"Yesh"
>You drop her at the stables and stroke your hand along her side and neck, walking to her front.
>She's drooping her head, looking a bit dejected. Maybe even worried. You give her a smile.
>"It should not take longer than couple of days to get your release forms approved. Do you understand?"
>"Y... Yesh!"
>She nods her head in emphasis, almost banging her horns on the ceiling.
>"Be good now."
>"Ah will, shir!"
>a few days go by as she is stuck in a cramped dragon stable
>she starts to have some regrets on her actions and maybe she shouldn't have listened to that boastful dragonet
>the stables were empty too
>only the occassional farm hand came by to help clean
>she tried to start a conversation but they just ducked their head down and scattered once the work was finished
>they were human hatchlings so their frightful nature was to be expected
>only entertainment she got was the small sliver of view of the streets near the constable station
>all she could do was count how many beings passed by the little opening over her stint in the stable
>28 humans, 8 apprentices, and 3 other dragons.
>she wished she could speak to them but the bit in her mouth kept her from raising her voice too loud
>not that she wanted to irritate the humans any further
>their serious tones kept her scales tight to her hide
>she was laying down in a comfy hay pile when the constible came and unlocked her stable door
>"Yer going up for auction, there you can plead your case."
>the dragon's heart raced, after stewing in her own head for the past few days she had no idea what she would say
>human customs were all learned from forth or fifth accounts from her friends
>he grabbed the reigns and yanked her out of her cell
"Okahy"
>she was pulled by the lead and squinted at the early morning light
>the grass was wet under her claws and talons as she was lead to a field
>there were two armored dragons flanking a large gallow
>on the platform there was a wooden podium
>she has seen these structures before, humanoid corpses hanging from them as carrion peck and feed
>She shivered nervously
>the human felt the shudder run up the leather leads
>"Don't worry, we ain't gonna hang ya, it's the only structure strong enough to handle dragon auctions."
>She relaxed a little taking careful steps up to the top of the wooden structure.
>she made careful footwork to avoid the square holes
>The constable dropped the lead and removed the bit from her maw
>she flexed her jaws enjoying the painful thing being removed
>He then took his place behind the platform
>"Lets get started men, it's early and we all want to get back to our work."
>The crowd was filled with a collection of well dressed men
>some of them had sleeves rolled up and scars on calloused hands
>while other were in black and white business suits carrying a fancy hat under their arms
>the dragon looked over at the other dragons to see their opinion but they were stoic and took their duty seriously
>"We have a vagrant dragon in the area, she's looking for a master."
>He stepped away from the podium and unbound her wings letting the leathers fall around her girth
>"She will demonstrate her abilities and yall' sort it out, the proceed will go to the youngins' school"
>there was a murmur of agreement with the crowd
>"Now go ahead missy, show the gentlemen what yer capable of."
>she was stricken with stage fright
>she had no idea what to do or what she could do
>all she thought of was how she wanted to be taken in by a human but had no idea what she would do beyond that
>her wings flexed out and the brilliant colors of her scales shown
>she closed her eyes and took a deep breath in
"I-I"
>The constible waited for a minute then whispered into her ear
>"Just take a big ol' breath and show the men what ya can do."
>The dragoness took in a massive breath in holding it in
>Her chest was puffed out and her foreclaws pointed inward comically
>As she let out the breath a spark of fire exhumed from her glands and ignited
>a stream of red fire flew up high and dissipated as fast as it came into existence
>the crowd applauded the performance
>"Well ya see that folks, a fire breather."
>Her dragonic pride was started to swell as she was applauded
>She then took to the air to demonstrate her acrobatics and speed
>all the axiety she had melted away as the wind flew past her
>a few loops and counter flying she hovered above the platform
>she made cautious counter waves with her wings to gently land without causing the constable's hat to fly off his head as she touched down
>"Fine show missy."
>He then waved the men to come up and view the dragon up close
>"Now come up and inspect so yall can start the bidding."
>Several men stepped up the platform while others left
>they started to touch her from her horns to the tip of her tail
>she was frozen in place as they fondled her
>they spoke to each other about what they could do with such a grand beast
>they'd ask her to open her mouth and they had a good look of her teeth while another was inspecting her vent
>they soon all found themselves behind her hind quarters
>"Can you you raise your tail for the gentlemen they seem keen on your backside."
>the dragon enthusastically lowered her chest to give them a view
>her heart was racing wondering what devious plans the humans have
>her house dragon friend once told her that her human fucked her for hours every night after a hard days work
>her legs shook in anticipation as her folds were fondled
>"Looks like she really wants to belong to a human." One man remarked
>"A fire breathing faucet, that's a treat." another said
>she tensed up and dug her claws into the wooden platform
>all the eyes on her backside and the careful attention and strokes of her tail
>She trilled softly as one person inserted a finger inside
>she was getting close from just the rubbing
>her muscles tightened around the finger desperately clinging to milk out whatever pleasure her vagina could
>the constable rang a bell
>The humans pulled away a few wiping their hands with pocket handkerchiefs
>she was still face down and let out a small whine as they stepped off the platform
>"Alright folks, let's get the bidding started"
>she slowly rose with her tail flagging, her cunt throbbing from the robbed orgasm
>The bids on her kept climbing steadily
>100
>150
>They slowed down after that. She didn't know if that was lot or a pittance. She didn't care.
>But she'd like to get a high price
>Her eyes scan the crowd, looking at the bidders
>One wore clean ornate clothes and held a hat and a stick under his arm
>Other one still bidding for her had a simple leather vest and clothing she had seen on the humans use on horseback
>Maybe he's looking for a stronger mount?
>She'd actually get to wear a saddle and be ridden around and not just be cooped up indoors all the time.
>Carrying her rider... Would he use a crop on her? Load saddle bags on her harness? Bury his hands in her cunt at the end of the day's ride? Pull her reins and make him clean his cock with her tongue?
>A string of clear lubricant could be seen dripping down on the stage
>The dragoness almost misses the question from the male she'd been staring
>"Dragon. Have you ever assaulted a human?"
>Taken aback by the question, the dragon on the stage lowers her eyes to her claws.
>She could lie, but what if she gets caught? Could they somehow do that?
>The answer comes after a short pause.
>"Yes"
>The man with a cane looks like he has second thoughts after this information and shouts he wants to back down on his bid.
>"Do you think that you are able to do so again?"
>This time, a longer pause
>"... Yes"
>Bidders start to rapidly lose interest on her
>Her eyes look over the crowd in growing worry
>"But it was only because I was attacked first!"
>The dragoness looks to the man who questioned her in desperation
>He was still looking straight at her
>"200"
>She showed confusion at that. He saw her as more desirable?
>No other bids are made and the winner steps up on the stage to claim his purchase.
>The constable offers the dragoness reins to him and he starts to lead her way from the stage.
>"Can I ask why? Why you still bough me? "
>"The amount of poachers and other outlaw activity in the surrounding areas has been growing worse. We can't cover enough ground on horseback alone. I need to find another solution. This answer your question?"
>"Yes... Rider."
>Her new life started as soon as she was fitted into a new harness
>The wealthy rancher made sure she was comfortable
>Leather straps wrapping around her curves and several loops around her legs to carry extra baggage
>She was also given a collar
>A thick ivory colored strap with her new name
>It was common practice for dragons to change their names based on their current lot in life
>The rancher went with the name Larrina
>It was embolden on a steel tag attached to her new decoration
"Any particular reason for this name?"
>She was naturally curious as it was a more human sounding name
>All dragons she knew were named concepts or other things like stormfroth, blazen, silver hide.
>The man didn't answer, he just straightened the collar with his calloused hands
>"Ya carry a human before?"
"No sir."
>"We'll take it slow then, I'll have ta teach as we go, only way to learn."
>He effortlessly lifted himself on her back and grabbed the reigns tugging her head
>He sat onto of her saddle legs resting just over her wings
>She started walking and felt a slight tap on both sides of her wing joints
>"That means go faster Larinna"
"Yes sir!"
>She started to speed up and slow down based on slight nudges
>All the while guiding her direction with tugs of her reins
>Then he flicked the reigns whipping them up her muzzle
>"That means start climbing in the air"
>She dashed into a dragon run and took to the air
>She wasn't questioning a thing anymore and just followed his orders
>when she got to her normal elevation she turned her head to see if he was alright
>he was stoic as if he done this countless times
>"Good job Larinna, we're gonna head north for about 10 minutes!"
>She wanted to ask him more questions but the whipping wind was preventing all conversation
>It became clear why gestures were needed for rider and dragon
>As they fly over the farmlands she is quickly drawn down low
>"We're almost there, it's just past the herd of cattle!"
>The cows and horses were grazing peacefully in the field not at all concerned with the dragon flying overhead.
>Larinna's time in the wild was mostly spent hunting deer and other fast prey animals, she always dreamed how the fat farm animals tasted
>the sight of food reminded her of how empty her own stomach really was
>her mast nudged her to a dry patch of dead grass for touch down
>it was just outside a large stable a red marked building
>Her wings were sore from carrying the weight but she kept her maw shut to avoid angering the man who just spent money on her
>"Let me get a few things straight for ya. Listen to me, don't disrespect me, or Olivia."
"Yes sir."
>"And don't eat the live stock unless I butcher it. The poachers, bandits, and predators that enter my 100 anchors are fair game."
"Bandits and poachers?"
>"If they're here at night, take em out."
>she pondered on that for a moment, a human that had no problem a dragon killing humans
>"Now you're probably starving so I'll go ahead and fetch you something while you settle into your new home."
>the man motioned toward the large red barn the door was partially open to complete darkness
>Larinna walked across the dry grass to her new home
>her long neck peered through the door sliding open the door further
>There was a large pile of dried hay layered with hop flowers
>it looked so comfortable she trotted over to it and rested her tired body
>but before she could divot the fresh bed to her size she noticed two rubies staring
>Larinna blinked a few times to adjust to the glare of the sunlight sliver of the door
>there was another dragon in the barn
>"So, he's replacing me."
>The second dragon sounded sad, as if she was on the verge of tears
>Larinna scrambled and backed up
"I'm not replacing anyone... I just got picked up from auction."
>the figure slithered out of their own sleeping stack
>it was another dragoness, but something was off
>She limped out of the bed and approached the newcomer
>"You're young, fresh"
>Larinna was backed into the wall as the other dragon kept approaching
>"I bet you're tighter too, hmph."
>She snorted out hot air into Larinna's neck
"I just arrived, I have no intention on replacing anyone."
>She repeated herself which seemed to trigger something in the other dragon.
>she was now sobbing.
"Is, something wrong?"
>Larinna looked over the dragon and saw the scarred body of the other dragon
>her left wing was missing and her other was robbed of all the webbing
>her sides were scrapped and cut with large pink swaths of scaleless flesh
>She tried to ask the dragoness questions but couldn't get an answer.
>the door slid open in a burst of light as the master returned holding a dead sheered lamb
>"Oh you're awake Olivia.You should really be resting dear."
>The dragon turned to face the man with watery eyes
>"You're replacing me?!"
>The man was flabbergasted by the accusation
>"What? No course not, I'm not some ungrateful-."
>she stumbled toward the human and placed it at his feet
>"Please don't replace me, I'm still useful. I can still carry you around the farm."
>He stared daggers at Larinna
>"Did you say something to upset her, missy?"
"No, sir. I just stepped in and she started acting like this."
>The man let out a deep sigh and tossed the dead lamb to the ground.
>"Don't go putting silly ideas in yer head, I'd never replace you. Lets get you back to bed."
>Larinna stopped paying attention as the smell of the meat hit her nostrils
>She dove at the carcass with ruthless intent,
>As she finished the meal she lost track of where her master
>She heard sounds from one of the deeper stables
>she stretched her head over see
>it was the master, he was completely naked standing over Oivia
>"Shush now. let me get this on you."
>he opened a jar of white cream and rubbed it on her scaleless sores
>"So you aren't replacing me..."
>he shook his head and kept up his job climbing over her rolled over body
>"For the last time, no. She's here to help me, and help get revenge on that drake rider that hurt you."
>Olivia smiled at the thought
>the treatment continued and the bottle was tossed onto the soft hay at her side
>the dragon coo'd softly at the massage and lifted her head to lick the man's neck
>The soft dragon kisses were returned with pecks from his face to the side of her muzzle
>the smell of dragon arousal was inescapable
>Larinna could see the reflective juices flow between the other dragon's hind legs
>the dragon moved her kisses down and planted them over his penis
>her powerful tongue swirled around for a minute and released the man's massive erection
>"I'm ready for you my master."
>the dragoness rolled to her back stretching her limbs in all directions
>the man just settled between her legs an got to work
>Larinna was captivated
>She heard of the tales of lovemaking between dragon and human but never seen it
>he wasn't as large as a dragon but it wasn't nessessary
>he pushed between her folds and grind her fat clit with his heavy thumb
>All Olivia could do against such precise teasing was squirm helplessly
>wet slaps accompanied by the deep throaty growls of pleasure left the barn
>watching it was enough for Larinna to start reaching for her own aching pussy
>The man thrust with all his might into the beast fucking her senseless
>Olivia moved her hips with him allowing her fat haunches to bounce on the soft hay
>her tail swiped viciously between the man's legs
>He tightened them to keep her still
>then he reached up, first stroking her belly then to reach and grab her foreclaws
>Olivia held onto his hands as they both moaned in unison
>Larinna was just about finished herself
>She pulled away to fuck herself with her tongue
>she was desperate
>swirling around her own buzzer and pushing her lips apart
>her legs shook as she approached the wall that was robbed from her
>the door to the stable creaked open Larinna pulled her face away, dripping wet with her own fluids
>master stood in the doorway as Olivia was sleeping soundly curled in a ball behind him
>"You know it's impolite to interrupt master's private times."
>guilt and shame filled her along with another aggravating robbed orgasm
>"I'm sorry Master."
>The man steps closer to Larinna and she has to focus on holding herself still, eyes forward and unmoving.
>She'll suffer through any pushiment he might deem appropriate.
>Besides, he bought her for added security to his ranch. She needs to show resolve.
>"I saw your performance on the stage. You are receptive to be mounted by a human?"
>The man circles behind Larinna and she lifts her tail for him, staying stock still otherwise. The swollen vent between her legs is completely exposed.
>"Yes sir. I have heard tales about their creativity and how they... use their dragons."
>The owner lays her hands on the both sides of her opening, rubbing it up and down. Larinnas tail can't climb any higher.
>"Was that the only reason you decided to pull that stunt of yours?"
>"Nnhh no sir. The constant threat of being hunted wwwhears on you iiiinn the wild. Master, please"
>It's like a small spring has spawned within her, leaking a constant stream of lubricant.
>Larinna has trouble standing still and not bump into the man behind her
>"Will you sneak on your master again?"
>"No master. I promise master!"
>"Good."
>The man pushes his hand in her cunt and keeps going untill her flesh has swallowed it all the way to the elbow
>The sudden thrust is too much for Larinna and before he even has time to pull the arm back, her front legs collapse and her chest comes crashing down
>The dragoness' pussy constricts around the master's arm, shooting out a jet of clear fluid that splashes on the man's chest.
>Larinna's rear legs quiver and her panting rouses dust from the ground as she rides her twice-denied release.
>Master pulls his arm out of the dragon's depths and gives her a pat on the rump
>"You've tight and strong cunt on you. I'm happy that I bought you."
>"Me... Me too. Thankh you masth."
>"What do you do here on the ranch, Olivia?"
>Both dragons were resting on a soft bed of hay.
>"Oh I'm just a beat of burden, a big scaly horse. I pull whatever is attached to my harness and help with heavy lifting. Scare away the wolves sometimes."
>She takes a forlorn glance at Larinna's wings
>"I'm not good for much else anymore..."
>"And that's why you thought Master was replacing you?"
>"Yes. But I'm ashamed to have held those kinds of thoughts. He has been nothing but good to me. Strict at times, but he's thinking my best."
>"How long he's had you?"
>"Oh, years. Many. He took me in when I crashed on his field during my escape. And now when he comes back with another dragoness, I show how little faith I have in him by immediately jumping to conclusion that he's replacing my loose ass with some fresh holes."
>Olivia shakes her head, admonishing herself.
>Larinna shifts on her bedding, setting herself more comfortably and laying her head on the straws.
>"He said that there's been poachers?"
>"Oh, yes. We've had cattle disappearing. Same as the neighbouring ranches. Maybe a group of brigands stealing food. Can't be wild animals. We never find any corpses. There has been attempts to track them down but the area simply has too many hiding places."
>"Am I not a bit... Excessive to keep thieves at bay? Why not get those domestic canines?"
>"Dogs? Master did. It was found dead one night after alerting rest of the farm. I also heard that some ranches had their dogs poisoned. So don't go eating any random pieces of meat or carcasses you find."
>Larinna is staring at Olivia from the ground, wide eyed.
>"I won't... Master did ask me if I'd be able to attack a human before."
>"We don't know if they're humans, but it is possible"
>Guess I'm his new scaly guard dog. But I wouldn't mind helping your chores either. If you won't mind?"
>Olivia snorts and gives the other dragoness a small smile
>"That's up to Master to decide. But no, I wouldn't mind... This is your home too now."
Larinna nodded appreciatively, grateful for Olivia's acceptance. The two dragons continued their conversation, their draconian rumblings running like two purring felines amidst the tranquil setting.
"I've never met someone like Master before," Larinna admitted. "He treats us with such kindness and respect. I can't help but feel a sense of loyalty towards him."
Olivia let out a gentle rumble of agreement. "I understand. Despite my initial doubts, I've come to appreciate the life he has given me. Yes, we work hard, but we are also protected and cared for. And now, with you by our side, we can face any challenges to the master’s claim on his domain together."
The dragons basked in the warmth of their companionship, the hay providing a comfortable respite for their tired bodies. Their conversation soon drifted to their individual experiences and the adventures they had encountered before being enslaved by their master. When they were both wild nesses.
As the sun began to set, casting a warm golden glow across the fields, they heard the distant sound of approaching footsteps. Their attention snapped to the entrance of the barn, where their master appeared, accompanied by a group of humans armed for war.
Olivia and Larinna raised their heads, attentive and alert.
>"Both of you, get saddled up."
>The dragons lower themselves on the floor so the farmhands can put the gear on them
>"We've received a rider from the closest neighbouring farm. Smaller than us, some ten miles out. A watchman was found unconscious and couple of their horses gone."
>"They're growing bold"
>"And greedy. It has been only a week since they last hit."
>Olivia was already saddled, being familiar with the process and knew what to do to help the farmhands work quickly on her
>Larinnas inexperience was obvious by how she needed to be told what to do.
>"Lift your body of the ground, they need to get to your underside. Raise that leg. Now put your rump down..."
>Still, it didn't take too long before she too was geared up to go.
>Larinna's master walked to her and scaled on her back. She glanced at Olivia and thought she saw just a hint of jealousy on her face, but it was gone before her attention was focused on the Master.
>"Olivia. You are to stay here with the others in case the brigands are heading this way. Do what you can. But I want to see you well when I get back."
>"Yes Master."
>"Larinna, we'll fly to the farm which they attacked. Drive of the thieves if they're still in the area and gather what information we can."
>"Yes Master."
>He tapped both of her wing joints.
>"Master, have two places ever been attacked in one night?"
>"No, but they might be stupid enough to try. And Larinna?"
>"Master?"
>He tapped her wing joints again.
>"Oh, oh! Sorry, Master."
>She trotted out through the barn doors, under the dark cloudy sky
>"Keep your eyes peeled on the ground as we fly, might spot them if we're lucky"
>"Yes sir."
>He flicked the reins up her muzzle and she accelerated down the field
>With a mighty pounce and flap of her strong wings, they were airborne
>Larinna picked up speed eastward toward the neighboring farm
>She tried her best to peer down with her predator eyes in the darkness
>Her master leaned over to check underneath
>he choked up on her and slowed down to a simple glide
>she tried her best to maintain the altetude but the weight was new on her and she beat her wings a few too many times
>"Come on now, get back up. We need to circle the property."
"Yes master."
>it was an exausting and the light started to peer over the horizon.
>master brought her to a landing on the neighbor's property right next to the owner who was on horseback
>"Ya see anythin'?"
>"Nah, they must have skipped out after their score."
>"Damn."
>"You're telling me. These bastards are having a field day with our stock. where the hell are they sellin' them?"
>"The constable has no clue. He chatted with the neighboring cities to see if there was a surplus of meat, but nothin..."
>Her master took his hat to wipe his sweat for a moment pondering
>"Where were the animals taken?"
>The property owner pointed out toward the forest
>Larinna was nudged that direction
>she started slow then went into a dragon run her eyes peeled between the trees
>"Woah!" her master bellowed yanking the reins
>she skidded to a stop as smooth as she could
"Sorry master, was it too rough."
>"I appreciate your urgency but I doubt we'd find them, I just wanted to test out your sniffer to see if you could pick up anything."
>She rose her muzzle up high and flicked her tongue out
>she tasted the air as best she could and then walked toward the trees.
>Her master studied her movements carefully letting it unfold.
>She could smell animals, horses, cows, and man
>then she flicked her tongue to the unkempt wild grasses
>the smell was more wild, but there was something unsual from the random wild bunny and deer
"I smell gun powder master. but it's feint a few days old maybe a week."
>"Good. One of his farmhands were shot a few weeks ago. he's recoverin'"
>she smelled around further to try and find something but then she picked up something she never smelled before
>It was musky like an animal but not as strong
"I smell a cat."
>"Cat? Like a normal cat?"
"No, it's larger. It smells cleaner than a wild animal."
>"How long ago?"
"Recent."
>She shifted her head high and tasted the air while closing her eyes.
>The smell difted into the woods.
"Definitely in the woods."
>"Explains how they can always spot us in the dark. Damn beastkin. Should have kept them in chains rather than free them."
>Larinna had never ran across an beastkin but her curious nature got the better of them
"What's a beastkin?"
>"A mistake, taken to the country side as slave help. But then the politicians got to moanin' and groanin'"
>He shook his head and yanked Larinna's head away.
>"If we find them we can do whatever we want. They lost their rights to freedom after this slight."
>They made their way back to their neighbor and told him the news.
>"Damn. No wonder the been slipping through our fingers."
>Larinna's master pumped a troth full of water for the dragoness
>she greedily sucked up the water
>"They probably have a camp in the woods. There is not a chance in hell we could find them."
>"We could round up every man to hunt through the woods in the daylight."
>"I'd rather burn the forest to the ground. But maybe if the town hears about a bunch of beastkin forfeiting their rights. People might come and claim some slaves."
>They conversed over their plans, the forest was large. too large.
>Larinna took her time to bask in the sunlight
>It was a wonderful feeling to stretch herself out and absorb the rays
>Her master's hand touched her neck and then slid down her belly making her moan and stretch in all directions
>"Come larinna, lets head back to see if Olivia found anythin'"
>Larinna rolled off from her back before streching like a cat
>Her tail flagged high, exposing her hindquarters
>She made sure she had Master's attention before putting her tail back down and settling down before him
>He climbed on her back and she walked towards the open field
>"Master, can't we get help from the city? Explain what we've learned and ask one of those officers"
>"That's why I was there when I got you. Said they wouldn't send anyone out this far to guard some fringe farms. Now that we know some beastkin are involved, someone citizens might be interested to come slave-hunting."
>"Could we sell them ourselves if we manage to capture some? Auctioned, like me?"
>"Certainly. That'd serve them right and cover some the damage they've done."
>After a quick sprint, Larinna was in the the air again and banked back towards her new home
>She had to work a little harder while carrying her Master in the air, but it wasn't much different from hauling a deer or some other prey in her claws
>As the ranch came to view, from the air they could see Olivia sitting outside, her neck nextended towards the sky, enjoying the sun
>The workers had spread out on their tasks, feeding the cattle or chasing some runaway chickens.
>Larinna wondered how they would taste
>Beating her wings, she touched down a short distance away from the barn
>Master dismounted from her back and sent her along with a smack on her haunces
>"Go on and get that saddle removed, I'll go an meet with Olivia"
>"Yes Master"
>A couple of farmhands entered the barn after her to strip away the riding gear
>Olivia was walking to meet Master half way, her harness already removed
>Meetin him, she brushed her head agains his side and warbled out a greeting
>He stroked her forehead in response
>"I take it nothing happen'd here?"
>"No Master. Did not smell anything on the wind or see anyone entering the pens."
>"Good. We learned what at least some of the thieves are. Beastkin."
>She let out a hiss at that
>"Ungrateful animals."
>Larinna trotted to join the pair and flopped down on her back to continue her basking session
>She wriggled on the ground, pawing the air
>Shifting one eye to her Master, head still upside down
>"Ungrateful animals? Who's that?"
>Master had settled down to rest against Olivias side. His whole torso moved as she drew a deep breath
>"Beastkin. They were offered freedom and what did they do with it? They turned towards eachother and their former masters. Rather than building a something for themselves, they ran into the woods and tear down what others have made"
>"Larinna here had an idea how they could pay for their crimes. If we capture any alive, they could be sold in the auction. Mayhaps use one or two as workers around here. After they've been properly broken down of course"
>"Of course. Up for a small challenge Larinna? You know live capture is more difficult than just mauling your prey."
>Larinna laid eyes closed on her back, wings open to soak up the sun
>"Mmm. Sure"
>Olivia had shifted on her side and the man's fingers trailed to the opening nestled between her's legs
>She raised her thigh to grant him better access
>Smell of arousal drifted from her, as finger dipped into her folds to coax them open
>He withdrew the hand to give his thumb a quick lick
>Back between her legs it went, rolling around her nub
>The scent was now strong enough to rouse Larinna from her drowziness
>"I.. Uh, Master. I don't mean to pry..."
>"Get back to resting"
>"I. Yes Master"
>His fingers began to pump in and out from Olivias pussy, making wet slurping noises
>Larinna's own vent started to glisten from the sounds and smells
>Olivia's breathing grew laboured and still the man kept attacking her cunt
>He forced her hole to take him down to the wrist and stroked her depths with his fingers
>With a heaving breath she she tightened around his hand
>Her leg kicking out and quiet moans, Olivia made her pleasure known
>The man pulled his hand out with a wet slurp and Olivia proceeded to lick it clean
>"Thank you, Master"
>Moisture had beaded on Larinna's vent and she was maintaining her willpower to keepo her eyes closed
>"Come on ya two, lets get to work. The fields won't plough themselves. And I'm not talking about your cunts."
>they were fitted with farm equipment.
>Olivia was fitted with a harrowing chain while Larinna had a yolk with a rake
>the work was grueling and long she waited for the farm hands to remove the gathered hay to bail it
>Her master yelled at the workers several times when they tried to get Larinna to speed it up
>"Get off yer asses and get the hay off, She can't just carry the entire field on her back."
>meanwhile Olivia was on her own marching up and down the field flattening the dead grasses
>She looked graceful in the field, Larinna couldn't help but admire the other dragoness
>Despite all of her hardships she still keeps on going for the sake of her human master
>When they finished with the field Larinna was attached to a wagon to carry the men around to load up the bails
>Olivia was taken to the barn where master joined her
>Larinna couldn't help but imagine what it would like to actually have sex with her master
>Dragon sex usually short lived but passionate fall from the sky
>Humans being able to last for so much longer leaving nesses in a drunken stupor
>she didn't even realize her tail was high exposing her wet slit to the farmhands.
>They were too bashful to say anything but instead just enjoyed the view of the incredibly horny dragon that towed them along.
>It wasn't until they removed her yolk she realized just how much moisture was leaking down her legs
>The dirt and grime clung to her scales all the way up near her sex
>She didn't know what to do so she stopped the last human before he could get a chance to leave
"Can I get someone to help clean this off?"
>The man shook his head violently
>"We're only allowed to equip ya, Not clean ya. Ask yer owner."
>She swallowed nervously staring at the barn
>master and Olivia have been in there for hours,
>Larinna took a step towards the barn
>Then another
>She promised not to sneak on them again, but what if she announced herself first?
>Arriving at the doors, she rapped against them with a claw.
>"Master? May I enter?"
>"Come in"
>It was Olivia's voice
>Larinna sink her claw at the wood, then immediately winced after noticing the damage she'd done
>These new surroundings would still take her some time to get used to
>Right after walking inside, her nostrils were assaulted by heavy musk
>The air in the barn was filled with sex and Olivia laid curled up in her pen
>"Umm. Is Master here?"
>"He left to prepare an animal for us. It has been a while since I ate. When was the last time you had a meal?"
>"Three days, I think? I hunted down a boar before I flew into the town."
>She kept standing, awkwardly shifting her weight from one leg to another. She didn't want to sit down an make the mess even worse.
>"Is something the matter?"
>"I'm leaking a river back there. I, I was hoping the Master would mount me."
>Olivia cast her eyes to Larinna's underbelly
>"Toiling the field got you worked up?"
>"Well some of it comes from having too much time to think"
>The older dragoness tilted her head at Larinna
>"Some? Like to carry a harness?"
>"I do... say does he ever use a crop? Do they hurt? They use them on their mounts right?"
>Olivia let out a chortle at that
>"I don't need one but you could express your interest to him. Come after me. Lets get you cleaned up"
>Larinna followed Olivia behind the barn, where a large reservoir of water was located
>She stood still while Olivia grasped a metal bucket and filled it with water
>Several buckets were emptied on her back and legs, washing away worst of the grime and juices
>Their little wash up complete, dragonesses returned to the front, finding their Master waiting
>It was Olivia who spoke first
>"Master, I think you should break in your new dragoness"
>"And why do you say that?"
>"Had squatted over a bucket, she would have filled it in minutes"
>"I see"
>He looked straight at Larinna, but she did not avert her gaze. She was horny, nothing wrong with that.
>"Alrigt, lets work up an appetite before lunch. Come here and we'll strip the harness first"
>"Can we leave it on, Master?"
>The man turned back at her with a questioning look
>Olivia butted in again
>"Part of the reason she could have filled that bucket"
>"And you know this because...?"
>"We had time for a little talk"
>"Anything else revealed in that talk?"
>"She..."
>A raised hand interrupted her.
>"I want to hear it from her. Larinna, want to tell me somethin?"
>Larinna was standing in attention again, neck curved to an 'S' and gaze kept in the horizon
>"I'd like to be treated like your horses, Master. That thing that you use to hit them."
>He went to retrieve a riding crop hanging from one of the hooks
>"I believe you mean this?"
>Larinna turned her eyes at him for a second
>"Yes Sir"
>"I doub't you would even feel this. We'll see"
>Master smacked Larinna on her rear with the crop
>"In ya go then. Git"
>She did feel that, somewhat, but the mental impact was larger.
>Trotting in, she went to her pen, opposite to Olivia's, who had settled down in her pen and was watching the events unfold
>Crop hit Larinna under her tail, followed by a command from Master
>"Up"
>She did as she was told
>"I see what you meant earlier. A man could drown in here"
>"I'm-"
>She received another slap
>"Don't talk"
>Larinna opened her jaw to answer, but managed to catch herself just in time
>Her near slip-up did not go unnoticed, and the man went to pick another piece of equipment from the walls
>"Head"
>She brought her face down to be fitted with muzzle
>It fastened behind Larinna's horns, and on some spikes she had on her jaw
>Another smack to remind her to keep the tail raised
>The man promptly removed removed his clothing and Larinna got a first good view on his member
>Not as large as his arm, but at the moment she did not care
>She just wanted it to be in her
>Man guided her haunces lower and positioned himself at her entrance
>No need to be gentle or start slowly, her folds were ready for anything he might give her
>He slammed his hips agains hers, rocking the dragoness forward with a violent thrust
>He wrapped his arms around her tail and used it as anchor to hammer her sopping wet pussy, breaking it in
>Larinna moaned in her muzzle, begging for more
>And more did she get
>The session was magical for Larinna
>He yanked her head back and swatted the riding crop at the weakened scales underneath
>It stung and reminded her of her place
>The smell of the musk was renewed with her own
>Her eyes rolled back and she bellowed deeply enjoying the experience
>She out of the corner of her eye she saw the damaged figure of Olivia shift closer
>Her eyes were fixed on Larinna
>It was a hungering gaze, it made Larinna feel small and weak
>the riding crop swatted her tail hole jolting her muscles to tighten around the penetrating member
>"Don't you side eye Olivia."
>Larinna was silent and just focused on the warm shaft stroking her inner walls
>Each slap of his testicles punched her throbbing clitoris
>She chuffed as she approached the end being mated properly
>Then her head was yanked back until it bowed back to the human
>He had gripped her tail tightly to the side with one arm as he humped her hindquarters
>His other arm was wrapped in the reins while his hand clinched tightly to the riding crop
>He swatted her with the riding crop but her armored flanks barely felt a thing
>Olivia was closer now, she seemed to be silently judging Olivia's performance
>Larinnas legs were shaking the session was far longer than she anticipated
>A single punch into her vagina was enough to cause her to spill out an orgasm
>This was long drawn stretching out her lust as far as it would go
>Olivia moaned louder than the audible wet slapping
>The steady pace was driving her mad
>"Olivia clean."
>Their master grunted tightened his grip
>He was close
>Olivia shifted and her head disappeared below
>A new sensation claimed Larinna as a tongue slipped and wrapped around her large clit
>Lighting trailed up Larinna and her claws gripped the wood around her
>Heartbeat pounded in her ears as she orgasmed
>She made a stifled roar through the bridle
>It was heightened as her pulsing cunt sucked on the hot fluids of her master to her core
>Her turmoil wasn't finished
>She was nearly falling over when the riding crop swatted her sensitive butt hole
>Her eyes shot open and her master let go of her reins letting it turn to face the wall once again
>Her body was crying out to her that she was finished and needed to stop but she grounded her legs
>Olivia's maw took place of master lapping the fluids that leaked
>Diving in to steal the seed that entered her body
>She couldn't take the stimulation
>Larinna's cunt was assaulted prolonging the deep throaty moans
>This accompanied by master's swatting made her mind drown in pleasure
>She shifted her weight and lost her grip on the floor moaning like a well used whore
>"Alright enough Olivia, that should give her an appetite."
>The dragoness licked her muzzle clean
>"She performed adequately."
>"She has a bit of a human fascination."
>"She'll grow out of it. It's all new."
>Olivia shifted her head onto her masters neck and licked the sweat off his skin
>By the time Larinna woke up from her pleasure induced nap there was a fresh goat ready to be devoured in front of her
>Olivia was sleeping soundly next to her the smell of blood permitting the air around her
>She quickly devoured her post coitus meal and passed out like Olivia.
>Larinna's life on the farm settled to a something resembling a routine
>Her time was spent working on the farm, warming her scales in the sun, or when the weather was worse, taking shelter from the rain in her pen.
>She was thought about the practices, different farm equipment and names for them
>Often she conversed with Olivia and Master in things of pleasure or work, socialising with the two most important beings in her life.
>He had inherited the ranch from his father, and had run it close to a decade now.
>Olivia had been ambushed by hunters and badly wounded. By some miracle she had lost her pursuers and crashed here, half dead.
>Olivia didn't tell much more that that, but she had been his ever since
>Larinna's pussy saw regular use from Master, and he had started toying with her ass too.
>He had yet to grace her tongue with his cock, as she had been muzzled like an animal in every session.
>Her master took Larinna to other ranches, both to spread news about beastkin, and to show he had another dragoness now. He did not want any misunderstandings and needed his neighbours to know who she was.
>Master did not visit the town again
>It was planned that they'd first try a capture themselves, before alerting the whole town and potentially getting dozens of people trudging into the forest to drive the beastkin deeper in hiding.
>Next beastkin raid was not expected to happen any time soon
>She was mostly put to work during daytime, pulling carts or even trying to herd the sheep from the air
>They were not too different from directing a herd of deer. Easier to spot, but more stupid.
>Master had made some modifications to her harness
>It sported several extra straps that could be fastened to rub against her vagina as she walked
>One was moved to rest closer to her tailhole. >"For future additions", he said
>As more time passed, her assignments turned to more nocturnal in nature
>Larinna stayed up at night, waiting if her senses would alert her to any intruders on Master's territory
>Near two weeks since the last known attack, she smelled something
>Beasts they might be, but certainly not hunters
>They were approaching from upwind
>The air carried strong scent of cat right in Larinna's nostrils.
>Do these creatures even bathe?
>She kept close to the ground, as much as a large dragon can in open terrain, and crawled to one of the farmhands nearby
>"I can smell them in the woods. Go tell Master"
>The human jumped and pivoted around, looking at her eyes wide
>"Hells, don't do that!"
>"You can tell your complaints to Master. Right after you've told him the other news. Now go!"
>She hissed back to the man and watched him leave to the farmhouse
>Larinna kept going towards the barn, trying to keep it between herself and the forest as much as she could.
>Inside, she found Olivia already awake
>"Smell that?"
>"Yes. They've come to test their luck again"
>"They're about to run out of it"
>Dragonesses snuck out of the barn and settled to wait behind it.
>Their master and a handful of other fastest farmhands joined them shortly, each carrying a rifle or a handgun
>"Where are they? The beastkin."
>Larinna gestured her head to the North
>"That way. The wind carries their scent."
>Master acknowledged her with a nod
>"Larinna, you stay here. Wait till they get to the pens and fly to block their escape route."
>"Yes Sir. Master."
>"Olivia stay here and be ready to come on our aid. You're too large, I fear they'd spot you too easily."
>"I understand Master."
>She didn't look to be too happy about it
>"The rest of you lot, with me. We wait for them to get one the open and focused on the animals before trying to get closer. Stay low and move fast."
>They didn't have to wait long for six beastkins to appear from the treeline and start to make their way straight to the sheeps
>"Move"
>The group of humans tried to get as close as possible without being seen
>The beastkin stopped before they reached the animals and Larinna saw them throw something in the pen
>She detected a new smell that she couldn't place
>Neither did Olivia
>In weak light Larinnas eyes saw the sheep who were not yet settled down to rest stagger, before falling on the ground
>None of them made any noises or struggled when they were lifted up
>That was her mark.
>She ran and leaped
>The beat of her wings put the thieves on alert
>It only took them a moment to spot her racing low on the ground towards them
>Cries of alarm sounded and some dropped their catch and turned tail
>"The dragon! Fuck thiiiiiss!"
>One, armed with a rifle, took a panicked shot at Larinna's direction
>She let out a bone shaking roar in response
>Five other shots could be heard as the humans opened fire at the beastkin reveled by the muzzle flash.
>Larinna could see the figure drop
>Olivia had left her spot and galloped after the fleeing outlaws, but the distance was too great
>Larinna strained her wings and took a sharp left, targeting the one who hadn't made it back into the woods yet
>The cat ran and made a mistake looking back over her shoulder. It screamed and Larinna could smell an unmistakable scent of urine.
>She snarled at the fleeing prey and reached her claws towards it
>Just an inch short, Larinna missed her target
>The trunks were rapidly approaching and she was forced to pump her wings to gain altitude to avoid crashing into the trees
>Larinna roared her frustration over the overest that denied her catch from her.
>Circling over the treetops she tried to get a glimpse of the beastkin
>Master shouted at her, telling her to come back
>Reluctantly, she retreated with a final roar
>She touched down near Master and he immediately laid his hand on her front
>"Are you hurt? Did the shot hit you?"
>"No Master. I don't feel any pain"
>He breathed a sigh of relief
>"Good. We'll get you properly checked later. To make sure."
>Larinna looked at the beastkin laying on the dirt
>"Is he..."
>"Dead. Bullet pierced his heart"
>"What do we do now?"
>"Get some rest. It will be a good while before they think hitting this place again, if ever, after that display of yours. Come morn, well learn what we can from this" he kicked the corpse at his feet "and plan our next move"
>A few weeks came and went
>No signs of the beastkin or missing animals
>Olivia and Larinna lazily spoke to their master as he finished servicing the two nesses
"Maybe I can fly over the forest to see campsites?"
>"No!" Master barked out startling the two dragons
>"If ya do that you will be shot down and torn to shreds by the trees."
>He looked over with a saddened expression to Olivia.
>Larinna shut her maw tight but she was grateful for her master caring for her safety
>He soon paced back and forth between the two occasionally stopping to pet either one on the fringe
>"They aren't capable hunters, plenty of game in the woods. Prolly why they steal."
"I have noticed they don't understand scent trails."
>Olivia stood up peaked her head out at the woods causing the other two to become alert
>"Ya hear somethin'?"
>"No."
"You have a plan?"
>"Maybe. We know where they come from and where they strike."
>She pointed a claw out toward the pasture next to the forest
>"The cattle are going to be moved over there tomorrow, Larinna and myself could be camouflaged in the woods and wait for them to strike."
>"Too dangerous, they'll shoot ya."
>"No, they will already be running from you and the other humans."
"They don't seem to be good shots when fleeing."
>Master stepped outside to view the forest
>The tall green grass whipped back and forth ready to be eaten by the herd
>"Better plan than any. Tomorrow afternoon I'll get a farmhand to wear extra layers to teach you two how to capture."
>The dragonesses nodded in unison "Yes master."
>the dragons sat peacefully on their beds
>Before master returned to his home he kissed Olivia like a human
>Larinna watched curiously as they performed the ritual shared between lovers
>Olivia's tongue lapped into their master's mouth
>"Good night the both of ya."
>He took his leave
>Olivia was already curling deeply into her bed while Larrina was left to wonder
"Olivia?"
>Olivia grumbled, "go to sleep we got work tomorrow"
"What's it like to be loved?"
>Olivia's eyes shot open to Larinna's dark shape in the corner
>"What's all this about?"
"Well you spend more time with master and he's even slept with you in the barn."
>Olivia tilted her head not giving it a real thought.
>"Master cares for both of us. I've been with him longer."
"I know, but he does things with you he doesn't do with me."
>Olivia let out a deep sigh, it was clear the young dragoness was feeling neglected
>"Come rest with me."
>Larinna stood up excited to join her friend
>She found a divot and wrapped a wing over Olivia.
>She then curled into Olivia's underbelly
>the smell of hops and the other dragon relaxing her.
"Thank you Olivia."
>"Sush now. And no more talk of unfairness. Life is unfair."
>The two dragons quickly fell asleep to the sounds of crickets and frogs waiting for their big day tomorrow
>"Like this!"
>Olivia leapt through the air and collided with the poor sob that was designated as the target
>thick padding and leathers bound his arms and legs to prevent too much injury from the dragons
>they prounced and jumped at their prey they didn't realize they have been at it for hours
>or the fact the farmhands swapped to new ones halfway through
>it was a fun game to the dragonesses
>Their master watched on smiling as they enjoyed themselves
>"Alright girls, time for lunch!"
>he set out an entire cow for them to enjoy
>it was the most succulent meat Larinna had ever eaten
"This is so good!"
>Olivia pulled away stripping a long strip of flesh
>"You should try it when it's prepared by humans, you could drink it."
"That sounds lovely, do you think we could have some of that?"
>Their master nodded, "If we get these beastkin under control without killing them, we will cook yall a cow each."
>Larinna stared at the bundled up farmhand with a renewed focus, she wanted that reward more than anything.
>They practiced for another hour and then they were back in the stable to rest till the sun went down.
>Larinna couldn't sleep, she was too excited for the mission so she just watched the bright blue sky dim to an orange to red.
>The master opened the door and beckoned them to come
>they were fitted with nets that had stuck with branches and leaves
>it itched terribly but it was perfect to hide their figures in the underbrush
>"Larinna, you take the south eastern forest trail and Olivia you take the south western. Got it?"
>They silently nodded and started to walk carefully to their position.
>they made it to the edge of the forest together and then they stopped
>the air was dry and the scent of dying flowers masked their scent.
"Good luck Olivia"
>"Don't get hurt Larinna. If things go south just run back to the house."
>Larinna didn't get a chance to respond till the other dragoness turned her backside to her
>Larinna turned the other direction and walked along the forest edge
>The air was starting to cool by the time she got to the part of the forest she needed to.
>With a small leap she landed just inside the forest finding a nice spot to nestle into
>then the waiting game began
>Larinna kept flicking her tongue out to taste the air
>grass, mulch, a beetle that had unfortunately met it's end in her mouth
>She heard the cows come and the men on horseback
>They were doing their last check on the heard before they turned in
>she waited.
>hours passed and nothing happened
>she wanted to fly and see if there was something in the horizon but that would ruin all of Olivia's plans
>She pressed her claws into the earth to stave off the instinct
>She tasted the air again, just more dying summer flowers
>There was a hint of gunpowder
>she moved her head carefully to not break her cover
>the smell got stronger
>cracking of underbrush gave away the position of her prey
>a small pack of beastkin wearing tattered tribal leathers
>poorly cured horse leather made them that much easier to detect
>anger rose in the dragon as they had the audacity to wear the slaughtered animals that they stole
>they had their summer coat and were slim
>some looked undernourished
>they were no more than 4 dragon lengths away from Larinna
>She closed her eyes to avoid the light reflecting her position
>she heard them walk ever closer toward the open field
>she cliched the dirt in her claws tighter to keep herself still
>all she had to do was wait for the humans to drive them back and then she would strike
>her tongue flicked out again to see if they were closer to her
>despite being brazen enough to come back but they reeked of fear
>the smell faded as the sounds of crackling underbrush vanished
>Larinna opened her eyes a sliver
>she thought they were gone but the grass shifted unnaturally in the distance
>12 dragon lengths they approached the cattle
>a spear pointed up and stabbed one of the cows quickly
>right through the ribcage it fell to the ground dead
>Larinna clinched her jaw shut at the speed the animal perished
>the other cows were too stupid to notice anything and were quietly contemplating the next blade of grass to chew
>Another cow dropped, this one a little more force
>it pounded the ground with a thud with it's carcass
>the rest of the cows suddenly perked up and looked around
>one moo'd out in confusion to the sudden startling noise
>one of the farmhands started to make his way to the cattle to see what spooked them
>A lantern in his hand blazed everything around him in orange light
>Without a sound he was suddenly yanked off the horse
>A scream was muffled shortly after
>this was enough to alert the other night watch to the location
>Larinna saw a shining dagger rose above the grass in one of the beastkin's hand before descending back to the earth
>The dragon was now completely out of her camouflage
>she stood tall looking around high to see where the beastkin were slinking to
>It was only a short moment later when the other men noticed the riderless horse and yelled out to the everyone
>Larinna ducked down again her eyes piercing and heart racing
>she needed to attack the beastkin when they got to her
>she was going to make them pay for what they did
>like rats they started to make their way back to the forest
>they smelled of cow blood and were carrying large chunks of meat on their back
>two of the beastkin stood their ground to the humans
>they held revolvers and shot at the humans riding toward them
>Larinna knew who her targets were
>she let our a roar before they could make it two dragon lengths to the forest edge
>this stopped the beastkin in their tracks
>A second roar echoed back having the beastkin shiver in place
>there were 8 of them, each one carrying a spear and a dagger
>they didn't have weapons that could penetrate dragon hide
>Larinna licked her maw and intercepted
>Larinna broke into a sprint towards the closest beastkin
>It was frozen in place and stared at her approaching form before instincts seemed to take over
>Turning, the beastkin bolted, Larinna right on its tail
>Literally
>She pounced on the beastkin's back, shoving the small cat forward
>Beastkin tumbled down and Larinna slammed her front leg on it's tail
>There was a yowl of pain
>A toothy grin rose on her face
>The beastkin clawed the dirt, trying to drag itself away from the dragoness but unless the cat tore its own tail off, the effort was futile
>Larinna lifter her leg away and her prey tried to crawl away in panic
>It rose to its knees in attempt to get its legs under it, but Larinna simply pressed her other leg down on its back, letting it feel her claws piercing the skin
>Time to stop playing with your food
>Beastkin got the message and settled to lie flat on the ground, sobbing
>"Please... I was so hungry..."
>Humans ran past her her spot, trying to keep up with other fleeing beastkin
>"Help me to secure this one! I'll go after them!"
>Two of the pursuers broke off and ran to her
>They took over and pinned the cat on the ground while rope was prepared for a wrap up
>There was a roar from Olivias direction
>She was chasing after a pair of cats that had separated from the others
>Larinna lifted her claws from her catch and launched herself on the trail again
>The hunt was on
>Humans could not keep up with the fast and agile beastkin
>Larinna has experienced the exquisite human stamina first-claw, but in this kind of terrain the bursts of speed the cats were capable of was much more useful
>They could lose the sight of their pursuers and vanish deeper into the woods
>Her talons buried themselves in the soft forest floor and gauged up dirt, sending it flying as her muscles worked to propel her past the trees
>She was gaining on Olivia, being able to set herself on a straight path whereas they were going this way and that
>She enjoyed the chase
>Larinna had seen multiple different species of felines
>Her first catch was fairly small one with large ears. She believed it to be a cheetah
>She judged the pair she and Olivia were after to be a jaguar and a tiger
>The cats split up and Olivia set after the jaguar
>That left the tiger as Larinnas next prey
>Much more substantial catch than the pitiful creature who's tail she likely broke
>Large it may be, but it was still a lot smaller than her
>It weaved and ducked between and around the trees with grace that Larinna could not match
>She whipped her tail to different directions, using it as counterbalance to change her course
>Against smaller trees she simply braced hersef and bowled through
>Despite her efforts her prey was able to stay ahead
>She roared at the tiger's back in frustration
>The beastkins head tipped forwad and hands flew to cover its ears
>Then it ran straight to a tree
>Larinna had to dig her claws on the ground to stop her momentum
>The tiger, now unmistakably a female, was holding her face
>Larinna sat down next to it, looking the cat writhing in pain
>Blood was starting to stain the tigers fur
>"Pathetic"
>Taking a quick look around she could not spot any more running beastkins
>Larinna brought her snout closer to the tiger and female raked her claws at her
>They slid over her scales, leaving only superficial scratches
>Larinna barely felt it
>She snapped her jaws closed right next to the female's head and the cat flinched
>The entirety of her head, and part of her torso, could have fitted in Larinnas maw
>She chuffed at her catch before nudging it
>The smell of blood was now strong as the tiger kept bleeding from her face
>Letting her tongue out from her maw, Larinna toyed with her catch and lapped up some of the blood
>Beastkin sneered at her. "Go on then, finish me. Be a good pet for your master."
>"Mmm... you do taste delicious..."
>The tiger was shivering as single claw was extended over her chest and dragged along the sternum
>Humans, Master with them, had catched up to Larinna
>She bowed her head, both to greet Him, and to mock the feline
>"Master? Can I eat it?", she asked playfully
>"Not yet Larinna. We need information"
>She pointed at the cat with her nose
>"I hink this one might be more useful as a Cow in fact. She certainly has the body for it"
>"We'll see."
>He pointed at two other humans
>"You and you, tie her up and take her back to the farm"
>As Larinna kept watch, the tiger was roughly turned over, her hands and tied behind her back
>After completing the package with a muzzle, Larinna's second catch was ready to be transported
>Beastkins garments were cut away and several men lifted her up
>One farmhand decided to cup a feel
>"Damn boss, she really does have tits bigger than any whore that I've seen. Ain't just fur on this beastie."
>"Ya oaf if any of the girls you've been with had a rack that big, they could barely walk!"
>Laughter filled the forest as the tiger was carried away
>Master greeted Larinna in his usual way by rubbin her hand on top of her snout
>"How did it go?", she asked
>"One beast dead and two captured, one male one female. Fair haul. One of the men was injured in a gunfight but he should make it."
>Larinna liked Master's hand
>"Where's Olivia?"
>"I don't know Master, the last I saw her we were both chasing..."
>Speaking of the dragon, there was an angry roar
>"That's her. She sounds pissed"
>"But not hurt"
>Larinna wasn't saddled, but she settled down so Master could climb on her back
>She walked carefully forward to make sure he would not fall down
>Larinna would not forgive her if he'd get hurt because of something like that
>They found Olivia from a small clearing with just a single large pine tree on it
>She was sitting at its base, staring up on the branches
>Dragon sized clawmarks marred the side of the pine's trunk
>"Get lost you scaly fuck! Traitor!"
>Larinna and Master could see the cat throwing something at Olivia from the tree.
>She kept sitting nonchalantly while the objects just bounced against her head
>As Larinna crossed the opening they could see what the objects were
>"You'll run out of pinecones sooner than I run out of patience"
>By the looks of it the cat had been at it for a while
>Olivias assailant seemed to be the very same jaguar she was chasing earlier, and another female.
>The beastkin spotted Larinna and turned her stream of expletives to her
>"Another? What the hell? And this one even lugs a human around!"
>Master took over the negotiations
>"Will you come down on your own or do we have to cut down this tree?"
>"I hope it falls on your flat face"
>Larinna had joined Olivias side, both dragons gazing upwards, unable to climb after the cat who was taunting them
>"Master could just shoot you"
>"Go get mounted!"
>"Right after you get down!"
>Cat fell silent for a long second
>".. wait does he fucks you? You let him rape you? Freak."
>Master slung a rifle from his back and shouted
>"That's quite enough! You have two choices: come down on your own or get shot. What will it be?"
>A rude gesture, it seemed. Picked some habits from humans it seemed.
>The man shouldered the rifle and took aim at the jaguar
>She did not have room to dodge and was too far away from the center of the tree
>Shot connected at her leg and she screamed in pain before toppling down from the branch
>Beastkin cats twist to fall feet down first. Who knew.
>Olivia reached her front legs up to catch the falling feline
>Nestled between large paws, she howled and tried to bite Olivia
>It had about as much effect as the pinecones
>"You fucking shot me!"
>Master decided she had talked enough and gagged her
>With their last catch bagged, the trio travelled back to the ranch
>Farmhands reported that the small male had rambled how he just wanted to eat, not get eaten by dragons
>Apparently he was with the group a few weeks ago on the failed raid. It wasn't clear if any of the females were there too
>He told that their food portions were cut or taken away as punishment
>The dead beastkin and more importantly the rifle they left behind made things even worse
>When the cat saw the dragons again he got so hysteric that no further information could be gained
>The three captives were put to chains and locked up in different spots around the farm
>That's four less beastkin being a nuisance
>It was the day after the beastkin chase
>Olivia was watching the cows being milked when Master appeared on her side
>"The cats are all tended to. Unsurprisingly none of them wants to cooperate."
>"Even the male?"
>"Even the male. Got some of his wits back once he calmed down. Might sick you or Larinna on him to try and make him talk."
>Some distance away they saw Larinna sit down beside a milkmaid and start conversing with her
>Master kept talking with Olivia
>"I hope you're not feeling left out in any way lately. I'm not trying to cast you aside, you're valuable to me"
>"Me, valuable? A broken dragoness? Surely I'd go for a pittance"
>He saw her looking at him from the corner of her eye, corner of her mouth curled upwards
>"I think I could trade you for a few prize cows if need be. But that's not the kind of valuable I meant." He shot back to her, smiling.
>"I know, and I'm not."
>They settled into silence after that, Master scratching Olivia at the base of her horns. The large dragoness almost purring to his touch
>On the field, Larinna attempted to herd another cow to the milkmaids direction
>"How are your injuries holding up? Need salve on your sides?"
>"Still getting phantom pains on the left wing ever now and then. Nothing I can't manage"
>"I'm sorry"
>"Don't be... and I'm sorry too"
>"For what?"
>"For doubting you. Remember the day you got Larinna? I immediately thought the worst of you and concluded you were throwing me away. Even after all these years, I still feared..."
>"Olivia..."
>"I know Master, I know. I've already beaten myself over it. Can we not talk about it anymore. Or ever? I just needed to get it off my chest"
>"Aye, we can do that"
>"Thank you Master. Besides, I'm not complaining for having to work less hard now that you got another dragoness on your payroll"
>"I pay you?"
>"You feed me"
>"Malnourished slaves aren't very useful"
>"Any chance for a raise?"
>He grasped her horn and pulled
>"Don't push your luck, dragon."
>Olivia chortled and Master joined her soon afterwards
>He released her head and Olivia pulled away
>Milkmaid emptied the bucket and went to work on another cow Larinna had brough to her
>"She seems to be settling in. What's your opinion?"
>"She's dutiful. Feisty. Makes a good 'scaly guard dog' as she put it. Gets along with other humans well enough, even seeks to spend time with them now and then."
>"Hmm?"
>"Oh don't worry master, she's keeping her tail down and the men know better than to try anything. I think she wouldn't react too favourably if they were to try either. I meant like she's doing now. Look"
>Larinna was sitting next to the milkmaid, trying to crane her head down to see the womans hands working on the cow's teats
>"I see what you mean. She's a curious one"
>"She is, Master"
>"What about you personally. Getting along?"
>"No complaints. She's respectful and I've grown to like her company. I think her life in the wilds was mostly a lonely one"
>"Why do you say that?"
>"One evening, after you left, she asked me about love"
>"Sure it wasn't just about the concept?"
>"I don't think so Master. She's familiar with lust and companionship, but love is something new to her"
>"And that combined with her facination with humans led to her self-enslavement"
>"And the stories she'd heard"
>"What stories?"
>"Girl talk, Master."
>"Females gossip, no matter the race"
>"True. Treat her right and you'll own more than her body for life"
>Larinna was flat on the grass, trying to fit her head under the cow, who was staying remarkably calm through the whole episode
>Olivia and Master watched as she stuck out her tongue and the milkmaid sprayed some fresh milk on it
>Larinna seemed thoughtful for a moment before opened her jaws again
>More milk was sprayed in her mouth
>"Larinna!"
>At her Masters voice, Larinnas head shot upwards, lifting the poor cow upwards she realized her mistake
>"Moo!"
>The animal slid down from Larinnas snout and fell to its side
>It quickly got up before running away, mooing in indignance
>Larinna sheepishly trotted to Master, aplogizing to him
>"No harm done, it was my mistake. How was the milk?"
>"Really sweet! You needed me Master?"
>"I think it's time we try to get some information out from the beastkin. You and Olivia could be of use."
>"Explain to me again the events of past few weeks"
>Male serval was tied to a chair inside a storage building and his head had been covered with a burlap sack
>"I already told to the other humans"
>"Humor me"
>"When we had to run away from you and got nothing from it, our pride leader got angry and punished us. Our rations were cut and..."
>"And?"
>"we we forced to... return here."
>"That's it?"
>"Yes. We were told that if we wanted to stay in the pride and eat, we'd have to get back. We didn't, at first, but hunger won."
>"Your leader. Male or female?"
>"What difference does it make?"
>"It's a simple question. Answer it"
>"What's that noise?"
>Snappin and crunching could be heard outside the shed
>"Answer the question"
>"Male alright?"
>"See we're getting somewhere. That sound is one of your friends. She would rather throw insults at me than cooperate so I let her feed one of my dragons instead.
>The beastkin tensed up at that
>"You're bluffing"
>"The way I see it I have enough of your kind to not waste my time on the stubborn ones. Plenty more in the forests if I happen to run out. Can you tell me how many more, exactly?"
>"... it's not true"
>Serval received a slap on his face
>"Focus. How many beastkin in the forest? Where are you hiding?"
>Cat was turning his head side-to-side
>"Not telling you, human"
>Master nodded to another man standing behind the beastkin.
>He grabbed the servals tail and twisted the broken tail
>"Aaaah!"
>"Tell me"
>Another pull
>"Dozens! Gah! There's a cave network we hide during the day. Please!"
>"Is it just you or are there other beastkin in the area?"
>There was a sound of flesh tearing outside
>"Answer!"
>"Yes, yes! Not just felines. Gods did you really kill her?"
>"Is that were you got the gas you used to sedate the animals?"
>"I don't know"
>"I'm losing my patience with you"
>"I'm telling the truth, you have to believe me!"
>"Have it your way... Larinna!"
>Sack was removed from the beastkin's head and Larinnas bloody snout pushed the shed door open
>"Master?"
>"Are you still hungry?"
>The cat's chest was going up and down in rapid pace, his eyes moving wildly
>"I think I have room for a little more and Olivia can take care of any leftovers. She hasn't been fed yet"
>Two men lifted the chair beaskin was sitting on up, and brought it closer to the dragon
>The serval was trying to raise hell but ropes were set tight
>"No! No please! I don't know! We're just given them before we leave. I don't know where they come from!"
>Master stopped his approach to reconcider
>Larinna licked her chops to clean away some of the blood
>The cat wanted to be anywere else than where he currently was
>"Fine. Put him down"
>Ear covering and the bag were retrieved
>"Our business isn't finished yet"
>Beastkin was deafened and blinded, and left alone with his thoughts
>Combined with thirst and hunger, he's likely to get more talkative
>Master got outside just as Larinna threw the last of the cow's leg in her mouth
>The beasts had managed to kill one last night. No sense to let it go to waste
>"You put on a good show."
>"How did you know he was telling the truth?"
>"I don't, but I do believe his position in the pack isn't very high. He probably just spends his time keeping out of the way."
>"Lay low and don't get noticed"
>"Exactly"
>"Would you really had me kill him if he'd kept silent?"
>"If I didn't find any use for him. Does that bother you?"
>"Not really, Master. If you'd make me be quick about it."
>"Mhm. Who should we meet next?"
>Olivia was watching the door to the separated shed
>The smell of cat piss and fur permeated the other side
>Inside the cramped space was the jaguar
>two farmhands left dusting themselves off
>"She's quite a looker for a beastkin."
>"I'll admit she has a nice rack, but a bit too much muscle for my taste."
>"ya think the boss will let us have fun with her?"
>"After he has his way. Honestly the way she stares daggers at us I'd wait until she's nice and broken."
>The two suddenly stopped as if the dragoness appeared from no where.
>she smile, "How's the bullet wound on the beastkin?"
>"She's fine miss. We sterilized it with some alcohol and removed the bullet."
>"Can she walk?"
>The other man shrugged unsure.
>"She's not really in a poisition to walk."
>Olivia peered over to the crack in the door she heard nothing from the once loud mouthed Jaguar
>"We'll be headin out now, have to check up on the other cattle"
>Olivia nodded and waited for master to arrive
>her patience was rewarded as Larinna walked master over bareback
>"Is our other captive doing well?" Larinna asked
>"I haven't checked yet, i wanted master to be present."
>He dismounted and walked over to the door.
>"Won't have to wait much longer, come Olivia, Larinna, this one has been the biggest pain for everyone."
>He stared at Olivia for a second, examining the scratches over her armored hide
>Not deep enough to actually injure, but enough to mar the glitter of the sunlight
>the master gritted his teeth and entered the door
>The jaguar was bound to a chair legs spread
>her right leg was bandaged up while her clothes were stripped from her body giving her zero modesty
>her pink slit was a beacon to her onyx black body drawing all eyes to her femininity
>"Why do you save me?"
>"Ya have information I want."
>"I'd spit on you if I could."
>The Jaguar looked over at the two dragons, they looked into the red eyes of the one that chased her into the tree
>The jaguar started to chuckle
>The master was unamused he clinched his fist.
>"Just tell me what I want to know or i'll feed you piece by piece to my girls."
>"You're girls?"
>Larinna and Olivia sat proudly next to their master
>Larinna went above and beyond by flashing her razor sharp fangs with a malicious lick
>"You have no intention of feeding me to your walking fucking toys."
>She laughed harder, "You treated and bandaged me. I'm worth more alive than a chunk of cow."
>The master squinted his eyes, this beastkin wasn't like the others
>She was most likely a former slave
>"Dragons are known for living with humans due to their insatiable lust and food. They're lost puppies in need of a master."
>worse she was an educated former slave
>He wondered if she was even worth keeping around, but in the back of his mind he wanted to break her
>"You're on thin ice missy. I already learned about the underground networks for your male friend."
>"He's no friend, cowardly. Meek. Leader only let him keep his balls because he wouldn't stop crying."
>"And he sold you out."
>"Big deal, they will flee to new home. We have control of the forest still."
>Larinna growled at the disrespect the beastkin was displaying
>"May I eat her master?"
>The jaguar laughed maniacally, "Yes! please eat me! Feed me to the dragons!"
>Both the dragons growled lowering their heads to meet her
>The master raised his hand to stop the two girls, "Not yet. She's still useful."
>"Oh i'm useful alright, more useful than a wingless lizard."
>She glared at Olivia and studied the scars across her body.
>"Once your master tires of your holes you'll be turned to belts and boots."
>The master socked her in her muzzle freeing a tooth from her mouth
>"GAH!"
>He punched her again bashing her head to the other side with a splatter of blood
>He hit her again until her face was swollen and blood flowed freely from her nose
>"You spoke enough beastkin. You'll be wishing for death the entire time you're here."
>The jaguar was nearly knocked unconscious
>The dragons hissed and spat curses at her
>But her torture wasn't close to being finished
>She heard the unmistakenable sound of unfastening pants
>"Master are you really going to touch that thing?"
>"Don't worry Olivia, it's just to show her who's in charge. She won't get any pleasure in this."
>The cat made a halfhearted attempt at growling at the situation but was slapped with the back of the master's hand
>Her legs were unbound and giving him leverage to violate her
>He made sure to grab her wound for support to make it as painful as possible
>The dragons figeted as they watched the act unfold it was erotic for them to see their master dominate
>"This is for scratching my Olivia missy."
>He fucked her until tears leaked out of her bloodied face
>Olivia smiled wide at the retaliation her master delivered she leaned her head toward his to kiss him deeply
>Their tongues danced as he held the cat's legs wide pumping deeper and deeper with his erection
>Larinna wanted to help too and leaned her head over to help stroke with every pump into the cat's pussy
>She tasted the salted fluids of her master and the sour beastkin
>it wasn't a pleasant experiance but she wanted to be involved
>"Damn she's tight." the master growled.
>He thrust a few more times before pulling out
>His wet cock shined like jewelry
>The cat's cunt twitched helplessly as she was orgasmed from the rape
>Tears painted her expressionless face and her chest heaved deeply from heavy breaths
>Olivia went to his dick licking the tip of the glands with enthusasim
>Larinna focused on the rest of his shaft cleaning off the disgusting beastkin fluids from her master
>The master grabbed Olivia's horns and shot his thick semen onto her tongue
>"Yes! That's better!"
>He took in a heavy breath and kissed his two dragons on the foreheads
>"Thank you girls, that should teach this cunt a lesson."
>Olivia smirked holding her master's seed on the dip of her tongue
>she rolled it around savoring the flavor before turning to the jaguar and spitting it right on her muzzle
>"There's your reward, you can smell your master for the rest of the day."
>Larinna looked at the glob as it dripped down with the blood
>She took her tongue and smeared it making sure it went into her nostrils keeping the scent in place
>"You should have given up. Master would have treated you better"
>The man smiled at the extra steps the dragons took, it was cathartic to see such a haughty beast beaten and conquered.
>The three left her to muddle in her mess to their last captured beastkin.
>The dragons followed their master to the tigress' location
>She was being held in one of the cow pens
>Both of the girls were breathing a little heavier than normal
>Having just watch their master dominate had their tails high and cunts leaking
>Olivia gently lapped at master's hand to clean the blood off his knuckles
>Larinna was to preoccupied shifting her weight from one leg to another wishing to itch her needy pussy
>Master approached the two farm hands leaning on the side of the building keeping watch
>"Anything to report?"
>"No boss, she's pretty worn out from last night."
>"Good, maybe she will reiterate what the small dicked cat said."
>The two men watched the dragon finish cleaning his hand
>"Did the black one give ya trouble?"
>"Just a lesson, you can go ahead and continue that lesson if ya like. Tell the rest of them men the same."
>The men perked up with wide smiles for their chance to have fun
>"And don't worry about churning any of my butter, she's clean down there."
>The men raced in the direction of the Jaguar to be the first.
>"Heh, boys will be boys."
>He opened the door to the tiger who squinted in the sharp change of light
>One eye had swollen shut from blunt force
>She too was stripped of dignity
>Heavy breasts bounded out with large areolas
>Her wounds were bandaged, though nothing as serious as the Jaguar
>She trembled as the dragons peered around the corner
>Any bravado she once had the other night was replaced with the smell of urine and cow feces
>"Tell me where your tribe is, and maybe I'll forgive you for scratching my girl."
>"S-sscratch?"
>Larinna walked in and showed off the very thin scratches upon her once flawless frame
>The tiger shivered and tried to back away
>All that happened was the chair she was strapped to wobbled and her tail whipped back and forth
>"I don't remember doing such a thing!"
>"You forgot?" The master questioned
>The tiger shook her head tears forming at the corners of her eyes
>"Tell me about your tribe and I'll forget it too."
>He leaned in and pressed his weight on her bandaged shoulder
>"Paaaa! Please! I'll tell! I will tell!"
>she squirmed helplessly in his grip
>He released her and the bandage was now soaked with renewed blood
>He then looked over her muscular vulgar body
>She was as big as a human, maybe larger
>He cupped her tit and thumbed the nipple
>It inflated instantly from the touch
>He thumbed it a few times his calloused finger teasing and pushing on her button
>"The tribal leader is in the forest and dug out large tunnels through the land."
>Her voice was more raspy as she continued
>"We need to feed families so we take what we can."
>Her other nipple was now pointed as if it was jealous of the stimulation
>"P-please, let me return. We wwwwillll never boooother you."
>The master moved onto her other nipple weighing her furry boob in his hand
>"No, I think I'll keep ya."
>The tiger shivered and closed her eyes trying to ignore the teasing
>"Tiger milk is quite a delicacy and ya look like ya can spare some."
>Larinna poked her head close to the tiger flicking her tongue out to taste the air
>The scent was just of the tigers slow and steady arousal
>"I don't smell any milk."
>The master chuckled at the dragons interest
>Lick her nipples and see if you can get some Larinna."
>The dragon did her part and started to lap gingerly at the pink nipple
>She tried wrapping it and stroking it and pressing it
>As she did her part he moved his hands to her pussy
>Her slit was soaked and her clit was easily found
>He pressed the sides of her clit hood to reveal her clitoris
>Large, it could have been mistaken for the serval's dick
>He pressed his thumb on the slick button and the tiger was reacting just the way he expected
>She gyrated on the chair, body begging for more
>"Pleeeeease stop, I don't wish to be a sow."
>"Too late darling, your body is built to be one."
>"Mmmmaaaaa!"
>The stimulation was too much
>She rocked her hips violently
>The master continued to stroke her obscene clitoris while Larinna lapped at her nipples trying to see how to get milk from it
>Her fluids splashed out of her cunt as she came
>He rubbed her a few times as she came down
>Each circle on her clit making her body twitch and jump
>Then he pulled his hand away and wiped it on her stomach
>The dragon was still trying to get milk but nothing came out
>She opened her maw and was about to put the whole boob inside when master bopped her on the snout
>"sorry master I was trying to get the milk."
>The man laughed and shook his head, "she needs to be pregnant before you get milk."
>The confused dragon twisted her head and then looked over at Olivia who was lapping at her own soaked pussy
>"Oh, well no one told me."
>The man patted the side of her neck.
>"You'll learn."
>Later that evening Master heard the voice of one of the milkmaids
>"I'm going, I'm going. What's gotten into 'ya dragon?"
>Larinna was nudging the woman onwards with her snout
>"And what's this about?"
>"'ya dragon has gotten all exited all of sudden"
>"Tell Master the same thing what you told me, Minny. About the tiger"
>"Wha' about it? All I said that if ya planning to get some milk out of that cat, there's another way than putting another spawn in 'er"
>"Explain"
>"Well sire, I've heard some nurses take herbs to help with that. Then play with their tits and milk starts coming out."
>"Just like that?"
>"Well no 'just like that'. It takes some time to get it goin', but it's much easier to keep up. Some take to it better than others."
>Larinna watched the exchange, turning her head between the two
>"Can we try Master? I want to try how it taste's like"
>Minny chuckled at Larinna's enthusiasm
>"If ya like, I can get ya the herbs sire. I'm sure ya can handle the other half ya'self"
>"No harm trying in out. I'm a little curious how well that works on beastkin"
>The tiger did not want to accept the scraps offered by Master
>"Open wide, and don't even think about biting my fingers."
>But she was starved, so she did
>Herbs like alfalfa and fennel were mixed in her food
>"Eugh, what are you feeding me? Want me to suffer some poison?"
>"Quite the opposite. I need to keep my cows healthy. Sick animals dont produce good milk."
>"I don't want to be one of your farm animals. Please let me go. I won't come near this place again."
>"Your little group has cost me several horses, sheep and other cattle. You'll be replacing one of my lost cows"
>Master circled around to stand behind her
>The cats legs were chained together, and her arms lifted above her head by the rope going over a roof beam
>He cupped her breasts, lifting them up and testing their weight
>"You'll pay back with these. I want you to produce a good amount of creamy milk for me every day, until your debt is paid."
>"I- I can..."
>Master pulled his hands away and watched the cat's breasts bounce, before settling against her chest
>"I could sell you at the markets for some quick compensation, but I'm trying to make an investment. I want my investment to start paying of soon"
>"I'm not-"
>"-realizing your situation. You either do this, or I tie you down and force you to it. The end result will be the same. Or I have you placed in a pillory and let everyone on the farm use you as they please. Helps to keep up the morale."
>Master's hands had returned to knead the tiger's udders and she tried to move away with what limited movement she had
>The beastkin received a firm grope and hard smack on the ass for her efforts
>"Think you stupid cat! You want to make this easy on yourself, don't you?"
>Tiger doubled her efforts trying to get free before growing still, and sobbed.
>"Do you understand now? Right now you have no other value to me than what your body can provide."
>"You won't throw me away, or let me go, because I have some worth."
>"Good. And if you stop being any worth to me...?"
>She drew a ragged breath and, hesitantly, nodded
>"My life will get a lot harder."
>"Very good."
>Cat no longer attempted to turn her breasts away from Masters roaming hands
>She tensed her jaw but made no comment as some of his fingers crept downwards
>The rest remained on her chest to stimulate her nipples
>They were pointing straight forward, her tits showing no sagging despite their size
>When Masters hand closed on tigers crotch, he felt her pussy had already grown hot and engorged
>He wetted his fingers in her, and brought them on her clit
>Pushing the large nub between his middle and index fingers, he began to stroke
>The cat was fidgeting again, but this time she had no control over it
>Master did not stop or slow down his assault
>He needed to show her the rewards of submission
>Mind may yet resist, but the body knows what it wants
>"Mmmrowl!"
>The tiger came on his fingers, gushing
>Ropes were pulled tight as she rode her orgasm
>Master tugged her nipple, getting another yowl out of her
>Slowly, she regained the control of her tongue
>"I'm.. I'm doing this for my own sake"
>"For your owners sake"
>"My owners sake.."
>"Now open your mouth"
>The tiger looked at him with apprehension but did as she was told
>Master picked up another piece of herb-supplemented meat and placed in in her mouth
>"Master? Is she making milk yet?"
>"No Larinna, I think it's going to take more than a day for that to happen"
>Larinna paid frequent visits to the beastkin, diligently lapping at the cat's nipples or squezing her breasts with her strong tongue
>Farmhands were happy to help the dragon with her little pet project. The younger boys and men were especially facinated with the tiger's firm and hefty bust
>Word had spread around the ranch and even some milkmaid had come to see if wild beastkins could be transformed into farm animals
>One of the milkmaids had called her Betty, and the name had stuck
>Betty was kept in the cow pens but was allowed to roam as far as her collar and chain would let her
>She was fed with enough meat and scraps to keep her healthy, all mixed with the herbs that Minny said would help with the lactation
>The tigress was mostly well behaved, having understood her position. Staying on Masters good side was in her best interests.
>Master focused on getting Betty accustomed to having her breasts handled
>She needed to learn how to stay still and not raise a fuss whenever he or one of the milkmaids laid their hands on her
>Every day she didn't need to be punished, Master forced another orgasm out of her
>Betty gave the farmhands only occasional trouble, when they tried to finger her or got too rough.
>None of them were brave or stupid enough to put their dicks near her teeth
>Besides, they had the jaguar or serval for some rougher fun
>No sooner than five days after her treatment began, Larinna exitedly run to her Master
>"It's working Master. Minny was right!"
>"You mean the beastkin?"
>"Yes! Climb on master, I want you to see."
>"This soon? I remember Minny said it would take much longer"
>"Must be different for humans. Or maybe I'm just that good"
>Master settled atop Larinnas shoulders and she headed to the cow pens
>They found Bessy feeling her own breasts in amazement, muttering to herself
>"We could have saved some of the cubs..."
>She looked at Master when he jumped down from Larinnas back
>"Your plan worked. I can now start repaying my debt"
>"Come here. Let me see"
>Bessy walked in front of him
>He did no move to grab her, instead looking straight into her eyes
>Bessy huffed, before pushed her chest forward
>"Good girl"
>Grabbing one of her tits with both hands, Master squeezed it to draw milk out
>A small droplet appeared on top of her nipple and he licked it away
>"I't still scarce, but it's a start. If we keep you fed and stimulate your teats, your production should increase"
>Her eyes widened
>"There will be more?"
>"Oh yes. Plenty."
>Betty was 'grazing' with the cows
>Her schedule now included time on the field to give her some excercise, all under Larinna's watchful gaze
>Bovines paid no mind to the large dragoness and even less so to the strange creature who didn't even seem interested on them
>She had complaned that her new enlarged tits made work out difficult
>Their ability to seemingly defy gravity did not extend to being thrown around by the running feline
>They jostled against eachother and theatened to thow off her balance when she tried to speed up
>Push-ups were a lost cause before Larinna dragged multiple large pieces of timber to her and suggested Betty set them up to get chest some way off the ground
>In short, she'd requested some support for her outings
>Master said he'd think about it
>It wasn't all bad for Betty
>The diet she was kept on had positive aspects on her health in general
>Her gums had stopped bleeding and shabby patchwork fur was starting to grow back, regaining its luster
>Master saw Betty trying to groom herself with her hands or tongue when she though he wasn't looking
>Maybe he'd have to get her a comb along the chest wraps
>"Larinna! Bring Betty over, we need to check her progress"
>"Yes Master!"
>On their way to the barn, the duo passed by the shed where jaguar was still being kept
>"Not a word to her", Larinna warned
>Cat threw a confused glance to her at that, but understood when they passed an open door
>Inside, a jaguar was blindfolded and slumped over a desk
>Her fur was crusted with cumstains and the floor was speckeld with old blood
>Bettys gait took a hitch and she wrenched her eyes away
>The pair walked the rest of the way in silence
>They found Master waiting in the barn, holding a large tankard. He gestured to a chair next to him
>"Sit down and we can begin"
>The beastkin was large. Taller than any of the men on the ranch
>Seated, her tits were at comfortable working height
>Betty settled down and put her chest forward
>"Hold this for me"
>Master handed her the tankard and ducked to retrieve a bucket with a washcloth
>He took the cloth, wetted it in soapy water, then wrung it out
>The tiger held the mug on her lap and calmly watched as Master brought the cloth to her breast
>It coasted along the top, before reaching her nipple
>Her back shot straight at the touch
>"Does it hurt?"
>"No, just sensitive"
>It might not have been obvious to everyone, but Betty's breasts had grown since she'd first started to lactate
>She still wasn't making much, but continued to improve every day
>"Your body hasn't adapted to milk production yet, it might pass. If your tits start to hurt or you feel sick, I need you to come tell me. Understand?"
>"Yes."
>"'Yes, sir.'" Larinna corrected her from the side, emphasizing the title.
>"Yes sir."
>"Good"
>The fur on Betty's breasts was short and grew softer the closer to nipple it got
>Master circled the washcloth around her areola, avoiding the tender nub at the center
>It had already swollen from stimulation as to offer itself to him
>He lifted her bosom to expose its underside and that too was diligently wiped clean with soapy washcloth
>Betty did not raise a fuss or show any discomfort for being handled Master
>She was more curious about different items inside the barn than his work
>Tiger didn't protest even when he pinched a nipple to test if any of the milk would come out
>That got her attention though
>Master wetted the cloth again and moved to her other breast. It received a similar treatment, while Betty patted the the first one dry.
>Her chest clean, Master put the bucket away and took the mug from Betty
>"I want to see if you'll be able to fill this tankard for me. You've improved quickly and by this rate it shouldn't take you too long produce a good amount"
>"What about what I've made this far?"
>"It isn't really enough to be sold anywhere, barely enough for couple mouthfuls. We've just used it here on the farm. You have an enjoyable taste"
>Betty crossed her arms under her bust
>"I don't know if I should be flattered or mortified from hearing that"
>"I like yours better than normal cow milk", Larinna commented from her pen
>"It's said to be a delicacy for a reason."
>The tiger just shook her head
>"Can we get this over with. Please?"
>Larinna ignored her
>"Delicacy means it's more expensive, right?"
>"Yes. If you can find a good buyer you can get up to five times more than standard milk and price is on the rise, since it's harder to come by now."
>Betty glanced at jaguar shed direction
>"I'm worth more than one of your farm animals then"
>"But you don't produce as much as a usual cow. So you have some catching up to do"
>Betty pointed at the tankard in Masters hand
>"How much is that?"
>"Volume? Half a liter"
>"And your animals make?"
>"Somewhere from 20 to 30 liters, or thereabouts"
>She sputtered
>"In a day? You possibly can't mean I will make that much!"
>He chuckled at her reaction
>"No, I don't. You could get to 5, while 10 would be exceptional. With how well you've taken to this, it believe it settles somewhere between."
>"That's still a lot... Will I get even bigger?"
>She apprehensively poked her own chest
>"Can't say for sure, but if I'd have to make a quess you are close to finished with your growth"
>The tiger crossed her arms again
>"I hope you're right. Any more and it could get cumbersome. More than this, anyway."
>"Some part of you likes it", Larinna butted in
>"Shut it, dragon"
>"She's aroused Master. I can smell it. Faint, but it's there"
>"You should get your nose checked"
>"Smell is stronger when it's you handling her, Master"
>"Moooving on! Please? Sir."
>Master smiled at Bettys poor choice of words
>"Don't moo just yet. We haven't even started proper"
>She basfully turned away
>"You..."
>"I think this will go easier if you had your tits hanging free"
>"Hmph"
>She looked down at herself, and back to him
>"They... are?"
>"I meant down. Away from your chest. Go stand up against that wall"
>He directed Betty to the back of the barn.
>She put her arms forward and bent her torso so her breasts were hanging freely under her
>"This what you had in mind?"
>"Yes, that's good"
>He rested both his hands on her left tit and began to knead it
>"I need to stimulate your tits to coax the milk out. This should not be required as you develop further"
>"Alright"
>Master kept at it for few minutes
>His efforts were rewarded by good sized dollop appearing on top of her nipple
>"I believe you're ready. Comfortable?"
>"Hold on"
>She took a step forward and crossed her forearms on the railing of one of the pens, then laid her jaw on top
>"I'm ready"
>"We need to make you a proper table or support later"
>Master held the mug to her teat and gently squeezed it
>It was slow at first. Milk beaded on her puffy nipple before separating and dripping down in the container
>Fat drops covered tankards bottom, coming down more easily with every squeeze
>Betty relaxed in Masters familiar touch and let her eyes close
>He settled on to a steady pace and after another minute, she was shooting the milk out in a near constant stream
>"How did you end up with the others? The group you were with."
>"Mmmm. We came to this area from north. Me and a few others. One huntress found us and offered to take us to their camp"
>"You hunt wild game? There should be plenty."
>"There was. Nowdays it's hard to come by. You have to travel large distances"
>Barn was filled with the sound of squishing and of milk spraying into the tankard
>"What do you do with the game you get?"
>"Mostly it's for food. Trade some. Give some as tribute"
>"Tribute?"
>Squish, squish
>"Canine pack sniffed us out a while ago. They wanted some of our meat as payment to not attack our hunters. Then there's the random lizards setting ambushes. Don't really know what they are, got scales so I call them lizards."
>"Whose idea was it to start raiding farms?"
>"Our current pride leader. He thought them easy pickings. You have so many"
>Squish
>"The last group did not have many males. Is your pride mostly females?"
>Bettys tail lazily swayed behind her
>"Mmmhmm. Males tend to fight among eachother and kill or drive the others away. But hunting packs are almost all female, males-"
>She lifted her head to look why Master had stopped.
>The smell of arousal was thick now. Even Master could smell it but made no comment on it
>"This one is dry. I need to move on to the next"
>Betty took the opportinty to fix her stance and caused her breasts to jiggle
>Master showed the tankard to her
>"Look how much you had in just the first tit"
>It was filled little over half way with creamy milk
>"Wow. It didn't feel full or anything"
>He put stool on her right side and sat back down
>Massage process repeated and milk started to flow
>"You're doing very well Betty. You make a good cow."
>"Do you have to call me that?"
>"Why not?"
>Squish, squish
>"They're clumsy and dumb animals. They just spend their days laying down and smelling bad."
>"Producing milk is your duty here. Think of it more like a title within the pride, if that makes it easier"
>Larinna voiced her opinion from behind the wall of her pen
>"I'm the guard dog. What's wrong with that?"
>"It's much better than a cow", Betty sulked
>Squish. Squish
>"We all have our roles here. Farmhands, milkmaids, butchers... Your is cow."
>"Wouldn't that be milk provider or something? Maker?"
>"Betty the milkmaker. That sounds official."
>"'What do you do here?' 'I make milk' sounds much better than 'I'm a cow'"
>Master had stopped tending to her again and Betty craned her neck to look at him upside down
>"Is it empty?"
>"Not quite, you still have more to give. But I should have brought another mug"
>Tankard was filled almost to the brim
>He thought about it for a moment before bringing it to his lips and taking a gulp
>Betty was unable to take her eyes away from him as he drained the milk that had been just squeezed from her breasts
>Master smacked her lips
>"Good. Really good. I made a good choice keeping you"
>"I..."
>"Aw Master, you drank it all? I wanted some"
>"There's still some left. Hold on."
>He went back to Bettys teat and milked out the remaining liquid
>"Here. Open wide"
>Larinna opened her maw and Master poured a quarter mug worth of milk in her mouth
>"You can get up Betty, I got everything. There was more than I expected. Well done"
>"Thank you. I think"
>"How did it feel?"
>"It wasn't... unpleasant"
>"I'm glad to hear that"
>"I still don't like to be called a cow"
>He gave her a scratch behind an ear
>"I'll think about it"
>"It shifted a bit. Pull!"
>Olivia's haunches bulged as she tired to dislodge a huge boulder from the ground
>With the increasing number of slaves on the farm, and potentially more to come in the future, Master had decided to open up a new batch of land
>There was also the two dragons to be fed now, even if Larinna sometimes went to hunt her own food
>Oliva had spend the day with other workers hauling different sized rocks and carting them away from the new farmland
>This was the last piece, but it was proving to be a stubborn one
>Workers had dug out the ground from sides and tied ropes around it
>"Rrrah!"
>Her legs stained yet the huge boulder refused to move
>"Gah. I can't. It's too heavy even for me. Try to expose it more, maybe that will do it"
>Olivia sat down as two of the workers picked up shovels and got digging
>One whistled to skies to get Larinnas attention
>She had been circling above the ranch and craned her neck to see someone waving for her
>Larinna banked, inclining at the mans direction
>Wings beat rapidly to slow down her descent right before she reached the ground
>Those who did not hold on to their headgear had it sent flying away
>Larinna's back legs touched down and she tucked her wings in, falling to all fours with a thud
>"What is it?"
>"We need to get that thing moved but it's too heavy for Olivia alone. Maybe ya could help push or lift it?"
>She took one look to appraise the situation
>"I could pull it with her. I need to get geared up. Be back soon"
>Larinna took off again, beelining to where she had seen Master last
>Man was left to stand with Olivia, scratching his head
>"Why'd she insist on that?"
>"I have a hunch... Lets add more ropes meanwhile to make room for us both"
>Larinna found Master sitting on the porch, cleaning a rifle. He lift his eyes from the gun to look at her
>"Do you need something?"
>"There is a heavy rock that Olivia can't move alone. I need to help her pull it"
>"Well go on then. Ask one of the farmhands set you up"
>"Master I thought maybe I could get the special harness?"
>He smiled at that
>"Like it that much?"
>"Mhm. Makes me feel nice and full, much more fun that way as well. I can picture you in there, pushing into me as I work."
>That got a chuckle out of him
>"Alright you kinky dragon. Lets go"
>Larinna gave Master a quick lick on the cheek and took him to her pen
>She was first fitted with her usual gear
>Master then went to retrieve a special accessory
>He sank fingers in her cunt, stroking the walls to collect some lubricant
>Larinna lifted her tail as the latest addition to her harness was pushed against her ass
>Master increased the pressure until it slid in place with a soft squelch
>A good fist sized plug now filled Larinna's tailhole, shifting every time she rolled her hips
>Master next attached straps to a ring at plug base, before looping them back to her front and reins
>It was built so that as the reins were pulled back, plug was driven deeper in her ass
>He swatted her rear with his hand.
>"Get to work then"
>Larinna gathered the reins in her mouth and trotted out of the barn
>Master stared at her receding hindquarters
>"Try to not get too distracted!"
>She just waved her wing in reponse
>"I was right"
>Olivia watched reinforcements approach. She saw the extra straps on Larinna and knew what they meant
>"'bout what?"
>"You'll see soon"
>Larinna came to stop in front of them
>"Am redy"
>A man reached to take the reins from her mouth but she growled
>He quickly withdrew his hand
>Larinna realized what she had done and dropped the reins
>"Sorry, I wasn't about to hurt you. Just don't want pulling them this time"
>"Better just show them, Larinna"
>She nodded and spun around, exposing her underside
>Some of the workers grew red on face while others grinned when they saw what she was wearing
>All understood the message however. No touching the plugged dragoness
>She went to stand next to Olivia and workers hooked the ropes back to their harnesses
>Olivia looked at her
>"You couldn't resist, could you?"
>"No, I couldn't. I like how it reminds me from Master"
>"Really? I simply thought you were a huge deviant", Olivia teased back
>"Har har. I know I find humans more interesting than most, but is that so bad?"
>"Oh, no. I didn't mean it as an insult"
>"None taken. I did practically volunteer myself to slavery afterall, but the way I did it was really stupid. Could have ended up real bad. I got real lucky being bought by him. I've learned this is exactly what I wanted."
>"Happy to hear that"
>Olivia and Larinna stood side to side, setting their feet into position
>Rope pulled taught, and two sets of dragon claws sank to earth
>The pair heaved once, twice
>Each time the rock became a bit more loose
>Olivia and Larinna grunted from exertion, and some pleasure
>The stone fought back but was no match to strength of two adult dragons
>It came free and they kept going, towing it away from the field
>"Finally. Thank you"
>"My pleasure"
>"I know it was"
>Workers took over from there and the dragons went back to the barn
>"Looks like you've gotten quite a workout back there"
>"Mmm, yes Master. It was really stuck in deep"
>He tugged on Larinna's plug
>"This one still is. Do I have to fight as hard to get it out?"
>"Maybe, or you could leave it there and take me for a ride"
>Master yanked at her reins, causing Larinna to moan lightly
>He tied the reins on a hook and went to tend Olivia
>"Another time. Wait for your turn"
>Larinna put her chest on the ground and backed up a little. Enough to pull the reins tight if she pushed her hips back
>Master was stripping Olivia's harness with practiced ease, setting everything aside to be serviced by farmhands later
>"Larinna got all the fun earlier. We should balance things out. Roll over for me"
>Olivia dropped to the floor and turned on her back
>She gave Master a knowing look, welcoming his attentions
>He sat down on her thick tail, straddling it.
>Hands moved on the underside of the scaly appendage, pressing it down
>He gradually moved his attention further up, towards the base
>Fingers circled her anus and it twitched in response
>"Mmm. Planning to fill me up there too?"
>"I have something else in mind for today"
>Master kept going, shifting closer to her vagina
>He could see her pink inner folds and dug his fingers right in
>Olivia let out a deep rumble
>Master used only his fingers to stroke her insides, but that was enough to make her pussy to start leaking all over her scales
>She laid her neck straight on the floor, breathing heavily
>"I'll never get tired of this"
>She squeezed at his fingers and weight was lifted from Olivia's tail
>Belt buckle came undone and next sensation she felt on her body was Master's penis seeking entrance to her cunt
>Nearby grunting distracted them
>"Larinna, are you pleasuring yourself?"
>"Hnnh, yes? Mmm."
>Master propped his head over the wall to see Larinna rock her hips backward
>The motion pulled her reins tight, driving the plug in her ass
>She then used her muscles to push it back outwards, almost dislodging it before throwing her hips back again
>Master practically jumped on Olivia, burying himself to the hilt in one stroke
>Olivia exclaimed and flexed her talons
>"Yes!"
>There was no need to be gentle or take it slow. Olivias body capable of taking anything Master could throw at it and she was wet enough for a full sized dragon
>Master pressed his palms against the dragon under him
>Smacks and grunts filled the barn
>He hammered Olivia's depths, balls slapping on her tailhole
>Olivia was panting, tongue hanging from her mouth as she watched Master take her
>Behind the divider Larinna continued her creative masturbation, moaning 'Master' on every swing
>"Getting close Master. Please give it to me"
>Master pushed two fingers in Olivia, hitting her in a spot that made her convulse and constrict around him
>With a final thrust he buried his cock deep in her cunt and let go
>Olivia tried to stifle a roar as thick ropes of cum pooled in her depths
>Master kept grinding, drawing out their pleasure
>Eventually his spurts grew weak, contents of his balls now resting within her
>Olivia brought her snout to their joining and lapped at it
>She snaked her tongue in her own pussy, coiling around Masters cock within her
>She drew out some of their combined fluids and greedily drank them down
>They rest together until Master grew soft in her
>When he withdrew, Olivia was there to clean him up
>"Thank you Olivia, but you should stop before we can't leave it at just one"
>Reluctantly, she obeyed
>Larinna was still going at it, her pace more feverish now
>Master stepped out from Oliva's pen to watch her
>There were juices trailing down her legs and abdomen, some of it pooling below her
>"Does it feel good?"
>"Yes Master! Please make me cum Master!"
>Still bottomless, he walked behind her
>"Please make me cum!"
>He smacked her cunt and took hold of her engorged clit
>One pinch was all it took
>She came explosively, squirting more femcum on the floor and all over his hands
>"Ah! Nnnnhhhhhhh YES!"
>Larinna's legs gave out and she collapsed on the floor
>She rode through her orgasm, being very vocal in her pleasure
>Master went to remove her headgear and put it away
>"Tail up"
>Larinna did as she was told
>Master grasped her plug and pulled it free with a small pop
>Her hole gaped for a few seconds, then closed and winked at him
>"Thank you. For making me cum, Master."
>Master went back to Olivia's pen and settled against her side
>Larinna came crawling in after her Master and Olivia raised her leg
>"I left some for you in there"
>Larinna planted her snout between Olivia's thighs and drank like a dragon dying from thirst
>Grunting carried out from the barn
>"No not there. That's not where it should go."
>"Well where do you want it then?"
>"A bit forward, so it doesn't block the entrance"
>Master and Betty, along with two farmhands, were hefting a heavy table around
>"That's good enough. Put it down"
>Custom milking rack for her had been finally completed
>Calling it a table could be somewhat misleading
>It had a sizeable cutout somewhere around two thirds of the length and was padded from end to end
>If one added a pillow, it was closer to a bed than a table really
>Master had decided to place it in the barn for now
>One stall was modified for Betty's needs, both for housing and her work
>New building was being planned for slaves but they had so much other projects to do that it'd have to wait
>So until then, barn it was
>It seemed that Betty's contribution to the ranch, even if apprehensively, had gained Olivia's approval
>Normally dismissive towards beastkin, the dragon had accepted this cat to be housed under the same roof as her
>Farmhands left to continue their own tasks, but not before one tried to cup a parting feel from the feline
>Betty swatted his hand away from her tit and the man walked out with a laugh
>It had become sort of a game for them
>They tried to get a good squeeze from her and she kept smacking their hands away
>"Can't you tell them to keep their hands to themselves?"
>"I could, but I bet if you just stopped warding them off they'd soon lose interest"
>"Hmph"
>He patted the rack
>"Want to try it out?"
>"Is that an order or a question? Sir."
>"A simple question. When was the last time you were milked?"
>"Yesterday. Minny did it."
>He nodded. "You-"
>Farmhand ran inside, gesturing back
>"Sir! Come quick. John hurt his leg with a horse. We think it's broken."
>"Lead the way"
>Men rushed out and Betty was left alone in the barn
>Minutes passed. Then some more
>Betty had wandered outside in boredom and looked around
>Only a few humans caught her eye and they paid her no mind
>She inspected her claws. All there.
>Master had ordered her to keep them dulled, instead of removing them completely.
>More time passed by and Betty had closed the forest edge little by little
>There was not a single person in sight
>Betty stood still, staring into the woods
>She was rooted in place for several minutes
>Then, taking a deep breath and steeling herself, she stepped forward
>Master found Betty sitting sideways on the milking table, palms gripping its edge
>"Will I be confined on these grounds for the rest of my life?"
>"Not neccessarily. You might accompany me or someone else to different locations"
>She kicked up her legs and laid down, placing hands on her stomach
>"But never on my own will"
>There was clatter as Master put down the items he was carrying
>"You are a prisoner. You will go where you're told"
>More shuffling, and a bowl was placed below the table.
>"And get groped by dirty males wherever that will be"
>"Most humans will respect another man's property. If I say you're not to be touched, you won't be."
>Betty turned her head to him
>"I suppose that has something to do why the men have not forced themselves on me yet"
>"It does"
>She returned to stare at the ceiling
>"You have not given the same order about your other prisoners"
>"I have not"
>He put a stool on the side and lifted a familiar washcloth
>Master cleaned her breasts in silence, wiping them under and over
>Betty turned around to her front settling over the cutout, her heavy breasts swaying below her
>She was not unlike a cow with her udders hanging free
>Once she was comfortable, Master grasped her tits and gently rolled them on his palms
>He rubbed her underside, sinking hands in the yielding titflesh
>It took only moments for milk to appear
>Master continued circling Betty's nipples and areola until she was dripping in the bowl on her own
>He took firm hold on the teats and got to work
>Right away her breasts gave out copious amounts of grade A tiger milk
>Each squeeze resulted in continuous stream shooting out from her nipples
>It landed audibly in the bowl, pooling at the bottom
>In no time she had given out approximately one liter
>As he kept at it, Master could see Betty's tail from the corner of his eye
>It was draped over the side and the tip kept curling to and fro
>"Why didn't you run?"
>It was a simple question, yet Master gave her the time she needed
>He kept alternating his hands meanwhile
>The steam of milk showed no signs of growing weak
>She spoke almost two liters later
>"Since coming here, I've not known cold or hunger. My health has improved and I'm well rested. This is the best I've felt in a long time."
>"And what about those things you mentioned earlier? You won't be free to go as you please."
>"I could ask you the same thing. You're free to go anywhere. Why stay here?"
>Other than occasional jostling of her breasts when she shifted and more milk hitting the bowl, they both spent rest of the time in silence
>When first tit was empty, Master told Betty to roll on her side
>Her breasts had dwarfed his head before, and now with her added growth, he could get lost between them
>Master lifted the tit that still had some milk left in it and brought his face closer
>"What are you-"
>He dived in, latching his mouth around her nipple
>Face full of furry breast, he started to drink
>Creamy milk filled his mouth as Master kneaded and nursed Betty's tit
>She was frozen and gazed Master with wide eyes
>Her hand lifted towards his head but stopped soon after
>Betty made no further attempts to pull away and just watched Master play with her body
>He gulped down several mouthfuls more before pulling away
>"Had your fill?"
>"I could go for seconds, but you're spent"
>Betty wiped her breast with a hand
>"You do that to all your cows?"
>"Just to my favourite milkmaker"
>She might have had a small smirk growing on her face, but it was quickly destroyed by a frown
>"Gah. You slobbered all over me"
>"Here, let me"
>One washcloth swipe later she was clean again
>Master stared directly at Betty's eyes. The cat normally well over a head taller than him, their faces now leveled with eachother due difference in their postures
>"What?"
>"I've thought about making it official. Your slave status."
>"What am I now then?"
>"A lawless beast. A wild animal anyone could put down without reprecussions"
>"Without what?"
>"Without consequences. No punishment because no rules protect you."
>"And some announcement will make others treat me differently?"
>"Registered slaves are concidered as property and are covered by some laws. Theft, vandalism, things like that"
>She lowered her eyes
>"You will keep treating me fairly?"
>"I can't promise you that. I define fair. You might not like everyhing I do to you or see it as 'fair', yet it is all you will get."
>"This?"
>She gestured to herself and around the barn
>"You will continue with all this?"
>"I see no reason not to"
>"... what would I have to do?"
>"Accompany me to town tomorrow. We will handle the paperwork there."
>"Can I get something to cover myself with?"
>"Don't mistake this for a negotiation. No, you can't"
>She winced at that and turned his eyes away again
>Master patiently sat beside her, letting her think
>"You were never about to let me go, were you? There is no 'debt' I can repay."
>"No, there isn't."
>Betty nodded. It was a weak one
>"Then yes. I will travel to town with you"
>Master nodded approvingly
>"Wait here"
>Betty watched in puzzlement when Master went back to dig the pile of items on the floor
>He pulled out a single item
>Betty recognized it. A comb
>"Lie down"
>Master put the comb on her head and began to stroke it through her fur
>It was quite short on her back without any notable scarring
>He combed from behind her ears, which made them flick uncontrollably, all the way down to her buttocks and legs
>Her tail seemed to have a mind of it's own, and he had to grasp it with one hand to keep it still
>Feeling her from head to toes, Master could sense Betty's toned body slowly grow more relaxed
>She had done so much infact, that he had to poke her ear to regain her attention
>"Turn over"
>Betty's front had areas where her fur was much longer. Notably on her throat and neck. It framed her almost like a small mane
>Longer fur on her throat extended some way down to her chest and towards her cleavage, but quickly shortened out to its usual lenght
>Master took his time sorting out any knots on her
>She'd closed her eyes and surrendered to his attentions
>When he stroked her chin, she'd started chuffing. She did not stop as continued he combed through her stomach and sides
>Fur on her chest was so thin that it wasn't much use to be treated with a coarse comb
>Her nethers were much the same, so he felt it out with her fingers
>They slid over her thighs and dropped down to the valley between
>'Combing' up and down between her legs only made her chuffing intensify
>The actual comb made long smooth strokes from her jaws to top of her breasts
>Down below, his fingers spread her open, seeking entry
>Sinking one finger in her, Master rotated his right hand to stroke her lips both inside and out
>His left alternated between her chest and chin, groping the supple flesh and petting soft fur
>Betty's breathing had quickened and Master had matched her pace with his fingering
>Chufs grew to low growls and mewls as she neared her peak
>Suddenly, her back arced from the table and she came around his fingers
>Betty yowled and sank her claws in the bedding
>Master kept going, drawing her orgasm out as long as he could
>"Enough. Enough. Please, no more"
>She was overstimulated but he did not give up
>"I beg you sir!"
>That got him to show her some mercy
>She laid on the table, panting heavily
>"You're evil. Sir"
>Master brough the hand covered in her juices to his mouth and tasted her
>"I have one more gift for you. Clean me up first"
>Betty dutifully licked all the remaining girlcum from his fingers
>She struggled to get up on the sitting position
>Master handed her a piece of clothing. She turned it in her hands a few times before realizing what it was
>"A bra?"
>"Kind of. More like wraps. Should be enough to keep your chest in place when you're leaping or running."
>"Thank you. Sir"
>"Thank the one of the women for making it. You may wear it during physical activity, and only then, without my explicit permission. If it needs to be adjusted you can ask Minny to handle it"
>Betty was grasping the bra with both hands and nodding deeply
>"Of course"
>Master picked up the bowl of milk on their way out
>"You gave out close to five liters this time. Was it less or more yesterday?"
>"Minny said it was four and half. It felt more easy today."
>"Should have no trouble getting past five then. Might end up closer to ten. You're doing well"
>"Thank you, sir. I think."
>Larinna was saddled on the field, waiting for Master and Betty to climb on
>Situation had gone to a standstill when Betty started to have second thoughts
>"I thought we were going to walk, or take a horse"
>"Walking would take better part of the day, and have you ever ridden a horse?"
>"Maybe use a cart or something?"
>She didn't look too exited
>Master put a hand on her back and tried to encourage her forwards
>"Climb up. You'll see it's not so terrible"
>She still hesitated and he gave Betty's rear a light smack
>"Don't be a kitten now. Larinna is very safe to ride on"
>Unconvinced, Betty stepped forward.
>She struggled to find a foothold and Larinna gave her a small boost with her snout
>That successfully got her up in the saddle, but not quite the way she would have liked
>Betty laid sideways on Larinnas back, arms hanging on the dragon's right side, while legs were still on the left
>Larinna gave her time to get seated and got up
>"Go give her a small lap around the pasture, let her get used to it"
>"Yes Master."
>The dragon walked around slowly at first before accelerating to a light trot
>Betty seemed to adjust well and was in no danger of falling off
>Larinna ended their little test run and returned to her Master
>Betty's tits jiggled tantalizingly as she was bounced up and down in the saddle
>"See. It's nothing to worry about."
>Betty scooted backwards and Master climbed to sit in front of her
>"Don't feline bestkin always fall on their feet?"
>"Not from this height we won't"
>Betty had a quizzical look on her face when Master secured them on Larinna's harness
>"Surely we're not about to fly there?"
>"Of course we are"
>He could hear her swallow next to his ear
>"Don't worry. Once we get up in the air it will be smoother than her gait on the ground. It can get a bit chilly but your fur should be enough"
>Larinna turned to her passengers
>"I'll fly low and steady"
>"...Alright"
>"Ready?"
>"As much as I'll be"
>Larinna was true to her word and took it easy on her inexperienced rider
>Master guided her down some way away from town
>"Betty, you can let go now"
>The cat had squeezed her arms around his waist when Larinna had launched up and was still pressin herself against his back
>He dropped off and pulled out a collar along with a piece of rope from Larinna's saddlebags
>Larinna aided Betty down meanwhile
>Master presented the simple leather collar to her. It had a buckle for tightening, and a small metal ring at the front
>One could mistake it for a belt if not for the ring on it
>"Since you're still technically 'wild', I have to escort you while we're in town. Kneel down so I can put this on you."
>Betty hinted at Larinna with her head
>"What about her?"
>"Yes, Master. What about me? Why don't I get one?"
>"The harness you're wearing is a clear enough sign that you have an owner. However, if anyone asks, tell them to look into your bags. I left the proof of ownership there."
>"What if I want a one?"
>"We certainly can"
>Betty got back up with her new collar and leash in place
>Her nipples were hard, pointing good way from her chest and were covered in little bumps
>Master poked at them
>"What's with these?"
>"Like you said. It was a bit chilly"
>The group walked rest of the way to town
>He was a familiar face and the guards didn't give them much trouble
>They showed more interest to the strange beastkin, mostly due to her size and "size"
>Wanted to know where he got her and if she was trained
>"Caught her trespassing on my lands and training is ongoing. She's the reason for our troubles, or part of it anyway. Here to get her registered"
>"Just remember you'll be held responsible if she causes any trouble"
>A dragon had been keeping an eye on Larinna, and now approached her
>"I think I remember you. You were the mad lass who decided to land in the middle of town"
>"Erm, yes. That was me. Left an impression, did I?"
>Guard chuckled
>"Only one to pull off something like that. You may go"
>It was almost mid-day and streets were crowded with humans.
>Few collared beastkin and occasional dragon could be seen among them, though the latter were more rare
>"Larinna. I'll take Betty to the offices while you can head to the markets. Meet us here later. Our business is likely to take longer than yours, so feel free to roam around a bit"
>"I will"
>He left Larinna to explore on her own and tugged on Betty's leash to get her attention
>She had been focused on the buildings and people strolling down the streets
>"There are so many"
>"Humans?"
>"Everything. Houses, humans. I haven't seen this many in one place"
>"This is still a fairly small town. Closest before the wildlands"
>Master and Betty navigated through the town, drawing curious looks from several humans
>Some came to congratulate Master for his catch and like the guards, wanted to know where he got her
>One woman, a wife perhaps, slapped her husband on the head when he got distracted by Betty's bobbing chest
>Even here she was one of the tallest figure around, making her stick out from the crowd and left her on display
>Few beastkin had actual clothes but many wore attire similar to Betty
>So far no one had tried to grope her. Just like Master said
>They arrived at the office building. 'Slave recruitment and retention center.'
>Since the politicians passed the law that you'd need a *reason* for enslaving beastkin, they'd either have to volunteer themselves to it or admit they broke some law and get enslaved as a result.
>Some volunteered themselves out of desperation.
>Some had idealized views about it and thought they'd just need to bend over and look pretty.
>Then some, like Betty, were brought in to confess a crime or another.
>If the crime actually happened or not meant a little. All that mattered was they admitted to it
>"Betty. Look at me."
>The cat turned away from the little girl who 'wanted to pet the big kitty'
>"I will have to answer to some questions by the clerk. You will confirm my statements and when asked, agree to be registered to my care. Understand?"
>"Yes"
>"Behave yourself. Don't talk to anyone unless they do so to you first. Keep your hands behind your back or at your sides. Don't try to cover yourself up. Understand?"
>"Yes sir"
>He led Betty into the office
>It was sparsely decorated with two booths for the clients
>A row of chairs was placed on one side of the room and some posters of missing or escaped slaves were mounted on the notice board
>Both clerks were be occupied so Master sat down to wait
>Betty went to follow, but he signed her to stop
>"Not on the chair. Kneel down next to me"
>She didn't miss a beat and settled down on the floor
>Master pet her head to pass the time
>One man stopped in front of them and pointed at Betty, as if to ask permission
>Master shook his head
>Other clerk finished with her client and waived them over
>"Here to rent her off or set her for an auction?"
>"To register her."
>Woman behind the desk pulled out an empty form
>"Name?"
>"Betty", Master answered
>"Species?"
>"Tiger"
>"Umm... sir?"
>Master shushed her
>Clerk looked up from the paper
>"What kind?"
>Master turned to Betty
>"Go on. You can answer her"
>"Wanted to say... Not a tiger, half breed. A liger"
>The woman gave master an evil eye and tore up the form and filled another one with correct information
>She quietly noted down some details on Betty's physical appearance.
>"A half breed?"
>"My mother was a tiger, but my-"
>The clerk interrupted them
>"Basis for enslavement?"
>"Theft and physical assault", master replied.
>Clerk looked at Betty
>"Do you admit to these offense and agree to be registered as a slave?"
>Betty gave her answer two heartbeats later
>"I do"
>Woman passed the form to Master and asked him to sign it
>"Wait here"
>She left to the back room and Master continued conversation with Betty
>"A hybrid? You never told me this?"
>"I did not think you'd care, or for it to matter. I'm a half tiger anyway"
>"On your mothers side. What about your father?"
>"A lion. Got my mother's stripes and father's eyes they used to say. Mother left soon after I had grown up. She never was much for social, unlike my father. Must have gotten that from him too."
>"Does being a hybrid have anything to with your size?"
>"I know I'm bigger than both of my parents, or any other I've met, so it might have. Could say same for these."
>Betty lifted her breasts up just when the clerk came back
>"Here are the papers for your proof of ownership, and document for her to prove she's been processed. She must show them to authorities when asked. We suggest you get this identification number tattooed on her somewhere so she won't get lost"
>"That's that taken care of. I need to follow her advice and get you tattooed, shouldn't take too long. Larinna can handle herself"
>"I'd be more worried about her getting into trouble. What's 'tattoo', sir? Or should I call you Master now?"
>"Either will do, although 'Master' is more often used when referring to your owner. Tattoo is... think of it like a painting, just hidden under your fur."
>Streets were mercifully less crowded as they made their way to the tattoo shop
>On one square, a beastkin doe was chained to a wooden post. She had been whipped and left for the amusement of townsfolk.
>Betty walked little closer to Master
>He explained Betty how tattoo's are made
>"It is not as painful as it sounds. The needle pierces the skin only enough to place the ink in. Many even use them to decorate themselves"
>"How long will it last?"
>"Untill you lose your skin it's on, or die"
>Master got lucky and was able to get Betty marked right away
>She was wasn't happy to have some of her fur shaved away but it had to be done
>Couple hundred needle pricks later she had a serial number placed on her neck
>Master detached the rope from Betty's collar.
>"I believe we won't be needing this anymore. Stay close, and stop rubbing your neck"
>"Why did you have to pick so sensitive spot.... Where to now? Are we done?"
>"No. There's two other places I need to visit. Notify the authorities there are bands of beastkin about, and find a buyer for your milk."
>Larinna was surrounded by bustling streets
>Last time she were here, nearly entirety of it was spent in a holding cell
>Now she had a chance to wander around on her own
>There were so many things to see! So much was happening wherever she looked
>She saw collared beastkin pushing a cart full of black rocks
>Groups of humans conversing everywhere
>Human hatchlings running down the alley
>Larinna was mindful in her strolling, placing each step carefully to not bowl into anyone
>Her long tail was more of a problem
>It threatened to knock people over if she didn't keep it still
>After one such event nearly happened, she hoisted her tail over the crowd altogether when passing more crowded spots
>Larinna did not understand why Betty still seemed so uncomfortable about not having anything to cover herself with
>Unlike humans, she had fur to keep warm and Larinna herself had scales to protect her
>Humans had neither of those so they needed wit to solve those problems.
>Their solution to cover themselves with fabrics was simple but effective, allowing them to adapt to every situation
>Humans were so used to their clothes that they wore even when there was no need to
>The looks Larinna received did not bother her. Let them see everything her Master had.
>She stopped one of the passing human females and asked her directions to the market
>"Stay on this street until you come at a tavern. Take right and keep going, you shouldn't be able to miss it"
>"Tavern. That's is one of those gathering places for humans, right?"
>The woman eyed Larinna up and down
>"I don't remember seeing you around here before. You're not a wild one are you?"
>"No no. I'm happily owned. Just not familiar with the town"
>"Oh good. Ever since that one beast decided to just land at the town square in broad daylight there has been some questions about the capabilities of our guard force. I heard it was after our mayor. Wanted do capture him to extort us."
>Larinna quickly excused herself
>"That sounds exiting but I have a task to complete. Thank you for your help"
>"What if- Ah, I understand. You shouldn't keep your master waiting."
>Passing the 'Early Bird' tavern had Larinna salivating from the smells drifting from it
>Carol and laughter briefly intensified when group of humans stumbled out
>She saw a glimpse of naked beastkin mouse serving the customers before the color closed again
>The was right. It'd be nigh impossible to miss the large marketplace
>Dozens of humans were standing behind collections of desks loaded with items
>All of them shouting and claiming they had the best goods in town
>The first item on Larinna's mental list was ropes. It was needed everywhere.
>They had used lots of it to build the camouflage nets for her and Olivia
>Binding the three beastkin had take a good amount as well
>To build more traps and prepare for additional captures, more rope was needed
>She wandered the markets to find a suitable seller
>"What do ya want, dragon?"
>"I was sent to buy several coils of rope. There is coin in my bags for payment"
>"Mhm. What kinds of?"
>Larinna hesitated
>"Master didn't mention anything about that... It's for farming work, if that helps any."
>"I tell ya what. Give you the most common one. Ya can come back if it's no good"
>She nodded happily
>"That should be fine. Thank you"
>A slave loaded the cords in her saddlebags and the merchant counted out the payment
>"Oh do you have cloth? For covering things and making bags."
>"I do. Should I load some of that as well?"
>"Please"
>The final item on Larinnas list were some horseshoes
>She found smith pacing around his forge
>"Is something wrong?"
>"Huh? Well I sent my slave to fetch more coals for the forge. Trouble is the damn bitch is nowhere to be seen."
>Larinna gestured at the fire. It had withered down so much that the plow on it was barely reddened
>"Those black rocks? I saw a wolf pushing a cartful of them earlier"
>Smith let out a sigh
>"I'm going too easy on her. If she's stopped to yap her mouth again... Anyway, you need something?"
>"Yes. Master sent me to buy one set of horseshoes"
>He picked four of them from the wall
>"Anything else?"
>"No, but could I help you with the plow? If it's fire you need I have plenty. I have time."
>The man stroked his beard in thought, catching on to the fact that there was a dragon inside his smithy
>"Say that's not a bad idea. You have a good head on that neck of yours, but what's it to you?"
>"I want to see how it's made. I've never seen a smith working before"
>Man chuckled
>"Fair enough. Say if it goes well I'll throw you a little discount on the shoes. Sound good"
>"Great. What do I have to do?"
>"See that crack on the mold board? I need you to heat that spot"
>Larinna brought her head over the forge and gently exhaled a stream of dragonfire on the piece of metal
>She kept the fire small and steady to avoid setting anything on fire by accident. That would be bad.
>The iron turned angry red in seconds
>"Stop! Stop or you'll melt it. Cripes that flame is hot"
>Larinna snapped her jaws shut and smith lifted the piece out
>He placed it on the anvil, starting to hammer it to a new shape
>When the metal cooled down he had Larinna heat it up again
>More iron was added and smith continued his work
>All the while Larinna attentively followed through the process
>Mold board was fixed in record time and smith gave her the discount as promised
>Her tasks now completed, Larinna headed to the agreed meeting spot
>She was passing the 'Early Bird' when a human teetered to her direction
>Larinna tried to avoid the man but he stumbled against her chest
>"Wahtsh where ya goin"
>"Sorry I didn't see you bumping into me... sir."
>His breath stank. She could smell alhohol on it
>"Don' ya trynna be a smart ass lizard"
>Larinna snarled
>"I'd be careful around lizards several times your size"
>"Ahn it's poorly train'd to boot."
>She heard a third voice behind her
>"Is there a problem?"
>Guardsman was walking closer
>"No problem. I was just leaving"
>"Dis... lizard tried to ran me ovar. Arr- arrest it officer"
>"You're the one who tried to walk through me!"
>Officer had put himself between the two parties
>"Lets all calm down. John, you're drunk. Go home"
>"Ya letting that lizard-"
>Larinna bared her teeth
>"Call me lizard one more time..."
>"Let me handle this. John, home."
>The drunk floundered past Larinna, mumbling about pig guards. She was tempted to trip the fool with her tail
>"May I go too?"
>"Yes, but a word of warning. Do not assault humans while in town, no matter how irritating they might be. That won't end well for you or your master."
>"In understand. Thank you."
>"How is your new master by the by?"
>Larinna took a good look at the guard standing in front of her
>"You're the one who arrested me last time!"
>He smiled. Larinna took that as a confirmation
>"He's been good to me. My needs are taken care of and I like to be with him. But I don't know what he thinks of me"
>"Have you tried asking him?"
>"No?"
>"Well I think you should. I'll let you go now, have a pleasant day."
>"You too sir"
>She reached the gathering spot without further interruptions
>It seemed Master hadn't yet arrived. Larinna settled down to wait
>Master and Betty had found their way to the town guardhouse
>"Wait here. No beastkin allowed inside."
>He left Betty outside and went to see the receptionist
>Master explained the situation how a band of beastkin had gradually grown more bold and we're causing trouble on the ranches nearby.
>He received the same excuses as last time. How the guard force was undermanned and it was difficult to get reinforcements from the state.
>"Now that we know beastkin are involved surely they'll send someone. The town may come under threat if more beasts gather here. What if they raze the ranches?"
>"We will send out and update about the situation but right now there's not much we can do."
>"Can you at least spread the news around town? To warn people and draw in some hunters?"
>"We could do that, yes. Can you mark the general area on the map?"
>He did so and wished the receptionist a good day
>Master stepped outside to scene of a well dressed rotund man reaching his hands towards Betty
>"Hello beautiful. What's a girl like you doing here all by herself? Are you lost?"
>"I have a Master"
>She looked unsure how to handle the situation
>"Aww don't be like that. I can ask if he'd be willing to part with you."
>Master gave him the answer right away
>"He would not"
>Betty visibly relaxed hearing his voice but the fat man persisted
>"You haven't even heard my offer. I can pay handsomely"
>"She's not for sale"
>"Hmph. Your loss."
>"But if want to have some of her product, I can sell the milk."
>"No, I don't think so. We're I to indulge on such things, I would not settle for anything less than the freshest."
>With that, he waddled away. Master gestured Betty to join him
>"That would have been too easy. Come, I have a place in mind we might have more luck."
>The farm lulled a bit as the activity from the beastkin stopped
>Their unsuccessful raid had coated them dearly
>"Watch what yer doin' boy." The masters tone was furious
>He'd been watching the waif of a cat work carrying pails of water to a trough for the cattle and Betty
>He appeared to be a serval but his muscle mass was nothing like the others
>The master knew his stunted growth had to of been from malnourishment
>The cat barely had the strength to hold on to a 20 lb bucket
>Betty frowned deeply at the struggling kin
>She whispered encouraging words but it just made it harder on the cat
>He stopped to wipe a tear away from his eye
>His soft fur was kept in good health and his tail was healing nicely, but his future was bleek
>"Dammit boy!"
>The master hopped the fence to finish the job
>He snatched the bucket with one arm and hauled it into the trough
>After he finished the work he set the boy to do he shook his head disgusted
>"There ain't room for useless animals on the farm boy."
>The serval shivered cupping his shame with one paw
>"Maybe I should just have you clean her other kin in the barn, maybe that will teach you what will become of you."
>He shrank even more from the threat, he already seen the sorry state of his kin
>Broken, with soulless eyes
>Betty spoke up for him trying to show his worth, "Please master, he'll do better."
>The master grumbled and stroked her caring cheek
>"I know ya mean well missy, but I have a business to run, and if he can't keep up with his chores."
>The master looked over at the boy and petted the soft fur.
>"I'll either sell him or skin him, depending on if I can even find a buyer for this runt."
>The cat clinched his eyes trying to stop the tears from running down the side of his face
>"Now, go clean Olivia's roost, prolly the only thing yer good at."
>He trotted over to the pens
>His one and only chore he didn't screw up
>He cautiously entered the dragon's den
>The scent frightened him, even with his sharp eyes in the darkness
>There were no dragons inside but he treaded carefully
>He started his work by scrapping the dried hops off the tops of Olivia and Larinna's beds
>He collected any large discarded scales and placed them in a bucket
>As he cleaned he saw that Olivia's bed was strange
>There was a large blanket of fur hiding under the hops
>He recognized the patterns
>They were the kin that went with him on the raid, skinned and stitched as a resting place for the dragon
>He hurried up tossing fresh hops to cover the grizzly scene and took the bucket away
>He slammed into what seemed like a brick wall of flesh
>"There you are," Larinna said musically, "I've been getting itchy from the dried bedding and was hoping you'd clean it."
>The serval was petrified and silent
>The dragon made an attempt to stroke the cat like master does with Betty and herself
>Her claw glided through the fur on his chest
>"Your fur has gotten really soft. You must have been eating good."
>The cat scrambled away out of the barn leaving a bewildered Larinna behind
>He ran through the tall grass back to the paster where the master was
>He stared at the treeline wondering if he should run away
>But memories of his treatment back home returned
>The leader beating him
>Leaving him starved
>If he returned they would kill him for being such a coward
>But Betty was the only one healthy enough to leave
>And she already refused to return
>He looked back at his master, Betty and Olivia were next to him talking with a stranger
>This stranger was prim and proper, tall white gallon hat and fancy collared suit
>A bit on the tubby side and a smile beneath pearly white teeth
>Betty stepped into the man's hand for him to grab a tit
>His lips latched around the nipple and he sucked a mouthful before releasing
>The serval grew curious as to what was going on and he slinked through the grass to get into earshot
>"Mighty fine specimen ya got there, sweet as honey," the white suited man pulled a handkerchief out of his pocket to wipe his mouth
>"Not a problem colonel, hope to have more soon"
>"Heard about the trouble, I wish I wasn't away on holiday, I'd of spared a few men to assist."
>"Don't trouble yourself ya hear, I heard the debate went mighty fine."
>"Polls are a troublin and my son's keeping on my mind."
>The master nodded along to the man's trouble, he couldn't really understand the scope of running for senate, but someone has to do it
>"As long as we get these beastkin under control again ya got my vote."
>"That's one plus the city, and if yer making fine products like this I can't be disappointed"
>Betty was as still as she could stand as the man sampled her milk again, she stifled a moan with her paw
>"I appreciate you commin around to see the old ranch, the twenty acres made for a nice expansion"
>"Glad to sell it, my son was too attached to the old home."
>The man stared wistfully at the renovated barn in the distance
>"I just wish he would have grown out of it."
>"out of what I may ask?"
>"I did everything for that boy, then I caught him with a male slave in the barn."
>The master stared at him with a raised eyebrow
>"I may have been hard, now he practically disowned me."
>The master removed his hat to stroke his hair pondering the conundrum
>"Can't say I relate colonel, I don't have any offspring, and if I do they'd probably be half-dragon."
>Olivia puffed up her chest in pride at the thought
>"I just wish I could give him something that would show that I accept him. He is family even if he's a little off."
>Master took a look around the farm to see if the boy was somewhere in sight
>"I just happen to have the perfect specimen. Olivia, you seen the boy around?"
>Olivia answered immediately without looking, "he's four dragon lengths toward the nest."
>the master turned toward the direction, "Boy! Get over here!"
>"That's a boy?" The colonel asked skeptically
>"That's what I said, he's a bit runty, and completely useless on the farm"
>The serval stepped forward bashful, he felt like he was being eyed like meat
>"Come now son, don't be shy let me take a good look at ya."
>The colonel stroked his fur and pulled his paw away from his tiny package
>He was inspected up and down and his mouth was pried open with a thumb and index finger
>"I think my boy might like him. Reminds me a little of that pony boy ages ago."
>"He's unregistered at the moment, didn't really have a plan for him except a throw pillow for Olivia."
>"I'll have him trained, he could even pass for a female if he put on a dress."
>The serval was silent the entire time even when his balls were fondled by the man
>"I think I'll call you Chance, you like that son?"
>The serval's eyes met with the Colonel's
>"A name?"
>"Yes, you need a new name of your going to come with me, you'll be my son's pet."
>Chance was filled with questions but he felt like there was no ill intention in his words
>He looked back over to his former master who just nodded in agreement
>"Pet? So I won't be turned into bedding?"
>"Only if you attack a human or raise your voice against one."
>The small cat wiped a tear out of his eye
>The colonel smiled and patted him on the bottom toward the carriage at the side of the road
>"What a fortunate circumstance" the colonel muttered with a bright smile
>"Saves me the energy of constantly having to hover over his work."
>Now I can toss that blasted foxkin out of my house
>"Foxkin?"
>"Yes, I got her in an attempt to change my son's behavior. She's forward in what she wants."
>The man wiped some sweat on his brow, "I have fallen for her charms from time to time."
>The master chuckled, "if she doesn't eat my chickens I'll take her in exchange."
>The colonel eagerly shook his hand, "Consider it a fair deal. I'll have her packed and ready in the morning."
>Master was hopeful he didn't have to search elsewhere
>"Bakeries always have need for different milk products. I won't get as much when selling bulk, but it saves me the hassle"
>Inside, Master and Betty found shelves staked with fresh bread together with other pastries and dairy products.
>"Oscar! How's business going?"
>The baker smiled warmly
>"Can't complain, folk know to come here when they need something good."
>True enough, people kept coming in steadily, most asking for particular products. Regular customers.
>Master waited for them to clear out and met the man on the counter
>"Interested in some premium ingredients?"
>"I sense a business proposal incoming"
>"They'd be correct"
>Master snapped his fingers to summon Betty at his side to display the goods.
>"I have recently come in possession of this beastkin and she makes the most exquisite milk. I thought you'd might have some use for it"
>"You have my interest. Lets talk, but not here. You're blocking my customers. Will! Come man the counter while I talk business."
>A young man came out from the back and was promptly floored by the sight of Betty
>"Well don't just stand there. Clients are waiting."
>Oscar admonished the boy and explained
>"My apprentice. He's a good lad and shows promise so I keep him around. Now, you selling her or just the milk?"
>"Just the milk. I presume you'd like to have a sample"
>"Of course. You have always been reliable, but I need to know what I'm buying."
>Master was handed a small cup
>He took hold of Betty's teat and roused it up
>Her other nipple hardened in sympathy and started to glisten
>Master made a long squeeze and was rewarded with a strong stream of milk
>"Has she been drained today?"
>"No. Last was yesterday evening."
>Her other tit was sampled too, foaming into the cup
>She shuffled her legs together almost imperceptibly
>Faint scent of arousal reached Master's nose
>Betty filled the cup in no time
>Traces of milk trailed down her areola, disappearing into the fur on her underbreast
>The baker lifted the beaker on his lips and took a sip
>"Heavy and creamy. You have my attention."
>Another sip, more substantial this time
>"Silky constitution with hints of vanilla. You were not exaggerating, this is something special"
>Betty grew hot on the cheeks
>Master congratulated her with a pat on the rear as Oscar downed rest of his drink
>"I've heard tiger milk is often thin, but this is very versatile. I could sell it as-is or use it for excellent pastries. Perhaps turn some into cheese and butter"
>"We have a deal then?"
>"How much can you deliver?"
>"20 liters minimum, or thereabout. Twice a week"
>"You've found yourself a quite productive lady. I'll take it"
>The two men shook hands to close the deal
>Baker seemed exited about the prospect
>"This will make me known throughout the town. Everyone will covet this delicacy."
>Oscar lifted his cup
>"Would it be too presumptuous to ask you don't offer any of this nectar to my competitors?"
>"You know I can't promise you that"
>Master's answer didn't dampen his spirits
>"Well it was worth a try. How about another from you cow then, as a complimentary?"
>"Help yourself, but what if I told you she's a heifer still"
>The baker went to milk out a second cupful
>"Then I'd say this is her calling"
>"Betty here doesn't like the term cow"
>"Why on earth not? They make valuable contributions to the society"
>Master rubbed Betty's rump and reached between her thighs to stroke her pussy
>"In her mind cows are only dumb prey animals."
>"Nonsense. Why, without them many would be out of food. And I'd be out of work! You have an important job Miss"
>Betty gazed in Master's eyes as his hand roamed on her waist
>Suddenly the sensations on her breast stopped
>Oscar's cup was filled to the brim, topped with foamy milk
>"Thank you for the treat"
>"My pleasure, and hers."
>Master wished Oscar goodbye, and left him with a promise to have first delivery the week after
>They were some way from the bakery when Master complimented Betty
>"Good work"
>"Hm? What did I do?"
>"You managed to convince him, quite easily I might add."
>"But I didn't say anything?"
>"You didn't have to."
>"I... see. Sir why did you only sell some of it? I already make more than what you promised him"
>"I want some of it for myself. It's not praised for nothing"
>They walked a few blocks in silence
>"Master?"
>"Yes?"
>"Can you milk me when we get back?"
Epiloque:
>Master stopped by the slave equipment store to purchase a heavy-duty collar for Larinna.
>He opted for similar design to Betty's
>Strong leather as base to go against her scales, but had additional steel reinforcement in its core.
>Gaggle of kids were egging each other to touch the dragon resting on the street.
>One braved enough to 'sneak' on the dragon and touch her tail
>Larinna watched in amusemet when the kid bolted away right after
>Master gave her the collar and pulled it tight
>She had to feel it pressing down on her scales
>Their business concluded, Larinna was boarded and flew everyone back home.
>Night had fallen and most of the ranch had gone to rest after a full day's work
>Only a few nightguards stayed up, in case beastkin were to try something
>Larinna's shift was almost up
>Her mind was already turning to the comfort of her pen
>Olivia and Betty were sleeping soundly. Soon she could join them.
>Some lanterns illuminated key locations on the ranch, namely the areas around farmhouse itself and other entrances.
>Whenever clouds parted, ranch was bathed in the cold light of the moon
>Larinna completed her last patrol for tonight and went to hand her shift over
>Her replacement looked surprised to see her
>"I didn't hear you land"
>"Because I didn't. Haven't been in the air the whole night."
>His brows furrowed
>"Well then who did I hear flying above just a moment ago?"
>Cries of alarm sounded from the sheep pen
>"Let go of me you fiends!"
>Both guards rushed towards the voice
>Larinna soon left the farmhand behind her and was first to get eyes on the scene
>She wasn't sure what she was looking at
>It was like some four winged greature had attacked one of the men and was wrestling with him on the ground
>"Demons! H- urg!"
>The pile of flesh and limbs untangled, spreading its wings
>Sky cleared momentarily and let Larinna see more clearly
>Not one creature. Two bats.
>Farmhand laid on the ground between them, moving weakly
>Larinnas galloping shook the ground
>"Shit! Leave the human, fly!"
>Both bats hoped to escape by air
>Unfortunately for them, their pursuer also had wings
>She was also faster than them.
>Bats panicked. Prey always did
>"Split up! Into woods!"
>But it worked. Larinna could not follow them both, she had to pick one
>Just like when she was chasing the cats, the bats used their higher agility to keep clear from her claws
>When Larinna banked left to follow, her target was already going right again
>They were still flying fairly close to the ground
>Larinna opened her jaws and waited for the right moment
>When bat attempted to gain altitude, the surrounding air filled with intense heat as Larinna breathed a cone of fire on its path
>For a few moments night turned to day and beastkin screamed in fright
>It dropped down to avoid the flames
>Right where Larinna wanted it
>She closed her claws around the beast's leg and yanked backwards
>Bat reached after her fleeing companion, crying for help
>"Sister!"
>It cried in vain and Larinna clutched it against her chest
>"She's already gone. You're mine now."
>Without the element of surprise bat was not much of a threat
>Conveniently one shed had recently freed up when the serval was traded away
>She now had private accommodations, complete with shackles and whips
>Beast was lithe, and while it had well developed musculature for flight, it wasn't particularly strong
>Worst it could do to a human was a kick with its footclaws
>Farmhand she had assaulted suffered slashes from claws and bone knife
>He needed stitches and would be left with scars once they healed
>His chest developed a sizeable bruise. One of the bats had knocked the wind out of him by a well placed kick
>Atop the bat's head sat two large ears.
>Long "mane" started from between them and ended just below her shoulders
>Its chest sported modest pair of breasts, small enough to not hamper her in the air, and two additional pairs of nipples below them
>There was no extra limbs on her back. Instead the flight membrane attached directly to her arms and sides
>Small tail protruded above her rear
>Wounded farmhand paid her back by delivering a good kick on the bat's cunt
>She squirmed on the flood, crying from the pain
>"Gods!"
>"Tell us why you're here"
>"Get mounted"
>A fist on the stomach
>"Urgh!"
>"If you want to keep your wings you'll start talking"
>Larinna had been indifferent to beasts' cries of pain, but the threat made her flinch
>Bat was heaving, trying to get air back in her lungs
>"We were hired. Needed to get rid of manling. Didn't matter how."
>"This place specifically?"
>"Yes"
>Beast was chained and left. Larinna did not want to damage her new capture too badly
>Everything Larinna had belong to her Master. Therefore the bat's fate would be decided by Him.
>She hoped Master would reward her
>The bat remained chained all throughout the night
>In the early slivers of dawn the door opened
>The bat flinched her arms chained to the ceiling feet unable to even touch the ground
>"So, who would send an assassin?"
>Master's voice was stern as he entered the shed
>The bat furrowed her brow mustering a look of disgust
>"So how much were you paid? I'd like to know the current wealth of this tribe."
>she didn't awnser
>"Ya had to of been paid or were you offered something else in exchancge?"
>He trailed a finger over her exposed body, delicately tracing it on the toned stomach
>she had a fine body and she tried to pull away from his touch
>"Go to hell."
>He kept touching her moving to her four nipples
>blood swelled from the light teasing
>goosebumps prickling at the edges on her areolas
>"You won't make for a good cow, but you would make for a nice piece of flesh"
>The bad cursed in her tongue muzzle crinkled baring fangs
>master trailed his fingers back down to her pubic mound
>he touched the fatty flesh above her vagina
>she was warm and the fur was soft as velvet
>she wrenched her hips away from his touch
>chains rattled in the small room
>"Don't touch me manling!"
>The master shook his head
>"You want to know what choices you have missy?"
>he gripped the webbing that ran from her pinky claw to her hip
>he touched the membrain feeling the slight fuzz
>"Your body would make for some nice leather."
>She froze as he contnued to play with the delicate skin
>he took a step back, "Come on in girls."
>Olivia and Larinna walked into the now cramped room
>Olivia had a chain in her mouth that trailed to a cowering jaguar
>the cat's arms were bound behind her back and a thick metal collar was welded around her neck
>her black fur stuck out in every direction and she trembled at every sound the chain made
>the bat remembered Larinna and hissed a curse at her
>the dragon looked at the bat with pity
>"Dragons! Too good for the rest of us!"
>Master slapped the bat
>"Here is your option, you can either become a miserable mess like that black cat, or you can work with me and I can make your life better."
>"Go to hell skinner."
>master slapped her again and a few more times till her head went limp.
>"you have an amazing body, i'm sure my workers would enjoy ruining it like this cat."
>The bat stared at the miserable mess that was once a tribe warrior
>the jaguar trembled at the sounds of hitting and curled in a ball, tears running down her face
>Olivia dropped the chain and let it fall
>"The cat could use some company," Olivia said with a smug toothy grin, "Take some of the load off her worn out cunt and tail hole."
>The bat squeezed her thighs together out of reflex a phantom pain of her imagination shivered up her spine
>She swallowed finding some resolve, "I'd rather die."
>the master sighed wishing there was another way
>he unholstered his revolver and shoved it into the bat's mouth
>he cocked the hammer back
>"Wait!" Larinna said stamping her tail, "She can be bait."
>Master pulled the gun out of the bat's mouth
>The room smelled like urine
>"The other assassin is her sister."
>the master turned to the shivering bat
>her eyes were dilated in fear
>"So a family business."
>"Leave her out of this! Do what you will with me!"
>"Oh I will missy, you will draw out this other killer by staying nice and safe."
>"No!" the bat had a renewed energy and rattled on the chains. "Kill me!"
>She continued to rattle and cry
>Master left the room to let someone else clean their new captive
>Outside he turned to Olivia and Larinna, "Keep an eye on the barn, I'm sure her rescuer will come by and try and save her."
>"Yes master." Larinna nodded
>Olivia smirked dropping the chain again, the jaguar was too petrified to realize she was outside
>"Shame she wasn't intimidated by this mess."
>"Family bonds are stronger than their own self interest. Go ahead and get the cat cleaned, she looks like she needs a break."
>Master sat atop Larinnas back, high above the ground
>The air rushed past them and provided a pleasant relief from the day's heat
>In the distance birds lazily circled on rising thermals
>Small river flowed through the forest below them, emerging and disappearing under the canopy
>It made a wide bend through a grassy clearing, large enough for a dragon to land
>Master pulled Larinna's reins and guided her towards it
>She seemed to catch on to his intentions and decended into a glide
>Rider and mount touched down next to the rippling water
>Larinna went to quench her thirst from the stream, gulping down the refreshing liquid
>Master joined her side to splash some water on his face
>"This damn heat has continued for almost a week now. A little rain could not hurt"
>"I don't mind. It feels wonderful on my scales"
>"I don't know how you handle it. I'd think you were panting from just walking around"
>"Heat doesn't bother me. Many dragons live in areas much warmer than this."
>Larinna settled on the bank and extended a wing
>"Rest next to me Master. I'll shield you from the sun"
>"Thank you my dear"
>He laid down on the lush grass and crossed fingers under his head
>Birds resumed their concert around them, adding to the background of burbling water and buzzing insects
>"Have you ever been to the far south? To deserts and savanna?"
>"No Master, I've spent my whole life in frontier regions. While sun is wonderful, too much of it makes it lose its novelty. Maybe it's silly but that's how I feel about it."
>"I understand, I wouldn't want to live in a place like that either. Why stay close to humans? Vast swathes of this continent are still unclaimed or even unexplored by us."
>"The remote parts are claimed by older and more... savage dragons. They generally don't tolerate others for extended periods."
>"I see"
>"We are a solitary race, for the most part. Dragon's don't form large communities in the wild because the area would quickly run out of prey. Even the whelps receive no special treatment from their parents and are driven out once they're old enough to fend for themselves."
>"Sounds a bit harsh"
>Larinna sighed wistfully
>"That's how it is out there. Territories can sustain only one mated pair. We hunt, we hoard, we mate, we repeat. No innovation or great breakthroughs in society. It's awfully dull."
>"To have cities, you'd have to keep animals. Like humans did."
>"Exactly. Or have vast territories. Too vast to patrol when someone could steal your hoard meanwhile."
>"Did you ever had your own? Territory or hoard?"
>"I had a territory for a while, yes, nothing big but it was something. Never started a hoard."
>"Why not?"
>"It makes you a target, even more so. To humans looking to steal it and kill you. We're no longer the big scary monsters we once were to you."
>"Human history has records of dragons razing entire villages and killing small armies. You're still a force to be reckoned with."
>She smiled at that
>"Thank you Master. We think ourselves the apex predators wherever we go, but the truth is humans have catched up. Wild dragons have moved on to raiding the beast tribes who are not as advanced. You now carry weapons that can pierce through most of our scales and have turned the situation around. Still, some choose to build a hoard as it's tradition."
>Master stared at Larinnas wing above him. Even the tiniest blood vessels were visible in the bright sunlight gleaming through
>"I've heard hunters go after dragons for their scales and other body parts alone. Some humans believe those have unique medicinal properties."
>Grass swayed as Larinna snorted in response
>"That's just great. Get hunted down only because someone thinks you'd make a good potion. I had to fend off two different groups of humans who stuck around even when they learned I had no treasure to take. None of them made it away alive."
>Bumblebee whizzed past Larinna's head, dodging her at the last moment
>"There was another reason I never built a hoard. I did not want that kind of life. After the second attack, I abandoned my nest and avoided everything to not make myself a target. But I couldn't keep myself doing that either. I wanted to see and learn. And humans are the most interesting creatures to observe."
>"I imagine compared to the empty forest human settlements must look like anthives to you"
>Larinna laughed at that. It was a rumbling sound coming deep from her chest and shook her whole frame.
>"That's exactly how they look from the air. I put myself at great risk by getting close but it turns out that closer to villages you get, less hunters you meet."
>"Nobody expects the enemy to be on your own back yard"
>"Mhm. I also discovered I was far from only dragon to choose life with your kind. One dragoness told me humans keep dragons as priced slaves and pets. At first I questioned why would any free dragon choose such a life, but more she explained, I began to wonder. I could watch human towns and your lives from close up and not have to avoid you in fear of being ambushed. I could have companionship and someone to converse with"
>"What did she say to make you even consider it?"
>"She was owned by some well off merchant family. Allowed much the same privileges than you do to me. Time to stretch her wings, not worked to the bone and reqular sexual relief"
>It was Master's turn to chuckle at that
>"Never new you considered getting fucked a privilege"
>"Don't laugh. She described all the 'degenerate' things her master made her do. That only made me more interested. To me the acts sounded almost... delectable."
>Her head curled under her wing, looking Master in the eye
>"I don't deny I'm very eager for sex and enjoy it. Many dragons do. So your attention is most welcome, Master"
>Larinna wedged her head between his legs, sniffing.
>"She described how her jaws were forced open and human mounted her several times. Every time he got close he'd come around to shoot his seed all over her tongue. She had to keep it all in her maw for the rest of the day before given a permission to swallow."
>Master's trousers had grown tight and tented up. Larinna nudged it with her snout
>"From that moment I wanted to learn more about your 'deviant' mating habits. She also teached me about what you call 'blowjobs'."
>"You're a real slut for a dragon"
>"Only for you, Master"
>She pressed her nose against his balls and inhaled deeply. If Master didn't have his trousers on, he would have feared his testicles end up in her nostril.
>Larinna licked his crotch. "Off"
>"You think to give me an order?", he teased
>"Wouldn't dream of it. Let me rephrase. Can you please remove your pants so I may take your cock in my mouth, Master?"
>If the twitch was anything to go by, Larinna already knew her answer
>"I can, and you may"
>Master slid trousers down to his ankles
>Larinna carefully dragged them off rest of the way
>His large member was completely erect and Larinna licked her chops, sizing up her target
>"I'm lucky to have a Master so gifted"
>"Flatterer. Less talking, more licking."
>"Yes Sir"
>She placed a long slow lick from all the way from his scrotum to the tip of his cock
>Her tongue returned to his balls. It reverently rolled them around, not leaving a single spot untended
>"These are so interesting. I can actually hold something that's responsible for all that delicious seed"
>Master's cock bobbed against her nose while she serviced his testicles
>Precum had wetted her scales, marking her with his scent
>Larinna loved the smell. She could keep doing this the whole day if not something even better
>His taste. She licked his glands, clearing out all the fluid that had collected on it
>Larinna carefully coiled her tongue around his member and drew it in her mouth
>Mindful of her teeth, she closed her lips around it and suckled gently
>"Hells. Have you been practicing in secret?"
>Corners of her mouth curled upwards and Larinna doubled her efforts
>Master relaxed to her ministrations and she purred in happiness
>The dragon engulfed him effortlessly and continued to tend him without interruptions
>She did not have to come up for breath
>She didn't even have to move her head to give Master a full blowjob
>Larinna could simply pump her tongue up and down on his shaft
>She kept an eye on her master to see where to squeeze or lick to cause him the most pleasure
>Suddenly master told her to stop and pushed her head away
>"What is it? Did I do something wrong?"
>"No my dear you were wonderful, but if you keep doing that I can't hold on for much longer"
>"Isn't that the point?"
>"I want to try something else. Sometimes you want to draw out the pleasure"
>"Oh. All right then."
>Master stroked her wing membrane and she shuddered
>"Sensitive?"
>"It has to be. I'll have you know that stroking a dragon's wings can be considered a sensual act."
>He had no intention to stop. Larinna's tail begun to rise
>"If you don't tell me what to do soon, I'm not responsible for my actions"
>"Lets get in shade first."
>When they were shielded from the scorching mid day sun, Master told Larinna to present herself
>She pressed her chest to ground and hiked her tail up
>The image of a submissive dragoness
>Master gathered some of her lubricant on his palm and spread it around her asshole
>It twitched in response every time he moved a finger over the opening
>Larinna turned to look behind her
>"Mmm. Is my cunt not good enough for you Master?"
>He slapped her tailhole. Larinna jerked forward and clenched.
>"Eyes front slut"
>"Yes Sir!"
>She turned to stare directly forward and master saw her ass relax again
>He gathered more lubricant, abundantly available now, and pushed some of it inside her
>"I think you're ready"
>"If you say so Master"
>He pulled her hips down to a more comfortable height
>That put her practically flat on the ground yet still too high
>"This isn't working. Roll over"
>Larinna was quick to obey
>He pushed two fingers from both hands in her and stretched her open
>"Beautiful"
>Master let her close up and rubbed his dick over her pulsing orifice
>"When I push myself in, I want to feel a tight hole squeezing me all the way to the base. Got it?"
>"Master?"
>"Yes?"
>"May I watch?"
>Larinna was still looking away, like she was told to
>"You may"
>Permission given, she brought her face as close as she could
>Master pushed in and Larinna watched as her ass was slowly spread open
>He groaned as he sank her hot, tight depths
>"Oh yes. This one is much tighter than your cunt. Very good."
>"Please enjoy it as much as you like Master"
>He pulled out completely to feel that bliss all over again
>Larinna puckered against him and when he popped in, squeezed like a vice
>Master gave it his all and slammed against her
>It was Larinna's turn to gasp
>Her leg twitched as she was mounted in the most unnatural way to a dragoness
>She was in heaven
>Every time Master slammed home she let out small growls of pleasure
>He was already close due to her oral attention earlier, but tried to draw it out as long as he could
>Master was fighting a losing battle though. Feeling the strong dragon writhing under him only served to excite him more
>To his surprise, Larinna spoke first
>"Master, I think I'm close..."
>"Coming from just your tailhole? What a lewd beast"
>Her pussy laid forgotten in front of him. He hadn't even touched it since they started
>Normally it was only a small slit against her scales but now those scales were raised up by her puffed up lips
>He was tempted to touch it and feel how heated it was, but wanted to see if Larinna could truly reach her peak without it
>"Keep going Master. Almost there..."
>"I don't know if I can. This is too much."
>"Please cum inside. I want to feel you fill me up"
>Master growled and gave a few quick jabs before hilting completely in her ass
>Feeling him release deep within her was enough to drive Larinna over the edge
>Both her holes pulsed and femcum jetted out from her cunt
>Master collapsed on Larinna, savoring the feeling of her tailhole milking him out
>They laid together for a long time, basking in the afterglow
>"That was intense. I didn't know you enjoyed anal that much"
>"Neither did I, Master. I mean, it feels good but never like this before."
>"That was the best orgasm I've had in a while"
>"Mmm, you gave me so much too"
>Master pulled out and Larinna cleaned the worst of their fluids off him
>He proceeded to wash himself in the stream while Larinna licked herself clean
>They were resting on the grass again, waiting for Master to get dry after his dip in the water
>"Master? Did you mean it earlier. When you called me dear?"
>"Why do you ask?"
>"Do you see me as someone worth your attention, more than sexually?"
>"Absolutely. I value your company. Your curiosity and enthusiasm you take into things is endearing. You're also a fine specimen of a dragon. Very breedable."
>"You mean those things?"
>"On my honor"
>She gently rubbed against him
>"Thank you Master."
>Before she had time to pull her head away, he kissed Larinna on the side of her snout
>"What was that for?"
>"For you not to worry. Me and Olivia love to have you with us"
>She bowled her head to him and knocked Master down
>"Oof. What are y-"
>Larinna rubbed her face all over him in happiness
>"Alright, alright. I get it", Master laughed
>"Thank you, for everything"
>Master picked up his trousers
>"You're welcome my dear."
>Larinna laid down and positioned her front leg to help Master saddle up
>"Ready to head home"
>"Lets go. You know the way"
>Dirt was kicked up along the main dirt road
>Farm hands stopped their activities to check out the new guest
>Larinna was stuck in the center of the field as she was still strapped to equipment
>"Hey! Don't leave me here, I wanna see!"
>They ignored her
>It was the colonel's carriage
>fancy as the day is hot and long
>A woman exited the carriage carrying an umbrella hiding her head from the morning sun
>the dress she wore was frilly, large, and made each sway of her ass a motion that caused the men to clench their hearts and crotch
>her shadowed silhouette in the dust made her appear to be a perfect woman
>She flowed through the dusty road as a man exited dropping three bags next to her
>a man jumped the wooden fence ready to assist the woman with those said bags
>this turned into a race with a few young men wanting to get a closer look
>the dust didn't even get a chance to settle as the men got to her
>the winner sneered at the losers behind him
>"Howdy ma'am let me help ya with these bags."
>"Now don't worry yerself about any of that, I'm more than capable of carrin' my belongings."
>Her voice purred with a silk that was beyond human
>the man shook his head insisting
>"I won't be havin' none of that."
>He heaved the bags in his arms and got close enough to the fancy woman
>shaded by the ubrella was bright orange furred fox
>eyes were shadowed with powdered make-up and her eyelashes were curled in the most seductive blink
>around her neck was a black leather collar and a beautiful golden tag that reflected like a star
>He froze unsure of what to do
>she was absolutely beautiful but she was also property, the master's property
>"Somethin' wrong mister?"
>"I- I-"
>she pressed one of her gloved claws to her mouth and giggled
>"Dontcha worry about it sweetie. I won't tell if you won't."
>She walked down the road to the master's house her ass contained in the gorgeous dress
>the other employees were stunned to silence when they saw that she was a beastkin
>She smelled like perfume which was the sweetest smelling thing on the entire property
>even the dragons who regularly get clean and maintain themselves with hop oil, reeked of sulfur when they opened their mouths
>the farm hand set the baggage next to the door
>he was half tempted to open it for the woman but realized it might look silly for a human to open it to a beastkin
>"Thank you mister, I believe I got things from here."
>"Y-yes ma'am"
>he shook off his conflicting feeling and went to return to work, only with tighter pants
>the vixen knocked on the door
>only two knocks in the master swung the door open
>he was taken aback by the sight of the creature on his porch
>a beastkin dolled up more than the fanciest burlesque house
>"Yer a little more dressed than I imagined."
>She smiled sweetly careful to not show teeth, as it's impolite for a lady
>"Pleasure to meet you master. My name is Autumn as due to my fur colors, but as is the custom you may call me whatever your heart desires."
>he squinted at her for a moment wondering what the hell he could use her for other than a bed companion
>but she was trained by the colonel who understood the value of hard work and cast those first glances aside, book covers and judgement and all that fancy philosophies
>she put the shade umbrella away and he got a nice look of her silky fur in the morning sun
>whites as pure snow and oranges like bon fire embers
>but this was the colonel's slave
>"Well I think you deserve a more, unique name. Elaine."
>He reached up and removed the golden tag with her former name on it
>"A human name master?"
>"From what I understand your not as you appear."
>he brushed her arm pushing up the delecate silk dress
>her arms had tone to them, hidden under her fur coat
>"you've worked before."
>he then pulled off her white glove and revealed her feminine paws
>he revealed a claw
>"Dull, a sign that you regularly use them."
>the vixen smiled, her piercing orange eyes were slots of black
>"My former master had me trained in many things. I'm not only a house pet, but i am a bodyguard."
>The master smirked knowing something was off.
>"That explains the eye scar you packed with make up."
>The vixen covered her eye, almost like a woman who had been caught in her britches
>"Don't worry missy, flaws just makes us what we are."
>the vixen was flush, she proceeded to rummage through one of her bags to give her new master her paperwork and licenses
>there were over a dozen forms
>slavery certificate for committing armed robbery
>trained fire arm certificates accompanied with beastkin licenses
>there was even a license to allow her to purchase herself out of slavery
>"You're a confusing little doll."
>She smiled once again, "My former masters have given me a diverse life."
>Master then stared at the baggage
>"let's step in from the heat and sort out yer belongings"
>She heaved the large bags and carried them inside
>the master's home was quite well furnished and decorated
>war trophies, medals, and hunting trophies
>hand carved furniture with leather padding most likely done by his own hand.
>dust bounced light rays around the large fancy lounge
>"normally beastkin aren't allowed inside. don't grow getting used to seein' this place."
>"I understand master."
>"In fact let me take a look at you, take all that gussied up clothing off."
>She nodded and slipped off her other glove setting it down on the clean floor
>her hat followed letting her black tipped pointed ears rotate freely
>reaching back she unknotted the corset that bound her chest adding her already perfect hourglass figure
>she let out a sigh of pleasure when the pressure was released
>the extra fabric was dropped and she unbuttoned her blouse
>each button revealed more of her white and orange frame
>she folded it nicely next to her clothes as her new master watched
>her heart was racing but she never stopped smiling
>she covered her maw to stifle a slight gekkering giggle
>Elaine's long flowing dress fell to the floor freeing her extreamly large tail that gave the illussion of a large ass
>silk undergarments hugged her taut furry ass and stockings gave her ditigrade legs the illusion snow white skin
>on her right ankle was a derringer and a holster
>on her left thigh was a hunting knife
>she unclasped the weapons and set them with the rest of the belongings
>she rolled her stockings down letting her fur free
>her silky twig like legs were begging to be spread open by a strong man
>the strip tease turned on the master as his pants were near to pop
>Elaine's tail swayed gently to and fro like a bitch in heat
>she then moved up to her brazier that cupped her fluffy chest
>her nipples were already erect on her white chest
>the vixen's breath was heavy, excited at being eyed in such a state
>she glanced up at her new master to gauge his opinion
>she wasn't disappointed as eyes flicked to his bulge
>Her clitoris throbbed inside her knickers
>her claws went to her waist band and slipped off the last remaining clothing
>she was now completely bare to her new owner
>Her pubic mound was shaved down letting her slit be seen properly from the front
>her clitoral hood was already glisening from having stripped down
>the master squinted at his new property
>"turn around let me see your back."
>she hesitated for a breif second and slowly made her rear face him.
>she flagged her tail to give him a look at her rump
>her perfect ass gave way to a perfect diamond thigh window that gleamed from moisture from her slit
>"No, Elaine. I want to see your back."
>she swallowed and lowered her tail
>large swatches of fur was missing revealing pink and red scar tissues
>"Did the colonel do this to you?"
>"No master. Punishment by previous owners."
>he reached up and touched the scars reminded of Olivia
>"I don't think you will be getting any of that treatment here. As long as you do what yer told."
>"I'm obedient"
>master touched the scars gently
>they felt like an old treasure maps
>a deep suck of air passed through her teeth as the man petted her
>he let the fur glide through his fingers letting them fall naturally
>"Lean on the sofa missy."
>she naturally strode right to where was comfortable and pressed her body over the back of the furniture
>She hiked her ass up and tail letting her glistening vulva do the talking
>there was the clicking of a belt from behind and a firm grip around her shoulder
>the strong hand pressed her
>she let out a whimpering high pitch cry turning her head with pleading eyes for him to continue
>her lips were parted with a massive erection
>her flood gates were opened as her lining was stretched wide
>Her anckes were pulled off the ground with each hard thrust
>"Yes!"
>long squeaking cries joined the slapping of his nut sack on her clit
>he pulled back hearing the squelch of her tight pussy
>"damn girl, have you ever been used?"
>she spoke with a tongue lolling out
>Her eyes were just dilated saucers
>Elain sucked in a chest of air ready to give an awnser
>"MmmAAAaaaaaaa!"
>she turned to face away letting the man fuck her raw
>her toes curled and a shocking orgasm shattered her mind
>"Aa! Aa! Aa!"
>she screamed out as the thrusts increased
>the man was struggling with the massive amount of resistant her throbbing cunt was giving
>he was being sucked with every pull back
>Elaine's cunt was begging to be filled
>he grunted and smashed forward yanking her tail with one of his hands
>her tunnel was now being filled with his hot semen
>she arched her back to press her fuzzy body to his still clothed chest
>a completely trembling and panting mess
>when the final thick rope of cum left his body he pulled away letting it pool out of her wet slit
>She collapsed over the back of the sofa
>Elaine tried to catch her breath on shaking legs
>"Thank you. Master."
>"You're my property, I will do with you as I see fit."
>she nodded smiling brightly
>a claw dipped into her cunt to scoop some extra semen from dripping to the floor
>she then licked the digit clean savoring the flavor
>the master fastened his belt back on though the sight of the vixen made him want to use her again even though he just finished
>"I should probably be showing you the barn where you'll be staying."
>she composed herself quickly, though the high never left her face
>"Yes master. Will I be needing clothes?"
>"I haven't decided, your unique skills may require you to carry firearms."
>she went over to a bag to pull out something
>"Thank you master. I really despise the extra layers required for city living."
>the master chuckled gleaning over the objects she was pulling out
>twelve gauge, a musket with bayonet, and large boxes of ammunition
>the danty looking vixen was armed to the teeth with weaponry
>she then pulled out a small harness
>"Might I demonstrate a more pleasing article of clothing master?"
>he was intrigued, "Proceed."
>she continued to rummage through her belongings pulling out a few articles of clothing.
>"I was told that i wouldn't be allowed to hide my femininity out in these parts. My previous master wanted me to demonstrate to the young master the beauty of my body."
>she set the new pile of clothing next to her old garbs
>"Unfortunately the young man never took my body for it's intended purpose, leaving me an awfully weak mess."
>"That explains quite a bit."
>"It was rough, and the human females in my previous master's company disliked my choice of equipment."
>she started to put some of the garments on starting with crotchless chaps
>"I was forced to take quite a bit of tutoring on ladylike behavior."
>She then put on another corset but it lifted her chest up and out cupping her underboobs
>A final lace of her foxkin shoes to keep her danty paws protected she tied her short hair into a pony tail
>"How is this outfit master?"
>the man couldn't help it but bend over the sofa again for round two.
>"John stop groping Betty, you're wasting her milk. At least get a cup or something."
>Master stood on a pallet with near a dozen workers gathered around him.
>"Alright, listen up! As you may have heard, we have another beastkin joining us. Elaine came to us in trade for the cat boy."
>He told the fox to step up on the pallet
>She stole everyone's attention with her attire. Corset lifted her boobs on display and panties were more to accentuate her hips than to cover anything.
>She did a small curtsy and introduced herself >"Greetings. I'm Master's latest acquisition, named Elaine. Pleased to make your acquaintance. I'm obedient and schooled in multiple subjects. I hope I can be of more use here than I was to my previous owner."
>She twirled around to let everyone have a good look on her and smiled at the looks she got.
>"I need a place for her to stay", Master continued. "I can't just put her in the henhouse."
>That got a couple of weak chuckles from the crowd.
>"In addition to a place for the domesticated, we need a dedicated building to keep captured beastkin in. Holding cells of sorts. This is to prepare for hunts and raids on the wild lands. It's time to strike back."
>The men started to murmur among themselves
>"You've seen beast activity has increased and some of you have lost friends to them. Expeditions to the wild lands will be dangerous affair and participation is voluntary and on your own risk. Every man or woman who bags himself a beastkin is free to keep it, if he wants to take the responsibility."
>"Whadda ya mean by that?"
>"If it attacks anyone, that's on their would be master. It's up to you if you want to dedicate the effort for training and breaking them. Any training is to be done on your free time."
>"So what we be doing then?", one man asked.
>"We'll build a new bunkhouse and a prison. Fell down some trees and turn them into planks and boards. Larinna will help you when she gets back from town. I sent her to shop for slave gear and other materials we need. Olivia will sit this one out, her wounds are acting up."
>Betty raised her hand to get Master's attention
>"Why am I here?"
>"You will help either the construction team or the logging team. You're strong and I belive you'd rather do something than just wander aimlessly."
>She nodded in confirmation. "Can I bind my chest?"
>"If you find someone to milk you first."
>The man next to her opened his mouth
>Master already knew what he was about to say and interrupted "No John you're going logging."
>"Aw"
>"Master, can you do it?"
>"Not this time, I'll be busy elsewhere. Next time, I promise. Any other questions?"
>"How large we'll make 'em?"
>"Large enough."
>No other questions were made and they got to work.
>It wouldn't be built in a day, but it had to be done if they wanted to get anything more than pelts out of the beastkin.
>Elaine was strolled out of the house
>messy hair and a bit of a hitch in her step
>she patted her fiery hair down and waved at the farm hands doing work
>they stopped everything to gaze at the essentric beauty of the vixen
>her sizable exposed chest
>the heartshaped cutout of her crotch revealing her slit
>She turned around to open the door for the master
>her fluffy tail wagged happily like a dog letting everyone get a view of her plush ass
>they whispered amongst themselves until the master stepped out
>"Get back to work the lot of ya!"
>then the master handed her a holster belt with a revolver
>"Don't forget this. I'm gonna have you help Olivia and Larinna with night patrol when you adjust."
>Elaine let the belt fall gently around her slim waist
>"More servants?"
>"In a way yes. Treat them with respect. I hold them in higher regard than even my workers."
>the master grumbled
>"Put a bullet in a man's head if harms em'"
>Elaine tilted her head in confusion
>"Come. Let's introduce you to the rest of the farm."
>She followed behind him, looking around at the territory
>much more spacious and open than the cluster of fancy architecture the colonel had on his homestead
>He pointed to the forest on the horizon
>"that's where our troubles are commin' from. beastkin tribe set up in the wilds."
>he then pointed to the red barn in the distance
>"That's where Olivia and Larinna are at. You'll be staying with them until we get some more places built up."
>"You don't have to worry about little ol' me master. I'm quite comfortable with whatever amenities you give."
>"Tell that to the dragons, they don't exactly like sharing."
>"Dragons?!"
>Her eyes lit up and started to look around left and right to see if there were any around
>the master raised an eyebrow to the reaction
>"Don't see many women excited about such a thing. Young boys, sure. But not a..."
>she smiled coyly, "Beautiful lady?"
>He nodded, there was no denying anyone that she was stunning
>She suddenly took the lead toward the barn
>Her tail jittered back and forth
>The master chuckled at her impatience
>"Calm down missy, we'll get to it."
>He trudged along with her constantly running a few feet ahead and then looking back at him like an excited puppy
>when they arrived to the large barn her nose was in the air
>she closed her eyes tightly as she followed the delicate scent trails on the wind
>she let out a delicate sigh and then stared longingly at her master for him to open the door
>"Just make sure you don't hurt Olivia's sensibilities and don't teach Larinna anything she aught not to know. She's quite naive and gullible."
>Elaine eagerly nodded her head and trembled jiggling her fluffy orbs in the corset
>the door was slid open
>A pillar of light lead the way through the straw floor to a large fluffy bed in the center of the barn
>a large scaly tail shifted over the fur disturbed by the light
>"Mmmaster?"
>Olivia's voice muttered slowly peering a ruby eye at the opening
>"It's just me, I've a new aquisition, Elaine."
>He showed the vixen inside and pointed to the dragon.
>"This is Olivia, she's very special and one of my prized companions."
>Elaine's mouth was on the floor she wanted to rush forward and touch and feel the dragon but resisted the urge by locking her knees
>"H-Hello, Olivia."
>The door was shut allowing the dragon to see clearly
>A lizard tongue flicked out and tasted the air
>"Hello Elaine, I can smell master had already parted you."
>Olivia got up and stretched liked a cat ass high in the air
>Her broken left wing was like a dead tree silhouette of black broken branches with little webbing between the unusually long digits.
>Elaine's heart sank as her eyes adjust to take in more of the beautiful dragon
>"I-I am just doing my duty ma'am."
>"Ma'am?"
>The dragon hissed and stepped closer taking another wiff of the vixen
>"Yes..."
>Olivia then turned her muzzle to her master and kissed him on the lips
>He reciprocated letting his tongue touch hers
>Elaine watched in complete awe at the sight
>when the master parted he motioned back toward the bed
>"You should rest dear, where is Larinna?"
>"Larinna is washing by the creek, she should be back soon."
>Master turned his attention to Elaine
>"You should get some sleep now as well, You'll be up all night with the two girls."
>The vixen nodded, "Yes master."
>"Good I'll let you two get to know each other while i go find Larinna."
>the door opened and closed quickly
>Olivia turned her attention to the vixen and eyed her up and down
>"What's with this ma'am stuff, your a slave too."
>"Sorry ma'am- I mean Olivia. I don't mean no harm in it."
>the dragon chuffed out laughter and then made her way back to her scented bed
>Elaine followed the dragoness, a million questions buzzing through her mind
>The dragon stopped and stared curiously at the beastkin
>"You're not afraid are you."
>"No, i'm actually a little bit of everything, shocked, amazed, curious, turned on, excited."
>Olivia looked the fox over again and noticed the gun on her hip, it was the first time she seen a beastkin with a weapon that wasn't a dead one
>"Master give you that?"
>Elaine looked around herself unsure what the dragon was talking about
>"the weapon."
>"Oh." she unholstered the weapon and spun it in a digit and then holstered it, "Yes. I'm quite capable of hitting a sparrow at 70 yards."
>the dragon's disinterest with the new addition ebbed
>"Well i'm quite awake now, would you care to tell me about yourself?"
>the fox was giddy with enjoyment and took a seat letting her legs rest on her side like a proper lady
>She told her the story of her time with her previous master, how she was trained and how she ended up on the farm
>the dragon's interest grew
>"What did you do before the colonel."
>"I was squired by some outlaws as a kit."
>She nervously brushed her fur uncomfortable with the story
>"They did horrible things to me and made me do worse."
>The dragoness nodded
>"Well, you won't be doing much worse than protecting master's property. Yourself included."
>The vixen stood and dusted herself off
>"Thank you Olivia, how about you? Might I ask how you came into master's posession?"
>The dragon smiled a story that she told many times
>"Master must have been 17 at the time."
>she closed her eyes remembering it as if it were yesterday
>"My territory stretched far. I didn't get involved with humans until I fought some poachers hunting some of my bears."
>Elaine leaned in closer eager to hear more
>"they stopped their hunt and turned their attention to me. I shot a few times, but those scars have long since healed."
>She scratched ad her shoulder with a claw displacing some shedding scales
>"They would have killed me if a bullet didn't fly through the leader's skull. Master rode through hunting the poachers that killed his herd of goats."
>She chuckled warmly, "He was so focused on getting even he didn't even notice a cowering dragon corned between a cliff face."
>"Sounds nice. what did he do then?"
>"He put away his gun and stared me down. must have some dragon blood in him because I couldn't help but submit. We dragons respect power and he stared me down like I was his."
>"Wow, so you been with him a really long time?"
>"Yes. before we even acquired this property. Now this is our territory and I'd follow him even if he needs me for just my scales and blood."
>"I don't believe he'd do anythin' like that. He holds you higher than anyone on this farm and when you kissed him I saw true love."
>The dragoness crooned pleased to hear such a tale
>"Thank you dear. I really needed to hear that. So why are you not afraid of dragons?"
>"I love your scales, The way your body moves, the strong muscles. The freedom of win-"
>She cut herself off and swallowed trying not to make an ass out of herself
>Olivia opened her broken wing up and mournfully looked up at the digits
>"A mess. a few months back I had an accident. Hunters known as the drake riders shot me with dragonshot. I fell into the forest and lost my wings."
>"If there is anything I can do please let me know, I am as much your servant as masters."
>Elaine's tail patted behind her eager to serve the dragoness like a desperate kobold
>"Could you apply more ointment dear, I know master loves to apply it but he's been quite overworking himself with the expansions."
>"Of course. I'd be happy to help."
>She ran over to a worktable where various tools were located
>She saw a few glass jars of white cream
>Next to the cream was a load of dragon harnesses and other stuff
>Her attention was then drawn to a very large butt plug next to thick riding crops
>The scent of dragon must wafted from the equipment
>she shook off her lust and rushed to complete the task given
>returning to the dragon she uncorked the bottles
>"I've returned Olivia."
>"Good girl."
>Olivia rolled over to the side and allowed vixen access to the side that ached her.
>She diligently poured the contents onto the scaleless skin
>Elaine rubbed her pads over every nook she could
>She felt wetness between her legs as the heat of the dragon transferred to her
>"That feels great Elaine."
>Olivia relaxed and shifted more to her back
>Elaine tried to cling on her side but ultimately fell to the cushioned hay
>With a heavy yawn Olivia started to snore.
>Her body was rested happily on her back with the bedding caressing her body
>He tail draped out into the main pathway with her legs splayed
>Elaine couldn't help but admire the beautiful wyrm
>she reached up to touch her claws but stopped herself from interrupting her sleep
>as she cleaned up and put things away she glanced back at the resting dragon
>she swallowed at the sight of the spread haunches
>She crawled closer to Olivia's hips and brought her face only a hand width away from dragon's pussy
>So close! Elaine wanted to touch it so badly but did not dare to disturb the dragon
>She drew in a long breath, committing Olivia's strong scent into her memory
>Elaine did not even think to overstep her bounds and lay a hand on Olivia without permission
>The fox couldn't even touch herself. She had forgotten to ask permission for that from Master
>She had to be content with just admiring the dragon's form
>Or wait for the second one to come in
>Being so close to one dragon was already exquisite, but Master had two!
>And she'd be living here, on this ranch, with them.
>She wanted to squeal from joy
>Elaine let the dragon rest and went through the other pens
>One opposite to Olivia had large bedding area and some big gouges on the wood. Must be the other dragoness' housing
>The straws on the floor were fresh and the pen was clean, but strong scent of arousal lingered
>Master must be really intimate with both of the dragons
>Both stalls next to dragon's were empty. No one seemed to live there
>One was full of miscellaneous knick-knacks piled around.
>Elaine could see some blankets mixed in there, she should ask Master if she could use some of them
>There was one pen that had much smaller sleeping area.
>A pile of hay covered with quilt was placed on one side. Next to the other wall was a table with a strange hole in it. A small stool with a brush in the corner.
>She thought it was quite well furnished
>Footsteps sounded from the outside
>Elaine went to welcome her master back but instead she was met with a strange felidae
>"Who are you?" "Who are you?", both asked at the same time
>Elaine reached to her revolver
>The cat ducked away from her sight and yelled. "Betty, now who the fuck are you?"
>"Master's new bitch, Elaine"
>"Why the hells you have a gun?"
>Betty had seen Olivia's tail resting listlessly on the aisle. "Olivia? Are you alright?"
>Hearing Betty call Olivia by name Elaine let go of the gun
>"Ssh. She's sleeping. I'm coming out now, alright? I'm a slave, not a wild beastkin"
>"Slowly."
>Elaine walked out, arms front to avoid provoking the cat
>Holy shit that's a huge tiger
>Holy shit those had to be largest tits she had ever seen
>Elaine had to tilt her head back to look Betty in the eyes
>Olivia had woken up from all the commotion
>"Oh, Betty. I see you have met Elaine"
>"Why does she have a gun?"
>"Apparently Master gave her one"
>They sat down in Betty's stall and Elaine gave a formal introduction and a brief history about her training
>That seemed to calm down the amazonian feline
>"So Betty, what do you do around here?"
>"Milk, and menial labor."
>Elaine only tilted her head at that
>"I make milk. Like a cow"
>"Wow. Lucky girl. I'd love to have my tits receive that much attention"
>"Getting milked does feel good. Master has skilled hands"
>"Tell me more"
>Betty explained her experiences and history
>Elaine hopped down from the table where she had been sitting
>"I'm told I was sleeping here until the new lodgings were ready. I'll settle in the stall next to you if you don't mind"
>"Not at all"
>Betty helped Elaine to fetch some straws and piled them up as Elaine's bed in the next stall
>As they worked Betty told the newcomer how Master was firm and demanded discipline, but fair and did not punish his slaves on a whim
>Elaine tested her bed out just when Master arrived with another dragon in tow
>She jumped up and curtsied. "Welcome back Master"
>Leather bands on Elaine's wrists clinked together when she crossed hands behind her back and pushed her chest forward
>She was little weirded out when Betty made no move to acknowledge the presence of her Master
>Do they have no basic decency?
>She accounted it for her being a first generation domesticated. She'd have to educate her on basic slave etiquette. She was on the edge of the settled world but some basic manners wouldn't go amiss.
>She refocused when Master addressed her. "Elane, this is Larinna. You are to treat her with same respect as you would me or Olivia."
>Her tail had started swishing again. "Of course, Master"
>"Betty did you finish with the fertilizer?"
>"I did"
>"Good, go help the workers to unload the cement"
>He left with Betty, leaving Elaine and Larinna to handle the rest of the introductions
>"Is something wrong?", Larinna asked
>Elaine realized she had been staring the dragon, "N- no ma'am, Larinna. You're looking immaculate"
>Larinna went to settle in her pen. Elaine tracked her movements.
>The rippling neck. Bone-white claws. Folded wings. Swaying hips and tail flowing from it. Under it-
>Larinna's hindquarters disappeared from her view but she heard the dragon ask. "Ma'am? That's a first. Where did Master find you?"
>"I was traded to the feminine male. He was more desirable to my previous owner. Or to his son, to be exact"
>Elaine moved to see the dragon again who now laid on her side.
>It was rude to stare, but she couldn't help but to let her eyes roam on her form
>Now she could see the scaly underside. Her eyes stopped between Larinna's back legs
>Her slit was flush against the scales, Elaine couldn't see any pink from there.
>Dragon's pucker showed signs of training. Elaine guessed the plug from earlier belonged to her.
>"I have an idea how Master feels when I look at him now", Larinna mused
>"Pardon. Ḯ've- I've dreamed long for this kind of moment and now I'm living with not just one, but two dragons"
>"This is to be your nest?" She didn't sound too happy about that and Elaine rushed to appease
>"Only temporarily. Until the slave lodgings are completed"
>"Oh good"
>"Is there anything I can do for you Mi- Larinna?"
>"Maybe... maybe a massage?", Elaine suggested
>Larinna perked up
>"Massage? What is that?"
>She didn't know? "I'd be honored to show you. May I?"
>At the dragon's permission, Elaine scrambled to Larinna's side
>"You're so big that I can't go through your whole body, so I'll only do your legs. If that is fine."
>"Yes. Now show me."
>Larinna watched intently as the fox's eears turned forward and she laid paws on her thighs
>Elaine's furry tail wagged. The dragon held her undivided attention
>She pressed the scaly hide. Then with more force.
>Elaine had to put her shoulders to it to get enough pressure
>She started from just above Larinna's knee, rolling her palm and knuckles, pressing on her muscles
>She had trouble keeping her eyes focused on her work, eyes wandering upwards between the dragon's legs
>Elaine kept working on her for several minutes but Larinna was losing her interest
>"This doesn't feel anything special, and master already does this to me sometimes."
>Elaine's ears wilted. "Maybe your scales don't really work with this. Can.. can I move between your legs?"
>"You want to touch my pussy? Why?"
>"It's more sensitive."
>"Hmm. Go on"
>"Thank you Ma'am!"
>Elaine's tail went crazy
>It brushed straws aside and made a clear spot on the floor. Some stuck on her fur
>Finally it was happening!
>She kneeled next to Larinna's haunches and reverently laid her hands on the sides of her genitals
>Elaine pressed the sides down and against eachother, then pulled them apart and revealed Larinna's inner walls
>Pink, like she was expecting
>Elaine kept repeating the movements, rubbing Larinna's lips but never placing a finger inside
>Larinna relaxed on the floor. "Mmm. This is much better"
>"Glad to be of service." She answered, smiling. "Does Master do this too?"
>"Sometimes"
>Dragon's lips had swollen up which made Elaine's task easier
>She pressed and pulled and rubbed, making her fantasies come true
>Elaine briefly stroked Larinna's protruding asshole
>"You like to be used here?"
>"I do, but that is only for Master"
>Elaine got the hint and returned her attention on Larinna's pussy
>Larinna's clit had exposed itself, bright red nub between her folds
>Elaine dared to make one more request. "Can I use my mouth on you?"
>She was given a go-ahead and gingerly brought her head down
>Strong earthy smell filled her nose when she poked Larinna's clit with her snout
>Elaine slowly opened her mouth and extended her tongue
>She wanted to savour this and commit the moment in memory
>Lick
>Both dragon and the fox shuddered from the sensation
>Elaine had to have more. She lapped the nub like it was her favorite treat
>And it was. Heavens bless her Master for letting her worthless self have something like this.
>Elaine licked away the runaway juices from Larinna's cunt and closed lips on her clit
>She suckled it like a teat
>"Stop"
>Elaine immediately removed her mouth, afraid she had done something wrong
>Larinna was breathing heavily but did not look angry
>"Ma'am?"
>"That's enough. I don't want you to give me release"
>Elaine wanted to protest but that'd been pointless.
>She acquiesced to her request and politely thanked the dragon for allowing her to serve her
>"I hope you found my performance satisfactory"
>The dragon nodded. "We can do this again some other time"
>Elaine was elated. She dabbed her lips clean with napkin.
>"I'm glad to hear it. Was there anything else?"
>Larinna stretched, flexing her claws. "No. I must rest. You should too"
>Right, Master had told her about that
>"I'll be taking my leave then." With a final curtsey Elaine turned around and left to her pen
>With the help of two dragons wood required for construction was easy to come by
>Workers only needed to saw trees halfway through and Olivia could handle the rest
>She rose to her back legs and leaned against the trunk to bring it crashing down
>Larinna then pulled the trees to be cut into planks for the new buildings
>She had wished for the transport duty specifically
>Complete with the plug
>The sight of aroused dragoness made Elaine's mouth water. It was like being teased constantly
>Bunkhouse design was a simple rectangle box
>Floor, four outer walls and a roof
>No inerior walls and no privacy, although slaves could always install something if permitted
>Few windows to allow light in and a small porch, suggested by Betty
>She had been helping by making the boards and hammering them into place
>"Curse these tits! I can't see where I'm stepping on"
>"Why not use the wraps? They help a little?", one of the workers commented
>"They're so restrictive. And feel like they're crushing me."
>When she was on the saw, her breasts wobbled all over, handicapping her
>Banging her thumb with the hammer was the last straw
>"Ow! Fuck this. I have to get them adjusted. I can't work like this"
>Betty threw the hammer away and stormed off
>She returned some time later, chest bound and pitcher in hand
>"Draining them helps with the pressure and I thought you'd like to have something to drink. There's more if this runs out"
>Refreshed, everyone god back to work
>Exterior walls were painted bright red, with dragons helping the painters reach all the way to the top
>Workers stood on Olivia's back and were able to reach higher up without the need for a separate scaffold
>Larinna even got to 'paint' herself by grabbing Betty from both sides and carefully holding the cat in her claws
>Betty painted an area she could reach and Larinna moved her to a different spot
>"This is fun but awfully slow. Don't they make bigger brushes?"
>"Not dragon sized ones"
>Concrete was poured to make a foundation for the prison
>Steel poles were struck deep into the ground where each cell would be, which were then consequently anchored in place by the hardening concrete
>Larinna brought large number of chains, spreader bars, gags and other assorted restraints from town.
>Chains were attached to poles and could be used to cuff any beastkin captives
>They should be strong enough to hold anything less than a dragon, but better safe than sorry
>Master put the jaguar in them for a trial
>"If you can get out, you're free to go"
>However she just pulled knees to her chest and rocked back and forth on the floor, muttering "A lie... it's a lie. No getting out... Must not run"
>"I'll have you whipped if you don't try to escape right now"
>"I'll go, I'll go!"
>The jaguar strained against the chains as hard as she could and clawed the manacles at her feet
>No matter how much she tried, the links didn't budge. The fur around her cuffs tinted red.
>She collapsed on the floor and started to sob. Only option for the cat to get free was to maim herself
>"I'm sorry. I'm sorry. Please don't hurt me Master"
>"Get her up"
>The beastkin wailed when two farmhands grabbed her and hauled her on her feet
>Master stroked her cheek and she flinched away, expecting to get struck
>"Shh, shh. You did as I asked. I'm not going to hurt you"
>The cat was shaking, fearful of his touch
>"It's alright. I need you to do one more thing. Can you help Master?"
>She nodded rapidly
>"Good. I need you to go to the bat and bring her here. Put her in chains, just like you are now. Can you do that for me?"
>More nodding. "Y- yes Master"
>He patted her head. "Good girl"
>Prison walls were not constructed yet. Maybe they could catch the attention of certain bat meanwhile
>"This is for being such a horny dragon"
>*smack*
>"This is for begging your Master to fuck you"
>*smack*
>Larinna was hogtied on the floor, her mouth held closed by a muzzle and filled with a dildo. Master was whipping her nethers with a riding crop
>'Positive reinforcement' as he'd put it
>"This is for enjoying this"
>*smack*
>"Mmmmph!"
>"Don't forget her eating habits", Olivia commented idly
>"This is for trying to lick my cum out from Olivia"
>*smack*
>Master dropped the crop and plunged his arm in Larinna's egg canal. She moaned all the way down.
>"Your cunt is not much use to me before I decide to breed you, but that won't happened before I've gotten a clutch or two out of Olivia first. Until then this is more fun one."
>He punched the plug sticking from Larinna's tailhole
>"Push it out."
>Her ring went taut as she worked to eject it
>"Mmggghhhh!"
>Master traced a finger along her hole where it met the plug. Larinna clenched and sucked it back in
>He stroked the walls of her pussy in come-hither motion. "Push. You want me in there instead, don't you?"
>"Mhs!" Larinna renewed her efforts and when she was almost at the widest point, Master slapped her clit
>"Mmmph!"
>The plug popped out from her ass and she shot a jet of femcum on the floor.
>Her was ass left open without anything in it.
>"This is for making a mess on my floor"
>*smack*
>Larinna clenched again and her rear closed up
>"Relax"
>It took her a couple of tries but she managed to slacken her sphincter enough to open up into a small gape
>Master brought his rock hard member on her ass and started to slide in
>Every time she clenched, he would stop his moment and wait for her to relax again
>She was sensitive. It took him a long time to hilt completely
>"That's a good girl"
>He pulled out in one smooth motion leaving only the tip of his cock in her
>The process repeated until she was able to welcome him in without interruptions. Mostly. She'd get there eventually
>This 'training' took it's toll on Master too.
>Without warning, he slammed his body against hers
>Larinna's tail thumped against the floor as she was taken
>Master was not turning this into a long lovemaking session or drawing out his pleasure. It was time to end the session.
>This was simple raw sex, looking to sate his need
>Larinna moaned in beat of his thrusts and Oliva chuckled in her pen
>"Don't break her Love. We need her later"
>"She's. Tough. Girl. She. Can. TAKE. IT."
>Master growled and went balls deep one last time
>He exploded in her, releasing all the pent up lust from their training session
>Her cunt tried to milk a cock that should have been embedded in it, but instead the male was lodged deep in her tailhole
>Master pumped what felt like liters of cum in Larinna as she convulsed around him, riding her own release
>She would have been howling if not the gag on her face
>When his came ebbed, Master pulled out
>Larinnas insides were completely filled with white. It was slowly leaking back out from her used tailhole
>She was panting and drooling on the ground, only succeeding to push more of the cum out when Master tried to make her close up
>He picked up the discarded plug and pushed it back in, sealing her up. Larinna barely reacted.
>Master left her to gather her wits and let Olivia clean him up meanwhile
>She polished his penis and balls back to a pristine condition
>Master opened the knots keeping Larinna's legs together
>When he went to take off her muzzle, she withdrew her head
>He stared into her large yellow eye. "Want me to leave it?"
>A nod
>"Alright then", he smiled, "I'll send Elaine to you later. Enjoy your rest."
>Master was about to walk out from the barn when he heard Larinna move
>She'd gotten up and stood outside of Olivias pen, as if to ask permission to enter
>Olivia let her in and Larinna curled next to her.
>The older dragoness rested her neck atop Larinna's back and looked at Master expectantly
>"Oh what the hell"
>Master turned on his heels and went to join the pile


If there anything better than to go on a little safari with your waifurs to nab some savages for the hell of it?
The little hunting party is easily defeated and squeals out the location of their encampment after only a little bit of teasing.
Despite the fact that you and your three ladies are outnumbered ten to one it's more then enough to blitz right into the middle of their stronghold. The tribal warriors stand no chance despite fighting unarmed and naked civilized girls. Being well fed and highly trained in both human combat they're the most deadly anthros within a thousand miles.
You join in on the fun, toying with a snarling, particularly mean looking bitch who you would later find out later that night was the tribe's greatest warrior as she screamed out while being forcibly bred.
The girls have fun going around and lezzing out with the confused tribal women who have never experienced such sensations.
The mature, pregnant chiefess and her virgin daughter kowtow to show their submission towards their new master and join you in bed in exchange for not being too hard on their tribe.
The chiefess rides your lap and fucks like the juiciest, horniest whore you've ever sampled while still being careful not to hurt her unborn child, knowing that the more she satisfies you the less of a chance you'll go around violating other women. She starts off fearful that she'll be unable to preform but soon gets into it as much as you do.
Her daughter is more reluctant, having second thoughts just as she feels the first and last cock she'll be fucked by glide against her pussy. She tries to jump away to preserve her purity but is held down by her own mother.
After a while of pussy pillaging you drive back to civilization, taking with you some females, including the former chiefess and leaving her daughter, now pregnant with your child, as the new leader of the heavily ravaged tribe.
You'll be back in a few years to meet and breed the your newest tribal family.

I came up with a scenario and blew three loads to it already.
>All female anthro tribe is defending itself against human invaders
>Somehow they are stronger then the humans who try to enslave them and always avoid being turned into breeding sows despite having many casualties
>But in order to keep their freedom they need to breed with strong males
>Furbois are too weak for this and the only option is to breed with the humans they hate
>The woman take turns leaving the tribe to seek out human settlements to whore themselves out
>The humans brutally fuck them and treat them like mere objects, giving them a taste of whats to come if they fail to defend the tribe.
>Ironically to not end up as live long fuck toys they have to endure this temporarily to make sure that they are pregnant
>They will give birth to string anthros and the cycle starts eventually again

>It was a brutally hot August day in Middle Tennessee. Seven of us were piled in the Suburban headed for an afternoon at Lake Kershaw, the local excuse for a water park. My mother and Aunt Jamie had taken mercy on us after two boiling days visiting my Grandmother's ramshackle old farmhouse. It was the summer family reunion horror that my only my father escaped, my mother and her widowed sister loved, and the kids of both women accepted as inevitable. However, now we were on the way to cool off and I was sitting next to my hard-body cheerleader sisters. Watching them giggle and toss their hair while drops of sweat stained their bikini tops was more than a little diverting. Yes, I am a little pervert, so what.
As such things will become important and are difficult to include in the story without stopping its flow I'll briefly present some pertinent facts about our clan:
>My mother, Beth, was a 36 year-old accountant with long blonde hair, long red nails, perfect face, red toenails and firm tanned body. She worked out regularly, dieted and made sure she was the only woman in my father's life. She wore a hot pink two- piece suit that could almost be a bikini, which barely contained her full bust and firm ass. She stood 5 feet 7 inches with a firm firm figure.
>Aunt Jane was 37years old with short blonde hair. She was not as perfectly toned out as my mother and wore a green one-piece suit. All her curves were fuller than my mother's including a round belly and rather large ass.
>The twins, Amy and Ann, were luscious Barbie Girl cheerleaders with bad reputations. They were 16, 5'9'', 135 pounds with lush soft bodies, long red nails, and very short summer butch hair cuts. They wore bikinis.
>My other sister, Denise, was a star soccer player already at 17 years old and outsized for her sex and age. She stout and bulky, she liked to say it was all muscle undernieth but nah she's a chub. 5'9'' She wore a bikini. She had been suspended the previous year.
>I was the so-called baby of the family at just 15 and junior varsity football player. I stood 5'11'', weighed 178 pounds and had my families' blonde hair. I wore a swimsuit.
>Cousin Lynn was 19 with light blonde-brown hair. She stood 5'6'' and weighed a heavy weight 155 and wore a red one piece covering her chesty 40D 30 40 body.
>Suddenly out of nowhere an old van nearly sideswiped us on the interstate. My mother blew the horn and the asshole bitch that had nearly wrecked us slammed on her breaks and shot the bird out the window before speeding on a head. My mother started to race after her, but Aunt Jane told her to let it go. Mom cursed and fumed, but she slowed down and we continued on. She was rewarded as we went up over a rise and saw the van pulled over on the side of the road by a state cop. We drove by real slow, my Mom lowered my Aunt's window and caught the driver's eye and shot the bird back and laughed. The furious black mare bit her lips and dealt with the traffic cop. She looked like she had a van full too.
>We drove on laughing and joking about the woman and her ticket. About ten minutes later we pulled off the interstate into a rest stop. This was one of the old interstates and the facilities were bare minimum, a two door brick restroom across the parking lot from each other.
>I went into the men's room to take a piss. It was hot and smelled of twenty years of piss and white urinal mints. At least it had been cleaned recently. I took my time, washed up and wiped my face . The heat was so oppressive that the cool tap water felt like ice and heared another vehicle pull up with many feet on gravel moving fast. I walked outside to see what was up. It was the same van we had passed by earlier. As I exited I heard screaming and shouting from the other washroom I entered and a young Horse boy stood just inside the door. Keeping watch? He was watching from the second door, wooping and cheering with a nasty grin as the woman's restroom
>explodes into a fresh cacophony of shouting, chashing screams and bestial roars.
>I started to step around him on my way to take a run into the stall and just like that the little bastard had me in an armlock, 'You can watch, but nobody insults mother Like that.. I didn't think we'd get to smack you no-skins up this trip"’
>Let me break the flow again and describe the room. The room was a ten ft wide by twenty foot long white tiled bathroom. Five sinks lined the left wall. A padded bench lined the back wall. Four toilets lined the right wall. A padded bench filled up the space along the front wall just to the left of the last toilet and the right of the door. A large trashcan stood just inside the door. The room smelled no worse and seemed marginally cleaner than the men's room. Now as to what was going on, that was the real stunner.
>Mom was in the far corner of the room bent backwards over a sink. The driver of the car car we passed, I'll call her Bess for black Bessie, had mom bent backwards. Bessy, forty something years old, stood maybe 5'6 and weighed 160 lean pounds. Her large tits were out of her ripped shift and pressed up against mom's belly Her nappy black mane was a wild mess in the heat of combat and no matter how it had been combed a handful was already torn out and gripped in my mother's right hand as she tries to do something, anything to turn things around.
>Aunt Jane meanwhile was sitting on an a rabbit I'll call twitchy, pinning the smaller anthro convincingly and wrestling with another rabbit I'll call Nips who was on her knees arms locked with Jane. Jane had lost her top and her big tits were scratched. Nip’s face was bloody. It looked like Aunt Jane had busted her nose all over her face before the two of them had locked up. The rabbit between her legs meanwhile was trying and failing to twist her head into a position to be able to bite at Jane's pussy before jane's thunder thighs squeeze her into the void.
>Sister Amy was hitting another anthro teenager, a young cougar who she was bravely laying into with both fists. The other girl, punched back. The mountain lion stood head and shoulders above amy and she was holding amy at arms length whilereeling back for a bite with the widest set of glistening killer jaws i’d ever seen on any cat. Her deadly bite got stopped dead in it’s tracks by the well timed ramming of a ceramic toilet lid into her wide open cat face in a collision that sent scattered bits of tile and chipped cat teeth skittering across the floor. and much of the rubble bits getting caught in the cougar’s mouth triggering the feline to reflexively gag and wretch. Amy having none of that opts to help her lioness foe out with chewing this gravely mix of ceramic chunks by stepping in close and throwing up a wicked knee against the predator’s jawline, grinding and chipping the beast’s picture perfect set of pearly fangs in in a blow which snaps her head back up. " Guuhnng" the cat gurgles aloud, expelling much of the bloody mix of chipped teeth and restroom porcelain. Amy was winning a fist fight with a mountain lion…that was impressive.
>Sister Ann was on her back with her head and shoulders in one of the toilet stalls. A lean secretary bird was on top of her back,talons of one foot gripping into Ann’s upper back while using the other foot to repeatedly bang the human girl’s head on the toilet rim with the lid until it breaks at which point she takes a talonhold around the back of ann’s head and bashes her head against the rim all while looking serine while doing it. She must have been 5'11'' and weighed maybe 130 pounds exuding an air of elegance and grace the rises above the beanten writhing play she stands atop. She was skinny, but had still been wrecking ann while standing large and in charge, she even mannages a casual bit of feather preening with her beak during the act just as Ann’s from teeth are blown out.
>Denise and Lyn by contrast had a put rat girl on her knees two stalls away from Ann. Denise was forcing the girl's head into the toilet. I'll call that girl Swirl. Swirl was another teenager, maybe a little older than Denise. Swirl stood 5'6'' and weighed a clean 100 pounds. She was outmatched by our soccer superstar. Both girls seated themselves on top of the face down rodent. Denise snarled as she plunged the stubborn girl head first into the putrid mess in the toilet. She firmly held Tara's head submerged as the dirty rat's body writhed furiously as the clean bowl's water suply grows dirty from the grunge that adorned swirl's face, the sickening mixture in the bowl bubbled with her gurgled protests.
>The horse holding me in a headlock whistles, 'My mom and her gang are going to fuck you bitches up good. Flipping her off on the the road is going to cost you guys, well, girls mostly.'
>I said, 'No way you psycho pieces of shi-*’
>He knees me in the balls with a lean mean horsepowered strike of the knee. “Shut it” He sneers. “After we beat your no-furs we’ll be on our way like nothing ever happened.”
>I heard Mom scream. Bess was biting Mom's right tit and jerking her blonde hair back with both hands. Mom pulled back on the mare’s hair with her left hand and moved her right hand to the beastwoman's face. Mom cursed as her tit was mauled, but she continued to fight back. She pushed her right hand into the mare’s face. Bessie moaned and tried to twist her face away, but Mom's long manicures nails ripped the horse’s long face open and then Mom got two fingers in Bess's left eye. The black mare screamed and twisted away. Mom straightened up from the sink and hammered the other woman with a round house right sending her staggering to crash against the sink and mirror wall which fell and shatters. The young stud man-erm Horshandling me winces for his mom, at least a bit concerned.
>With Stud's attention taken up by worry for his own mother I pull his headlock loose with everything I have. Well from there I was out of the pan and in the fire. When I slipped out of Stud’s head grip i immediately try for a kick on the suprised equine's shin, that elicits a pained whinny before he lunges after me and I turn tail and run. I throw down a trash can and slam the open stall door in his face make a break for the highway. Stud however used that superior size and superb physique of his catches up with me in moments. Outrun a horse…What was I thinking. From there stud started to knock me around quite badly with sweeping arms and lunging kicks, I licked his a few times on the proach each time but it was like trying to use your fists to beat up well, a horse. He was tossing me around the lawn like a rag child because frankly I was in comparison. I figured out real fucking fast that I was was in over my head. He was a young man, prime of his life against a teenager. so I began to really focus on attempts at evasion by managing to keep just out of his reach. Sure i couldn't hit him either but it was better then the alternative. After one to many evasions Stud had wizened up to my tricks. He caught me by the shirt coller during a sidestep.
>"I think it's time I knock your sorry ass out”
>"Who forgot to break you in you damn draft animal?!" I spat back.
Man, I was flying high on adrenaline. I was juiced after not getting instantly beaten senseless by the Stud. I only wished my family was in the room enough to see this. He had plenty of chances to knock my ass out he’d been kind of playing around before but that genuinly ticked him off. I got too wrapped up in embarrassing him though. It was a huge mistake. All of a sudden it felt like a bomb went off in my gut. Stud buried his fist in my belly and I folded like a wet noodle gasping for air. Next thing I knew he was about to crack my head open with a curbstomp of his hoof. Just as Stud
>was about to kill me fate intervened in the form of screeching tires and crunching metal. A police car, driven by a familier officer, who ticketed their vehicle. He rolls around the corner, cruiser's bright red and blue lights turned off for the element of surprise. Without a moment's hesitation, the vehicle rams into the anthro horse from the side, the impact causing Stud to be flung away skidding along his back across gravel and into the drain off ditch where the young anthro lay on the ground, his movements feeble and sluggish.
>From where I was laying halfway under the car I see a leather boot with spokes step out of the vehicle and saunter across the carlot mostly apathetic to the commotion inside the the restroom as squats by the ditch nightstick in hand poking and lightly swatting at Stud's upturned hooves checking the damage. He was a gigantic fucking bullnecked state cop complete with a Bubba peaked hat and the biggest handgun I have ever seen in the front pocket of his jeans, no wait he had a holster. I emerge from under the cruiser shaken and stunned as heard him speak in deep dry gruffness with a casual jovility as he drags the weakly groaning Stud out from the ditch by his tail. "Pep up you black equine bastard It's just a big old splotch of bruises sprains, strains, scrapes and possibly fractures. You're fine. probably."
>"ghhh...you rammed me"
>"I said you're fine so shut it." he flicks the nightstick with a casual swinging arc into the anthro's nuts making Stud jolted in shock and cup himself real quick.
>"AAurgh! shutting up, shutting up!"
>The cop pushed Stud's head down and snapped plastic cuffs on him before he opened the door to the pandemonium inside. The screaming group fight going on inside. I swear he chuckled. "They totally started it" I blurt out. The officer man acknowledges me with a turn and a noncommittal "Sup." his nametag says 'Dan'
>Aunt Jane was still wrapped up with Nips. Twitch was clawing at Jane's thigh and buttocks while Jane hand wrestled with her partner. Aunt Jane cursed and bounced her big ass on Twitch’s belly hurting the small bunny girl the only way she could and to her credit it did seem to be effective.
>The cougar finally grabbed onto Amy and tried to get on top her. The beast clawed her back ripping the cheap t-shirt my sister wore off. She cursed and then the lion sank her teeth into Amy's shoulder. Amy howled and jerked the girl's head away by the scruff. The predator sank a fist into Amy's pale white belly. Amy groaned, wretched and dropped to her knees and the cougar then makes an attempt at barreling Amy over by practically leaping into her like a tackle with no distance but then Amy stunned everyone in the room by turning this rather bad situation in her favours as she catches the cat in a wide hug and with a Herculean effort to arch her back she smashes the cat down in a power driver with the cougar girl on it’s receiving end. Crunch! Cartilage in the limber cat’s spine clicks and creaks while blood burst out of her nose, Amy’s blood, the cougar was still clamped down hard on Amy’s shoulder even as her torso gets sprawled out in the room as an interfering element in another pair’s engagement. Amy puts the cougar in a two armed headlock from there.
>The secretary bird had been slowly beating the crap out of Ann. Ann's face was never going to be photogenic again. The bird with the legs was slowly working her body up on top of the blonde going for a school girl pin and then a face fisting to finish Ann off for good. Her very well thought out battle plan was ruined when The cougar girl’s body fell over her, tripping the bird up a bit. She ended up side wedged against the stall wall with the cat’s violently thrashing lower half tangled with the bird's legs and Ann's own tangle of limbs as she is already kicking and scrambling for away out.
>Amy used her left hand on the stall to balance herself and drove her bare left foot straight into the secretary's face. The bird girl's head bounced hard against the wall and her beak gets a nasty crack in it which immediately started bleeding. The couger finally got a leg out of the tangle and kicks up. Her clawed foot took Ann right on the mound and she slumped against the stall wall. Ann rears back stepping on the lid of the toilet trying to keep as far away from the floor where that flailing beast and her claws are going absolutely ballistic until she spots an opening and makes a short leap. She hammered her right foot down like a club. It hit the couger right on the Pubic mound, getting revenge for her cunting amy just before and from there she’s able to launchpad off the cat’s crotch to deliver a mighty kneecap impact in the the side of the secretary bird’s head as she shes off the first hit crushing her pretty little bird face between the stall door and a hard place. The door is blown off it’s hinges with Ann’s avian enemy laid out on top of it.
>Denise had Swirl's face in the toilet and she was flushing it and laughing as the rat girl reached back frantically over her head for something to claw. Denise put her knee between the girl's shoulders, grabbed the arms and jerked them back into what looked like a perfect surfboard hold. I had never seen one in a real fight. Denise had her rat humiliated, under control and fading. Lynn was running to help Mom. Then Dan blew his whistle.
>He yelled, 'All right that's enough. Break it up, break it up right now.' They continued.
>He blew on the whistle again and yelled, 'All right you fucking cunts. If I have to come in there you are all going to jail.' Dan shot the celling.
>The sounds of the fighting stopped. There was the sound of shuffling and mumbled curses.My mother's voice said, 'You're fucking lucky he saved your feral asses.'
>Bess snaps back, 'I would have taken your tits home in my van, human.'
>The cop man chuckled and said, 'Well ladies, you can't be fighting in a public restroom. Now I tell you what we are going to do. I am going to give you a choice. I can call for support and we can haul your mighty fine asses to jail. You'll spend the weekend sweating off all that energy because the judge won't get in till Monday. And, it'll will cost you about two thousand bucks a head or thirty days on the farm and believe you me you'll hate thirty days on the farm.'
>My Mom said, 'Or?''
>He chuckled and said, 'Or we can finish this little argument one on one out back in the woods. The fights go on until one side gives it up. I let the winners go and the losers, well the losers get fucked, we're off normal districts out here so technically criminals are free to do with by anyone and yeah thise whole place is a crime scene.We’re underfunded and this is a porno story don’t try to think to hard about it. Fight or jail, win or get fucked.'
>Bess said, 'We'll fight! My son is twice the man of anyone here, he'll break every one of you bitches and rape your ass for good measure.'
>The cop said, 'Okay Black bess is in."
>Mom said, 'We'll fight! This horse is delusional about her team's chances.'
>Everybody picked up their clothes and followed the cop out of the bathroom, some of the anthros collected their sole male from the roadside. We walked around the side of the rest room and down a long dirt path that curled back through the woods. It was traveled well enough to keep the weeds down. We emerged into dirt clearing covered by pine needles and a few weeds. The dirt clearing surrounded both sides of shallow creek. A couple of chairs were propped against the surrounding trees. It looked like an unofficial camping site that the cops kept for themselves. "Rest up for a time, lick your wounds with some of you that might involve actual self licking."
>Dan hadn't actually given much of a time frame for this rest and recouperatin period to take and so everyone with any sense were qick to pivot away from calling across the isle with taunts and slurs to the more pressing concern of patching ourselves up at a frantic pace. We were checking up the bodies of our family and I had the unusual treat of being combed over by all my immediate female relatives as they diagnosed soothed and felt up every nook and cranny of my body along the way.
>Deputy Dan lined us up by opposing trees and took out a deck of cards. He walked down the length of the lines and had the females draw cards. Then he collected the cards, reordered the lines of women in the order of the rank of the cards they had drawn. Aunt Jane was first followed by Amy, Lynn, Mom, Denise, Ann and myself. Nips was first on the beast's line and she was followed by Bessie, The couger who we later found out to be named celica, The secretary bird girl, identified as ‘terry’, Twitch the second of the rabbit twins Swirl the rat and Stud. Deputy Dan pushed A hesitant bunny teenager and Aunt Jane out into the dirt clearing as the rest of of.
>Dan explained, 'All right now you bitches are going to fight it out with no rules until one of you is knocked out or begs to quit. As soon as that happens I break up the fight. The winner fights the next woman in line and so it goes until one of you groups of bitches is too ass whipped to fight on and gives up.
It has to be unanimous. And after you give up, the losers are going to eat pussy, lick ass and get fist fucked by the winners and then I'm going to dip my cock in every loser's pussy and maybe take some ass too. So you don't want to be losing this little dispute now do you''
>Deputy Dan looked at the women and said, 'Go ahead and strip down. You've got nothing to hide have you' And ladies, please feel free to fight as dirty as you want.'
>'Alright, you fucking cunts, fight!'
>The two crowds roared as the woman and the bun square off against each other. Nips was looking rather worried going into it as she no doubt remembered how the woman across from her had held her own against both bunny twins at once and been coming out ahead. Nips engages in a bit of ad-hoc emulation of a boxing asthetic, tossing fast jabs while bouncing and bobbing along to an invisible beat in her head as the meaty whacks of the blonde’s fists hit nip’s mug right on the sniffer, reopening the nosebleed she’d inflicted earlier.
It was beautiful.
>Cruel, but beautiful. Jane’s knuckles slammed into the bunny’s chin as she springs forwards, telegraphs her next tossed hand on the backhop and the stupid bunny jumps foreward to meet it. Back and forth, her sticklike arms had poor reach and power compared to her far deadlier asset in those mighty thumpers she was wasting with kicks into the ground commonly referred to as 'jumps'.
Nip’s her little imitation dance of a boxer comes to die with a whimper instead of a bang as her eratic 'jump and jab when the other girl is outreaching you' strategy pans out about as well as could be expected. Nips gets sloppy, uncoordinated and slower as like the progression of alcohol she takes one shot to many. Her raised fists drop like two rags final shot spun Nips around causing her to stagger forward. Nips whipped around with an elbow nailing Jane with it accidentally because frankly anything at all that was better then just a jab seemed outside the dumb bun's brain wiring.
>Regardless Nips falls over on her back right then and there. Deliriously Nips mouths off with a couple of nonsense words of song lyrics as Jane jumped on the bunny girl’s belly working to keep the small rabbit girl down with the same full-budy straddle she’d used on Twitch.
She sat up between the fat spread thighs of the rabbit and drops an elbow down on the exposed pubic mound.
>The elbow crushed the clit against bone. Nips screamed and writhed, almost freeing her legs. Then she stiffened as the blonde beauty grabbed hold of the bushel tail of the bun and yanked. The crowd of anthro sympathetically wince.
>Nips squealed as a handful of matted hair was ripped from her nub, and another, and another. Jane's mouth was twisted in a snarl. She started punching the gaping pussy with short rights as her left pressed down on nip's belly keeping her in place. Nips cried and cried for someone to get the crazy bitch off her cunt. A couple of her friends looked ready to come down, but anybody who interfered at the got a mob ass-kicking. “I quit! I quit! You win! Please, no more!”
I found myself joining in
on my family's adoration, cheering for Jane as she just netted up a 1-0 edge.
>Deputy Dan blew his whistle and said, 'Get off her you whipped her ass.'
>Aunt Jane kept banging the girl’s crotch Deputy Dan put his big boot up and pushed Aunt Jane off. Aunt Jane was furious. She wanted to keep on hurting the bimbo bun. But the size of Deputy Dan and his menacing nightstick stopped her on her knees. She sat there panting as Nips cursed her face down in the dirt. Deputy Dan kicked Nip in the ass and kept nudging her until she crawled to the end of the anthro’s line where she could cul up and cry in relative peace.
>Deputy Dan said to Aunt Jane, 'Get up, bitch. It is time to fight again.'
Aunt Jane stood, breathing heavily covered in sweat and dirt. Bess steps forward.
Her body was a testament to her species Her torso boasted a taut midsection, The deep cuts between each ab muscle were evidence of that.
Her chest stood firm and proud, with well-developed pectoral muscles that gave her a sense of authority. Each rise and fall of her breathing showcased the strength that lay within and the veins coursing across her frame hinted at her cardiovascular fitness. She was a perfect specimen of her race and she knew it.
Bess the horse and gang matriarch was ready for payback for Nips rushed forward andcollided with a great thud from which jane is tossed back with contemptuous ease. Bess instantly popped a left jab straight onto Jane' nose, then another and thr woman staggered back her nose now
bleeding. It seemed that Bess was more concerned about ensuring the retribution was poetic as a third jab from the mighty mare again caught Jane on the nose increasing the trickle of blood which flowed down her face and dripped onto her torso. Bess flicked out yet another left jab at her face and this time Jane's guard did come up and Bess's' left was blocked, but she had been waiting for this as the moment Jane's guard came up Bess sent out a fierce straight right which crushed the human's left breast. 'Noooohhhh' sobbed Jane staggering away. Bess didn't hurry, calmly she paced across the dirty clearing following the fleeing Jane gradually cutting of avenues of escape until once more she was in range with her left poised to jab at her face but instead of the jab her right fist went in low and hard into the top of Jane's bush with a dull thud 'ughh' went and she fell straight down landing heavily onto her backside weakly gasping for air, her arms limply at her side she slowly bent forwards trying to ease the pain.
'Did I find your uterus?' Bess asked as she stands over Jane.
'Maybe a little higher next time, I think I just caught your pubic bone that
time' Jane grits her teeth and with ovaries of steel springs right back into the fray tackling or at least attempting to tackle the larger fitter woman before changing to a dreadful tangle of grapples.. Their furious hair pulling and kicking began as they stirred up the dirt. Bess got her right leg behind Jane's and tripped my blonde aunt. They hit the ground hard with the mare woman on top and the crowd of beasts hollering her on. Jane groaned and was stunned long enough for Bess to sit on her belly and straddle jane.
This time the human woman took a two fisted facial beating from the beast with no more theatrics or banter. Aunt Jane reached up and pulled Bess down by her flowing male and stopped the fisting. Blood dribbled out of Jane's nose now and her cheeks were dark red.
Bess and Jane struggled in the dirt. Jane bucked up again and again trying to get the heavy horse bitch off her. Bess rode the bucking blonde and suddenly pinned her arms down above her head. Bess spread out on top and tried to tie up Jane's legs. Jane was pressing up on her feet thrusting against Bess's pelvis. Bess hooked her hoof around Jane's calves and suddenly my aunt was in the grapevine. Jane moaned as her arms were stretched out and her legs stressed. Bess raised her pelvis and hammered her knee down onto Jane's pussy. Jane groaned and cursed.
Bess dropped her head and bit into Jane's right nip. Jane screamed and struggled. Bess shifted her bloody mouth to Jane's neck. Jane screamed out a quick surrender. Deputy Dan reached down and grabbed Bess's flowing mane and jerked her off and kneed her in the head to throw off to the side as Jane cried and checked her throat for blood. She was bleeding, but her arteries were..if not fine then at least not punctured. Jane crawled to the end of the line. My sister Amy stepped forward, looking very anxious. She was facing a heavy woman extrem;y powerful horse who had just kicked the shit out our aunt and Amy's normally cocky looking sneer was missing.
This time Bess was more circumspect and held back from a rushdown, content to simply outbox the smaller woman with her longer arms built like trunks.
so not wanting to over commit
herself, sent out a left jab which Amy blocked with both arms up, it looked like it sill hurt the small teen like hell but she did actually block it all the same. Amy is thrown back from the force of the blows and would hiss feeling her arching wrist after taking just one punch from that powerful draft animal while
keeping another eye out to see to see what Bell would try next... another jab. Blocked again with Amy wincing as the two fighters continued to slowly circle each other around the clearing. After the unusual intensity of the fights thus far this was a bit of a anticlimax but the calm didn't last long. Bess felt that she was dealing with a staller and in the absence of much response other than blocking by Amy she pushed out a faster jab which just got past Amy's guard catching Amy on the forehead, Bess instantly sent out a right aimed at Amy's chin to end it but she struck . . . nothing! Amy was boxing clever now, learning where the rabbit was to stupid to adapt and had been waiting for this, as Bess's right powered towards her she was already dropping and sending a one, two of her own towards Bess as, driving forward, she sent a left and a right string that be roundly heard as meaty thumps against Bess's washboard ab rack stringing along a combo of gits there drawing a quick gasp from the mare before a making sidestep around the large woman who whinnies out of frustration of the annoying gnat.
Bess turned around to recieve sister's hard little right hand flush on the mouth. Bess's head snapped back spraying some horse spittle. Amy slammed her knee into the black mare's heavy mound. Bess groaned and the family cheers, amazed at amy for being a Danial who is managing to down a goliath before our very eyes. Bess turned around to take my sister's hard little right hand flush on the mouth. Bess's head snapped back spraying some horse spittle. Amy slammed her knee into the black mare's heavy mound. Bess groaned and the family cheers, amazed at amy for being a danial who is mannaging to down a goliath before our very eyes. Bess grabbed the leg of Amy and dropped to her one knee holding Amy's leg with one arm. Amy reflexively grabbed a handful of horse mane for balance. Before my sister could strike with her
other fist, Bess drove her free leg up into Amy's shaved cunt. Smack!
Amy squealed and fell backwards. Bess held onto the leg with the left and jammed her right hand into Amy's young cunt. My sister screamed, drew back her right foot and kicked out. She left a dirty foot print on Bess's snout. The mighty mare dropped her and spat out a bloody glob shaking it off with a whinny. Amy rolled into a little ball holding her cunt scrambling to stand back up. Amy could have mule kicked her equine foe in the face, pussy or even break a shin right then and there, but my sister was not thinking about that.
"This is how to throw a kick, you dainty bitch!" hissed Bess as she unloaded a wicked jump kick at the girl catching Amy's face on the way. That practically launched our girl vertical.
her body went from crouching to practically upright, spun around in a lazy half circle and then staggered away
like a zombie. She looked like she was out on her
feet and to substantiate that she abruptly collapsed to her knees and fought
to stay there with her head tipped forward and her arms hanging limp at her
sides giving the animals a good show of her virgin hole, Stud the son of this monster Bess was being the sole male in their clique sprouts a stiffie,
Bess plants her hoof on amy's back leaning into her while a bit stunned at that having as much difficulty with a girl she could have essentially taken out in one good hit having caused her as much trouble as it did. but still spits insult across the ring.
Dan stepped forwards and rules it a clean knockout as her body gets pulled back in the line "sloppy bess, but yeah that's a win for you Lynn, time to sink or swim, come on up,"
Bess stood on the edge of the ground and tossed Lynn a derisive smirk.
"You ready for a fuckin' cleaned clock you no-fur?!" she taunted. Lynn stepped forward terrified of Bess but her resolve was steel. They charged at each other like a couple of runaway trains and when they slammed together it was intense. Bess's superior weight proved beneficiary and as she drove the grunting lynn backwards she nearlytook her off her feet. The human managed to land a glancing kick on Bess's calf but Bess continued driving forward untilthey crashed to the ground in a squealing heap. Lynn purposefully brought oneknee to her chest before Bess landed on top of her. Bess rose up on her kneesand landed a blow that only grazed lynn's chin due to the fact that as she unloaded the punch lynn pushed out with her knee wedged between Bess's rock solid tits. Instantly my aunt's hands shot upward and she viciously raked the beast's face eliciting a sharp cry from her. With a powerful shove of her leg lynn sent Bess sailing backwards to her ass on the ground. Everyonewas cheering loudly for their fighter. lynn jumped to her feet and stepped towards Bess as she reared back with one of her legs for a kick. Just as she let fly with it Bess dropped back on her elbows and snapped a kick up underneath lynn's leg, burying her hoof inlynn's wide open crotch. lynn bellowed in agony as she folded at the waist clutching her aching cunt. As bess scrambled to her feet lynn suddenly dropped on all fours and like a greased pig she shot right between Bess's legs, even catching her in the crotch with a backwards heel kick on her way through. Lynn was flat out tenacious!
Bess's brief hesitation to massage her stinging sweet spot gave the tenacious human time to mount a renewed attack. lynn jumped onto Bess's back and clamped her legs around her hips With a maniacal expression plastered across her face she began to yank on Bess's long mane while she delivered several quick smacks to Bess's cheek.
"Mom!" shouted Stud, "Just fall backwards!"
Bess heeded the advice immediately and pitched herself back with the intent of crushing the unwelcome hitchhiker glued to her back into the ground. The wily lynn demonstrated the foresight often absent from beasts as she dismounted just in the nick of time, landing on her feet and watching Bess slam to the ground on her back with an enraged groan frustrated. She seized the advantage and viciously stomped her heel between Bess’s big tits forcing an even louder groan from the animal’s lips. lynn dropped to her knees beside Bess, cocked her fist and unloaded a nasty punch that was labeled for that long face. Bess for her part bobbed her head to the side and lynn's fist plowed into the ground.
The crowd was alive with frenzied cheers from both sides of the feud. Bess's hand shot upwards and her fist smacked into Lynn’s chin. lynn yelped and tumbled backwards as Bess quickly rolled over and scrambled to her hoofed feet. Bess had the draw on her now and when lynn hurriedly made it back to an upright position she was immediately grabbed and placed in a side headlock. The mare snarled as she began to violently wrench her hated rival's head up and down repeatedly but lynn was liquid Her right hand came up in front of Bess's body and found purchase on the folds of Bess's pussy. Bess howled in pain once lynn gouged her polished nail talons into the sensitive flesh. As lynn commenced to assault her foe's foal producing organ Bess was forced to break the headlock and she frantically tugged on lynn's wrist to stop the human’s agonizing attack. Bess was screeching as she worked upon lynn's wrist and finally she was able to break the hold. As soon as lynn hand came free her fingers balled into a fist and she ripped a punch into Bess's mound. The mare grunted in pain and was sent staggering across the ground by a firm shove from our girl.
My heart was racing as I watched this epic battle being waged. My aunt was holding her own but holding your own wasn't going to cut it here, lest bess keep bowling over our whole family in sequence.
My anxiety only deepened as I watched Lynn stumble across the ground clutching her gut with Bess right on her heels. The little warrior that she was Lynn launched herself back around on a dime and welded herself to Bess's back wrapping her legs around the draft horse’s waist. Bess's legs buckled but she stubbornly stayed on her feet as lynn swiftly applied a sleeper hold from behind. Bess struggled wildly, her fingernails digging into lynn's forearms and then when that failed to produce any result, they clawed at the bare thighs cinched around her hips. lynn yelped but she refused to let go. She tightened the debilitating hold and rode her rival across the ground.
"Fuck yeah!!!" I literally jumped with a pumping fist as I watched lynn control Bess with relative ease. "Fight it, Mom, FIGHT IT!!!" urged her son Stud with obvious concern in his voice. "Put that draft brute to sleep, Lynn!" cheered amy proudly from the end of the line.
Bess was languishing in lynn's hold at this point. As her strength dissipated the situation was fast approaching one outcome. Her legs quivered as she staggered to and fro and I heard her moan throat *glck*ing without air. in desperation as most certainly the girl’s vision began to spin. All of a sudden she began to shuffle backwards while trying to remain on her feet. Inadvertently she ended up all the way back against a tree and when lynn's body collided against it the back rider let loose with a groan of her own. Bess was still conscious enough to realize that she had one last glimmer of hope and she took it. Employing all of her remaining energy she rammed herself backwards several times, smashing her piggy-backed foe against the hard wall. Her gaggle of supporters came to life with a flourish of encouragement and after
a few more solid smacks against the wall lynn was off. The anthro pitched forward and staggered.
across the ground reeling from the effects of the sleeper hold. Her eyes were glassy,
legs were weak and she needed a respite, not just from lack of breath. lynn grimaced as she pushed away from the wall and pursued her rival doggedly grabbing two handfuls of Bess's mane for balance and driving her knee up into the anthro woman's crotch. She scored perfectly and Bess groaned. Heartened by her commanding position, Lynn made a hair swing and Bess was soon on her knees in the dirt being dragged by the smaller weaker woman. Bess put her hands down and braced against the pull. Lynn stopped, drew back her foot and kicked the horse woman straight in the face.
The first kick caused Bess to cover her face. Lynn jerked up on the woman's mane. Bess screamed and grabbed for Lynn's wrists. Now the exhausted mighty mare was on her knees with her hands up on Lynn's wrists. Lynn didn't need to be yelled instructions. She was already driving her knee upward. It hit Bess's chin. The equine’s teeth clashed together. The blow knocked her head free of Lynn's hair hold. In fact two wads of tangled hair were left in Lynn's fists.
Bess hit the ground hard. She had bitten through one of her lips. Blood spurted out of her mouth and she looked sick for swallowing on it. She rolled onto her belly and clawed at the dirt. Lynn stomped on the small of the downed woman's back five or six times. Bess grunted out her surrender and then vomited out a mouthful of blood and one broken tooth onto the dirt. Bess's rampage was over.
Bess crawled to her end of the line and Celica stepped forward to fight the cat girl, the beast is quick to step up and not give our mare breaking aunt a chance to rest and recoup herself. The cat’s lips were badly swollen and still leaking blood from the ceramic crunching Amy had given her. Lynn had the weight advantage against the teenager but Celica was comparatively fresh and looking for something to prove herself aainst with Lynn being exactly the kind of 'something' she had in mind."
"Careful!" Bess yelled. "Just knock her ass out!" I learned the hard way about the dangers of toying with an opponent stay focused on the goal. I want vengence Celica.".
Lynn came out of her corner and moved forward cautiously. As she moved in a wide circle around Celica I began to worry she just wasn’t up to this fight as Lynn was huffing, after her struggle with the horse getting previously. Celica was eyeing her human opponent not as prey but as a dangerous rival intensely cautious of any woman who could best the animal's matriarch Bess even as she herself had been in softened up state. Dan blew a whistle and set the pair of women into action. Celica suddenly threw a perfect thrust kick straight at Lynn’s already battered belly. Lynn stepped back and it merely smacked her instead of gutting her. a close call.
"you're not as good as you think you dumb cat."
'I'm going to be the best!"
Celica started fist fighting at arms length. Lynn fought back, but she wasn't as good with her fists as Amy. Soon Lynn's right eye was closing and her lips were swelling. The cougar’s mouth was bent in a smirking glare, a nasty mosaic of her hunter's teeth made to make prey bleed revealing themselves.
Lynn came out of her corner and moved forward cautiously. As she moved in a wide circle around Celica I began to worry she just wasn’t up to this fight, after her struggle with the horse getting busted in previously. Celica was eyeing her up intensly cautious of any woman who could best Bess even in a softened up state, Dan blew a whistle and set the pair of women into action Celica suddenly threw a perfect thrust kick straight at Lynn’s already battered belly. Lynn stepped back and it merely smacked her instead of gutting her.
Celica moved forward quickly with feline agility. Her right claw came flying in. Lynn’s left blocked it partially and it hit the side of her head. Her cheek is lacerated and she ducked. The left swipe of the big cat missed her head entirely. Lynn rose up and dug her own right deep into Celica’s fuzzy abbs. The predator woman grunts and back elbowed Lynn on the ear knocking her sideways.
Celica drove a right hook into Lynn’s left eye. Smack! Lynn's head snapped back and she spun halfway around. She kicked to Lynn’s thigh following up on the older oman's grogginess Thud! Lynn groaned, spinning halfway and dropping belly down. It looked bad. Celica practically pounces on the downed girl as Lynn throws both bare feet in a flailing panic kick upwards. Whether it was by design or by dumb luck, Lynn’s right heel hit Celica right on her maize crotch. The blow was so solid it sent her flying over and past Lynn crashing to the dirt as the beast cups herself and doubled over and kneeling. Lynn hefted herself up like a champ and kicked into Celica’s toothy face as she turns around. Celica’s hands partially blocked the blow. She straightened up and backed up to make a lunge, pouncing with a mighty roar. Lynn moved in and dug a fist into Celica's left breast and then a left fist to the right ear. Celica bounced back and Lynn took the punch flush on the eye. Her head rocked and she staggered back our side.
Her head rocked and she staggered back our side of the isle.. Celica came forward, but Lynn’s defensive front kick hit the cat driving a hard lunging side kick into Celica’s belly.
Celica doubled over and grabbed for Lynn’s hips to steady herself. Lynn smashed her hard in the middle of the back, but Celica drove forward. Her shoulder hit Lynn in the belly and pushed her into the ropes. Celica lay against Lynn and took slams to the back. Suddenly she drove her left fist up to the underside of Lynn’s right breast. The punch thudded into the heavy orb and lifted it up. Then I saw that it was more than a tit shot. Celica kept her fist in the underside of the tit and dropped her maw to the top side of the breast. Lynn's screams showed that the cat bitch was biting her tit!
Lynn pounded the back of Celica’s head and then her neck. Lynn’s right knee snapped outward and then twisted to hit the side of the feline’s thigh. Desperate Lynn punched her own tit with her right hand, grazing the top side just to smack Celica in the side of her exposed left eye. Lynn hammered her six times screaming with each desperate punch. The sixth time must have ruptured the a forming mouse because the golden fur of Celica’s face quickly reddened over the left eye. A seventh punch knocked Celica off Lynn’s tit.
Celica stepped back and rubbed at her eye with her arm. Lynn looked down at her right tit. There were deep bite marks along the top of the bloated breast, blood dribbled from three particularly deep bites and milk leaked from Lynn’s nipple. The animal crowd went absolutely bat shit wild. Celica gave up trying to clear up her vision. The trickle of blood in her redmust be giving her some problems since the left eye of the lion was quickly soaking through red.
Lynn smelled blood and came after the cat.
Lynn jabbed. Celica blocked and connected with a hard shot to the outside of Lynn’s right tit. Lynn still jabs and smashes Celica flat on the snout.
Celica caught Lynn on the right cheek and then the left jaw with her claws. Lynn fired a straight right through Celica’s hands and crushed her nose again. This time something ruptured and Celica was staggered. Lynn's left hit Celica on the righ cheek. Lynn drove a knee into Celica's crotch and the cat woman nearly fell forward onto her knees. Lynn started to go for a knee to the face, but Celica sweeps her legs and bring Lynn crashig down.
Lynn’s feet came out from under her and she hit hard on her ass. Celica jumped through Lynn's legs and landed on her body. Lynn closed her legs on Celica’s ass to keep her from climbing on top. As it stood Celica hit Lynn under the chin twice and continued to chop at her face while trying to get her teeth into Lynn's tits. Lynn writhed on her back, punching the top of Celica's head to keep her off her tits. Celica tried to drive in a foot, but Lynn had her own feet up. Celica's foot hit Lynn’s mound a glancing blow and then slid across her lap and to the floor leaving a terrible cut. Lynn's returning upward kick caught Celica right between the legs and actually lifted her off her feet and put her down on her ass. The crowd winced. Lynn pulled herself up. As she stood she got light headed from all the blood loss. Celica rolled onto her hands and knees and stalked Lynn on all fours. She was obviously cunt busted and was having difficulty even crawling.
Lynn recovered from her dizzy spell just as Celica managed to get up on her wobbly legs and lean her ass on a stump for support. Lynn came at her. Celica leans on a tree for it's support until the last Moment. Then she sidestepped and circled away. Lynn followed her slowly. Celica suddenly stepped forward and fired another higher kick going for Lynn's weakened belly. Lynn twisted and took the kick on the hip and grabbed the leg with her club fisted arm. Celica hopped for a second and Lynn stepped forward, hooked her foot behind Celica's other leg and pushed.
Celica hit the ground with her trapped paw still up in the air. She quickly moved to guard against a kick, but Lynn dropped straight down, driving her knee into the cat’s gut without a moment's hesitation. The crowd's roar covered Celica’s scream, but you could see the agony as she sat up straight and clawed frantically at the knee grinding into her underside. Lynn's face would have been a better target, but right then all she could think of is getting that knee away.
Lynn drove a fist straight into Celica’s chin. Her head snapped back and then Lynn climbed on top, a knee on each bicep and started a classic two handed beating of Celica's already bloodied face. She pounded Celica straight for thirty seconds. Celica heaves coughing blood under Lynn's weight She straddled the Lioness and went for the two handed choke. Celica clawed at Lynn's big soft tits leaving deep claw marks all over them, but Lynn bore down. The teen clawed higher trying to get to Lynn's face. Then the beast girl went for her own choke, but Lynn had position and just leaned back out of rrach.
Celica’s hands dropped and she started waving frantically. Deputy Dan let the choke continue until the cat girl's hands started to spasm. Then he accepted her frantic gestures as a tap. Lynn blinked and removed her thumbs from her enemy's windpipe and tried to stand, failed and then rose again on shaky legs.
"Is this the best you've got?!" taunted Lynn as she looked down at the delerious Celica with her head lolling back and forth. "Cause if it is, you're all fucked."
She had beaten two of the biggest threats in a row and looked on death's door, bloodied, near broken but still conscious She spat a glob of bloody spittle across Celica's face and stomped her tail as her parting gift as she walks away before the other beasts are able to drag their cat out of the ring to curl up and cry.
Long tall, skinny legged, the secretary bird terry was next. She had been whipping Ann's ass in the stalls for most of the free for all and I had always thought it was likely that Ann could whip Lynn's ass at least before her accomplishments today as she’d shewed through two of the perceived best fighters among the arraywd set of foes. She was in really bad shape. She moved in a circle around the small bird of paradise. On the other hand, Terry was not anxious to close with the little puglist. This turned into a very strange stalemate. They circled and circled each other.
That limber avian’s scaly knuckles at last flew at long range and smacked Lynn's face. Her nose was bleeding and Terry bops her a second time with no fisting reply as terry hops back light on her claws. With no other option in the face of such kiting tactics the older woman charged in at Terry who dodged out of the way. Lynn stopped and turned. Terry drove her right foot straight out and sank it into Lynn's lower belly in a kick with real technique behind it.
Lynn's eyes got big. She grabbed herself and fell to her knees gasping and wretching. The avian fired another kick out. This time the long skinny foot hit Lynn in the mouth. My aunt's head snapped back and she fell like she had been shot. Lynn hit the ground and didn't move. Deputy Dan stepped forward and called it a knock out. He slapped Lynn awake. Her upper and lower lips had been busted wide open. She coughed and choked as she crawled in defeat to the end of the line.
Mom was next in our order of battle. The bird began fist fighting at long range again. Mom took four or five unanswered fists to the face before she connected with a hard right to Terry’s' chin, making the bird’s crack beak bribble with blood again. The bird girl staggered to the left. Mom slammed into her and took her off her feet. They hit hard with Mom on top.
Terry snapped her long legs
around Mom's hips and prevented her from climbing on top, but Mom had other targets. Holding Terry's arms by the wrist, Mom dropped her mouth to the feathery bitch girl's pert tiny tits. Unlike the other women her tits were A-cup at best, Mom sucked those rubbery nubs into her mouth and began to chew on them with a guttural growl. Terry's screamed in a beautiful bird call and writhed under the blonde. Mom kept biting the nipples, shifting around to bite the meat and then on to the other tit.
Terry squawked and in her floundering mother was able to released herself from the scissors. Terry dug her clawed feet into the dirt and pressed up, shifting to the left and suddenly rolled Mom off. Terry crawled in the opposite direction cupping her breasts. When she looked at her feathered hands the palms were both coated in blood and downy fluff. Mom had chewed into each nipple and ravaged the tiny tits again and again, pinching gashes in the pink flesh under her plumage.
Mom stood up with feathers on her lips and went after Terry who was still on her knees nursing at her tits. At the warning of her team Terry looked up and took Mom's right knee under the chin. It was a savage shot and it put the bird girl on her back. Mom fell on top, straddled the stunned girl and started hammering her face with both fists. Deputy Dan moved forward and watched as the outmatched bird tried to protect herself. As long as she was still responding it wasn't a knockout.
Frustrated with smashing the teen's face, Mom dug her claws into the tiny bloody bumps on Terry’'s chest and ripped away, plucking handfuls of chest fluff. The white bird girl screamed and cried. She clawed my Mom's bigger tits back, but she couldn't take the savaging any longer. Terry cried out her surrender as Mom's hands were bloody up to the wrists.
Swirl’ the Rat girl was next. She was outweighed and Mom was relatively fresh. The rodent stalked Mom and took three shots to the face as she tried to close.
The fourth shot opened the pest’s lower lip and caused the animal to step backwards. Mom stepped forward and hammered her in the eye. Swirl groaned and lunged forward.
She grabbed Mom and crushed her in a classic bear hug. Mom groaned and kicked her legs until they fell over backwards. Mom kept the hug and immediately tried to bite Swirl's tits. She got her teeth into the top of the swell of the right one, but her neck was so twisted she lost control of Swirl's arms. Swirl grabbed the back of mother’s head with one hand and pulled her snapping mouth away from the red and blue tit.
Swirl's right hand ripped across the woman’s face. Mom howled as both her eyes were poked or scratched. she rolled off Swirl. Swirl climbed on her back and dragged back on the older woman’s hair bending her head back at an angle. She leaned all the way back and two handfuls of hair ripped out of Mom's head. Mom fell backwards.
Mom crawled forward trying to escape. Swirl sat up and grabbed the crawling girl's ankles and jerked her knees out from under her. Mom hit face first and moaned. The rat bent her legs upward and then down so her heels were digging into her ass cheeks. Then she sat on the legs. She bounced up and down on the legs laughing, stretching the woman in way’s she’d never done in the last 30 years. Then she started to claw the older woman’s ass with both hands. Mom banged on the ground and cursed. Swirl spread that human ass cheek and started to stick her hand down to between her hairless thighs to get at the pussy and squeezed. Just the threat of an attack at her sex had Mom squealing her surrender.
Swirl stood up smiling. The next girl in line was Denise. I hadn't seen Swirl do any fighting. By the time I had arrives Denise was already humiliating her. So I was surprised when she blocked Mom's right hand and smashed Mom in the mouth with a left. Mom hit back with her own left and got smacked with a right. Mom hammered the girl twice and
then took three shots in return. Swirl was a pretty good fighter!?
Mom grabbed the girl's whiskers and kneed her hard. Swirl bent forward and rammed her shoulders into Mom's belly. Mom bent over the girl and tried to choke her, but Swirl grabbed the back of Mom's legs and lifted her off the ground and then slammed her down hard in the dirt. Mom's legs were up in the air and Swirl pushed between them dropping her right knee onto Mom's pussy. Mom cried out and tried to kick the rat girl off, but Swirl grabbed her legs and pressed upward doubling Mom over in a matchbook.
Mom groaned as her tendons were stretched and her already wearing lungs were crushed by her own body. Swirl's supporters were yelling for her to bite off Mom's nipples. The rodent dropped her head trying to do it, but Mom had enough strength to keep squirming and threatening to throw Swirl off.
Denise yelled for Mom to just give up and take a rest. Mom heard her and surrendered before Swirl could do any more harm. Now Denise stepped forward smiling and Swirl looked sick to her stomach, memories of getting drowned in the toilet coming back to haunt her.
Swirl snarled at denise and rushed forward into the bigger woman, slamming into Denise’s belly with a flying tackle. Denise groaned and then thudded into a tree with Swirl still driving forward on her bare feet. Dust flew from the soles of Swirl’s feet as she kept pushing into her enemy’s belly. Denise regained her senses, grew angry and started hammering down both her fists onto Swirl’s shoulder blades. Swirl grunted with each blow but kept her bigger foe pinned into the wood Denise’s right leg came up in an attempt to knee Swirl, but Swirl grabbed it with her right hand and held it tight against her own body. Denise screamed in fury and pounded Swirl’s back some more. Each thud solicited a grunt from the small rat. Swirl finally responded by driving her left fist up hard into Denise’s crotch.
Swirl hooked on a choke with her right arm grabbing her left arm which slammed into the side of Denise’s face. Her left hand grabbed a wad of sweaty dirty blond hair. It almost looked like a classical pro wrestling sleeper hole and somebody yelled “sleeper!” from the crowd. Instead, it was just a very effective choke. Denise staggered around ripping at the right arm on her neck, leaving red streaks but getting no relief. Cheering and jeering picked up. Bess yelled for their teams unsung hero rat to choke out the cunt.
Denise was in trouble. She drove backwards, picking up speed with each step. The small of Swirl’s bare furry back rammed hard into the tree Swirl groaned. Her legs and arms popped open. Denise fell forward on her hands and knees gasping for breath. She crawled forward choking and coughing. Swirl was on her knees holding her back with both hands. She could barely see through the pain. Denise was still crawling away when the smaller woman forced her self up on her feet. The crowd roared its approval.
Swirl took six quick steps to Denise’s side and drove her right foot into the downed woman’s ribs. Denise groaned and set back on her ass, raising her hands defensively. Swirl grabbed the slut’s hair and drives a hard knee into the approximate area of the trapped woman’s face. Four more knees brought a clattering of human teeth tumbling out of her mouth. At that point Denise’s dead weight freed her and she fell back in the dirt. Swirl reacted to the cheers by raising her boney fist and waving it at the crowd.
Denise’s big right foot showed Swirl the serious errors of gloating. The foot disappeared under Swirl’s crotch and lifted the woman off her feet. Swirl’s mouth formed a large O and her eyes rolled back in her head. She landed on her ass and bounced twice. Then she screamed and grabbed herself. Denise’s big foot had crushed her pussy lips and her clit in one clean shot. The pain had taken air out of Swirl’s
lungs and all the muscle out of her legs. Both women’s supporters started screaming for their lady to take advantage of the situation. However, both women were content to sit on their asses in the dirt for a few moments more. Denise’s nose was pouring blood down both sides of her mouth, to her chin and then to her sweaty tits. Her eyes were slowly clearing. Swirl’s breath was returning and her legs were just begging to twitch again. The searing pain from her clit was slowly giving way to the throbbing pain from her pussy.
Denise rolled onto her hands and knees, blood still dripping into the dirt. Swirl saw the motion and did the same. She got to her feet and stays on balanced legs with arms outstretched for support. Tears mixed with sweat as she struggled to get the pain under control. So far she had out thought, out moved and out fought the big human. If she hadn’t stopped to gloat she could have kicked the shit out of the human trash whore all day long. Denise was up on her feet and testing her balance. Her fucking nose was not ready for one let alone several knees. She hated this stuck up little bitch and was not about to lose a fight to a fucking rat of all things.
Denise stalked forward, slowly with her fists ready. She was going fight her fight now, a fucking bitch brawl. Swirl moved away from the larger huma looking for a way to take her big foe down again. They circled each other. Swirl made a move toward Denise’s right leg. Denise stood her ground and countered with a perfect right upper cut to Swirl’s face. Swirl moaned and staggered back, bleeding from the mouth. Denise swung a round house left, which Swirl dodged. Swirl responded with a right left to Denise’s face. Denise grunted and drove her own right straight into Swirl’s nose. Swirl staggered backwards again, blood dripping from both nostrils. Come on Denise you can keep it up! Denise swung again. Swirl dodged again, but found herself against the side of the bushes
Denise’s next shot took her on the right ear. Swirl charged forward. Her dark nails buried themselves in my cousins matted hair and a knee went up into Denise’s crotch. Denise fell backwards with a groan and Swirl went down on top of her, ripping hair. They landed with a thud. Swirl straddled hips and banged her head on the dirt floor. Denise screamed and groaned with each thud. Her own hands went to Swirl’s face and clawed.
Denise’s nails ripped open Swirl’s cheeks and stopped the head banging. Swirl grabbed Denise’s wrists and pulled the claws away. The bigger woman planted her feet in the wet dirt and pushed up, bucking Swirl forward. Swirl flopped down onto of Denise’s bloody face. As they wrestled with each other’s arms, Denise continued to bridge up and Swirl rode her thick belly.
Suddenly the grunting and moaning of the two women was broken by Swirl’s screams. Swirl rolled frantically on her side and grabbed at Denise’s hair. Denise rolled on top. As the big woman’s face was pulled back by the hair it was obvious that her teeth had been working on Swirl’s pelt around the breasts As Denise’s head was pulled back, her mouth continued to try and bite, angling for her molars to get a clamping grig as much of her front teeth were already knocked out. Her teeth snapped close just a fraction of an inch from Swirl’s erect nipples. Swirl closed her legs behind Denise’s back. Her ankles crossed and she snapped on a perfect scissors hold. Her strong thighs flexed and big thigh muscles stood out on her dirty legs. The onlookers appreciated the smaller woman’s fitness. Denise grunted and realized she was in another trap. This little bitch was a good wrestler. Denise moaned as her ribs flexed and lungs constricted. Swirl’s hands were slowly pulling Denise’s hair out, but her teeth were out of the fight. But that left Denise with two free hands. She grabbed the rolling boobs just out of reach of her teeth.
Denise’s thick fingers and big hands sank deep into the yielding flesh. Swirl groaned as her boobs were crushed by human fists. Denise had both boobs by their bases. Swirl’s rack was constricted into two small cylinders by her fists. Then they ballooned like strange nipple topped mushrooms over the tops of Denise’s hands. Swirl moaned and tightened her scissors hold. Denise responded with a more desperate groan. Then the big woman pulled her hands outward and twisted trying to wrench Swirl’s trapped tits off her chest. This was too much for the smaller woman.
Swirl screamed and twisted her head from side to side as her boobs were mauled. She couldn’t release Denise’s hair or the bitch’s snapping teeth would dine on her bulging nipples. Swirl tried to roll her big assed foe off her using the scissors, but nothing worked. Denise pulled, crushed, twisted and kneaded the tit flesh while her weight and spread legs maintained her superior position. Denise’s ribs and lungs were screaming, but Swirl’s muscles had reached their limit and the legs were beginning to weaken and spasm. Swirl finally released her scissors and tried to roll Denise off with her feet and knees. That didn’t work. Swirl twisted hair into her left fist and doubled her efforts with her left hand. She moved her right hand to the side of Denise’s face and gouged her thumb into Denise’s left eye.
That got the big bitch screaming and rolling. As Denise escaped so did Swirl. Her boobs bounced back into shape, but they were bruised, dirty, bitten, clawed and swelling visibly. Swirl got to her feet checking her boobs and backing away. She was finished with this fucking fight. Dan blocked the way and pushed her back into the center. Denise got up rubbing her eye.
“You tried to put out my fucking eye!?”
“You were trying to tear off my fucking tits. What's wrong with you? You fight like an animal! And That’s coming from me a literal animal!.”
Denise moved forward with a hard left that grazed Swirl’s right cheek. Swirl fired back with a right straight into Denise’s mouth. Denise’s head snapped back and her upper lip opened up, but the big woman wasn’t stopped. Swirl got caught with Denise’s right fist between the eyes. Swirl staggered back blinking. Denise’s left landed on her nose. Swirl’s head snapped around leaving a spray of sweat and fresh blood. She staggered drunkenly to away. Denise grabbed the back of her head and dragged her in a staggering circle. Denise released her at full speed and Swirl smashed into the side of a tree.
The crowd groaned in sympathy as Swirl started to fall. Denise rammed into her rat foe’s back driving Swirl’s face tits and body back into the wood. Swirl grunted. Denise leaned hard into her foe, pinning her to the wall. Then the big bitch grabbed the back of Swirl’s head again and started pounding her face into the unyielding wall. Soon the bark was stained with Swirl’s blood and bits of her skin. Swirl was basically limp. Denise finally exhausted herself and stepped back, pulling Swirl back by the fur. Swirl’s collapse was immediate. Denise let her rat fall backwards like a domino. Swirl bounced once in the dirt and lay still, blood covered her face and breasts. She was flat out on her back and helpless.
Denise raced her big foot and stomped down on both of Swirl’s tits. Then she stood on her belly and posed for the hooting crowd. Somebody said something about stripping the little cunt. Denise wiped the blood of her own face and suddenly thought she liked that idea. She took aim and buried her foot into Swirl’s wide open belly three times. Swirl finally curled up in the fetal position preventing further damage. Denise walked around behind her and started stomping on the rat’s ribs. Swirl groaned and withered across the floor trying to avoid the big feet. Frustrated, Denise grabbed her rat foe’s right foot and dragged her onto
her back. Holding the foot against her left thigh, Denise grabbed the left foot and trapped against her right thigh. She looked to her cheering admirers, raised her right foot and teased them for a moment and then stomped down on swirl’s pussy. Denise ground her dirty foot back and forth across Swirl’s mound. After she had left smeared footprints on Swirl?s belly and mound she wiggled her big toe inside Swirl’s vaginal lips and stepped down on the back of Swirl’s vagina. Swirl’s scream mixed with the cheers and laughter of the not at all merciful crowd of humans. Denise tired of toe fucking. She took aim and slammed ten hard kicks into Swirl’s now dirty pussy. Somewhere as the crowd counted, Swirl passed out and Dan shoo’s Denise away for the now well and truly depressed clique of anthros to retrieve the body of their rodent representative.
However, Denise had nothing left. Even worse she was facing Stud, a 17 year old male in the next fight. He was almost my sister’s height, just less than her full 5’10’’ and he weighed probably a hard 300 pounds. It was a total mismatch and I whispered to my sister to just give up at the first punch. I wanted her to save herself for the next round, but like I said Denise is not the brightest bulb in our family lighting tree.
Denise stood up and wobbled forward. Stud moved quickly. He smashed his left fist into Denise’s right eye, knocking the big blonde backwards into a bush. The punch opened her swollen right cheek. She moaned and rested there, her fists still raised. He feigned in and drew my sister’s ball kick. He was obviously experienced in scrap. He caught my sister’s foot on his left thigh, grabbed her ankle, trapped her leg and replied with his right foot straight into her crotch. Denise screamed and her knee failed her. She ended up on her ass with one leg bent under her and the other held against Stud’s thigh. He moved in and stomped his right hoof down hard on her belly, then on her mound and finally he stomped down on her swollen right boob crushing it flat as he practically stood up on her tit.
Stud grabbed my sister’s long hair and dragged her on her hands and knees into a tree. He waved off his whooping and hollering band of allies and proceeded to spread Denise’s ass cheeks. My battered sister screamed as his rock hard horsecock pushed into her puckered hole in one brutal push. He slammed his hips against her again and again as he pushed his fourteen inches deep into her asshole. Denise screamed and pounded the floor as she was ass- raped without mercy. Denise grunted and cried out surrender. He finally whinnied in pleasure as he let himself blow a load on hearing those words Stud pumped a full load inside her. He pulled out and curb stomped the girl on the head.
her nightmare. Je got ready for the next round as denise is dragged back to our camp. bruised and swollen face looking onto the scene.
Stud strutted back. He pointed to ann and said“I got this for you too, little cunt girl.”
Ann was seriously in trouble. She was outweighed by about a hundred pounds and up against a fit young male with no compunctions about beating her to a pulp. I started to suggest she take a dive, but my mother took over as team captain and told her to tear into him and soften him up.
ann and Stud started. He circled her waiting for a crotch kick. ann started talking to him. After about thirty seconds my cheerleading sister had replaced his confident smile with pure macho fury. I sure hope she knew what she was doing because he was going to beat her to a pulp now and grudge rape her senseless. He rushed her. She ducked under him and drove her right fist into underside of his jaw. It must have hurt him because he staggered away from it. ann jumped on him from behind and took him down to his knees. She snapped on a choke hold and tried for a quick victory.
Stud was on his knees with both hands trying to get ann’s forearm out of his neck. She pressed her head against the side of his and bit into shoulder. Now he was screaming. Stud reached back over his shoulder with one hand and kept his other on ann’s choking arm. He grabbed a big handful of her hair and pulled. ann groaned and bit harder. Stud pulled harder and then jerked forward trying to toss ann over his back. My sister’s legs tried to clamp around his back, but he was doubled over and tight. ann screamed as a handful of hair was ripped out of her head. Stud screamed as my sister’s teeth went to work on the side of his neck.
Stud exploded in rage. He lurched forward and rose up on his knees. ann’s bloody teeth came free. She had not succeeded in putting on a vampire bite, but she did have his ear bleeding and his neck had deep impressions in the skin. Lurching
back and forth, Stud took advantage of their now sweat covered bodies. ann slid around to the side and was unable to keep the bastard from getting his elbow working into her belly and up into her tits. It took six hard shots and a lot of twisting to get ann totally out of position. Once there Stud fell to the side on top of her.
ann grunted, but maintained her hold, now converted into a brutal headlock. She hooked her left foot around behind him and across his ass, but he trapped her other leg under his left knee and thigh. Stud was still tied up and hurting, but now he could use both hands against my smaller sister. At first nothing he did could shake her off. Then he just started swing blindly at all angles at her face. He couldn’t get in a direct punch but his big black stallion fists were still connecting hard to every part of her face and head as she twisted her face back and forth. Stud pushed forward with his hooves and basically pushed the top of his head into her chin and bent her head back. ann moaned and started hammering his kidneys with her left heel. Stud grunted with the rapid fire kicking, but he continued his facial attack. ann’s nose was soon dribbling blood.
Finally ann’s head was jammed against aclump of thorns. Once there, the bastard reached up for ann’s swelling face and started to blindly maul her features with his blunt fingers. I’ll give my sister all the credit she deserves. She held on and even managed to catch his right index finger in her mouth. He yelled and pounded at her head wildly with his left fist as she tried to bite off his finger. His fist finally rocked her and he pulled back his bloody finger
He pushed off the bush and finally got some distance between them. ann was wide open now. He grabbed her left breast with his wounded hand. The bastard sank his fingers i her tit and pressed down to push himself up. ann’s arms finally unlocked from his head and he rose up gratefull that ann was trapped against
ann was trapped against the bushes on her back with one leg pinned outward onto the ground and the other now up around his hip. Her head was jammed up against the nobby bits. Her boob was being crushed and now her tormentor was above her with one fist free. Stud started pounding her belly with his left fist. ann responded by clawing down his chest leaving deep bloody furrows in his black pelt. Try as she might her muscle shield could not hold and his hard fist was soon sinking in deep. She grunt and groaned. Finally she had to try and cover herself.
Stud used that moment to shift. Suddenly he was astride her hips with both fists working. ann took the merciless pounding. Soon her mouth was split. Her left eyebrow split. Still she refused to stop. She even tried to get to his cock with her claws. The feel of her nails ripping at his lower belly drove Stud to take aim and drive his right fist straight into my sister’s left eye. She saw it coming and turned away. His fist crunched into the side of her head just behind ear. He groaned and grabbed his hand. I thought she had him for a second, but ann was knocked out. I yelled she was out. Stud didn’t need to be pulled off. He rolled over still holding his right hand. The larger horse man and I are already squaring up as the others in our family shuffle onto the field and retrieve ann.
I circled my bigger opponent. Stud was more then just fit, the dude was an olympian. Up close he was just plain scary and brutal looking. His dark eyes had a dull malice in them and his lips, slightly fuller than a European's were twisted in an excited snarl. His large, elongated horse ock, excellent targets, was slightly perked in anticipation for being able to rut for a bit of post battle fun and clearly excited at the prospect of battle. This was a real blood thirsty brute and he wouldn’t have a cop car hitting him as an interference this time around.
The Horse lunged, throwing a hard left straight for my chest.
It was a strong, but surprising fast punch. I decided to avoid it rather than endure the shock of blocking it. The big guy’s fist just missed. The wind of its passage played across my already sweaty skin. I fired automatically under the sweep of the left club driving all four of my knuckles straight into the dark furred muscular chest of stud. My shoulder jerked on impact and I felt the solidness of the muscle flesh being deformed, crushed and bruised by that very first strike. It was easily one of the most solid body punches I had ever performed.
Stud’s dark eyes flared and his nostrils twitched. A low, grumbling voice grunted and he staggered backwards against his will. The Boy’s eyes showed the irritation and a slight groan passed his lips. I had hoped for more to be honest.
Instead the Horse found his balance on hooved legs and drove his right fist into My left side. The knuckles hit the skin and scored it immediately driving between the ribs and hurting bad. I staggered to the side propelled by the solid power of the big draft animal and twisted back into the horse, not making the mistake of turning my back because of the pain. The Horse had already started his knee moving and I blocked it with a hip thrust surprising the Stallion by slamming into his big body rather than retreating.
In close, I drove a left fist up into the underside of Stud’s rock hard belly sending all four pyramids into the flesh driving them upward and dragging the entire mass upwards. The horse groaned more deeply. The underside of his massive tit was apparently more vulnerable than the frontal meat. I rotate my hips and drove my right fist up and speared Stud’s left kidney in much the same way. The horse groaned again and clamped his arms around me holding on, blocking any further gut shots.
Our chests pressed together, skin against naturally dark silky black fur. I felt the beast’s big arms tightening. I wanted to head butt, but Stud had his teeth on my
scalp. I screamed bloody murder and pushed against the big brute’s body, but there was nothing to do but endure a bear hug for a moment. I felt the power in Stud’s draft animal arms and forced myself slowly relax and breathe against the crush. The grip was too high to bend my back, but it was trapping my arms below my waist and compressing my lungs, not to mention the stick of horse clock awkwardly grinding up against my own smaller set. Stud’s black shaft dug into my flesh and stifled her shock, but Stud was face to face with me and smiled knowingly.
The Horse snarled, “My schooner just whipped yours and we both know it. I'm going to hurt you so bad. You'll remember this day for the rest of your life, the day I took your body apart and then put a fat one in your whole family human. You'll eat my shit after this.”
I spit in the guy’s eye, technically not a foul. The Horse blinked and turned his head actually hurt for the moment. I hooked my feet around the stalion’s thick legs and dug my heels into the back of the bigger animal man’s knees.This is where experience and just having a higher iq makes the difference I thought as the Beastman’s legs began to buckle.
Instead of releasing me or falling to his knee he actually threw me backwards. I hadn't been monitoring the progress across the big ring and was stunned as I crashed into the camp of other anthros all piled up unconscious. Tripping on body of Swirl and getting cushioned by her. I saw Stud come into view from behind and reflexively protected my crotch and crossed my arms to prevent a head stomp. Instead, Stud stepped forward and fired a curb stomp which I had to pivot out of the way from. His big hoof hit the Rodent’s body below me. The black hoof heel sank into the rodent's lower belly I however was making a lunge to grab for the leg. The bigger slower Horse fell for it and jerked his hoof back and stamped on the ground preparing to knock me senseless me with his big fists.
Instead I came off the convulsing rat’s body and drove a right knee upward just as Stud was coming in to ground and pound me. He understood too late and started to close his thighs. The eight inch gouge passed between his thighs and drove into his dangling softball sized eggs, and driving one up into his crotch.
Stud actually squealed! Our side of the crowd roared. I felt the testes of Stud dig into the upper wall of Muscles and then jerked my knee upward and back making sure that studs nuts were well buried under the pubic bone. Stud moaned and curled up. He drove his fists down on my skull. The blow hurt and would leave deep bruises but it was a trade of blows anyone would take.
I’m able to kick apart his legs again and the horse’s hoof slides open letting me bring my other knee up into much the same spot and Stud’s pained whinnny tapers off into nothing as he bleats and whinnies cupping himself with one hand dropping to his knees. I definitely heared the crackle of something getting permanently damaged down there.
Stud understood he had been out maneuvered and glared at me as I stood up and sent side kick right along his cheek driving in the sole which sent spittle flying. The horse moaned deeply and was getting back up to his feet trying to deflect my one onslaught with one arm as a left fist repeated the journey to his head in the form ofan uppercut clacking stud’s teeth together. Again the big man moaned and staggered, but he was made of stiffer stuff then most and didn't fall.
Instead, Stud snarled, “Get it in deep you tricky cunt! I want to remember how bad it hurt when I get my turn in eviscerating your human tool.”
I smiled and replied, “Keep talking stupid and I’ll triple down on busting your sack by branding your draft animal ass right on the crotch.”
Before Stud could reply, I drove my now well accomplished nutcracking left knee right up into the big boy’s cupped testes. The strike didn't catch the hanging orbs
because he was still shielding himself with a hand, but I saw his face still twist in pain. We both knew how bad it hurt.
One nut broken, stud stalked me around the big circle, huffing and gritting his teeth. I fired quick shots at the chest and hit twice. Stud threw looping shots and missed everything but my arms and ribs, but when the horse hit me I was jarred. My cheering family grows restless as the early fast action had slowed. Stud wasn't fast enough anymore to close and I showed no inclination to get in and try to risk myself in a grapple with a beast who could still tear me limb from limb.
After taking another shot straight to his nose there's a steady dribble, Stud lunged forward like a bull. I side stepped him and drove a kick up at an angle so it took him in the belly as he passed. The blow doubled the brute over and spun me around in a circle. I moved in from behind to punt Stud in the nuts again, but this time Stud was feinting, or maybe he was just on edge about nut shots. As I got within range the big beast mule kicked back slamming his big hook into my center of mass. I felt ribs cracking and actually went flying for a hot second there,
Stud spun around and he hammered down on my back while i am getting back up. The hammer blow knocked me to my knees. I turn and cross my arms defensively, but the horse powered through it. It went in hard to the face sending my head spinning in a strike so hard that were luck particularly mean to me in that moment I suspect thatstud could have broken my neck.
Stud drove his other leg up into my chest. I howled as the spearing knee penetrated my belly and threatened to burst something. My gut deformed and showed the impression of the impact as it appeared and I fell back on my heels. I screamed a fraction of a second later as the extraordinary agony finally was felt over the throbbing of my head.
Stud paused to enjoy his work. His vengeful eyes focused on my junk but I was not the type to
be incapacitated by pain or at least I knew that would be bye bye nuts if Stud got his way. The fraction of time Stud had wasted was enough. As the Stalions’s arm started down, My right foot smashed up into the male’s danglers and it struck home with a loud crunch. The horse formerly titled as Stud yelped as it's pride was flattened between it's pelvis, with nothing to absorb the shock those testicles popped.
The stunning blow seemed to make Stud go rigid, .The Horse fell backwards the length of his body hitting almost as one. His legs closed with his hands going down to try and ease the pain a long silent scream whistling out of his gruff throat.
I climbed on top of the downed creature’s thighs and drove my fists like hammers into the big guy’s lower belly. The blows sank in and the horse sat up to respond.. Stud screamed in murderous rage. His legs came up and clamped around my hips. Now his busted crotch was up in the air and in position for a spearing if I could get my knee back, but the Horse’s hip scissoring actually protected him. I struggled but couldn't get a knee into it again. While Stud hammered at the my straight arms. I lost my strangle. Suddenly I was rolled onto my back and the Horse was pulling himself up.
He threw a punch at my face reflexively and luckily missed. I hammered the guy’s chest with two right left combinations knocking Stud backwards and back to the ground flatly and we both scramble to get up.
Of course Stud’s troubles were all too apparent. He was now spotting an ugly bruised set of purple bags where his nuts used to be. I danced around Stud and noted that he was even slower now that his groin injuries had had time to flame up on him. I started peppering the guy’s exposed face with fists. Stud’s big swings were blocked, but bruises were already appearing on my arms and shoulders. I moved in closer and drove a straight right into the bigger anthro’s nose.
Renewed I was all over him with flying fists. Stud fired back. I hit him five times to three and cleaner as well. But Stud was stronger. Soon the beast’s face was a bloody mess. His nose was swelling, cheeks were swelling, his mouth was ripped open and one of his ears was rapidly puffing up into a cauliflower. In return he had ripped open my right cheek with a left cross and put a knot on my forehead, I was not much of a looker right now. I was beating his ass to a pulp. Stud had an eyebrow rupture under the pressure of a lucky hit. Now his left eye would be full of blood! In frustration he swung a hard right. I bobbed to the side and the fist ripped along the side of my head skinning me again but giving Stud no knockout blow. The My fists came in like bees. Stud felt his lips being ground to pieces by his teeth and the pounding of knuckles. His left cheek was ripped open and now his left eye was swelling shut from above and below!
My next punch crashed into the Horse’s nose, already bloodied. Stud staggered a moment. My knee rose toward his crotch. Stud took the strike well. He coughed blood and screamed. no nutshot agony? I guess his balls must already be busted.
Stud tried to head hunt again, missed again and paid for it again. I was out fighting him! The horse took the hammering like a champ at least. Another nasty twisting fist hit Stud's already ruined lips and almost ripped off a portion of the upper lip. The spray of blood and pain drove the big anthro to drive his right fist straight downward. It sank into my navel and drove me back. Stud looked at me using his one good eye.
The creature lumbered forward despite having a face that looked more like a bloody monster mask than a face. How many times had I hit him? I had pumped fist after fist into the bloody maul, twisting the knuckles into the flesh, dragging the knuckles across the wounds, hitting the split places again and again. The draft horse's face and upper body were coated
in blood now and still he lumbered forward. Right now there was no doubt as to who was winning the fight, but the last thing I wanted to do was meet this monster’s full force hits while the beast could still stand.
Stud got too close. I dodged and kicked to the back of the big guy's left leg. The foot hit hard and he cried out. His leg collapsed and he fell to his knees. I leaned forward and drove my left arm back under the brute's chin to keep him from falling forward. Then I drove my left knee into the middle of stud’s shoulder to keep him from falling backwards. I raised the right elbow and drove it down past the anthro's flaccid attempt at a block and down into his upward pointing face. I speared his cranium good, drew my arm back and went for another strike in lieu of a quick reaction from the horse. Stud’s head snapped back and forth and his blood and sweat splattered in every direction.
He howled and jerked forward on unsteady legs. Despite my bracing and superior position the sudden surge of mad animal barreled me over and in that moment the stallion suddenly slumped and the naked body of the horse fell face forwards on top of me as I started beating what at the time I hadn’t realized was a dead horse. it took three body shots before i caught on that Stud wasn’t moving and from there it was the better part of a minute or so that it took me to roll the body off my chest to the whooping cheers of the crowd as I posed over Stud's hunk of a body.
Denise and Ann crawled to where Stud was. The guy still wasn't moving. He had been knocked the hell out. When Ann got there she drove her right fist into the swollen sack that ballooned out from under his impressive cock. Even that punch didn't wake him up. Denise grabbed the ball sack and crushed it with both hands. Disappointed that she got no reaction she grabbed the flaccid cock and bit into its massive head until blood ran down its shaft. She chewed down the length of the shaft taking
pleasure in hurting the big cock that would been used to knock her up with equine babies if Stud had won.. Satisfied with leaving his cock bloody from tip to root Aunt Irene rested on his body, keeping one hand ready to crush his balls and the bloody shaft of his cock near her mouth. If Big Dick did wake up he was going to have one sorry couple of months even if his balls could even be saved since we were sure he had suffered massive hemorrhaging throughout the brain with how long I had been laying into his head, the guy was to stubborn and tough for his own good as the girls all picked out some beast bitches to have their ways with in general while I laid around to catch my breath.
Amy was fondling the Horse’s moher’s muscular chest while simultaneously slipping a finger into her pussy, my rod was hardened as I nodded and gulped. "You've got a bit of a crush on her, don't you~?"
I didn't reply, but the shade of pink that my face turned told amy everything without my needing to say a word,
"You wanna fuck her, pump your load in her tight cunt~? Who am I to tell you you can’t have your pick of the litter as it were. You were a real scale tipper.”
My sister wound me up even further, she was herself on the high of a victory and i knew she would never behave like this normally, actually admitting that her dumb brother had made the difference when things got hairy with the hairy ones.
amy grabbed Bess by her shoulders and rolled the Horse onto her belly, clutching the back of her head and turning her muzzle towards me, pushing a few fingers inside of her warm maw and opening up her mouth, that large tongue lolling out the corner of her maw as strings of saliva stretched down. I crouched down as i looked at her, utterly mesmerized by the sight, one hand clutching my cock and the other feeling around the loose jaw hinge of Bess shutting and prying the black mare’s mouth and exploring around the unconscious girl with my fingers working to pry out a loose tooth to keep as a bit of a war trophy. While amy played around with her ‘ride’ lounging on the larger woman’s back and taking selfies of herself.
"Go on, you know you can take her on, you big dumb boy, you beat her son after all~"
Not needing to be told twice, I frantically shuffled over to the napping mare, dick standing at rapt attention bouncing against my skin leaving wetness just below my navel as the thing was already dripping a couple flecks of precum onto the onyx snout of the horse girl.
Still with some caution I line myself up & grab her head with both hands bringing her busted slackjawwed lips right up to the tip my breath shudders as I feel the horse’s
floppy tongue rolling across my shaft while i explore inside her. Just having her mouth wrapped around my pole at all was enough to make me pant with uncontrollable joy, combining that fantasy with one where i was literally fucking the losing man’s mother made it literally beyond words. Amy the cruel imp that she was hums out a threatening snarl which i’ll admit did spook me thinking that the onyx inert horse in my hands had come back to the waking world for a second to bite my junk off. I hammer blow the top of Bess’s head and hear amy’s snickering but at least she makes it up by nudging that throat of BESS that little bit deeper. She was a colossal bitch and a thug, and I knew it couldn't be happening to a more deserving horse. I carefully shift my hips forward, slightly clumsily humping her muzzle as I held back my moan in front of amy by leaning in and hugging tight in an almost fetal position nestling the precious equine’s head between my legs.
"Nnnnggghh!!..." I’d half expected Bess to wake with a grunt and chomp my dick clean off in detestment of my defiling her. That didn't happen, though. Ess remained perfectly silent, even as I began thrusting erratically and breathing heavier so good girl.. Or maybe it’s bad girl? Whatever. While I got busy with Bess’s maw, Amy beams and wraps a hand around the base of celica’s tail as she starts giving it her all to heft the larger horsewomen into a bit of a half circle bringing her ass next to her head for my convenience as the mare’s legs spread across the floor her body curling from a crescent to a near-complete circle. Nevertheless, Bess still didn't wake up. Didn't even stir.
My sister then grabbed a handful of Bess’s pliant asscheek and pulled her legs aside, revealing her pink slit.
No further invitation was required for me to switch holes as I clamber atop the vaginal offering, looking down at a pair of haunches that even in this tenderly bruised state quiver as I split ass.
Every time my shaft goes in and out exhausted though I was a broad grin was plastered across my face like a child with a christmas gift. I pulled a hand back and smacked the beastwomen’s right buttock, experimentally a harsh clap echoing around the area and causing Bess’s legs to mindlessly kick out and her pussy to clench. Between me and Amy both our smiles were rising. "God I love that sound,'' amy whispered as her hand now groped that cheek with a hard grip. Another quick slap was given to Bess’s plush ass. It was simply too enticing to watch how the tense powerful hindquarter musculature of Bess reacted to the swats,
Amy laughed a bit as she backed off testing if how she’d propped the girl up was stable before, letting me have her all to myself for a bit, she’d had enough hands on time with these untamed anthros for a lifetime already. "Go crazy man, hell, when we're finished you can bend her over your knees and spank her for every time she's insulted or threatened our family today.'' Taking amy’s cue I begin feeling the contractions of an orgasm in progress and jam it up her vent. Cum bursts into the Mare’s pussy, spilling into her mature womb, her tail flicking about, her mind subconsciously aware of the breeding even if she wasn't awake. I felt the ringleader of this vicious little band of beast’s vent closing around the tip of my cock with amy’s sweet nothings cheering me on. Bess’s steaming pufts of exhalation was consensating on my balls as they clapped away against the big girl’s face. I’ve no shame in admitting that i straight up whimpered and mentally fell apart during these golden strokes. amy needed to intervene on my behalf keeping me upright and comparatively steady lest i fall over during the act. Amy, blessedly knowing my needs in the moment, came over and held up from falling over and there was no question that her holding me helped ground my mind in the moment as i neared my release.
I hadn’t considered the possibility of blacking out from the violent intensity of a single orgasm but, looking back on it, I could guess how close I'd come to the edge as began slinging thick pearly ropes of cum deep inside the belly of the beast whitewashing her womb with spunk of a hated enemy. “Hoouunhhfuuuck”… I'd never cum so hard and doubted I'd ever do so again. But I made the moment count, soaking her rough milf womb rounding out her midsection with a little viscous lump of warmth; a 'gift' by her better, fair trade for me having extracted one of her teeth as a trophy.
My hands dug into the twin swells of ass, feeling and kneading the musculatur. Brushing up and down her back.
My peak having passed the reality of my being spent comes full force and I fall forwards into of the unconscious mare, her pelt and muscles as good place to rest oneself as any. My softening tool still plugging the hole as my body give little micro-humps in the aftershocks. I am still gasping erratically in disbelief at what I’d just accomplished. If i spontaneously died in the next 15 seconds of a heart attack it would be with no regrets. Alas I did not die, and as senses returned I marveled at the outcome of my efforts, Bess’s rumbling hum of a steady breath and the wider situation throughout the arena were that of mutual camaraderie over a scattering of beasts who still lay motionless or had only just now have started to deliriously writhe around in the dirt.
We said our goodbyes to officer Dan who patched us up with his medical kit and sent us on our way with the anthros as our prisoners.
Mom had us check us into a hotel so they could clean up. The battle had taken its toll, but all the family were jolly over what these beast’s could sell at auction.
I sat in the corner of the van letting the bumps in the road and a tight anthro pussy stroke me off to dreamland on the ride back to civilization.

I love the idea of being able to just grab any random anthro woman and just have your way with her. Doesn't matter who, where, or when, just grab her, rip off her clothes, bend her over the nearest available surface, and have at it. You could do it in broad daylight, in front of hundreds of witnesses, and no one will say anything because the human man does as he pleases. And once you're done you can just zip up and leave her there, with your cum leaking out of her. If she can still speak afterwards she might even thank you for the honor of blessing her womb with your human seed.

Unfortunately that kind of society would probably have anthro broads mobbing any human male that dares set foot outside their door, begging to be fucked raw and granted human babies. While that sounds like fun at first, imagine that day after day. Your morning commute would be hell.
>Get swarmed by anthros on the train to work
>That's the third time this week
>It's only wednesday
>There's even some fubois in the mob
>They won't let up till you filled them all with your cream
>Making you mis your stop
>Again
>Your dick hurts and your balls feel hollow
>Your boss is going to have your head
>Not because you're late again
>Because you promised to fill her up every day in exchange for that promotion

>implying a human male would be stuck with a mere desk job and would need to make commutes or even use public transportation
Realistic in that type of setting humans would be nobility or celebrities
Humans would likely also be quite rare
Most children with anthro females might heir some human/human like traits, but the birth of a new full human would be a news worthy event

Introduction:
Hello, /Collared/ !
Welcome to my Pokémon Sexual Analysis (PSA)! I am Professor Harkness!
In each of my PSA’s, we will be looking at, and ranking, a particular Pokémon’s sexual capabilities, as well as some tips and tricks on taming Pokémon. For my first PSA, we’ll be looking at Pokémon number 001, Bulbasaur!
General Overview:
>One might see this unassuming Grass/Poison type and dismiss it, but there’s a reason it was the first pokemon given to rookies back in the day.
>Bulbasaur, especially the females, are incredibly relaxed in nature, but not to the point of being placid, as the humble Slowpoke tends to be.
>Instead, Bulbasaur are loyal and friendly, perfect for a novice trainer, such as yourself.
>They’re easy to feed too. Just water and sunlight.. or any other liquid you feel like feeding them will do fine as well.
>Finding them in the wild is a rare sight, but if you do, don’t hesitate to have some fun with any of them. I have not once observed a violent outburst from a female Bulbasaur.
Sexual Analysis:
>Speaking of, being a smaller pokemon, only weighing 15 pounds, one can’t be too rough with them, even though their cute asshole and tight-looking pussy for an entire battle can wear on a trainer. Their pussies are fairly flexible, and very wet if given time to warm up.
>For those with smaller packages (not me), it can be a very enjoyable sensation. For me, I find them a bit tight. Results may vary.
>A Bulbasaur’s ass, on the other hand, is extremely flexible, requiring little to no lube, due to sap secretions on and around this area. When your cock is inside of its ass, it feels like she’s really trying to milk you!
>I would not recommend oral with a Bulbasaur, however. As inviting as her wide tongue may look, armed with an aphrodisiac-imbued saliva.
>Bulbasaur are not exactly the brightest pokemon, not always knowing the difference between a poke-treat and a dick. This may lead to a very embarrassing hospital visit, considering those fangs they have for self-defense.
>Thrillseekers still might have some fun with their spit, but, it is in my professional opinion to simply use it as lube for your other exciting ventures with this beginner friendly-Pokémon!
Care: 10/10
Vaginal: 6/10
Anal: 8/10
Oral: 3/10
Relationship Bonus: +1
>Very friendly, but they don’t tend to fall in love with their trainers, due to their lower intelligence.
Final Rating: 7.75

I’m Professor Harkness, and today, we’ll be looking at the elusive Psychic type, Abra!
General Overview:
>In the Kanto region, where it’s native, Abra is known as an extremely rare Pokemon, popular among trainers and enthusiasts for its association with good fortune and strength in battle, when evolved.
>However, unlike a lot of rare Pokemon, population estimates tend to place them as quite numerous. This is because of their relatively unique way of avoiding capture- Teleportation.
>An unprepared trainer only has one chance to throw a Pokeball and hope for the best.
>However, as your most generous and esteemed professor often does, I have a pro tip if you’re dead-set on this slumbering feline!
>If you’ve got a Pokemon that can give an Abra a rude awakening, waking it up can actually delay its teleport. Pokemon like Golbat and Misdreavus can learn the “Mean Look” technique to startle it! This should give you plenty of time to weaken and catch it!
>The trials don’t end even when your ball clicks shut on a successful capture, however.
>Getting an Abra to listen to you is a taxing endeavor of its own. This cat likes sleeping 18 hours a day.
>You should be aware of its sleep schedule, always being awake when it is. Each Abra’s waking hours differ completely.
>Abra are highly intelligent and are even known to be able to communicate telepathically, but this requires a high amount of training and trust.
>When it’s awake, as of many feline Pokemon, it’s often selfish and mischievous. Someone like Oak or Birch might tell you something dumb like; “Care for it” or “Take time to know it!”.
>I prefer a different method of training..
Sexual Analysis:
>Like mentioned above, a captured Abra can be quite the handful, taunting you and teleporting you when you don’t expect it, but I have a wonderful, proven way of dealing with that.
>Lust after your Abra when she’s sleeping. Masturbate to her. Stare at her private bits, blow your load on her. Whatever. Just don’t try to fuck her in this state.
>She might wake up and knock you out with a Confusion attack. Very painful.. Not that I would know.
>I discovered this method not too long ago in a purely scientific setting.
>Abra, being a novice with its powers, needs to focus and rest to keep in tune with them.
>But when there’s a horny trainer messing with her mojo, she starts absorbing your desires, so to speak. Like a sort of osmosis.
>In a few weeks, you should start to see her warm up to you, follow your commands.
>You might also notice that she’s a bit more clumsy than before. This is normal.
>Rinse and repeat ad-nauseam.
>Over time, you’ll notice her labia show moisture when she sleeps.
>Eventually, during her waking hours, she’ll present her pussy to you, wagging her tail suggestively.
>Whatever you do, DON’T give in and ravage her.
>You MUST let her become desperate.
>After she presents to you at least four or five times, you can consider her properly tamed and love her to your heart's content!
>Now, just how is she once you’ve gone through all of this trouble?
>Her pussy is tight. REALLY tight. Perhaps too tight for some, but if you followed my steps, it should be wet enough for all but the biggest of cocks to break into.
>Seeing your dick bulge in a freshly-deflowered Abra’s tummy is something every man should experience at least once in his life.
>When an Abra cums, she’ll send out a psychic wave, opening her mouth. Abra has no vocal cords, communicating through psychic waves, you see.
>This particular wave makes anyone very close instantly achieve an orgasm. It’s a truly wild time.
>For her anus, unless you’re of the small variety, I wouldn’t bother. It’s much too tight for any more than your tongue or a finger. Though her expression will be adorable if you give her some attention in this area.
>Abra are proficient cocksuckers. Being a very smart pokemon, it’s easy to teach her the way you like it.
>They also seem to lack inhibitions and will worship any part of you with their mouths once tamed, if a rimjob is something you want from this bratty tsundere of a Psychic type!
Score:
Care: 3/10
Vaginal: 9/10
Anal: 2/10
Oral: 8/10
Relationship Bonus: +2
>It’s hard to build that psychic link between you and an Abra, but very possible. There are some trainers who are privileged enough to consider this Pokemon more than a pet, but not many.
Final Rating: 7.5

I’m Professor Harkness, and today, we’ll be looking at the illustrious Normal-type, Lopunny!
General Overview:
>Native to the Sinnoh region, Lopunny is a very popular choice for Contest competitors, enthusiasts and people like you and me.
>Like a good handful of “Friendship Evolutions”, as my cohorts have taken to calling them, you won’t find a single Lopunny in the wild.
>Luckily, Buneary are a common sight in the forests of the Sinnoh, and don’t put up much of a fight if you want to catch one.
>You see, when a Buneary falls deeply in love with her (or his) trainer, she’ll evolve into one of the most sought-after pokemon out there
>Buneary are easy to train and raise, as is the trend with Normal Types. They’ll eat any vegetable you give them, and a lot of ‘em.
>They’re usually friendly, but can be a bit uncontrollable when excited.
>You can try to have sex with her before evolving, but it’s worth saving her virginity until after. Trust your professor with this one, youngsters.
>But how does a trainer like you get their cute little Buneary to fall in love with him?
>Simple. My new Bun-ly Poke-Treats! You can order them through my website. Use Code: TEST to get 15% off your first order!
Sexual Overview:
>Immediately after evolution, a Lopunny will enter a deep heat that’ll last around 7 days. Be prepared, trainer.
>Luckily, around 80% of Lopunny are incredibly submissive and won’t try to overpower you.
>A horny Lopunny, when in heat, will have a potent field of aphrodisiac-laced perfume around her, emanating from her sweat glands. Let me tell you, there’s a reason they put this stuff into boner pills these days.
>Speaking of, a Lopunny’s virgin pussy is the stuff of legend.
>The reason I told you to wait in the section above? A female lopunny’s pussy is specifically designed according to her master’s cock as she evolves.
>That’s not all I’ve discovered, however.
>Her body shape isn’t at all affected by diet or exercise as she evolves. It morphs into her trainer’s personal preference.
>Lopunny can be anywhere from 3’1”, if her trainer really wanted a pocket pussy, to 5’6”, if he wanted something larger.
>Some lopunny are slender and muscular, some are built like fertility idols, with fat, jiggly asses and thick thighs. All are incredibly flexible and limber.
>Additionally, her vaginal canal is highly muscular. When orgasming, yes, they’re squirters, these muscles ripple up and down. It’s almost like a handjob on top of a perfectly molded pussy!
>Make sure to pull out, if she’s not gripping you so hard that you can’t, or wear protection. Lopunny are in the Human-like breeding group.. Unless you *want* a bunch of eggs.. Then go wild!
>Her asshole doesn’t seem quite as specialized as her pussy, but it’s still a fun time.
>Most Lopunny are hesitant with anal, but as her trainer, she should idolize you enough to give you exactly what you want.
>I’ve noticed it gapes quite quickly. You can really get your Lopunny addicted to anal if you pound her ass often enough.
>Lopunny can be good at sucking dick, but you need to teach them. She also has particularly sharp front teeth, something to watch out for.
>There’s nothing like waking up to a morning blowjob from your little bunny slut, so get out there and start your search for this bunny-eared goddess of sex!
Care: 7/10
Vaginal: 10/10
Anal: 5/10
Oral: 7/10
Relationship Bonus: +1
>I would have put this bonus higher, but one thing holds her back from true perfection. Lopunny ALWAYS want sex. It’s hard to tell if she really wants you, or just your cock.
Final Rating: 8.25

I’m Professor Harkness, and today, we’ll be looking at an evolutionary duo! It’s the Ice/Dark Types, Sneasel and Weavile!
This is our first true time where we talk about an evolutionary duo as one. The behavior and physiology of these two are very similar. When there are distinctions, I’ll be sure to state them when they appear.
General Overview:
>Sneasel, another native of the Sinnoh region, are found in the coldest area that the province has to offer.
>They’re the first carnivorous pokemon we’ve covered, which means you’ll have to buy the more expensive, artificial-meat poke-kibble for them, supplementing their diet with store-bought Torchic eggs as treats is also recommended.
>All this can really put a damper on your wallet, with our sponsor, it doesn’t have to be so hard!
(Drawn-out Ad skip)
>A ‘gang’ of Sneasel, led by a pair of Weavile are one of the most effective and aggressive pack hunters in the wild, primarily targeting flying pokemon and their nests.
>Due to this some regions with endangered flying types disallow travel into their borders with these cute, yet deadly Ice Types, even if they’re captured. Make sure to check local laws regarding this before trying to get your own.
>Sneasel and Weavile, both standing around 3 feet tall, with very slender frames are numerous in the cold northern tundras they’re native to.
>This doesn't make them easy to find. If you come across a gang of them, it’s likely because they chose to show themselves to you.
>The best way to make this happen is to bring the previously mentioned eggs that they love so much. Any food will do.
>Now, to avoid being torn to ribbons by hungry Sneasel, you should have brought along a Fire or Fighting type.
>Challenge the pack leaders, the alpha male and female, to a battle. With the type advantage, a component trainer should come out on top.
>From there, I, as a Pokemon professor, recommend you to avoid capturing the alphas. It might seem tempting, but they’re very likely to be difficult to train due to their level and temperaments-. And you don’t want to be on the cutting end of claws like those.
>Go for the Sneasel- plural. Not only are they likely to be a much lower level, but they’re also used to taking orders. Very useful traits for training.
>It may be hard to do, but being pack Pokemon, they do much better with at least one other Sneasel. I find the sweetspot to be at a gang of three.
>How does one go about training a Sneasel? Carefully; At first, anyways.
>A trainer must teach the Sneasel that HE’S their new pack leader. Don’t let them decide when they eat.
>Have a strict schedule for them. Consistency is key. Eventually, they’ll respect your leadership… Hopefully.
>Sneasel are extremely mischievous, even compared to other Dark-types.
>Don’t let them get to you. Or at least don’t let them know they are, otherwise they’ll keep doing it.
>Regardless, I hope you’re not too attached to your sneakers when they inevitably tie them together with their dexterous paws and throw them up on a tall tree-branch.
>When they do actions like this, a trainer must have some sort of punishment in place, and since they outlawed beatings 20 years ago, the next best thing is, you guessed it, hardcore sex.
Sexual Overview:
>If you want to control your gang of Sneasel, you need to fuck them senseless each time you catch them breaking rules you set in place, even if that means multiple poundings per day.
>Keeping a helpful Grass type, such as Lilligant or Bayleef around to re-energize you might be necessary for particularly naughtier Sneasel.
>Sneasel cunny is unsurprisingly as tight as a vice.
>You’ll find yourself busting your nut extremely fast while pounding these little pranksters.
>You shouldn’t try to go too hard with them. Their bones are partially hollow and prone to fractures when put under too much stress.
>Weavile are exempt from this stipulation. Fuck as hard as you want with one of them. Harder the better, I say!
>Sneasel are VERY LOUD, even when not getting mercilessly raped by their masters. Always chittering and laughing with one another.
>If this annoys you, I have a simple trick!
>When fucking your Sneasel or Weavile, wrap your hands around her neck and squeeze.
>If you did this correctly, she should give you some peace and quiet as she experiences back-to-back orgasms.
>As a bonus, her pussy’ll get even tighter!
>For when a Sneasel has committed some even more incorrigible offense, anal might be your best resource.
>Sneasel assholes are surprisingly roomy for such a lithe Pokemon, making lube an optional endeavor for the benefit of the Pokemon.
>When punishing one Sneasel, you should always make the others watch as a deterrent, so anal can be effective for that.
>As for oral, I cannot under good conscience tell anyone to let these icy pranksters’ fangs anywhere near your cock, but if tame enough, a collaborative blowjob from these three bratty predators just might be your ultimate power fantasy!
Care: 3/10
Vaginal: 8/10
Anal: 8/10
Oral: 5/10
Relationship Bonus: 0
>As intelligent as this Pokemon is, they seem adverse to forming any sort of romantic bond with their trainers. Perhaps this comes from their pack-mentality? More research is required.
Final Rating: 6
(Any allegations that fucking your Sneasel isn’t an effective punishment are false. There’s no way that hardcore breeding with a cock three times the size of the males of their species could ever be an encouragement to a Pokemon such as this, causing dozens of orgasms, is pure fallacy.)

I’m Professor Harkness, and today, we’ll be looking at the gold-hearted fiery devil, Houndoom!
Warning: For any who witnessed the report I posted on- E̴r̸r̴o̴r̵!̶ ̵M̸i̸s̸s̵i̶n̸g̴ ̵i̸n̷t̸e̷g̸e̸r̵!̸ - earlier today, I apologize. Please report to the nearest health facility if you experience any of the following symptoms in the next 48 hours: Nausea, headaches, vomiting, o̢̡͚͚͎̞͇̠̯͎̙̗̺̖̥̱̮̫͙͓͔͐͒ͮ͛̾͆̃͂̇͛̂͋̈́̔f̵̝̭̩̣̟̳̺̔͗̃͐͌͐͌̀ͮͩ͊͐ͩ̌͗́͘͠ ̶̨̜̬͉͖ͧ̓͆̐̈́̑ͪ͐͐̓͝͡͞ţ̵̡̹͓̼̳̖͍̰̫̞͔̃̆ͨ̇͊̈́̑ͫͬͤͩ͌ͮ͛ͧ̀h̴̴̢̨̰͇̤̝̻̣̩̙̤̺̤̣̖̀͌ͤ̾̎͋̚͞ȩ̧̗̟̻̼̳̺̤̗͍͖̰ͩ̂͂̋̃ͫ͂͛̽̄̐̂̃ͦ̉́̕ͅvertigo or dizzy spells. If you didn’t see my post, good! It never existed! Now back to our regularly scheduled programming!
General Overview:
>Native to the open plains of the now-famous region of Kanto, Houndoom can be found in packs, leading Houndour, or on their own.
>Regardless, they are voracious carnivores, relying on long-ranged blasts of fire to injure prey.
>They tend to be much more aggressive in packs, therefore I recommend only trying to capture solo, lone wanderers.
>However you go about catching these Pokemon, I will give you some crucial information about them.
>If you are burned from the flames of an angry Houndoom, that pain will never fade. Proceed with caution.
>Assuming you capture one, preferably with a personally signed Ultra Ball from yours truly's website, how do you go about taming such a dangerous beast?
>The answer is surprising. They aren’t all that dangerous once captured.
>This goes beyond the basic mental-restructuring that Pokeballs are designed for.
>I’ve yet to land on a single conclusion as to why. I’ll keep you updated
>When captured, Houndoom are surprisingly loyal right off the bat, as long as you treat them with the kindness such majestic creatures deserve!
Sexual Overview:
>Now, since forcing yourself on a Pokemon such as this even when tamed is a sure way to end up as a black stain on the pavement and a statistic, I’ll tell you youngsters how to properly seduce such fine specimens.
>The answer? Kill em with kindness.
>Seriously. These canids have pure hearts of gold, under all that fire and brimstone they like to tote around.
>Pamper her. Buy her a nice collar. Let her pick it out. Walk her around like a Growlithe. Lots of headpats.
>Treat her like the most adorable little Pokemon and that’s exactly what she’ll become.
>Let her sleep in your bed. When she’s comfortable enough to sleep with you, you’re in the green as long as she seems into it.
>Simply start feeling her up and she'll be wet in no time, begging for your cock.
>You’ll know it’s time to smash her when she presents a particularly strange pussy.
>Many canine pokemon actually share this design- it looks a bit like a fortune cookie when you squint hard enough. It’s puffy and exquisitely soft.
>Being a fire type, as you slip in, you’ll immediately notice just how hot she is.
>If it’s too much for you, I do sell heat-resistant condoms on my website!
>Her pussy is amazing for those who can take the heat. No getting around it perfectly tight. Those fat, canine pussy lips really grip you on the way out. Really wet too.
>Her horns can be used as handlebars, no matter what kind of sex you’re having with her!
>A houndoom’s asshole is even hotter than her pussy. Unless you’ve got one of my condoms, I can’t recommend it. If you do manage the heat, it’s quite tight.
>As for oral there’s little to no risk for bites, with sufficient intelligence, but Houndoom aren’t exactly skilled in dicksucking. Throat-fucking one with her handlebar horns is always great after a hard day at the lab!
>The way she looks up at you, with nothing but admiration in her eyes while you pound the living daylights out of her throat is something to behold.
Care: 5/10
Vaginal: 9/10
Anal: 4/10
Oral: 7/10
Relationship Bonus: +1
>While tamed Houndoom are very friendly, they lack higher communication skills that make relationships worth it. They also get jealous very quickly. If you have a harem already built up, I don’t suggest pursuing any more than a FWB relation with your new canine partner.
Final Rating:
7.25

Greetings, /Collared/ !
I’m Professor Harkness, and today, we’ll be looking at the moody, yet lovable bug, Scolipede!
As an aside, my first-ever pokemon was a Venipede, now a Scolipede, so this entry hits close to home. In fact, she’s napping on my bed as I type this. Her name is Lucy. She’s the best.
...
General Overview:
>Native to the deciduous forests of Unova, Scolipede is the final form of the Venipede evolutionary line, a Bug/Poison dual-type.
>They’re one of the most intelligent bug types out there, able to learn to fully understand complex human speech, which is more than even some Psychic Types can attest to!
>Catching a Scolipede, or even the middle form, Whirlipede in the wild is a fool's errand for all but the strongest trainers.
>Even discounting the danger they pose, each form is much faster than one would think, and are smart enough to know what types they’re weak to, fleeing any unwinnable battles.
>Venipede, on the other hand, is an easy target for even rookie trainers (Such as yourself).
>This Pokemon is a pure carnivore and are not equipped to digest anything but meat or meat-substitute. I’ll drop a link to the kibble I use, even though Lucy prefers my backyard barbeque over them.
>Now that you have easily acquired a Venipede, it will be an arduous few months of hard training if you’re really dying to get her fully evolved.
>However, I recommend, as always, patience. Your experiences together will only expand this already clever Pokemon’s wisdom.
Sexual Overview:
>Whirlipede and Venipede have no breeding organs. You’ll need to fully evolve this pokemon to make love to her.
>But when Whirlipede evolves, you’ll need to court her.
>In the wild, Scolipede, males go through long, elaborate courting processes, bringing the females their kills, pretty rocks and other trinkets.
>This has been observed to go on for months, and in a few cases, more than a year.
>However, and this has been noted by researchers even more credible than I, Scolipede have a soft spot for humans.
>It should be only a week of gift giving and ‘flirting’ to get her to open up to you.
>Oh man. There’s nothing like fucking a beast this strong and beautiful. Knowing that she *could* liquify you if she wants to, but chooses not to because she likes your company… is invigorating.
>Her puffy pussy will “wink” (her normally hidden clitoris moves out of her vaginal canal) when she’s aroused, even if she’s too proud to admit it and bend over for you.
>There’s a reason why Scolipede courting rituals take so long. For the wild female, sex is extremely painful due to the males’ spiked penis.
>Even more cause to blow your Scolipede’s mind away with a little mouthwork on her ass and pussy.
>For sex, both holes are amazing. Her pussy is softer than anything you can imagine. Just watch out for when she cums. It gets tight enough that pulling out isn’t an option, so when she thrashes around, mind her rear spikes. They’re venomous. Won’t kill you, but you’ll be out cold for a good while.
>Her ass is next level. That thick ring, or “Doughnut” as I’ve taken to calling it, around her rear really sucks on your cock every time you pull out. It really doesn’t want you to leave. Lube is optional. She’s usually moist enough back there from all of those pheromones for you to just slam your hips against her massive rump and go to town, watching as your thrusts ripple throughout.
Not getting too carried away, she can definitely be taught to suck, but Scolipede lacks the flexible tongue and finesse that makes great cocksucking Pokemon so beloved, even though I'll never get tired of those bedroom eyes she gives me after I paint her face white.
So, if you want an intelligent, thicc Pokemon to call your partner, Scolipede is an amazing pick.
Care: 3/10
Vaginal: 8/10
Anal: 9/10
Oral: 4/10
Relationship Bonus: +3
>Scolipede are not social creatures by nature. They’re stubborn, selfish and sassy.. But then again, I think that only adds to their charm. It’s one thing to have a bimbo Lopunny submit to you, but to have an egotistical apex predator slowly become protective of you, letting you use her body as you see fit.. It’s euphoric. As I mentioned, Scolipede are extremely intelligent, likely an adaptation for more successful hunting. This allows them to pick up human language. They themselves can’t speak, but bonding with a Scolipede can let you get the gist of what it’s trying to convey through their grunts and body language. Catching this Pokemon was one of the best choices I have ever made.
Final Rating: 9

I’m Professor Harkness, and today, we’ll be looking at the highly-sought aura Pokemon, Lucario!
General Overview:
>To even get a Lucario, you must find a Riolu, since Lucario in the wild are nearly unheard of.
>Riolu are the rarest Pokemon we’ve covered as of yet. Finding one isn’t easy, but as always, your wise professor has some tips.
>Tip number one is to be “pure of heart”. Riolu and especially Lucario are able to read each living creature’s aura.
>If you’re just looking for something to rape, it’s actually going to be harder to find one of these pokemon.
>And tip number two is that they like to train on mountains, crushing rocks and fighting the local rock types. Look around for shattered boulders that look like they’ve been blasted apart.
>Assuming you do manage to catch a Riolu, it’s likely going to be a male. ~85% are.
>I’ve not spoken about males for very long on these blogs because I know my target audience, but this is an exception.
>Riolu are naive and cheerful. They make very good assistants, actually!
>A captured Riolu will almost never disobey orders.
>Despite their disposition, they’re more intelligent than they let on, able to solve puzzles and understand human speech.
>Some very special individuals are rumored to be able to understand Lucario and Riolu, hearing their Poke-speak as plain language, but this has not been independently verified as of yet.
>This evolutionary family is omnivorous, but will get sick if you feed them anything other than fresh, organic food. No kibble. This makes them expensive to care for.
>To evolve your Riolu, you don’t just need to care for it. You have to coddle it. Treat him like a princess. Hours a day, if you want a Lucario within about a month.
>You don’t really need to train this Pokemon to follow orders. It’ll become very loyal very fast, if you’re kind to it.
>Or.. You can just keep him as a Riolu longer if you force him to bend over to take cock all day.
Sexual Overview:
>Riolu are capable submissive anal slaves.
>Being much smaller than their evolved counterpart, they’re tight. Really tight. The average Riolu is 2’4”.
>Shortstacks! Perfect cock-sucking height.
>I recommend those with smaller endowments frequently “rape” their Riolus (at least three times per week, more doesn’t hurt) to keep them from evolving, or consider the Everstone Necklace I sell on my website.
>When Lucario or Riolu take it in the ass, or receive any stimulation for that matter, they cum very quickly.
>Around 30 seconds and they’re finished.
>Due to their abnormally large ballsacks, they both ejaculate a lot! Around 30-40 ml for a Lucario and half that for a Riolu. A condom might reduce the mess they cause.
>I usually just have mine lick up their mess when I’m done.
>Only 2000 Poke-dollars! Guaranteed to prevent evolution or your money back!
>Riolu boypussy is really tight and looks nice- at least it does when you’re able to see it through the fat, jiggly asses that most of them have. It doesn’t self-lubricate, so to avoid hurting your partner, you should at least let him suck you off beforehand, which they’re good at.
>Average sized or large sized trainers should coddle their Riolu. Give him daily handjobs … Or finger-jobs, they’re usually only a pathetic 2.5 inches long, small- even for its size.
>Lucario is a bit taller than its pre-evolution, standing at around 4 feet.
>A male Lucario who was cared for, sexually and otherwise, in its pre-evolved form will worship the ground you walk on.
>If rimjobs or foot-stuff is your thing, this is the Pokemon for you. They seem to utterly lack inhibitions.
>My Lucario will literally beg me to let him eat my ass. He’s hopelessly addicted to me.
>The great thing about Lucario is that you don’t need to bribe it, train it or force it to do anything. It’s perfectly content with living life as your cockslave.
>Now to get into the specifics..
>Lucario’s butt is amazing. All Lucario that were sexually submissive during their time as a Riolu will have much thicker posteriors and shorter statures, impractical for battles, but much better if you just want a sissy to empty your balls into.
>Keeping your Lucario’s fur well-shampooed will make his ass shine, smoothing his fur. This, along with his undoubtable dumpster of an ass makes for the best assjobs around.
>You’ll find yourself blowing your load into his canyon of an ass over and over.
>He’ll even walk around in public with it dripping down his leg if you make him... Though, you might get weird looks..
>Lucario’s ass, even though it does require lube, is unsurprisingly very pleasurable.
>Like mentioned, it’s jiggly, amazingly so.
>A Lucario’s prostate gland is so large that you can feel it as you fuck him if you’re long enough. It’s fun to hear him bark and whimper each time you press your cock against it.
>They also like it if you pull their tail, I’ve found. It’s like a lever to make his ass tighten. Though it can be hard to grab sometimes due to how fast it wags when you’re pounding his ass.
>Lucario are almost as good at sucking, too!
>It’s not that they have any special adaptation to suck cock better, it’s more likely that they’re just very passionate about being called a “Good Boy” and getting to taste your semen.
>Overall, Lucario is a rare, high-maintenance, yet obedient slave. So if you’re super determined to have that perfect "male" to boost your ego and satiate your urges, Lucario might be up your alley.
Care: 1/10 (Takes into account how hard they are to find)
Outercourse: 9/10
Anal: 9/10
Oral: 8/10
Relationship Bonus: +2
>Males who remain “untainted” until they evolve tend to be much more reserved and intelligent. I would recommend this path for anyone who wants a serious relationship with a Lucario. An unsexed Lucario is a very intelligent Pokemon with a low sex drive, it will take a lot of time for feelings to develop. I’m sure that if they do develop, he’ll be a very passionate love interest.
Final Rating: 8.75

I’m Professor Harkness, and today, we’ll be looking at the protective Emotion Pokemon, Gardevoir!
General Overview:
>Gardevoir is a Psychic/Fairy type native to Hoenn.
>I took a holiday there a few years ago and caught my very own Ralts and I’m here to tell you about her.
>Ralts and its evolutionary family have exclusively berry-based diets. They don’t eat a lot, so it’s easy to feed them. Just about 20 berries a day and you’re gold.
>Capturing a Ralts, the only member of this family you’re likely to encounter in the wild, isn’t easy.
>Like Abra, they can teleport if they sense danger, and like Lucario, they only show themselves to those with positive emotions.
>Ralts and its evolutions are able to sense emotion. The longer one lives, the keener they become.
>Raising a Ralts to become a Gardevoir, or a Gallade, if you roll that way, is hard for a lot of rookie trainers, due to Ralts and Kirlia not being very strong battlers.
>A trainer that shows compassion and patience will be rewarded with a strong, loyal Gardevoir.
>Like most Psychic types, Gardevoir is smart, but certainly no Alakazam, landing somewhere above Lucario and below Kadabra.
>They struggle to understand human concepts like technology and science, but mine in particular has fallen in love with the arts.
>Bonding with your Kirlia or Gardevoir over things like movies, opera and fine art will nurture him or her into a worthy partner.
>A well-cared for Gardevior will famously defend their trainer with their life at the expense of theirs in (overly) dramatic fashion. They will do this even when it is obviously unnecessary.
>I’ve tried to explain this fact to my Garde, but she doesn’t seem to understand. Maybe it’s simply something built-in to their psyche. Pure instinct.
Sexual Overview:
>Unlike some of the other Pokemon I’ve spoken about so far, sex with a Gardevior is less about physical gratification and more of a mental affair.
>When she feels the time is right, she’ll let you know she’s interested in some dramatic fashion.
>You’ll come home to something like rose petals leading you to the bedroom, her asking you to paint her in a revealing position. Something she’s seen on TV or at the theater.
>The virginity and purity of her body is something that many Gardevior take very seriously. Oddly, most take to wearing clothes. Fluffy dresses, big floppy hats with ribbons… Old fashioned symbols of femininity. (Or masculinity, if you have a male).
>Some trainers get their Gardevoir cosmetic surgery, most commonly, breast implants.
>I myself prefer the ‘au naturel’ flat look, as a man of culture. Also it’s a bit illegal in some places. That could be an issue.
>Sex, to a Gardevoir, is something only done with the utmost care. Like stated above.
> They tend to be extremely vanilla, feeling any deviation from the “norm” to be scandalous.
>If your Gardevoir refuses to do something for you, it’s not because she doesn’t love you enough, so I’ve noticed. It’s a self-image issue.
>Mine wouldn’t have sex with the lights on for the first year of our relationship.
>I believe they’re worried that they’re “not human enough” for you.
>For the specifics, the first time you have sex with your Gardevoir, breaking her virginity, is pretty magical.
>Sex with a Gardevoir that you’ve bonded with is spectacular, and it’s not because of any anatomical quirk.
>If you’ve bonded, you can feel each other’s pleasure. It’s out of this world.
>Her pussy feels very similar to a human’s. A bit tighter than average, due to her shorter stature, but nice nonetheless.
>To this day, I’ve never been able to persuade my Gardevoir to let me anywhere near her ass. Good luck with full-on penetration.
>However, oral is another story. Being able to feel each other’s pleasure doesn’t just apply to penetrative sex. Cunniligus with this Pokemon is amazing.
>I can’t describe the feeling, but it’s not centralized on a single point like it usually is normally. It’s just a great sensation that evades proper description. I love it when she tries not to cry out as she cums.
>Speaking of, watch out for flying objects as she cums. She loses control of her psychic power when she does.
>A blowjob from a Gard is nice. Again, nothing unusual here, other than her loving gaze looking up at you, blushing and moaning from the shared sensation
>So, if you’re looking for a traditional girlfriend or even wife in your Pokemon look no further, but if you’re more on the lecherous side, I’d recommend Lopunny instead, you brute.
Care: 5/10
Vaginal: 6/10
Anal: N/A
Oral: 5/10
Relationship Bonus: +5 (Perfect Score!)
I bet you’re wondering:
>“Harkness, why do you have to have consent from your Pokemon? If you want to fuck her ass or tie her up to the bedpost, just do it.”
With most Pokemon, I’d agree. But Gardevoir are not most Pokemon. They’re prone to human emotions. Insecurity. Anger Jealousy. Depression. Rates of the latter are high. Abuse your Gardevoir at your own risk. Gardivoir are the Emotion Pokemon. This isn’t limited to positive emotions. Relationships, to a Gardevoir, are eternal. This doesn’t mean you can’t fool around with your other Pokemon, (especially because they only live for about 15-20 years), but just make sure to give this pure maiden some tender love at the end of the day, okay?
As a final note, they're in the Human-like egg group. Like all others in this egg group, the offspring will look like the Pokemon if breeding with a human, but will be infertile. That being said, if she finds out that you're sexually compatible with her, she may want kids.
>Now, I have to go. I think the cookies she’s been baking for me are done. Chao!
Final Rating: 8.3

I’m Professor Harkness, and today, we’ll be looking at the fiery magician, Braixen!
General Overview:
>The middle form in the Fennekin line, Braixen is a very unique pokemon.
>Native to Kalos, this evolutionary family isn’t found in the wild at all anymore, having been fully integrated into human settlements for a long time. The exact time they became extinct in the wild isn’t clear.
>They’re omnivorous and require a mix of meat and veggie poke-kibble, if you want to use kibble. I find that due to their high intellect and wide diet, it seems a bit cruel not to let your Braixen sit at the table with you. Avoid giving them milk when possible, as much as they *love* cheese. Mine is particularly fond of the Barboach filets I pick up from the supermarket.
>Braixen is a lot more common than its evolved form for a reason, apart from how cute it is.
>To evolve, a Braixen must master its powers. As such, Braixen are often bold, proud self-improvers.
>A Braixen will demand instruction from its trainer on a daily basis, so you should familiarize yourself with techniques that only Braixen can learn
>If you’re interested in training one of these vixens, I recommend you buy my good friend, Professor Sycamore’s book; 50 Steps in Fire, a Braixen Training Guide.
>It teaches you what techniques to pass down to your mystical little fox much better than I ever could.
>You’re likely asking by now: but how do I fuck it?
Sexual Overview:
>Well, as always, there are two ways.
>To seduce your Braixen, it takes a lot. A lot of cuddles, I should say.
>Braixen are proud and will likely reject any daytime hugs or pets, but at night, when they feel secure, they love being a little spoon for their masters. For trainers who travel a lot, they’ll keep you warmer than any campfire at night.
>Brushing their fur, especially their tail and ears is something they really love. Trainers should invest in a high quality brush.
>They love to be involved in whatever you’re up to, even if they don’t really understand what you’re doing on your laptop, they’ll often make themselves right at home on your lap.
>Females get pretty noisy if you ignore them, more so than males.
>When the time is right, they’ll let you know. Constant pestering. Nibbling your ear, tugging your shirt. That sort of thing.
>A Braixen’s pussy, when she’s in the mood, will ‘puff’ up, looking similar to a Houndoom’s when fully aroused.
>It’s remarkably warm and slick. You’ve got to be careful, though. Humans are a lot bigger than male Braixen and you run the risk of hurting your cute fox wife.
>Her puffy lips are designed to keep your cock inside as long as possible and feels like a warm hug.
>Braixen enjoy being manhanded during sex. During missionary, try lightly choking your Braixen. Her puffy pussy lips will tighten around you.
>If you’ve got the strength, pick her up and pin her to the wall, biting her ear. My girl adores that.
>You’ll know when you’re pushing their buttons right when she starts high-pitched wail.
>When you cum inside, it acts like a cup to prevent semen from running out of the vaginal canal.
>Anal is much of the same. It’s tighter. Maybe too tight for some. Lube will be required.
>Oral sex with a Braixen is quite enjoyable. They have a wide tongue and seem to like giving head to their masters.
>Braixen will become sick if they consume too much semen. Something about their digestive system makes it slightly toxic to them. Make sure to pull out and shoot over her face. She’ll thank you later.
The overall on Braixen is that she’s a great all-round companion that’ll keep you and your member warm during the coldest of nights.. Just don’t take her stick away from her.
Score:
Care: 4/10
Vaginal: 8/10
Anal: 5/10
Oral: 8/10
Relationship Bonus: +3
>Braixen are quite intelligent and are known to mate for life. They can learn to speak telepathically and are great lovers once they get used to your coddling. Some are even familiar enough to use public transport, go shopping and do all sorts of helpful tasks for their masters. Suitable Poke-wife material!
Final Rating: 9.25 (New Record!)

I’m Professor Harkness- and after a long hiatus- I’m proud to say that we’ll be taking a deep dive into the fearsome fire-type, Charizard!
General Overview:
>The final evolution of the Charmander family, Charizard is an iconic, highly carnivorous, Flying/Fire type native to the Kanto region’s highest peaks and active volcanoes.
>Active hunters, they ambush prey to bring back to their young, such as Tauros, from above with searing Fire Blast attacks.
>Charizard that are of the same gender are highly territorial of one another, but it’s not uncommon to see a lair with a mating pair.
>Not very proficient in burrowing, many of these creatures rely on abandoned Onix-made caves to make their lairs.
>Attempting to capture a Charizard while it’s hunting is paramount to suicide.
>Trying to catch a Charizard in its lair would be foolhardy at best. Then, how, I hear you asking, would one go about taming one of these dragons?
>My answer? Don’t. Too many young trainers have perished trying to do so.
>If you value your life, one would be wise to purchase a Charmander egg from a breeder.
>Swiping an egg from a Charizard’s lair is foolhardy as well. Not only are they often laid in lava hotspots, prone to swelling with molten rock without warning, the mother has a knack for knowing exactly where her eggs are when they go missing. Call it a sixth sense. Female intuition.
>A female Charizard will burn an entire town to the ground if she thinks someone has taken her egg or hatchling there.
>Better to pay the hefty fee for an egg or a hatchling from a captive, tame Charizard than risk life and limb atop Mount Ember.
Sexual Overview:
>Well, let’s assume you hatched a Charmander and raised it into a fully grown Charizard. What are you in for?
>Female Charizard are a bit larger than their male counterparts, but still within a manageable 6 foot package.
>To lay with a female ‘Zard, simple good trainer sense and dedication isn’t all you’re going to need. You’ll need to impress her.
>In the wild, males compete for female attention, one-upping one another, bringing her bigger and bigger kills, or showing her how far their territory reaches to prove their superiority.
>Remember that you’re a human. Play to what you’re good at. I’ve spoken to breeders. A female can recognize far more than feats of strength or conquest. Homemade gifts of intricate craftsmanship, art of all kinds, fine cooking and especially lavish displays of wealth. Every Charizard I have met has a crippling affection for gold. For what reason, I’m not sure.
>Lacking deft hands, Charizard are easily impressed, watching humans work on small details.
>So you finally win her over, what then?
>She’ll likely make the first move. You’d better be ready once she starts giving you the ‘eyes’ and her tail starts igniting hotter around you. A female Charizard can weigh in at 250 pounds, and have a habit of pinning down their beloved trainers before mating.
>Charizard coochie is in a tier of its own, but might be a tad loose for those with smaller endowments. I’ve been told that it doesn’t make a difference to her.
>It’s unsurprisingly hot, too. Fucking her too often may lead to a very sore dick. (It’s worth it).
>It takes a long while for her to get wet, but often, foreplay is out of the question when the she-beast is horny. Keep heat-resistant lube handy.
>If you’re able to avoid death by snu-snu from the big girl, you might be able to push her down and turn the tables, maybe switch to a different hole.
>Charizard ass is surprisingly tight for their stature. Again, lube is required, but Charizard seem to have a very sensitive g-spot that’s hard to reach from her other hole. Don’t be surprised if she ends up cumming over and over as you take her ass. Just watch out for the fiery tail.
>A blowjob from a Charizard follows a way of thinking I described in my Scolipede report. The “creature big enough to kill you with ease instead is desperate to please you” philosophy.
>To put it in perspective, a mature female Charizard’s max bite force is around 4,000 PSI, and she can spit fire that’s up to 2,800 degrees Fahrenheit. And she’s using this highly specialized mouth, adapted to kill and maim, to please your cock.
>...Not to mention how long and dexterous her tongue can be.
>I rest my case.
Care: 2/10 (Expensive eggs, nearly uncatchable in the wild. Needs ~5 lbs of fresh meat, not kibble, per day.)
Vaginal: 7/10
Anal: 8/10
Oral: 9/10
Relationship Bonus: +2
>The first thing you need to know about marrying your Charizard is if you want to really be with her, and her alone, forever. Charizard are extremely jealous and protective of their mates, and might flare up if it feels you’re giving too much attention to another Pokemon. But if you’re as devoted as she is, go for it! Turning a hormonal, feral flaming terror into a housewife sounds appealing! You can even ride her to work.
Final Rating: 8.5

Hey all! It’s time again for Professor Harkness’s Blog. Today, we’ll be looking at a surprisingly highly requested duo! It’s Bayleef and its evolution, Meganium. Usually, for these blogs, when I take a request, like in my Lucario analysis, I have to either find a fellow science-minded owner of the Pokemon in question, or catch it myself for study. Luckily for me, I already ‘own’ a Meganium. Or rather, she, as a wild Chicorita, somehow found her way into my garden and took a liking to it, so I’ve let her laze around for a few years now. Anyways, let's begin!
If you have any suggestions, let me know!
For a full log of my works, you can read them here: https://docs.google.com/document/d/1ni0fYdKi2TaQiKnC6yx1pM7nmG_KtGE0fn0XvKJOrR0/edit
General Overview:
>All of Meganium’s evolutionary forms are mild mannered, friendly, gentle grass types that are extremely easy to care for,
>In the wild, the Bayleef and its evolutions do nothing but wander about the low temperate plains and forests, soaking up fresh water and bright sunlight in herds, or, more scientifically, “meadows”, of around 8-20 members.
>Differently to many other Pokemon that live in large groups, these meadows of Meganium don’t seem to have any leader or pecking order.
>In all of my years, I have not once seen a conflict escalate within one of these groups. This is perhaps because of the mind-affecting pollen and scents that these Pokemon produce that keep them, and even predators, too mellow and docile to become violent.
>When a meadow becomes too large, a “Pruning Event” will occur, where roughly half of the meadow parts ways with the other, with adolescent Bayleef often choosing to wander off on their own to form their own meadow.
>Those with stronger, sweeter-smelling aromas will always accumulate more members.
>These adolescents are what I would recommend trainers catching, but you can’t really go wrong with catching any of these Pokemon.
>You can find meadows sunbathing by clean, shallow, rocky streams during the spring, summer and early fall.
>At the first sign of a bite of cold in the air, Meganium meadows will begin a sudden migration to warmer areas.
>This might be the only danger this Pokemon might possess; thoughtlessly throwing yourself into their stampede during this event.
>Don’t bother battling them and weakening them before throwing a Pokeball like you would with most.
>Depending on their resistance to it, the pollen and aroma of these groups can completely prevent a trainer and their Pokemon from attacking at all.
>Notably, a few species of native bug-types are immune to the effects of the smell. Heracross is a constant worry for Meganium, as their sweet scent ironically only helps the bug-type locate them. A Heracross will not kill any of the members, thankfully.
>They love the sweet, medicinal sap that is held within Bayleef’s neck-appendages, intended to be energy stores, possibly for its eventual evolution. A feeding Heracross might delay a Bayleef’s evolution by weeks or months, but won’t actually harm the creature.
>You can actually buy Bayleef Sap at most drug stores sold as a topical skin-rub or facial mask. It’s known to have effects similar to caffeine, without the crash or headache a few hours after ingestion that some experience.
>Me? I’ll just stick to my black coffee, thank you very much.
>Once you’ve accomplished the easy task of befriending a member of a meadow, or a wandering Bayleef, you’re probably wondering how you should fuck it…


>Travel back to XV century
>Discover a Queendom of pure anthro females
>The few males are slaves, even the young ones
>Team up with them
>Dethrown their milf matriarch and marry her
>Become the new King
>Inherit your wife's courtisans and councilors as your personal harem
>Reward the males with freedom, land property and wealth

What's the thread opinion on Pokemon? How subservient are these pocket monsters to their human masters?
How would you treat your newly caught 'mon?

>Supernaturally strong creatures and gods can be captured and commanded
>Common items that can capture and instantly make an aggressive Pokemon obey you for life
>You can pat them and feed them like you would a pet
>All pokemon can pass the Harkness test
>Many Pokemon need a strong bond with a human to active their strongest form
>Many Pokemon are practically anthros already, many are full ferals, and their all levels in between
>Supreme God of the setting send humans back in time and rigged the odds to make sure it would happen
Pokemon is the ultimate /collared/ universe

>Be Arceus
>Travel through multiple dimensions before creating your own
>Really like this creatures called 'humans' and they way to push whole ecosystems around to fit they whims
>You REALLY liked them
>Create a word full of all sort of spirits and animal like creatures with supernatural power
>Make all of them with some level of sentience with strong personalities
>Now there's just one thing missing
>You isekai a bunch humans into your world, like humans
>Tfw they aren't proper monsterfuckers yet and treated Pokemon just like dangerous animal
>Tfw your magical realm requires not just multiple isekais, but causal loops to from a successful civilization that works the way you wanted it in the first place
>At least you have all the time in the world

Wild Pokemon subservience I feel should vary between hating/not respecting to loving/worshiping if they've got a fetish for it or something.
Traded/breeded pokemon may be slightly more inclined to be friendly with humans, but I still prefer a variety.
What I really like is the idea of pokemon being influenced by the balls they're caught with.

Like luxury balls, friend balls, premier balls, love balls, and heal balls all make the pokemon comfortable and make them become friendly and adore you faster, with variations between them like luxury balls making your pokemon a bit of a snob/superiority complex that they get to be yours.
Regular pokeballs do not modify the pokemon's behaviour, where great balls and ultra balls are steps in making them more subserviant, with ultra balls having a stronger effect.
Master balls instantly make a pokemon completely subservient, even if they were just trying to kill you mere moments ago, turning them into a pet that would rather die than disobey you.
Net balls, lure balls, and dive balls give pokemon a taste for BDSM, anal, chastity, asphyxiation, that sort of thing.
Heavy balls and moon balls help your pokemon become more voluptuous, with moon balls having more of a focus on the ass.
Quick and fast balls make your pokemon quick shots, timer balls having the opposite effect or drawing out your pokemon's orgasms.
Repeat balls are good for making harems of the same kind of pokemon.
Dusk balls turn your pokemon into a goth, no I will not elaborate.
Sport balls for tomboys, safari balls and beast balls to keep them with a wild temperament.
Nest balls for if you like your pokemon younger and in their earlier evolutions, usually paired with evolite and everstones.
And lets not forget P.R.O ball attachments, compatible with all pokeballs. (https://desu-usergeneratedcontent.xyz/trash/image/1651/64/1651649361418.jpg)

>What I really like is the idea of pokemon being influenced by the balls they're caught with.
Dear lord, why haven't I thought of this before?
The way you describe them, one would assume that there's some level of hypnosis or mental conditioning built into every pokeball, but there's also a few that modify their assets. A reasonable explanation is that while a pokemon is held in their pokeball that they're gradually modified as to not alarm them- intrusive thoughts of obedience, headaches that come on suddenly at the idea of running away or harming their new master, and dopamine rushes when they obey- a frog in a boiling pot situation when by the time they realize what's going on, it's too late.
The only exception is the Master Ball. An instant removal of that pesky resistance. I'm sure rowdy pokemon look at it with fear, afraid to have their mind scrambled in a zealous human supremacist and race traitor.
>Traded/breeded pokemon may be slightly more inclined to be friendly with humans, but I still prefer a variety.
These pokemon already know their place, especially bred pokemon. Their supple minds are molded from the moment they're borne to love and adore humans. Pokemon right's advocates fruitlessly try to undo the programming, release them back in the wild, but that just results in them throwing themselves at their nearest human, desperate to do anything for their approval.

>"O-Oh sorry, I'm a male, I know human guys don't really like-"
"Don't worry, I'll use this."
>"I-Is that a l-love ball?! B-But that's supposed to be for g-girls!"
"Not exactly, there's a reason why every pokemon caught with a love ball LOOKS like a female."
>"Wait! I-I don't want to get any girlier! I already get hit on by guys, I can't get any smaller! My d-dick is barely t-"
"I wasn't asking, either you accept this ball and get caught like a good girl, or I have my Blaziken beat you and hold you down for me to catch instead."
>"O-Oh dear..."

How would different Pokemon deal with a trainer that is, or appears to be, to dense or oblivious to fuck them ?
How long can they endure being blue beamed ? and what happen when they can't wait any longer ?

>A good question, trainer
>As is often the case, different Pokémon will react in different ways.
>Some more bestial will present to you, often and spontaneously. This might be enough to "break" them and make them more obedient. (Good!)
>More intelligent Pokémon might be offended or feel dejected. (Bad!)
>It all depends.
>I would not recommend "blueballing", as you say, Pokémon that are more dominant. >Dragon types... Fighting types...
>Most Pokémon get along fine in a purely platonic relationship. It's when they go into heat or some catalyst for a relationship presents itself do they feel this way.
>There are also some Pokémon who are just horny all of the time. It's a mixed bag.

What signs should a trainer watch out for that a pokemon is receptive or in need of attention before it start feeling dejected/frustrated or stressed out ?

>For intelligent Pokemon, it can be hard.
>For instance, the Pokemon I plan to cover next, Braixen, is notoriously proud, holding its intelligence on a pedestal. It's unlikely to admit to wanting your cock.
>Fortunately I have an easy tip.
>Any kind of skinship.
>Headpats, cuddles. That sort of stuff. Eventually, she'll lead your hand much lower than usual.

>QOTT: What origin story do you prefer for anthros? (i.e. genetically modified, magic, they were always there, etc)
It depends on the setting.
The idea of anthropomorphic animals seemingly design to serve and satisfy human men is absurd and fantastical, but, like any premise, it can work in the right context. In a fantasy with an original world and history it's easy to believe that anthros have always existed. However, in a modern setting meant to resemble our own, this would bring up so many questions and make it difficult to believe what's being presented. In this case, a light revision of history or small leap into the future with a more plausible explanation would be best, such as genetic engineering.
Genetic engineering is my favorite origin for anthros. It demonstrates the absolute power and control humanity has over the anthro. They aren't natural creatures. They're tools- toys. To deny this is delusional. Every bovine anthro knows they're born to provide milk and meat for their human masters. Every feline anthro knows they're born to provide company and comfort for their human masters. Every bunny girls know deep in their core they're only good for dumping a hot load in their holes.
Although, one origin I'd like to see more of is an inter-dimensional one where humans have pierced the fabric between realities and capture the natives to have them serve back home.
(I'm not proud of how many drafts or how long it to edit and write this.)

>“My lord ambassador, would you mind delaying your… gratification until after…”
>The feline princess broke off, wincing at the slutty moan that filled the small but luxurious meeting room.
>Across a table from her, the human ambassador was casually bouncing another catgirl up and down on his dick. The sound of his cock sliding in and out of the delirious girl’s asshole…
>“It’s… very distracting, my lord,” the princess continued.
>’My lord.’The words scraped at her nerves as she spoke them, but that was reality.
>The ambassador let his hands drop from the narrow hips of the catgirl on his lap. She pressed tighter into his chest, bouncing her ass up and down, whimpering her pleasure into his neck as she rode him.
>“Let me explain something to you, Princess Lresse,” he said, his voice calm despite the physical exertion.
>She clamped her legs together, hands spreading into claws at the confused jumble of hostility and unwelcome lust that filled her.
>“Look at this thing buttfucking herself on my cock,” he said, stroking the catgirl’s hair. “Do you see how small she is, compared to me?”
>“Y-you people are giants,” Lresse said. Her folk ran to about four and a half feet high, maybe five for the tallest.
>“Yes, compared to you, we certainly are,” he agreed. He raised a hand and brought it down in a loud smack across his catgirl’s bottom, drawing a mewling sound of pleasure.
>“And yet look at how easily her hole takes me. How flexible she is, how perfectly compatible she is for my enjoyment.”
>Lresse looked.
>It was true.
>She swallowed, her mouth dry.
>“And look at how much joy and fulfillment she’s getting out of it.”
>“You’ve drugged her,” Lresse said, but the lie was feeble in her mouth.
>The ambassador laughed. “Poor lost lamb. Too stubborn to admit what you know is true.”
>“I am a princess of the Sreethar and you will address me as-” she began, her hackles raising.
>“Do you have any idea how many races exactly like yours we’ve encountered as the Terran Domination has spread across the stars?” he broke in, his voice hard.
>“Exactly like ours?” Lresse repeated, confused.
>“Yes. Small. Flexible. Easily led. Easily fucked. All female, and oh so eager to be ravaged by our human cocks.”
>Lresse’s cheeks burned at his characterization of her race, but it was hard to deny watching the depraved scene in front of her. She thought she recognized the feline mounting him, some lesser countess or some such minor nobility.
>“The Sreethar Solar Union, this petty little collection of a few planets and perhaps ten billion of you tiny sluts… We have encountered over two dozen discrete alien races exactly like you.”
>Lresse’s eyes widened. “Two dozen?”
>The ambassador nodded. “Not all kittens like you, of course. There are elves, and goblins, and angels and any number of other flavors, but they all fit that profile. And do you know, there’s a curious commonality in all of your origin myths. Do you know what it is?”
>The princess could guess. “Wicked giants from the stars,” she said. “Who left after a war in heaven.”
>The ambassador’s teeth glittered. “Giants from the stars,” he agreed. “It dovetails with some evidence from Terra, you know. Ancient, planet-wide burn layers, exotic metals buried deep. Artifacts from Luna and the rest of our system.”
>Lresse’s skin prickled at the implications of what she was hearing.
>“Something destroyed our ancient empire, Lresse,” the ambassador said softly. “And now that we’re taking it back, what do we find? All these soft, biddable,breakablesluts.”
>“That’s doesn’t necessarily mean what you’re saying,” Lresse said.
>“We put you here, you stupid alien cunt,” he replied flatly. “We’ve done the DNA tests. You are a bioengineered race of sex slaves, and thirteen thousand years ago one of you sets of sluts, I don’t know which, betrayed us and bombed us into a genetic bottleneck.”
>There was a hard, bitter edge to his voice.
>“I’m not enhanced, Lresse,” he said. “I’m not a warrior, or a cyborg, or using combat drugs. But I understand revenge. And look what I can do to you weaklings.”
>For a few moments, he pounded as hard as he could into the catgirl on his lap, the girl who had been a countess, who had been nobility, who had been rich and important.
>She flopped like a rag doll, and as the ambassador groaned and climaxed in her tight catgirl ass, he stood up.
>With almost no perceivable effort, he took her neck in one hand, pulled her off his cock, and slammed her head into the wall so hard that Lresse could hear the girl’s skull crack.
>Countess Hara,she finally remembered.Her name is Hara.
>Stupid babbles fell from Hara’s lips, accompanied by bubbles of saliva and blood, and the ambassador slapped her face almost tenderly, her body jerking and flopping in his grasp, cum dripping from her ass as she shuddered and babbled.
>“Do you see, princess?” the ambassador said, looking at her.
>The thing in his grasp still had the body of a catgirl, but her face showed no trace of sapience at all. Her eyes wandered randomly around the room, and the ambassador flung her into the corner to twitch and moan by herself.
>“She was a person,” Lresse said, but her voice carried no conviction.
>“She was a useless, stupid, weak thing to fill with my cum,” the human countered.
>Lresse withered in the face of the iron-hard fervor in his voice.
>“But what happened to that creature isn’t what you should be concerned about,” he continued. “Rather, let’s discuss the original question you came here for. You wanted to know what happened to all those feline cunts we’re shuttling offworld to visit the rest of the Domination.”
>The princess shrank down into her chair, breathing hard.
>“Wait, that’s not necessary, I w-won’t tell…”
>He reached over the table and hauled her towards him. She screamed and scratched at him, and it took her some time to realize her claws weren’t extended.
>She had just barely enough time to wonder why she hadn’t extended her claws when two of the human’s fingers thrust into her, and her world turned into a sizzling heat that melted her brain as the orgasm that had been stealthily building inside her hit her nervous system hard.
>“Our marines work up a lot of stress, in our campaigns against the more warlike races,” the ambassador said as he pumped his fingers into the spasming catgirl princess. “Unfortunately, you little cunts don’t last long in the stress relief racks, so we have to keep up a steady supply.”
>Stress relief racks,Lresse thought. An image popped into her head of a row of dozens of her kind bent over, bound into metal racks, humans rutting into them over and over, raping them full of their hot, white cum.
>She came again, hard, and then the ambassador slammed his fist into the side of her head and everything went black.

>Anthros have been trying to get equal rights with humans for years.
>There is just one problem.
>Domesticated anthros.
>The entire movement is in constant gridlock from domesticated anthros mucking things up. "No no, you've got it all wrong!" They say. "It's not bad at all! Life is so easy with humans!"
>Canines are by far the worst offenders. They're hardwired for domestication, and even free canines have the tendency to self-domesticate around humans. Wolves, coyotes, foxes, and dogs give up and let it happen.
>The movement can't just oust all canines, though. They represent a huge block of the anthro powerbase, and alienating them is political suicide.
>The leader of the movement has to wonder if their efforts are doomed...

>Angry cat women holding up signs saying 'No more cookie play. Humans have had their day'
>Lizards and other cold blooded women aren't there either due to their love of their human companions and their radiant heat

>tfw no female anthro boss who wants to be your submissive bitch in bed

god i love that trope.
>you go to her office to speak about some IT shit
>she casually hands you documents explaining the computers that need work done
>you go through it with her she is explaining what's wrong with each one and how to replicate the problem
>then as you pass through each page there is just a photocopy of her vagina and ass perfectly pressed to the glass
>"And that's my soaked cunt and asshole. You can go ahead and keep that in mind while you work."
>then she moves on to the next page like it never happened

>the flirting gets more bold
>she sits you in her office and offers you coffee
>you agree while she is biting her lip
>she sits down and shuffles under her desk
>she pulls off her bright pink panties
>she makes sure you notice the wet spot before she places them into the filter cone
>She then pours you a cup of hot coffee her nipples hardening through her business blouse

>lioness boss lady trying to play off you knocking her up like its nothing to worry about cause she has money
>while on the inside she's sweating bullets and wants you to be with her no matter what and is terrified you'd reject her

>the anthros are firmly leashed in their place beneath humanity
>but a prophecy states a boy of humble beginnings will rise to be a great warrior-prince, and lead his people out of bondage
How do you prevent this without inadvertently creating the circumstances for the prophecy to come true?

Let it happen.
Humanity thrives under the pressure of challenge. Civilizations may fall and nations may crumble but the place of the beastkind is set in stone. Let them build their grand palaces and monuments and breed their beautiful females. They still continue to serve humanity in different ways.
It will simply be a different time for humanity, not a humiliation of any kind.
Tribal humans will enjoy the juiciest fruits in the form of anthros fattened up by their easy lives, stolen from their manors at night or simply ravaged in their own bed. Peasants sleep uneasy, knowing that they may be woken up by a human cock roughly tearing their holes apart. Entire cities may fall prey to a surprise raid with not a single member, regardless of age and gender, being spared. The lucky ones are only dragged out of their homes and raped out in the streets alongside their families. The unlucky ones are taken away and disappear forever.
The remnants of the human empires will have a surplus of captured anthro soldiers after each battle and adrenaline of war is the greatest aphrodisiac. Great anthro warriors, defeated and humbled with human seed sloshing in their bellies and/or assholes, are taken from the battlefield and have their swords replaced with iron collars.
Even the "enslaved" humans are barely that. More often than not their masters and mistresses are the ones kneeling and worshiping their supposed inferiors. All females are deflowered by their servants as soon as their bodies start to bud. The male royalty and aristocracy become unable to breed their females at all, having been secretly but universally fucked by humans since a young age. Many require a human inside them to maintain an erection. Others simply let their "slave" breed their wives for them. All the great anthro kings have lusted after and submitted to their human lessers and turn a blind eye when their Queens give birth to anthros who look nothing like them or even birth purely human heirs.

And the hero? Let him ride on to victory, liberate his kind, and retire with a beautiful wife.
One day he will discover his first daughter spreading her legs and accepting a human neighbor's cock. He will watch as she waddles out of his home after sex, her small, young butt leaking copious amounts of human semen. Day after day after day, she will allow him to fuck her in every hole and taint her entire body in his musk. She will squeal as her buds are teasingly nipped and pulled, neck playfully choked, and hair pulled as her unused womb is filled.
He'll try to object but watching them fuck he will realize that she is truly happy like she's never been and he will remember that in his youth the best moments of his life were when he too, knelt before his master and ran his lips across his dominating length before accepting him inside his rear. And as the first bumps of his daughter's pregnancy become prominent he will feel a deep sense of immense regret that he ever listened to that anthro supremacy cult and dared to upset the natural order.
And as his wife births his second daughter, a pure anthro born from an anthro mother and sired by an anthro father, he swears that he will make things right again.

>Ancient anthro prophecy tells of a powerful warrior who will one day defeat the humans and liberate furkind
>A child is born bearing all the signs of being the chosen one
>Grows up beating all of the prophecies challenges, clearly he is the one!
>Heads out as a strong and powerful warrior, on his way to fulfill his destiny
>Only to return to his village as a sissy femboy slut enslaved to the despised humans
>His muscular form has been replaced with thicc curves and breeding hips
>His armor swapped out for only the most revealing slutwear
>All hatred for humans, replaced by insatiable lust for human cock

>New product revealed for anthros that are more stubborn and require more effort than a master wishes to spend on them.
>One press of a button and you have an immediately obedient anthro ready for all your desires!
(https://desu-usergeneratedcontent.xyz/trash/image/1687/06/1687066023366.png)
>And if you are still finding you have problems or just don't want the leftovers, press the other button instead and discard the useless bit.
>Now even the most obstinate and unwilling anthros don't need to be disposed of wholesale, their bodies can still serve without them.
>It's an eco friendly alternative!
(https://desu-usergeneratedcontent.xyz/trash/image/1687/06/1687066438456.png)

>The Human Empire frequently captured and bought slaves from all over the empire
>From the frigid North to the Hot deserts of the South
>However rarely were humans enslaved, instead the conscious cattle tended to be of the more beastly style
>Deer, wolves, rabbits, foxes, and even eagles were chained and sold
>However the most prized slaves were the big cats, with Tigers being the most expensive
>Only issue was their hostile temperament and unwillingness to submit
>Luckily, through an intense process of chains and drugs even the most resilient of Tigers could be broken into breeding whores

What if you were a popular character in the humiesphere?
>Get taken to furry Earth, courtesy of truck-sama.
>One moment a loud horn is blaring in your ears, the next you're waking up in a dingy alley.
>It feels like you're going through the worst hangover of your life.
>Although considering what just happened, it could be much worse.
>After dealing with the panic from the more-than-near death experience and realization that you're still alive somehow, you get up from the floor.
>You look out of the alley, keeping your head down as you try to get a lay of the land.
>Furries everywhere.
>Just going on about their days, buying stuff, driving somewhere, the usual.
>A few notice your presence and give you a suspicious look.
>Fair, considering you're creeping around in a corner.
>After seeing that they haven't ran off screaming, you make your way out of the alley, feeling more courageous.
>Their odd gazes persist. But they leave you be as you think about your situation.
>You haven't seen another human around yet.
>What seems to be this universe's equivalent of a geek store gets your attention.
>Poking around, you take in a bunch of this world's media.
>Pretty cool honestly.
>You notice an occasional human on some comics that are written in a language you don't understand.
>Suddenly, you hear a shocked gasp followed up by an excited squeal.
>Turning to the noise, you come face-to-face with a wide-eyed dog girl.
>She examines you so closely it looks like she's counting each individual pore in your skin.
>Leaning away from her, you clear your throat loudly.
>Realizing what she's doing, she pulls back with a blush and an apology.
>Unzipping her hoodie, she reveals her shirt.
>There's a print of your face on it.
>In the corner of your eye, you catch something.
>A 2D human on a DVD box that looks a lot like you.
>As she talks about how good your "cosplay" is, you realize.
>"Awh, fuck." is all you mutter out as other patrons surround this 'IRL Anon'.

>QOTT: Would you prefer hybrid offspring or pure "one or the other" offspring from interspecies pairings?

>>QOTT: Would you prefer hybrid offspring or pure "one or the other" offspring from interspecies pairings?
a hybrid of the two choices, fittingly enough
one or the other for the most part, but there is still influences from the other parents' species
I suppose in this example Spock wouldn't have been a half-vulcan, but rather a vulcan with certain human additions from his mother

>Would you prefer hybrid offspring or pure "one or the other" offspring from interspecies pairings?
I like elderscrolls, FFXIV, and probably some other game rules
the mother is the definer of the specifications, because it's her uterus that is doing the work.
egg laying species still apply, dragon, kobold, snek, leezard
it leads to more ascetically pleasing children, with a splash of genetics from the father. (eyes, dexterious hands, taller or smaller, bulkier, head of hair, ect.)

>Save up enough money to buy your own anthro for the first time.
>Go to the "Pet" store, where anthros and all of the proper tools to tame them and care for them are available.
>They just got this one in today.
>Some feline who was found guilty of "aggressive posturing" and "threatening body language" towards Humans one too many times.
>Now forcefully enslaved, she managed to beg for mercy enough to not end up chained to hard labor for the rest of her life, but she's obviously not happy about being here.
>Wat do?

Acquire her and train her gently over months. Reward good behavior with treats and pleasure. Punish her primarily with confinement and sensory deprivation, and couch it in terms of doing what's best for her. Hurting her just gives her something to focus her aggression and anger on - so leave her to stew for a bit when she does wrong.
Eventually she'll forget what she was fighting for, and you can start acclimating her to whatever activities you most prefer without further resistance.

I love that one guy that we had a few threads ago, who had the idea of the 70s-era world where anthros outnumbered humans, like, 4 or 5-to-1, and basically all of humanity had become very peaceful by focusing their efforts on subjugating and making anthros submissive.
I personally would tweak the world a bit. Make it a smaller ratio, maybe 2 or 3-to-1, so that anthros could fight a little harder for a good human. Make it modern times, social media, movies, games, etc., all with tons of themes about anthro inferiority and submission.
I liked the idea that it had become so engrained in the modern world that there were laws around it, even against things like aggressive posturing and body language from anthros, and how 'collaring' aka enslavement was a possible punishment for breaking the law, for those that didn't just voluntarily collar themselves.
Plus the public sex acceptance. Groping, spanking, molesting an anthro in broad daylight was completely legal and normal, as was having them serve you or even have sex with you- though the sex itself had to be consensual, it was nightmarishly easy for any anthro to be coerced into being fucked or letting their partner get fucked. Sexual punishments were common for those who broke the law and chose not to be collared or weren't forced into it, too, whether it was being spanked, forced orgasms, denied orgasms, chastity, bitchsuits, etc.
Call it /collared/ world or something. Idfk.

Anthros know their genetic codes belong to humans to fuck around with as they see fit.
Gigantic or extra breasts, centaur body, wings, lipples, futanari, tentacles, removed limbs, extra limbs, another head, headless, etc.
Whatever fetish or even curiosity a human might have an anthro will be modified to fulfill it.
Sometimes it's usually a relatively mild or simple change here or there, other times it's the creation of a full on abomination.

>Imagine genetically modifying an anthro into being the biggest, strongest, tallest, most muscle-bound slab of meat that could easily tear you into two with her bare hands.
>imagine further augmenting her lethality by implanting numerous cybernetic implants into her huge body, turning her into a literal killing machine.
>imagine subjecting her to the most brutal and rigorous combat training imaginable. Training which she easily excels at due to her genetic and cybernetic enhancements
>imagine implanting a gene mod that makes her loyal to you on a genetic level to the point where you become the centre of her world.
>imagine rewarding her with a good breeding after she protected you from an corporate assassination attempt
>imagine having an literal killing machine worship the ground you walk on.
I know this is retarded wish fulfilment but goddamn if it doesn’t make me hard as diamonds

(https://desu-usergeneratedcontent.xyz/trash/image/1523/80/1523800554214.jpg)
An interesting marketing move they have here, in this live goods store. Each customer receives a simple leather collar as a gift. Now, walking deep into the store, past the shelves with accessories, smiling saleswomen with cold eyes and demonstration stands, I went deep into the zone of slave cells.
Feeling the roughness of leather in my hand, I really began to think about acquiring someone.
A little wandering between the cages and I stopped in front of three wolves, who caught my eye.
In the left call, a gray she-wolf immediately jumped up and pressed her breasts against the glass, demonstrating the desire to be bought. She even playfully licked the glass, as if promising that I will not regret the choice.
Tall, curvy body, lust mixed with joy in her eyes, big wet tongue and even a wet shine on her crotch, with a willing attitude, education and cooking skills - it all makes her a perfect companion for a busy person or a gift to a teenager.
There will be no problems with her either in bed or in everyday life.
The first one would not have to bother with upbringing or think about how to incline to intimacy.
She would bent over in expectation after one single butt slap. And while quickly learn to recognize the intent of her owner, she will cook and clean up the house, judging by the icons on the glass.
As a gift to a teenager, she will help him with homework at day, and at night, if a guy learned all the lessons, she will show him how to give more pleasure to girls. After this, even the most modest will be sure to act in bed.
And judging by the discount, she already were owned. I would not be surprised that a teenager somewhere already got more self-confident.
The right cell was occupied by a red she-wolf, who sat leaning against a wall and looking melancholically at the floor. She only raised her eyes on me without changing pose.
Unlike the gray one, she did not even try to show her eagerness. It seems she spent here quite a while, still, there is a glimpse of hope in her eyes. Those scratches on the wall, is it a... home?
Give her attention and care - and she'll give in to her Master. Still a virgin, she'll submit to the Alpha, as she was told by other females, while she were a cub. She may become incredibly loyal and will agree to absolutely any experiments and games.
Like a clay, which you can mold as you wish. Just how many different things you can try, and a short "you'll like it" should make her endure anything. If you do everything right, then it will be rewarded hundredfold.
Between those two was a cell with a dazzling white wolfess. Signs on the glass indicate that she's a wild, vicious bitch. And still a virgin too.
Just how bad she behaves, if the seller placed all 3 danger stickers? Even now she's looking at me angrily, scratching another message to a potential buyer. "You're a d..." Oh, how she tries to scare me off with her teeth and eyes.
Still, she's afraid, with her tail between her legs. Obviously, contemplating those gifts from a big poster from her cell glass doesn't help to calm her. That's what her buyer will get for free after purchasing her, and she acts like she knows very well what to expect at least from from some items.
It would take lot of skill to train her without crushing her will, but in the end she'll become a great companion with her own opinion. Upbringing her would be a real challenge.
But the moment she'll submit to you and call you Master by her own desire - it would be worth all the efforts.
So, which one should I choose?

>"Wait, is that a human male? Ok, stay cool, girl. You got it."
>"Damn, I'm already getting wet. I hope he won't notice. It would be so embarrassing!"

What tickles /collared/'s fancy more
>A ruthless alien warrior descending from her spaceship, with the intent to violently scour our world and claim it as their own, only to be subdued by the first human she meets
>A demon lord bent on taking over the earth with her horde of monsters, only to be enslaved by the "noble" hero
>A cold and indifferent goddess who refuses to anwser the prayers of humans due to her belief they are a blight upon the world losing her divine blessing all for the sake of enjoying the sexual embrace of a human non-believer

>So many sangheilli males died in the covenant war that the females feel obligated to start enlisting.
>The war comes to a close shortly afterward, and the uneasy alliance between the sangheilli and UNSC begins.
>...Or it was uneasy, until the UNSC marines realize that all of the sangheilli on their joint ops and exercises are female.
>Even if they're still rightfully bitter over the war, it doesn't sit right with the mostly male marines to be mean to women.
>The female sangheilli units pick up on that, and open up to their new allies. These females have gone months, sometimes years without male company, and they're eager to capitalize on it.
>It only takes a week before a sangheilli commando makes her favorite marine an offer...
>...And is taken on the ride of her life. By the end, she's left sweaty, exhausted, and near mind-broken from earth-shattering orgasm after orgasm.
>Sangheilli are pragmatic down to their biology. They don't have as much sexual stamina as a human. Nothing in the galaxy really does, as it doesn't make sense to drag out mating from an evolutionary standpoint.
>Humans, she finds out, don't make sense and don't really care to.
>Of course, she tells her squadmates, who tell their friends, who tell others, and the secret is out.
>Humans will gladly take wives of any species, and they'll ruin her pussy shortly afterward.
>In hardly a few years, there are a LOT of female sangheilli applying to immigrate to UNSC space, and species relations are in incredible shape.

>CONTINENTS:
>Panagea (Analogues– North America, Africa, Europe, Australia)
>Euradia (Analogues– North America, Europe, pokemon, other weird shit)
>Zyriatt (Analogues– South America, Central America, India, Africa)
>Nephir (Analogues– Egypt, Middle East)
>Shaia: (Analogues– Asia, Japan)
Eras:
(??? – 1124 B.C.) Ancient Era
From the earliest pre-recorded history, up until the formation of the human empire on Panagea. During this Era, humans were the first to shift from hunter-gatherers to farmers, and settled the first proper civilizations– which would eventually unify into the Empire of Humanity. From here on out, evolution will slowly capitalize on their interbreeding with other anthro species, adapting them to be genetically predisposed to appeal to anthros as superior mates, as an evolutionary strategy.
(1123 B.C. – 541 B.C.) Early Imperial Era
–Empire of Humanity is formed
–All other human settlements are unified into the Empire
–A prosperous anthro slave trade begins, paternalist traditions of human masters and anthro slaves/pets form
–The countless anthro tribes surrounding the Empire are frequently raided, conquered, or vasalised
–The Hunter's Lodge is formed, a guild of those most passionate about hunting anthros for sport or slaves that sponsors and regulates the trade.
–War of Wolven Aggression (Cottonwind Pact), a large number of anthro tribes unite to attack the Empire of Humanity
–Firearms developed, limited by scarcity of niter
–The Great Call to Hunt begins to cull out of control anthro overpopulation in many wild areas of Panagea
–Generations of domesticated anthro women breeding exclusively with human men creates the first domesticated species offshoots (dogs, cats, etc.)
(542 B.C. – 1 B.C.) Late Imperial Era
–Human explorers land on the shores of the High Egyptian Empire in Nephir, first contact with another continent.
–Empire of Humanity enter into slave trading agreements with the Pharoah-Queen of High Egypt, Neithhotep. Other Nepherite civilizations such as the Nubian Empire and the Sobekhanate are also discovered.
–Human explorers discover Zyriatt, war with the natives and invade.
–The first Human Incursion War in Nephir begins against High Egypt
–Euradian explorers discover Nephir, establish a couple of colonies
–Shaian Explorers discover Panagea and the Empire of Humanity, cautious trade begins
–Human colonists land in Euradia, establish colonies.
–Second Human Incursion War on Nephir begins
–Human invasion into Euradia begins
–Internal issues, famines, and a Shaian ban on Imperial trade cause the Empire's expansion to halt
–Human colonies in Euradia are cut off from the Empire due to joint Euradian-Shaian blockade agreements
(1 A.C – 262 A.C.) Dark Ages
Unknown events cause the decline of the Empire of Humanity. No human presence remains on foreign continents, save for isolated colonies in Euradia. When historical records re-emerge, human population in Panagea is noticeably reduced, anthro population even more so.
(263 A.C – 1259 A.C.) Reformation Era
Humans re-expand throughout Panagea, and large multi-species anthro civilizations flourish on the other continents
(1260 A.C – 1758 A.C.) Renaissance Era
–Global trade flourishes between Euradia, Zyriatt, Nephir, and Shaia.
–Predator/Prey wars begin in Euradia
–Humans from Pangea cross landbridges with Euradia and Zyriatt, have first contact with foreign anthros since Late Imperial times. Humans are delighted to rediscover the anthros they are traditionally so fond of, and excited to enter the global world stage. Anthro nations are notably less enthusiastic to see the warmongers slaver race of ancient times.
–The lost human colonies on Euradia are rediscovered by the rest of the continent, having largely forgotten their original heritage and instead forming a sort of bizarre syncreticism with a native group of the newly sapient pokemon species of anthros.
(1759 A.C. – 1999 A.C.) Industrial Era
–Fuck yeah, Industry!
–Anthro nations begin to reluctantly trade with the humans of Panagea
–Zyriatt and Eastern Nephir get turbo-fucked for their natural resources
–Human immigration into other nations is tolerated
–Pred/Prey civil rights movements begin in Euradia
(2000 A.C. – ??? A.C.) Modern Era
–Pred/Prey interspecies acceptance begin to heal divisions where they still exist
–Human culture and the stories of their men's superiority as mates begins to spread through anthro nations despite social stigma and taboo
–Underground social movements spread in support of anthro human relations, or even human supremacy (COLLARED, #FuckFur, a new Hunter's Lodge, etc.)

>Married anthros are the most vulnerable to the allure of human sex
>Despite rumors, furbois are actually fairly good at fucking
>But only for a few times
>They once lived fast and died young, mating involved putting all his energy into the scant few times he would breed a female
>Most males wouldn't have the opportunity to mate with his partner more than five times while the female remains fertile nearly all her life
>Afterwards the male becomes completely impotent and in this new world of long lives basically all anthro wives experience their final fuck a mere eight years after marriage
>And that isn't even mentioning the fact that she has never been ravaged more than two or three times per year
>For many their children become a distraction but for the truly unlucky their husband's seed failed to take in their lonely wombs
>Those women do not even require an introduction before they fall to the human who let himself into their sweet little home
>Fear fills her heart for only a few seconds while he approaches but a firm grope of her curvy butt and a hand sneaking under her apron is enough to melt all inhibitions and anxiety
>Within five minutes of his intrusion she is naked on the bed where she was first deflowered, on her hands and knees, presenting her bottom and tight holes for a man not her husband
>But her nearly unused pussy still eagerly invited the foreign penis inside with a welcome gush of feminine nectar, starving for any kind of virility after so many years of empty neglect
>Life fills her soul as her body remembers what it's like to be taken
>Her human mate sends her squealing and moaning with each savage and hungry thrust of her married pussy
>He playfully nips and pulls at the nipples that fed her children, massaging and reawakening her breasts so that they may soon squirt out more of her white love once more
>Her eyes roll back into her head as the incredible heat flows into her once cold, empty belly
>Forget once a quarter, try multiple times a day

Is it a punishment? Or can it also be seen as a reward/status symbol?
A favorite anthro might have most of her duties taken over by the other ones, leaving her with just the job of bed warming and breeding.
Limbs aren’t needed for these tasks and are removed, becoming a fucknugget for her master.
It shows favor from her master, not only is the procedure expensive, but it’s kind of like how pale skin was seen as a status symbol as a tan meant you were poor and working the fields.
No limbs shows she doesn’t do manual labor of any sort and could be seen as a status symbol of a higher level as the other anthros will need to feed and bathe her.
Of course it can still be a punishment for anthros unwilling or unfit for anything else than being bred, I wonder if there would be a way to distinguish between the two wildly different nugget statuses.

>Huge muscular warrior race beaten and domesticated into the perfect breeding stock
>Still plenty strong but weighed down with fat asses, wide hips, and huge milky tits
>Happened to the Minotaurs a millennia ago with the Romans, turning them into the cows we know today
>The tradition lives on with the more recent subjugation of Sangheili, with some referring to their domesticated forms as geckos or newts
>Despite the biological differences and unlike the cows of yesteryear, technology affords the newts a much faster conversion rate, no longer needing several generations to become perfectly molded for humanity's use
>Between the two once proud warrior races there seems to exist an unspoken mutual respect or acknowledgement, an acceptance of their shared position in the human's universe

>Sangheili cows that misbehave are sent to industrial milking facilities, where they are forcefully fed enormous amounts of hormones, and high grade fertility drugs
>this aggressive regimen of drugs and hormone therapy swells their already massive curves to obscene sizes, often to the point of immobilizing them.
>the only use modified “newts” have is giving milk, and being bred to give birth or future generations of Sangheili cows

Anthro teachers are legally required to be pregnant with a human child while instructing

>The entire process of impregnation, pregnancy, and birth is displayed as a real-time lesson
>Anthro students watch as she is ravaged by a chosen human displaying the rightful place and role of female anthros and plants his seed deep inside her belly
>Usually it is a male taken from one of the student's families, either a human father showing his highly embarrassed and aroused daughter how he bred her mother or older brother showing off his superior virility to his blushing sister
>In many cases the human will stick around for a week, deflowering and impregnating many young schoolgirls both in the class and in others
>Birth of the new anthro baby occurs where it was conceived, in front of the classroom in view of all
>More experienced teachers will not require midwives, simply spreading their legs and even commentating on the birthing process as it occurs
>If the pregnant teens are lucky the father of the baby will be there to comfort her as the newborn enters the new world and lets out its first cry
>While the teacher will grade the performance as her final project, usually any anthro girl brave enough to give birth in the classroom to provide her classmates with a display of the natures of breeding will receive enough credit to pass the class no problem
>Those too embarrassed to give birth in the class and instead pops out their baby in the nurse's office will receive half credit
>The teacher usually takes the summer off or at least takes birth control to let her tired womb rest

>Pilot from the anthrostate crash lands and is captured by tribal humans

>When she gets rescued she tells them nothing extraordinary happened, they were initially aggressive but relented doing harm and gave her shelter
>They accept this until someone on the recovery brings up the cellphone they recovered
>It was covered in dirty finger prints and when plugged into a charger they get a warning that its running low on space
>The culprit is a massive load of blurry images and videos
>They start off innocuous enough but then they give way to what seems like a ritual
>Forcefully taking off her outfit and given a tribal one
>Lots of bowing to the pot belly chieftain, body paint applied and walking on all fours
>The last of the batch show her sucking him off and finally a vigorous mating for all to see
>Impressive stamina for a fat pompous bastard
>Clearly not the first time this tribe has nabbed a pretty lady from beyond the jungle
>Rather than refer to the higher ups they deiced to keep it for themselves
>And they scroll through the pics and rewatch the videos over and over and over again

To carry the prior discussion about tribal humans:
>Hippy furs want to go back to their 'roots'
>Convenient local population of tribal humans nearby to blend in with
>College educated Furbois think they're gonna live the dream life with tomboy outdoorsy waifurs
>Instead these independent need-no-man types quickly fall into traditional roles, their bellies swell from human seed
>The always apologizing vegan furbois don't at all seem attractive when they have grug and friends for comparison
>Lots of murmurs of wanting to back home, this was a mistake etc.
>Meanwhile the ladies are more than happy to stay

>Civilization has made anthro males soft and weak, both mentally and physically
>Generations of safe sedentary life combined with anthro feminism have wrung all the fighting instincts out of them and left them timid and agreeable
>Anthro society is heavily gynocentric as a result
>Humans meanwhile have just continued living in the harsh wilderness, hunting and fighting to survive
> As a result while they are technologically backward, building no cities and still fighting with spears and axes, they are much more physically robust and virile
>In contrast to the meek and submissive furbois, human males are aggressive and domineering towards females, especially females not of their own tribe

>they are technologically backward
I think it would be better for humans to be technologically adept, but choosing to restrain their advancement and not let technology rule their lives - thus hidden towns and villages of loose confederations.

>every year thousands of anthro citizens go missing
>some are discovered to have been kidnapped, others murdered
>but there are a special few that dissappear in mysterious circumstances
>dozens of female anthro citizen, every year, go missing without a trace
>unresolved cases involving anthro women of various species and ages
>Wives, Daughters, Managers, retail workers
>there are no patterns to the disappearances
>none except one
>in many cases those close to the victim(s) talk about how the victim(s) having recently returned from taking a trip to some far remote part of the world
>all claim, varying degrees, that the victims returned somewhat different
>slight changes in behavior, a noted interest in the wilderness, muttering of unintelligible phrases or words
>even in one case, the family of the victim reported her being pregnant
>the victims then would go missing not long after
>their homes virtually untouched, nothing taken or missing, no warning
>in a few scattered cases all that's left is a note or letter expressing desire 'to return to them'
>these cases are never resolved nary a trace of the victim no matter the places searched
>officials report that these cases may be the result of untreated psychological issues ranging from schizophrenia to depression
>however, among certain circles, there are rumors of these victims being falling for strange creatures
>these so called 'cryptozoologists' claim that there is a race of primitive bipedal anthro not too dissimilar from Chimp or ape anthros, Hyu-mans
>these beings live in isolated pockets of wilderness far from society
>they travel in the shadows often stalking those that enter their domain, taking them
>those that encounter the hyu-mans have a strong desire to return to them
>for decades these experts have scoured the forests of the world and have found nothing
>'some day we'll find them [...] lost tribe of anthros hidden somewhere'
>but as long as these cases continue then so will the mystery

>Humans become the anthro-worlds version of Bigfoot
Kek

>all the different anthro species have tales of hyu-mans in their myths and folklore
>in some they are depicted as lustful demons who would seize young anthro women in the night to have their way with them, and impregnate them with more of their demonic kind
>and in others they are depicted as powerful yet gentle nature spirits, who protect women and children, and can even grant "blessings of fertility unto anthro women

>Legends of wild men seizing women were inevitably used for the big screens
>Movies about terrible beast stalking women in the frontier
>The intention was to instill fear
>Damsel in distress, a classic trope
>But clearly they've failed because shrieks weren't heard from the women nor did they seem shaken up afterwards
>Rather they seemed more interested in learning more about these myths and odd tales
>Discussing it with friends on forums
>Fanfiction (What if the monster won and got the women? What if they're not actually monsters?)
And thus the Hyu-man fandom was born

I've been drinking tonight to celebrate the 4th of July but I just felt like tellin you all I've got something planned for later that I've been thinkin' about for a while now. Hopefully not another project I'll abandon for months at a time, but who can say. I ain't drawin' or writin shit right now 'cause it'd come out lousy, like normal, but worse.
The idea is a full generational cucking of a furboi. Between his wife, his daughter, and his mother. A human comes along and fucks an impregnates all three, each feeling more brutal than the last. His own mother, the woman that raised him and loved him unconditionally now disowns him for her human lover and her new child who she'll shower with affection, his wife, his childhood sweetheart who lost to the human cock. She's fine with telling him this because she knows he won't divorce her like the limp dick loser he is. And his daughter, his pride and joy, knocked up by a human who sees her as nothing more than a onahole to dump his seed in. She was on track to go to college and have an excellent career, but she threw it all away once she got a taste of humanity's sweet pleasures.
I like the idea anyway, but lemme know if it's a banger or a dud. And give me a species to work with too.

>Be park ranger
>Get a call, hiker saw discarded clothes on a rock
>Already know what to expect so no haste
>Arrive on scene
>Hiker says the usual, was walking along and saw bright women clothing on a rock
>They're folded neatly with a wallet to the side
>No sign of struggles
>someone laid these out to be found
>Buddy on radio calls in
>"The usual huh?"
>"Yep the usual"
>.....
>Goddammit

Why not all three in a group similar to pic related? (https://desu-usergeneratedcontent.xyz/trash/image/1688/60/1688604138162.jpg)
>three "normal" anthro dads who clearly have the femboy genes but don't actively pursue it
>all neighbors and friends
>Fox is the nominal leader, most normal
>Rabbit is the hardworking and a bit repressed, perhaps wanting to "rise above" the sex-crazed stereotype of his species
>Cheetah talks like he's hot shit, but everyone knows that while he's full of hot air he's also dependable when it comes down to it
>then the human neighbor moves in
>Fox has become mostly standard femboy, but its a gold standard
>Rabbit has done a complete one-eighty, maybe even pawning off his (many) daughters to his new master on the rare occasion he isn't thirsting for some dick himself
>and the Cheetah is finally cumming as much as he'd claimed he would back when he made up stories about how much of a lady's man he was, except now its whenever a human dick so much as touches his ass and doesn't stop all night

The name is James. James Smith. I was a pretty happy guy, who tried to share that happiness with his family every day. Odds are you might have known me from around the neighborhood. I live on Emerald Pine Road with my lovely vixen of a wife Kora and our two kids. I work at a small tech firm out in town, and I try to stay active in both the community and with my family. From the outside looking in, it seems like I’m living the American Dream, especially for a fox anthro. And I was, until that fateful day.
See, I had a secret. One that nobody, not even my wife, knows about. It’s…a fetish of mine that’s kinda gotten out of hand. Kora was out shopping one afternoon, and I noticed she’d left a pair of her panties out on the floor. I went to toss them in the laundry but for the first time I took a moment to appreciate how soft they were. The delicate lace pattern felt really nice, and I could still smell her on them. Me and Kora hadn’t been intimate in a while due to various things in our lives occupying our attention, so I became aroused rather easily. The kids were still at school, so I had the house to myself.
Just on a lark, I decided to slip them on and feel the fabric against my skin. It was awesome. I found myself mindlessly rubbing my legs together before I caught a glimpse of myself in the standing mirror in our bedroom. I’d had always been told I had a fairly curvy frame for a guy, my hips flared out a decent amount on their own, and now they were wiggling back and forth in these skimpy panties, with the tip of my manhood peaking out the hem. I could hardly believe it was me staring back at myself. I collected my thoughts and finished stroking myself until I’d cum, now thoroughly covering the tiny underwear with semen before burying it at the bottom of the dirty clothes hamper.
It was a small, random act. But the sensation and the visual of myself kept playing over and over in my head. My life seemed perfect, but it was just going through the same thing over and over again. That...that was so simple. So harmless. So exciting.
It wouldn’t be long before I found an opportunity to do it again, and again still, each time going further. At first it was just using my wife’s panties, then the rest of her underwear and lingerie. Then I got a credit card under a different name so I could start buying my own. It was easy enough to hide my outfits in the attic, my family only ever went up there for holiday decorations. Soon I had a nice little wardrobe to choose from whenever I wanted to masturbate. It was intoxicating, stroking my dick to my own image in the mirror. Once I’d gotten a nice wig and done a couple makeup tutorials, it was truly like watching a horny slut squirting to completion every time, my dick bulging out of my panties. I should have stopped right then and there.
But one weekend, my wife decided to take the kids to see her parents out of state, and I decided to stay behind and work on another project. At least, that’s what I told her. I waved them goodbye and as soon as my family was out the driveway and around the corner, I ran back inside. With almost three days to myself, I wanted to enjoy every moment of it. I took my time getting dressed in what I thought was my cutest, most convincing outfit. The skirt fluttering around my tail felt so refreshing. I stepped outside for just a moment and turned to lock the door when I heard my name. I felt the blood drain from my body as I whipped around to see our neighbor. He was the only human in the neighborhood, a rude and lecherous young man who thanks to his wealthy parents, was living comfortably on his own in a house he could normally never afford. I was at a loss for words, but he let out a chuckle stating that he was surprised but that I pull the look off well.
Panicking that someone else might notice, I open the door and pull him back inside.
I told him I could explain as I feverishly wracked my brain for some sort of excuse that he might buy, but he casually shrugged and remarked that everyone has hobbies, but still, to think that James Smith, family man, was actually a crossdressing perv, he couldn’t even finish his remark before busting into a belly laugh. He said I seemed more like a ‘Janet’ now. I could feel my cheeks burning with irritation and embarrassment. I sighed and stammered that I’d really prefer it if he not mention what he had seen today, and I began to grab the purse I intended to go out with that had my wallet, and he stopped me.
He said he understood and that he’d totally be down to keep my secret, and I didn’t even need to pay him. A wave of relief washed over me only briefly before his hand came up to my muzzle and cupped it firmly.
He continued that he wasn’t lying when he said I looked good, and his other hand came down to his crotch, rubbing it roughly before he pulled down his pants exposing his cock. I glanced down for a moment, then back to him, what I could only imagine was a mixture of confusion and disgust.
I knew that he was a horndog, most humans are. He’d taken glances at Kora and made sexual remarks to her before, just like any woman in the neighborhood, but I never would have guessed how…broad his interests truly were
The human got comfortable in my recliner as I knelt before him. The excitement I had for this day was all but gone, replaced with a hanging feeling of regret. I looked at his cock bobbing up and down in front of my eyes and I felt tears welling up as I began to tremble. It was…just too big. The veins throbbed angrily with each pulse of blood, It continued to swell, until the tip, wet with pre-cum slithered across my nose and my senses were assaulted with his musk. It had to be 4, maybe 5 times as big as my own.
He didn’t wait for me to gather myself before slipping it into my mouth. And so began our fateful arrangement. It started with me blowing him in my own home. Being forced to swallow his semen was enough to have me puking on the carpet afterwards, but this only amused the human more. He proclaimed this was only a single instance of our new relationship as neighbors.
Every so often he would call for me under the name ‘Janet’, when I was at work, or home with the kids, or trying to spend quality time with the wife. And if I didn’t want him to expose me and my fetish, I came running. It was torture, or so I thought. He’d always want me dressed up whenever I came to see him, so I left my wardrobe at his place. He’d often ask for a blowjob, and his requests only escalated. He began teasing my nipples in an effort to enlarge them and increase their sensitivity, along with forbidding my from touching my own penis when we were together. He’d bough lubricant and instructed that I should start probing my “asspussy”, like a real slut would. It wasn’t just physical, he trained me emotionally as well. Going on about how my kids and wife would be sickened by the slut their father and husband had become. How easy it was for me to throw away the life I care about, all for some human dick. That wasn’t it! I had no choice! He’s forcing me to swallow his cum day in and day out, I-I do it BECAUSE I love my family and I don’t want to hurt them! It was all mentally and emotionally exhausting, but deep down…the humiliation…the fear…that overwhelming sense of domination…it was awakening something inside of me. I was terrified, and I kept telling myself I should just tell Kora the truth. Put an end to all of this. But I didn’t. I think I know why now.
After a couple weeks of this “training” he finally took me, while in my own home. I won’t lie, I cried. I begged him to stop. But after days of priming, my asshole was just relaxed enough to allow him inside. I passed out from the fear, but when I awoke, I was drenched in sweat and cum, my ass trying and failing to close properly, a slow trickle of milky white fluid rolling over my balls onto the floor. But the worst part is, my stomach was sticky with my own semen.
And so, it continued for months. I wasn’t able to hide how close me and the neighbor had become, so I told my family we were working on a neighborhood project together, and that we’d be happy to unveil it soon. Kora was skeptical. She had every right to be. As of late, I found myself struggling with erectile dysfunction whenever we’d try to make love. But somehow, things were holding firm with my life as a whole. That’s just how tight knit our family is. I console Kora and tell her it’s probably just stress on my end, and when I can finally finish and show her what I’ve been working on, I know It will be worth it.
Given that our love making session was officially cancelled for the night, I told her I couldn’t sleep, so I’d head over to the neighbor’s to keep working on the project.
I knock on the door, and when the human answers, he smiles graciously before ushering me inside. Wearing nothing more than a long overcoat, I drop it unceremoniously to the floor, revealing the skimpy underwear beneath. Special holes exposed both my now engorged nipples and puckering slit of an asspussy, drooling with the lube I’d prepped it with moments ago. My cock fell limply out a hole in the front, throbbing softly in anticipation, though I knew full well I wouldn’t even graze it. The human coyly stated that he hadn’t called for me this evening, and I replied that I knew.
I’d love to say it was all cruel blackmail from an evil human being, and that I was an unfortunate, foolish victim. But that’s not true. Never was. That fear I felt months ago? I was scared at how much I was enjoying it all. That it was wrong, and that I was going to ruin my life. But as I tenderly kissed the human who roughly squeezed a handful of my plump cheeks, I knew that only now was I truly living. The name is Janet. Janet Smith. And I can’t wait to share this happiness with my family someday very, VERY soon.

>Find depressed anthro chick in collared world
>She feels completely lost and unsure of her place in life and struggles on her own
>Offer to make her feel better and spend time with her if she pays with her body
>Slowly convince her that she'd be so much happier in life if she just gave up and accepted being officially Collared like so many other anthros have

>A common myth found around the world is of a battle of divinity between a female goddess of fertility against god of conquest
>All say she lost the battle and her domain, the wilderness, was gifted to his followers colloquially known as the wild men
>With such control they hunted anthros using both their strength unparalleled sexual prowess, a power leeched from the fallen goddess
>In response anthros formed tight communities to help stave off attacks which inevitably grew to cities and nations
>As they grew attack came less and generations afterwards only knew of such creatures via oral tradition
>Only those in the frontier will say such of these creatures and even those were seldom
>Variations of the tale flip flop over whether the god himself put a handicap on his devotees to embrace the challenge or if the goddess gave herself up, allowing her domain to be taken so her followers could flee and form their own domain of artificial homes

>LF long-term partner to put me in my place and shave off the rest of my mane~

This is weirdly hot.
>Human guy is pissed that female anthros are not around and all he have left is stupid furbois
>So he force one of the Lion guy force him to add femininity and “fat” on to his body and ass and shave his mane off with no hesitation
>A human male really don’t care if the anthro is male or not. Most straight humans will make sure the male furboi is feminine enough to convince themselves it’s a furry women and their ‘package’ they have is just a “stuck strapon”.

>Map of where anthro women were reported to have disappeared
>Overlay it with a map of cryptid sightings
>Then overlay it again with a old map that depicts settlements/cities from a unknown empire that most scholars claim is just a inaccurate map made with limited data of the time, only woo/cranks bring it up
>Conveniently they all (mostly) align

There are so many delicious scenarios for this.
>teens sneaking off into the woods for some naughty time and never coming back out
>a cheer squad going missing when their bus dies in the middle of nowhere
>an entire girl scout troop and their guardians vanishing when on a camping trip
>groups of hikers getting picked off and bred one by one

>the best harem is the kind that grows itself
>your bitches regularly go out and catch you some new pussy
>from dangerously little girls to perky, fertile college girls, to fat tittied milfs of four, if they were attractive and fit in the trunk of your car they could find themselves in your basement
>sometimes your girls would feel extra cruel and send their families pictures of their lost women next to their missing posters to maximize the mockery, bound on the table and heavily raped with their new human master's sperm spilling out of their stolen pussies
>it wouldn't be too long before they'd be broken, eventually joining the hunt to serve their master more pussy
>They might even make recommendations on who to catch next from their former family and friends

>potential Slasher movies but with Breeding
>genre name is Stealers

>Catalyst for the movie is a girl convincing others to go camping
>They note she's a bit odd, strong hippy vibes, but the idea sounds exciting
>Once they're far from civilization she vanishes and soon they're picked off one by one
>The main character is the last one standing and discovers their camp adorned with clothes and other items from different time periods
>When she's eventually caught its revealed the hippy girl purposely led them to the forest to be caught
>Time skip
>Main character walks up to a group of women to convince them to go camping

In the world I’m creating, females Anthros can be impregnated almost year round, with mammalian Anthros following a very similar estrous cycle to that of a Human female. However, unlike Human females, female mammalian Anthros also go through seasonal periods of heightened reproductivity, in which they become not only extremely fertile, but also more likely to conceive twins, triplets, and even on rare occasions quadruplets (for some select species).
The exact time of such periods (known simply as ‘heat’) vary from species to species, with some even experiencing it multiple times a year. This ‘heat’ can last anywhere from a few days (if treated) to a month (if left untreated), with some species experiencing multi-month long periods.
Sadly, due to stereotypes brought forth by Human written smut novels, many Humans and non-mammalian Anthros have a fetishized view of this reproductive curse, with many assuming that this period is highly enjoyable amongst female mammalian-Anthros. This however could not be further from the truth.
In reality, while few may have a positive experience with ‘heat’, for most female’s this period is one of extreme discomfort, brought on by not only the frequent mood swings and oppressive sexual drive, but also from the almost painful increase in sexual sensitivity. This sensitivity not only impacts the Anthro’s ability to carry out everyday tasks, but also effect their sleep patterns which can lead to insomnia and exhaustion.
While this unfortunate period of time effects the females experiencing it, it also negatively effects societies as a whole, and can pose a noticeable strain on any business, Government, or company whom may possess a large number of female individuals. And in no other group is this risk as present as it is within the Royal Regnun military.
The Royal Regnun military, a large military made up mostly of canines, is one of the few militaries in the world of Nanetae that allows females to serve alongside males within mixed-sex units. This of course poses a risk to unit cohesion, as large numbers of soldiers, sailors, and marines could possibly be temporarily knocked out of service for upwards of a month if left unchecked. This makes dealing with heat cycles a top priority.
While new medicines have been created to help combat the effects of heat cycles, they remain extremely expensive and have a good amount of risk involved in taking them. As such most servicewomen are only able to deal with their heat cycles manually through sexual contact with males. However, such activities are forbidden within the ranks, and violators are subject to harsh discipline. Due to this, servicewomen are forced to turn to non-military partners to help soothe their afflictions.
Although such relationships are easy for those lucky enough to be stationed on the home island, who can visit or find mates, these relationships are rather tricky for those stationed or deployed away from home, where finding a fellow canine to mate with may be nigh impossible. This issue has lead to the development of a certain kind of culture, in which servicewomen indulge themselves with male locals regardless of species, most of whom being male prostitutes.
In no other land is such culture as common and catered towards as the nearby and currently occupied Human-majority island nation of Terratilis. On this island an entire industry has formed around soothing the inflammations caused by the ever reliable heat cycles of the female canine occupiers.
Once heat begins, female servicewomen are granted a one week pass in which they surrender their weapons and equipment to their local service stations armory before being allowed to travel to their nearest ‘relief village’. Upon arrival they will pay the fee before being united with the ‘relief worker’ of their choice. Such relief workers mostly consist of young men in search of extra money, with the most common of species involved being Human. Such relief workers are in extremely high demand, as most males are unwilling to do the job, and it’s not unheard of servicewomen reserving males months in advance.
Once united the pair will take up temporary residence within either an on-site brothel or a small pre-built house, the rooms of which being pre-stocked with food and drink along with access to baths, kitchens, and toilets.
The pair will remain together in an almost non-stop act of passion until either the female runs out of time on her pass, or her heat is finally cured. Once this is done the pair will say their farewells and will seperate.
Upon arrival back to their service station, the servicewoman will either be given another week pass, if her heat as not yet been fully treated, or medication to prevent any possible pregnancies caused by the activities. Such medication however are not 100% effective, and few find themselves dismissed from the military and sent back home with a hybrid growing inside of them, abortion not being allowed due to state-mandated religious reasons.

>When your girl convinces you go deep into the woods and you start hearing rustling in the bushes

>over the years there have been numerous missing persons cases that have been attributed to the legendary hyu-mons
>the victims in these cases are almost always female, of various species, and ranging in age from nubile girls to curvy milfs
>and the victims always went missing deep in the wilderness far from civilization

>She says she needs to take a "call of nature" and tells you to start a camp in the mean time
>You were hesitant but she just said it was probably the wind or something
>You set up camp after figuring out tent poles, starting a fire after wasting half a dozen matches.
>You look at the time
>She'd been gone for half an hour at this point
>You call out for her, when nobody responded, try to follow her path
>You keep finding bits of clothing
>her sweater, then her shirt, then her bra, finally her pants
>A nearby tree had claw marks and you become afraid
>You flee back to camp and call for help from the forest rangers
>Soon a search party was launched, but nothing else was found
>You go home with promises of any news
>You don't know what to do so try and look up anything about missing persons
>You open her laptop and as you start typing in search you get an autofill
>"Getting lost in the woods to be ravaged by Hyu-Mans"
>You click on the strange result and feel horror as you read urban legends/stories of missing women and girls across the world, all vanishing in deep forests
>only a few were ever found, often strangely changed and often going missing again soon after.
>One account told of signs of these women having been pregnant even when they were not before going missing
>You keep searching feverishly to learn more legends of HyuMans
>More research pulls up forums of anonymous people fantasizing about these monsters with strong hands and cocks
>You read more and find yourself wondering if they were truly that good at fucking
>You realize that you grew hard at the thoughts you've read and had.
>You shut off the PC to go take a cold shower, then off to bed, trying to shake off the degenerate thought.
*weeks later*
>You'd heard no news of your girlfriend, but you weren't concerned with that anymore as you put on a skirt and some of her panties you'd found in the laundrybag
>It was time to go to the woods again yourself, to find HyuMa- to find her.
>It was late noon by the time you return to the spot you'd camped
>You'd prepared a week for this and your trained, plugged pucker twitched in anticipation
>Walking through the leafy forest you looked around, cock hardening a little tent under your skirt
>Suddenly you felt it; the eyes staring at you from somewhere
>You pretend not to notice and keep going, swaying your wide hips like your girlfriend used to
>You squeak after a rough, large hand grasps one of your cheeks from behind
>It was one of THEM, those legendary urban monsters were real
>Without a word or any warning, he presses you into the tree
>He grinds into your ass and you can feel the sheer size of his cock, barely hidden by a loin-cloth
>his humping slides between your legs and rubs your little packages through the fabric of the panties, leaving a tickling feeling inside your core
>His rough, bearded face nuzzles into your neck, sniffing your perfumed scent
>Clearly he liked it as the large cock expands and pushes up on your crotch from beneath, prompting you to rise onto your tip toes and arch into the tree
>You glance down and let out a gasp as it sticks out past your bulge, outsizing you by far
>He drew back and his rough but nimble fingers pulled your panties down and stop, clearly the plug stumped him, but you flex and it pops out like you'd practiced
>"Good" He growls
>Oh god they talk
>Any other thought was purged from your mind as he plunged in, the broad head unlike any of the tapered SillyLizard toys you'd used
>The meat pole pushed deep inside and your borrowed panties wetten from your precum streaming out
>With grunting and your efforts to relax your rear, he pushed in bit by bit and until you could feel his hairy loins tickling your rear
>You could feel a bulge in the front of your belly
>He pulled back and the emptiness made you whine like an animal, which became a yelp after he slapped your ass unexpectedly, and as you tightened in reflex he roughly thrust again.
>The pleasure striking your inner button and being stretched apart like that was becoming too much
>He roughly began slapping into you, quickly making a wet mess of your hole as he ruined it
>With a keening moan you finally cum like a girl from getting battered in that sweet spot and moments later feel a flood of liquid heat shoot into you as he gripped your hips and bit your ear
>He pulled out finally and you collapse to the ground, legs shivering
>Without a word he picks you up and slings you over his shoulder like a sack
>Almost cockdrunk you giggle at the rough treatment, watching the forest sway behind you as you're taken deeper in
>A long trek later you reach a river to and he swam across gracefully, you holding onto his muscular shoulders
>A quick walk through the meadow where he kept groping your ass, you reach an open area hidden by dense trees and vines
>A veritable village stood there, with more HyuMan's wandering about doing various chores...
>And then you spot others, a foxgirl here, a ratgirl there, carrying food or getting railed into the wall like you had been only an hour earlier
>Your insides tingle, itching to be refilled at the sight
>You're ushered into a wooden hut with a slap on the ass and giggle girlishly
>Then you see HER, coming out of the back
>"A-anon!" She's surprised, and only more so when she gets a good look at you
>Rather than be appalled she then giggles, "Oh if I knew you'd like this too, I would have brought you with me! This is going to be so much fun!"
Some tie later later
>Your ex-girlfriend was screaming, not in terror but pleasure as his cock ravaged her pussy making it drip
>Her belly was slightly bulging with child
>None was getting on the floor because you were right under them, mouthing those big balls and licking the base clean of the juices
>Finally he came and she went limp in his arms as he finished, you hurriedly licking up the dregs - how had you never known you needed this so much
>He placed her on the bed to sleep while you look on
>You paw at his leg and whine, feeling left out
>You'd grown even more feminine; your ass had grown larger if still firm and your chest had begun to fill out into the smallest of A-cups
>Your hair had grown so long it reached your shoulders and your cock and balls had shrunk
>You tucked your gloved arms up by your chest and whined again, begging "Master, put me in my place with your big fat cock"
>Your master grunted, and sat down and you eagerly took the invitation, long tongue plunging in to the softened flesh, determined to bring back that glorious pleasure stick
>sucking deeply you taste her insides on him and start bobbing, snout making it an easy job
>Finally he grew hard again and pushed you off
>You turn around, tilting your ass to him and waving it
>He took your invitation. Grabbin your hair he plunged his newly hardened cock inside
>Your mouth opens to pant in pleasure as he slams down into you, burying deep inside and stirring you up
>Your penis dribbles into your thong and stains your fur with clear pre
>You yelp as he suddenly flips you over, cock still inside and finally does the position you've been hoping for - the one that he used on her first - Mating Press
>Pushing your heels to your ears he slides back, and slams back down into your needy hole, burying himself inside and battering your ass and bullying your penis
>He batters you for some time more and then you cum together
>How could life be better for you?

(https://desu-usergeneratedcontent.xyz/trash/image/1666/18/1666188231791.jpg)
>"Pizza delivery!"
>"But I didn't order any pizza... Also aren't you living on our street?"

>Day 90. Upped the concentrations of aphrodisiacs in her water again, removed all objects she's been using to masturbate.
>She fingers herself constantly now, but has difficulty achieving orgasm.
>I have gotten her a clit shield, and will be fitting her with it along side another dosage increase on day 100.

>before long everyone at school knows about your mom and her insatiable BHC thirst
>now every human boy at school is showing up to bang your mom and sister
>even some of your fellow anthros have started showing up to watch and jerk their own inferior dicks to your family being used as fucktoys

With how many “hikers” dissapear, you gotta wonder of some of the park rangers are in on it.
>Yet another case of campers disappearing
>Some bachelorette party or something, seven females missing
>A search is coordinated
>The young park rangers search the area closer to the camp site
>The more experienced rangers search the difficult terrain
>Then there’s the ‘cougars’, an all female group of experienced park rangers who go to the part of the park that’s closed off from everyone else
>Dangerous animals you see, only the most senior and experienced rangers are allowed in after completing “the ritual”
>No one outsider the group knows what the “ritual” is but it involves accompanying the Cougars to the closed off part of the park and stay there for a week
>The Leader of the park rangers is a senior member of the cougars and she strictly vet anyone interested in joining the Cougars
>Interestingly, all of the Cougars have multiple children, even those that have been divorced for years
>It’s not uncommon for one or two of them to be pregnant at any given time
>The younger rangers suspect that it might be the fresh air and being close to nature that makes them interested in having a large families
>”Lucky Husbands” some of the males will say
>If only they knew
>But apperances must be kept and the truth hidden
>The arrangement is old but simple:
>The rangers will “fail” to find the “lost” campers
>And in return each Couger gets to be the center of attention of multiple Hyu-mans on a regular basis
>It’s a good arrangement
>And following this latest “disappearance”, many of the Cougars look forward to a week of vacation

>Wild men aren't the only cryptids to stalk the woods
>In fact a whole variety of legendary beast are said to roam about
>That in itself isn't unusual
>But they're relationship to hyu-mans is
>Local tribes tell via their oral tradition that these creatures once belonging to certain gods, acting as their servants, were tamed by them
>Once fearsome night stalkers were domesticated and made servile
>the accounts among tribes and even within tribes
>Sometimes they're eldritch shape shifting blood hounds seeking new 'stock' for their master, either leading them to new prey or just catching the unfortunate ones themselves
>Others say the sight of one is a omen of good fertility
>Among the variables there's on constant
>If you spot one the hyu-mans aren't far behind

>Year is 2077
>It’s been 54 years since the great microwave occurred and the country collapsed
>Finally after many decades of blood, sweat, and tears the Anthros have finally been able to carve out the Commonwealth Anthro Republic (massachusetts)
>Less than a year later most of the country falls into complete chaos as large, heavily armed gangs begin to appear due to Anthros being completely incapable of looking after themselves
>Northern border starts to become threatened by encroaching Human soldiers by the New England Coalition who are looking to liberate the Humans that are being oppressed

Plot-twist:
>The rest of the (Human dominanted) country was never hit by nukes
>In fact, nuclear war never happened
> It’s only the (Anthro dominated) States in the north-east that got nuked
> By themselves
>That’s What happens when you allow Anthros to gain power and access to local nuclear storage
>The rest of the Union have been waiting for the radiation levels to drop down before moving in
>Meanwhile, everyone waited for the migration of fallout refugees - a migration that never came
>Apparently, the Anthros just presumed that the entire world was gone, so they basically sat on their asses and did nothing for half a century
>Now that the radiation levels are down, Humans go in to rescue the unlucky Humans that have been trapped in there by Anthro warlords
>There’s not much hope for the Anthros though
>And the whole odeal have been used by the rest of the non-nuked Union to strip Anthros of their rights
> Clearly they Cannot be trusted with responsibilities

Exactly my intention, except I was thinking that the anthrostate was some minor country in Europe or something
>The anthrostate arises as the dominant power after a coup d'etat against the reigning government of the high anthro population but otherwise unremarkable Anthroistan
>Estates anthro supremacist laws and policies, making the surrounding states watch with minor concern
>Only for them to immediately nuke themselves within the year, either in an internal power struggle or because "those damn humans are up to something, I just know it!"
>Concern becomes momentary surprise, then resigned acceptance
>Of course they'd do that
But your idea runs better with fallout so let's go with that

Best couple to bisexually dominate?
>husband/wife, with or expecting kids
>husband/wife, no kids
>husband/wife, never consummated with the other, married to your cock
>boy/girlfriend, fucked
>boy/girlfriend, never fucked
>boy/girlfriend, competitive with each other but loves you
>brother/sister, not incestuous
>brother/sister, definitely incestuous
>brother/sister, identical twins
>son/daughter, biologically yours
>stepson/stepdaughter, not yours but they will be after you're done
>guy/girl friendly fuckbuddies, not really romantically into anybody but friendly with plenty of benefits
>random strangers, enthusiasm varies depending on how you meet
>tomgirl/tomboy, the guy's a slut but the girl is a bro
>gay male/straight female, both are into getting fucked
>straight male/lesbian female, neither are into getting fucked

>>stepson/stepdaughter, not yours but they will be after you're done
>Your wife leaves her first husband when both of her children are still infants and marries you. They grow up with you as their father.
>Anthros have some animalistic instincts and idiosyncrasies, and two pure anthros growing up with a human father has some odd effects.
>Your stepdaughter's teenage heat cycles start hitting her like a truck. Since human men stay at a sexual peak constantly after puberty, your stepdaughter more or less grew up in a pheromone hotbox, so her hormones go nuts. You've caught her more than once sniffing your clothes and masturbating furiously. When your wife complains of her favorite dildo going missing, you look in the box of sex toys you and she keep in the closet and find the one made from a mold of your dick is gone. You later find it in your stepdaughter's room. Concerned, you keep your findings on the downlow.
>Your stepson got the opposite treatment. He grew up rather shy, despite your efforts to get him to man up. His subconscious decided it's better to be submissive in a household with a firmly entrenched 'alpha' than to make waves, so his testosterone has always been low, giving him a somewhat androgynous frame. Puberty has left him kind of confused. You've caught him peeking into your bedroom as you work your wife over, but while he uses one hand to stroke himself off, the fingers of the other are under his tail and knuckle-deep inside him. One time, he bites his lip and mouths 'Daddy,' and you know it's not his mom he's focusing on.
>Then they start experimenting with each other. Masturbating together, sex play (often with the pilfered dildo), and joint voyeurism are just a few things they get up to, often with your stepdaughter being the leader. The few times your stepson can muster up the nerve to penetrate his sister, she always insists on anal because "I'm saving myself for someone, dummy!"
>Though your stepson stops topping when his sister holds him down one day, shoving one of your unwashed shirts in his face and jerking him off.
>He came so hard that he actually hit the ceiling.
>You finally talk to your wife about what the kids are doing one night, and how it's strangely focused on you.
>She nods along like she expected everything. "Adoptive relationships are a bit different for anthros than humans, honey," she says. "I've talked with the kids already, and, well... Kids! Come in!"
>Both of your children slip into the bedroom, naked as the day they were born. Your stepdaughter is as eager as can be, her virgin slit drooling and the nipples on her pert breasts hard.
>Your stepson is nervously twiddling his fingers, but his tail wags and his small, pre-tipped cock is throbbing.
>They meet eyes for a moment, then turn as one and lift their tails, putting everything on display.
>"Go on, honey..." Your wife purrs. "It's best if their first times are here, somewhere safe and with their loving daddy."
>You have the weirdest boner.

>straight male/lesbian female, neither are into getting fucked
>Jerry and Jennie grew up together as friends, and he was very understanding when she came out as a lesbian, even though he knew it meant he would never have a chance to act on his childhood crush
>A trip to Vegas gone bad later, and they found themselves over $100,000 in debt to some very scary people
>So when those scary people offered to let them pay off their debt entirely by working as prostitutes for a single night, they knew they had little choice but to take the offer
>They had no idea that they would be serving the same human at the same time, or that it would be only male humans
>The first human man had Jennie lay on the bed masturbating while watching Jerry jerking off(as ordered), who was slowly licking the human's balls(as ordered)
>After Jerry came on himself, the human ordered Jennie suck his cock while Jerry was forced to sit so close his nose was almost touching the human's cock
>The human ordered Jerry to watch closely, and said for every second he looked away, that would be ten minutes he would be spending sucking the humans cock himself
>Jennie gave a blowjob as ordered, but glaring at the human the entire time
>The human told her if she made a mess or swallowed without permission, he would fuck Jerry until Jerry bled, then came in her mouth
>While she visibly tried not to vomit, the human had Jerry clean his cock with his tongue while thanking the human for donating human cock to his "dyke friend"
>After he considered his dick clean enough, he ordered Jennie to swallow
>Once she finally stopped coughing and gagging, he had her thank him for letting "a lesbian like her have some proper dick"
>As the human left, two more entered the room, bringing some toys with them
>Jennie was soon fitted with a ring gag, and Jerry found himself wearing a chastity cage to his horror
>Both were tied to beds, asses up, and legs spread wide
>Jennie swore she wouldn't let herself enjoy it, but it was far too similar to the stimulation she gave herself when she was using her toys
>She had her first humiliating orgasm of the night while drooling out the ring gag
>Jerry was completely ignored since being tied, and could only listen to Jennie growing increasingly aroused and then her noisy orgasm
>The sound aroused him, but his unusual chastity cage locked on him made it immediately uncomfortable, and he was just left horny
>To Jerry, it felt like it was trying to shove the head of his penis down the shaft
>They continued to rail her, and she continued to have one loud orgasm after another, and Jerry found himself desperately trying to fight off his urges as even the slightest erection was becoming painful
>The two humans left after some time, leaving the both of them tied up, and another came in
>He fucked Jennie relentlessly, not even slowing down when she shuddered and thrashed around in orgasm
>After what seemed like hours to them both, the human gagged Jerry, untied Jennie, and had her take a good close look at Jerry's caged cock
>He told her that anthro cock that small could never please her like human cock could
>Jerry tried to yell that the cage was making his dick look tiny, but he could see by Jennie's face she didn't understand what he was trying to say
>She looked a bit sheepish, then told Jerry not to feel bad, and that size wasn't everything, but he could see she didn't really believe what she said
>The human then had Jennie give him a blowjob while sitting in front of the bed Jerry was tied to
>He told her to catch every drop like a good slut for human cock, and wait until she was allowed to swallow
>He then told Jerry to take a good look at "how quickly the dyke you've been chasing will drop to her knees and pleasure a human dick"
>Jennie wanted to spit or swallow and object, but she knew that failure to obey meant the deal was off
>A week later, they were both sitting in front of some very scary people again
>The debt this time was $200,000, and the scary people demanded five days service for the deal
>They didn't have a choice, just like they didn't have a choice in making the debt in the first place
>Jennie found herself unable to orgasm through masturbation anymore, and even had problems with a female partner helping her
>She thought about all the orgasms she had from human dick during that night, and eventually suggested to Jerry that they make another trip to Vegas
>She was really a lesbian she told herself, she was just using these human men for pleasure, that's all
>Jerry jumped at the chance, leading Jennie to think he enjoyed the experience far more than he said
>Unable to find a way to remove the cage they locked on him, Jerry was hoping one of the human men would take pity on him and take it off so he could finally relieve the blueballs he had been suffering under
>He was completely straight he told himself, he just spent time researching how to do a really good blowjob so he could encourage one of the human men to let him cum, that's all
>Three nights later and Jennie was required to beg human men to fill her lesbian pussy with their dick, and Jerry was required to beg human men to let him suck their dick while he had a vibrator secured pressing against his prostrate
>Jennie had her first orgasm while begging a man to fuck her, and Jerry had his first prostrate orgasm with a chastity cage on
>Neither one told the other, but they were already thinking of excuses to take another gamble they had no hope of winning

>husband/wife, no kids
>living in neighborhood with anthros
>lion couple next door had been married for some time, seemed to be arguing a lot lately
>see lioness outside in back yard one day hanging laundry, go say hello
>doesn't say much at first until I tell her I've been hearing screaming and offer her an ear
>opens up like I'm Heraldo Riviera about how her husband got laid off a few years ago and hasn't found work since
>she starts to get a bit handy when talking about how I'm a good listener
>ask her if she would like to teach her husband a lesson to motivate him to get a job while scratching at the base of her tail
>she's very interested in that, and just about anything else I might have to say or do
>that evening when he came home, his wife wasn't there
>he quickly figured out where she was since she opened every single window in my house before we started
>the entire neighborhood could hear her begging for more and screaming about how much better I was than her husband
>the entire neighborhood later heard her scream at him that she would be my willing sex toy until he got a job since she had also opened all the windows in the home she shared with him
>the next night she waited until everyone in the neighborhood was home from work, including her husband, and walked out of the house in a very revealing cocktail dress
>she walked next door to my house and knocked, and greeted me at the door with an embrace and kiss in full view of the neighbors
>once inside, she opened the curtains wide, and started to remove her dress
>I tried to shut the curtains, but she complained her husband wouldn't know about things if the neighbors couldn't tell him
>the next night she brought a banner with her, and hung it in my window
>in large block letters it read "BETTER THAN MY HUSBAND!"
>she spent most of the time fucking me screaming about how she saw no reason to ever let her husband touch her again
>inspired, I told her to bring her husband with her next time
>the next night she came by in a little black dress, with her husband in tow
>had her tie him to a chair in front of my bed, had her then get on all fours on the bed facing him
>told her I was tired of having her scream in my ear about how much she preferred my dick to his
>so instead she could tell him to his face while I gave her the fucking she begged me for
>I took my time pounding her while occasionally giving her tail a brief tug or her fuzzy ass a slap
>she alternated between berating her husband for his shortcomings and talking about how good her neighbor was at pleasing her
>at first he looked humiliated, but he stopped trying to look away and soon had an obvious boner
>now she waits for me to get home from work and escorts me to her home
>makes me a nice dinner while heating a TV dinner in the microwave for her husband
>while we eat, she climbs under the table and kisses and nuzzles my dick while asking how my day was
>after dinner she leads me to the bedroom with a hand firmly on my cock
>she picks out an outfit from her closet, the dress she wore on her first date with her husband, the dress he bought her on their first anniversary, even her wedding dress, and puts it on
>has me fuck her on the bed she and her husband have slept on for years while he watches and jerks off
>the teenage daughter of the leopard couple across the street keeps making suggestive tongue gestures and wiggling her hips every time I make eye contact with her
>tried to talk with her mother about it, her mother just smiled and said she was far more experienced and skilled than her daughter, in addition to practicing her kegels for decades
>I'm not sure this shit is worth $100 less a month in rent

>https://e621.net/posts/4165804?q=girly
>your renagf catches her supposedly straight brother streaming himself getting reamed by a fuckmachine and moaning like a whore for some human worship site
>gives into her female instincts and records him for leverage and hornyness
>then blackmails him with both the footage and the tempting promise of "upgrading from that little toy to the real deal"
>you're not too keen on her actually blackmailing her brother, but you have to admit you are enjoying this harem building attempt of hers more than when she tried to get more of her friends in on your dick
>now you have a renagf and a renagf (male), so its not all bad

>Otherwise, it's a great intimidation and humiliation tactic to call an anthro an animal or eat their feral counterpart in front of them.
One hell of a sliding scale too.
>intimidation/humiliation tactic level 1 : calling a pig anthro "pork chop"
>intimidation/humiliation tactic level 2 : fucking a pig anthro tied on a silver platter with an apple in their mouth
>intimidation/humiliation tactic level 3 : telling a pig anthro how good bacon tastes
>intimidation/humiliation tactic level 4 : eating a sandwich with bacon in front of a pig anthro
>intimidation/humiliation tactic level 5 : making and eating a pulled pork sandwich in front of a pig anthro
>intimidation/humiliation tactic level 6 : having a pig anthro make a pulled pork sandwich for you
>intimidation/humiliation tactic level 7 : carving up a whole roast pig in front of a pig anthro
>intimidation/humiliation tactic level 8 : having a pig anthro carve up a whole roast pig, and eat it
>intimidation/humiliation tactic level 9 : fucking a pig anthro while forcing them to eat bacon and tell you how good it tastes
>intimidation/humiliation tactic level 10 : fucking a pig anthro on a butcher's table with knives ready to go, telling them they will either be an amazing fuck or lunch, but they will satisfy you one way or the other

>anthro women keep trying to cope away their attraction to human men
>"So what if human men are taller, stronger...more masculine...and have h-huge fat c-c-cocks...it still doesn't give them the right to grab my tail and call me a slut!"
>"Even if it does feel good..."

>"I don't even like h-humans, I hate them. I just think the more we can learn a-about them the more easy we can get rid of them"
>"They m-may look dominant and humiliate other anthros by putting c-collars in them" *wags her tail* "B-but there must be way to e-erradicate them"
>"M-maybe we can go u-undercover, pretend we are one of their p-pets"
>"Even if they try to turn me into a stupid c-cumdumpster that can only think on serving those superi- stupid humans I would never blow my cover..."

>QOTT: It’s time for the big race (species?) war, which anthros are the worst and easiest to fight?

>QOTT
Lots of variables here. Rabbits aren't physically imposing but guns are a great equalizers and then add in home field advantage. Conversely tribal wolves are physically imposing but as shown in that Jay Naylor comic guns hard countered them. Not to say physical traits are irrelevant in war but its not the ultimate deciding factor.
>Humans invade bunny territory thinking them easy prey
>Turns into long tedious campaign involving the detection of well hidden warrens and destroying them
>Little celebration over it because they just move via tunnels elsewhere and continue the fight
>They also use wolf mercenaries to disrupt the back lines
"I've been to the hills of the north and they speak bnuuy!"

Dogs are the easiest to fight as they will immediately betray anthrokind for that sweet sweet human cock

>Be Queen in Antho kingdom
>eldest daughter was kidnapped by human bandits
>she was en route to rival anthro kingdom to secure a political marriage
>after days of search she re-appears with a leather collar
>she talks how her captors had used her and how the leader of the band had taken to her, claiming her as his
>mentions that one day the bandits had abandoned her but had taken everyone else who was kidnapped
>behavior is quite different afterwards, assume its a consequence of being kidnapped and raped
>the once vibrant cheerful girl is quieter, despondent and often lost in thought
>her room begins to reeks of masturbation and desperation, a possible symptom of withdrawal
>husband tells me take her and our other daughters to the hidden villa so that she can truly recover
>notice one day that she is about to send a message
>question her about it
>tells me it was to the the king and queen, of rival anthro kingdom, to assure them she still wanted to continue their political marriage
>tell her that doesn't need to worry about that
>tell her that she and her sisters will will be going to the family villa on the lake so that can recover
>her ears perk up and tail begins to wag
>runs back to her room saying that she's going to write a new message but this time to one of her friends
>a couple of days pass
>on carriage with eldest daughter and sisters
>she's smiling and bouncing around, behaving like her old self
>maybe this trip was all that was needed
>notice how she has the leather collar that human bandits on her neck
>before I can ask her about it carriage is attacked
>get knocked out by one of the assailants
>when I regain conciousness, hear lots of moaning and the slapping of flesh
>quickly open eyes to see daughters all getting raped by human bandits
>on a wooden see eldest daughter bouncing on the lap on what I assume to be the leader of these bandits
>she's howling about how much she's missed this, if she's been a good girl
>the leader grabs her by the hips pulling her down onto his cock cumming inside her, telling her that she's been a good girl
>looks at me and says that the village is grateful to have girls of such great stock
>as human men begin to grope and play with my body, I pray to the ancestors for my husband to come and rescue us

>Be Polish Mercenary, year is sometime in the 1600s
>Lead a band of Cossaks into Siberia to colonize in the name of the Tsar
>Slaughter the Anthro hordes that attempt to halt you
>The Queen of the lands you are devastating asks for a peace negotiation
>She gives herself up to you as is tradition in Anthro culture for the defeated, proceed to fuck her senseless
>Write about your experiences, teach others how to conquer the Anthro kingdoms and tribes of Siberia
>mfw

>Movie is about Judy tracking down an international rabbit trafficking ring.
>She's initially horrified by the fact that every victim they rescue is a quadruple amputee
>And that they always 'disappear' again soon afterwards.
>Very quickly though, she starts to wonder what it would feel like to be so helpless and defenceless in front of a human.

>QOTT: Are all anthros equal in your imagined collared setting, or are some sub-species more equal than others?

>QOTT
Since Humans exist as a sort of ubermensch class that guarantees even the lowest human is still above most anthros, that leaves anthros to make up the other 99% of the social ladder. The easiest way for an anthro to gain status is by riding the coattails [read: dick] of a human. Being a human's mate is the highest class of anthro, supplemented only by bearing a human child. Most anthros at this level of society are the ones humans like best. Personal taste accounts for a lot, but it trends that most are canines, vulpines, and felines. Though rabbits, scalies, avian, and the occasional horse also exist here.
Then comes the indirect family structure. Friends, personal attendants, and favored servants. Anthros in these positions often vie for a human's attentions in an attempt to raise their stature to the top level. Most anthro politicians also exist at this level, since most of them are overseen by humans, either human political leaders or in the pockets of human businesses. These are most species that humans tend to like. Basically anything a human finds pleasant can exist here, depending on the tastes of the individual human.
Then comes the service class. Those in direct employ of a human, or owners of businesses that serve human clientele. Most businesses employ cute and cuddly to draw a human's eye, but the more exotic races are sometimes hired as a draw.
Below that, the working class. The average anthro going about their day that probably doesn't have a hope of seeing a human, let alone talking to one. Most of the population exists at this level. 80% of the population lives here, so you can find just about any type of species among the working class.
Then the lower classes. The poor, the fringe, and the criminal. As well as anything humans tend to reject. Wasp girls live here, also most furbois.
Then at the very bottom are the anti-humanists. Criminal anthros who have fallen for anti-human rhetoric and reject human superiority. Require reeducation.

>Be human
>Life is supposed to be easy.
>Life isn’t easy when you’re running a Megacorp.
>Especially when anti-human terrorists are harassing my supply lines and costing me millions.
>Enough is enough
>Hire SpikeCollar, the world’s best paramilitary. Anthro mercs who work for humans exclusively.
>Negotiations are quick.
>Well, not that quick.
>Wake up the next day on top of their tigress leader, my cock still stuffing her pussy and making sure my cum stays inside of her long into the late morning.
>Even if she ends up pregnant, at least SpikeCollar is now working for fee basis.
>Set them to work rooting out the terrorist attacks on my supply chain.
>Surprisingly easy.
>Anti-Human group calling themselves The Black Paws
>SpikeCollar infiltrates The Black Paws, uncovers their leadership
>Raid their compound
>Air lifted to site, see lines of Black Paw leadership on their knees, zip tied with guns to their head.
>Smells like victory. Feels goodman.
>”Kill them al-”
>”You’ve never been hungry!” interrupts one.
>Pause my hand, a dozen anthro fingers waiting for it to drop so they can open fire
>Black wolf, looking at me with hatred in his eyes.
>Don’t know why, but that got me curious.
>”What?” I ask.
>“You’ve never been hungry." Wolfboi says, "You’re a human. Everything’s always handed to you. You sit at the top in your ivory towers. You don’t know what it’s like down here in the gutter. You’re spoiled. Rotten. And worst of all, full of shi-”
>Wolf gets buttstroke by tigress’ rifle.
>Smile a little, but gesture for her to cool it. She takes a step back.
>Wolf spits blood, defiance behind his eyes.
>”You take and you take, leaving nothing for the rest of us. You surround yourself with sycophants content with slurping up whatever drips off of your cock. Your followers are hollow, and the only notable thing about you is your blood. Shoot me, human. I’ll die on my knees, but I’ll die standing for something. We’re tired of you standing on our backs!”
>”Please let me shoot him, sir!” calls the tigress, already lining up her shot.
>Idea creeps into my head.
>”Take him to headquarters. Kill everyone else.” I order.
>Gunfire drowns out agonized wolf screams as I get back into the hovercopter.
>Wolfboi has to be sedated in order to be brought back uninjured.
>Perform background check.
>Jazz, underprivileged furboi. Only male in family, abandoned when mother and sisters sold their possessions to accompany a human traveler. Both currently raising children fathered by same.
>No job, no education. Resorted to crime for food and shelter.
>Poor, misguided furboi. Convinced that it’s the human’s fault his family left. No wonder he fell for the anti-human propaganda.
>While he’s out, have him thoroughly scanned in medbay.
>Congenital defects, parasites, organ damage from malnutrition and poor living conditions.
>Pay to have all of them fixed.
>Jazz wakes up from surgery in a hospital room nicer than anywhere he’s ever slept before.
>Decide to be there when he wakes up.
>Jazz confused, initially.
>“Why?” he asks.
>”Humans aren’t as evil as you’ve been told.” I answer.
>”You killed all my friends.” Jazz says.
>”They weren’t your friends. They were terrorists who used you because you were poor and impressionable.” I say.
>Jazz gets upset, so I ease off the subject.
>Tell Jazz that I own him now. He's reported as dead to the officials, but if they find out he's alive, he'll be arrested.
>Jazz protests but I hold firm. I am his new owner.
>Visit Jazz often in the hospital, spare no expense.
>Excellent recovery. Pay for specialists, the best drugs.
>Unbeknownst to Jazz, drugs include hormone therapy.
>Nothing too dramatic. His body undergoes a slow progression into being more feminine.
>Goes from starved beanpole to soft and slightly curvy. Eating well does wonders for his frame.
>Jazz is initially resistant to my company, but I am his only visitor.
>Bring food, clothes, entertainment.
>Jazz slowly starts to accept my presence.
>Jazz released from hospital.
>Have Jazz committed to psychotherapy center.
>Jazz resists at first, but has no choice but to accept. I can have him arrested for terrorism, and anti-humanists don’t last long in prison.
>Therapy deprograms most of the propaganda out of his head. Jazz comes to terms with family’s choice to abandon him.
>Still visit regularly.
>Become genuine friends. It’s not hard. All I have to do is be nice to him. Tell him he’s doing well.
>Decide to test theory.
>Headpat Jazz during one visit.
>He shivers.
>Smirk.
>The hormone therapy enhanced his receptiveness to human pheromones.
>Frequent visits expose him to pheromones.
>Jazz’ brain now floods with serotonin when I’m near.
>After cleared for release, give Jazz a job.
>No other options. Now my secretary.
>Yes, the skirt is mandatory. Company policy is Company policy, no exceptions.
>Jazz uncomfortable, but agrees.
>Barely even notices the changes in his body.
>Good food filled out his ass into a plump, round shape. Fun to spank.
>Jazz protests spanks, but accepts them reluctantly.
>Jazz works hard. His brain now wired to feel good when around me, and I send his dopamine levels into the stratosphere when I pat his head and tell him he did a good job.
>Jazz chases that high with everything he can muster.
>Proves invaluable help during new Company acquisition.
>Doesn’t even mind the skirt anymore.
>Decide to take him out to dinner as a reward.
>Fanciest restaurant in town.
>Tell him furbois aren’t allowed.
>Purchase fancy evening gown, complete with accessories
>Jazz protests. Weakly.
>Push him to do it anyway.
>Damn, he wears that dress well.
>Go to fancy restaurant, evening going well.
>Get drunk on celebratory drinks. It was a big acquisition. Lots of money to spare.
>Jazz has a really good time. “I don’t know how I could ever repay you.”
>Well into the drink, I decide to push. ”I have an idea.”
>Tell Jazz to blow me under the table.
>Jazz refuses
>Order him to do it in firm voice.
>"Be a good dog and suck my cock."
>Watching him squirm is fun.
>A war wages in his head, but I can't help but smile as wide as I can as I watch him slip under the table.
>Feel him pull my cock out
>Holy. Shit.
>Try not to lose my load in the first minute because goddamn this wolfboi is good a sucking cock.
>Literally takes my breath away as I try to keep it cool in the restaraunt.
>Goddamn that tongue.
>Become convinced that Jazz was placed on this earth by some higher power as some kind of cocksucking angel. I must have done some saintly deed in a past life.
>Unable to hold it any longer, I blow my load right down his muzzle.
>Feel Jazz lick me clean before he reappears above the table.
>Less than five minutes. Good fucking record.
>Damn, I had no idea a black wolf could blush that hard.
>Fuck, I'm out of breath.
>"You are too good at that."
>Jazz fidgets, uncomfortable at being praised so highly for something he considers shameful.
>Hah, I can tell he enjoys it.
>That night, we sleep in the same room.
>Make him suck me again before I pass out from the alcohol.
>Wake up a little hungover.
>Jazz wakes up, too.
>Jazz isn't talking for some reason.
>"What's the matter?" I ask. I figure the shame might be getting to him.
>Jazz opens his mouth. Literally full of cum.
>Vaguely remember ordering him to not swallow.
>Holy shit, he kept it in his mouth all night.
>"Good boy."
>Let him swallow while I give him headpats.
>Going forward, I use his muzzle as often as I want.
>Rarely give headpats or praise without my dick in his mouth
>Jazz becomes properly addicted to my cock.
>After a few months of using his mouth as my personal fleshlight, I start pulling back.
>Spend more time with tigress. Leave Jazz alone for a while.
>Headpats without mouthfucking. Generic praise. Weeks pass.
>Jazz anxiety through the roof. Starts working harder. Desperate for attention.
>Literally begs to suck my cock.
>No.
>Reports come in of more attacks.
>Spikecollar investigate. More Black Paw operatives.
>The time has come.
>Appoint Jazz to lead the raid.
>Wolfboi in a frenzy to prove himself.
>Coordinates Black Paw raid.
>Jazz knows their tactics. Raid success. Zero friendly casualties.
>Hovercopter to raid site once the battle is over.
>Black Paw operatives ziptied on knees. Deja vu sets in.
>"Orders, sir?" asks Jazz.
>"Kill them all."
>Can't help but smile as I watch former Black Paw operative execute Black Paw prisoners one by one.
>From the smile on his face, Jazz doesn't even recognize the irony.
>He just beams a hopeful smile at me, hoping that he did a good enough job to be called a Good Boy.
>Bring him back with me.
>Let Jazz suck my cock all the way home.
>Bend him over the railing and stuff my full length into his tight little tailhole.
>I make him scream that he loves me out over the city.
>I can still smell the GSR on his fur.
>Experiment success.
>Sit back in my office chair, Jazz eagerly lapping away to clean up.
>Pour myself a stiff drink.
>Life is good.

>new ad campaign with before/after pictures of furbois accepting their new role under their human masters
>it's ten percent ad and ninety percent hardcore porn of furbois getting fucked and cucked

Dogs are the perfect species for human men.
>loyal to a fault
>many breeds that allow for almost any combination of body type and personality
>near perfect compatibility with humans, quickly being able to integrate themselves into any household as needed
>fiercely protective of masters home and family
>can easily and enthusiastically lead and run any other anthro slaves that their master may have
Only real flaw I can think of is that they're usually stupid, having bred most intelligence out of themselves to better serve humans and their needs.

>Anthros that are noble and righteous and stick closely to their ancient customs get to go to anthro heaven with their ancestors.
>Anthros that side with the human invaders and embrace their strange ways receive a karmic punishment in having to serve them forever in Anthro Hell (which is really just human heaven.)
>Anthro heaven hasn't had any visitors in a long, long time.

>Live in the big city where most anthros are second class citizens, as they should be
>Those that does not have a human master tends to live on the edge of the law
>Just come to show why an anthro can’t be trusted to Care for themselves…
>Occasionally there are those that attempt to either ‘liberate’ their kind from ‘slavery’, or those that just cause trouble under the belief that they are ‘fighting the bad guys’
>Misguided fools, but what can you expect
>Recently the city have been plagued by a small group anthro turtles, all females, running around and acting ‘heroes’
>Besides being a team and being proficient in martial arts, they are otherwise disorganized in their efforts, hence why no one takes them serious enough to deal with them
>Still, they inconvenienced you personally, so you have been on the hunt to put them in their place
>after a few days of tracking you find that they apparently have their base in the sewers
>Ofcourse they would live in a place like that…
>It took a while to map and navigere the maze of a sewer, but eventually you are able to pinpoint their base of operation
>Seem that you arrived at a time where no one’s home, so uou take a look around
>Looks like a dojo and is surprisingly clean, all things considered
>”Are you an ally of my daughters?”
>You turn around to see a rat anthro in some eastern dress standing in the doorway
>You tell her that you are here to pit an end to their meddeling in your affairs
>She sighs and change her stance, saying something about being their sensei and how she must protect those she love
>Okay sure
>She hits you with surprising force and speed
>This Will be more difficult than What you had planned
>Thank god for humans being more robust and recilient that your average anthro
>The battle goes on for a while
>She's good you gotta give her that
>She send you to the floor more than once, but not enough to keep you down
>Eventually you manages to catch her tail and yank her off balance
>You put your weight on top of her to keep her down
>You tell her to stop
>She tells you that she will never yield to mankind
>Goes on and on about how evil humans are and that as long as there are honourable anthros with fire in their eharts, the fight will never end
>All of her philosophic ranting is something you would expect to hear on some low-budget series on mainstream TV
>Even so, she seems to be fully convinced
>She is even able to keep her body under control
>No reaction to your proximity or scent, even after the sweaty fight you had
>You could take her home and break her
>Instead you got an idea on how to break her slowly
>Gonna take a little effort and time on your part, but the results should be interesting
>You grin internally as you tell her that clearly, she have a strong conviction that you cannot hope to beat
>Offer to leave her and her daughters alone if she will let you go without trouble
>She is surprised as you say this
>You sense a hint of disapointment as you lift yourself off her, but her mask hides it well
>"Very well, I will allow you to leave unharmed. You have my honor on that. But as they say, to the victor goes the spoils"
>She walks over to a makeshift table, dropping her dress as she goes.
>She lays on the table with her legs spred, looking at you with a stern mask that would have been convincing if not for her wetness down below
>You put on a facade of defeat even as you approach her, making sure to build up her confidence and sense of honour
>All according to plan
>You take a few weeks to prepare before you start your plan
>Time is spent on sharpening your skills and make a costume
>It's impressive what you can make from a couple of cheese graters and a halloween costume
>Meanwhile the team of turtles have begone to take greater risks with their actions
>They're most likely emboldened by their sensei
>Excellent, that makes breaking them all that much easier
>You begin to aptrol at night in locations that they're most likely to go to
>Soon enough you run into them
>Four female anthro turtles wearing colorful bandanas and (blunt) ninja weapons
>It is time
>"You've messed with my affairs for the last time, now suffer my strength" bla bla bla
>It's cheesy as all hell but they buy it without question
>Your first encounter is a formality: you trhow them around for a bit, then let them 'defeat' you
>"I'll get you next time!" bla bla bla
>Over the next couple of months you become their nemesis, a saturday cortoon villain for them to combat and defeat
>As they become more confident with their skills, they become mroe cocky and starts taking risks
>They start chanting that a 'real man' would have beaten them by now
>Excellent, now onto part B
>You lay low for a few weeks, letting them wonder where you are
>Then one night then they are out patrolling, you sneak into their base again
>Still in costume
>You find their hideout and meet the rat again
>This time, the battle is more for show on your part, but once again you win
>'To the victor goes the spoils' you tell her as you take your prize
>She recognizes your voice and scent
>You can see that she is both frightful and excited as you take her
>When you're done you leave
>You tell her that you will be back for a remeach at another time
>This could be used by her and her daughters to paln an ambush, but you know that she won't use the information for that
>Her honour won't allow her to seek help from her students
>Just as planned
>Over the next few weeks you routinely enter the hideout for a 'remeach' whenever the turtles are out patrolling
>You do engage them sometimes on some rooftop, just to keep their attention on the night and away from their base
>Your aim for now though is the rat
>Every battle you have is won a little easier than last time
>Her despair have turned to dullness as she starts to come to term wit the fact that her entire life of dedication, training and honour have been a joke
>Excellent, now onto part C
>You begin to compliment her as you claim her
>To make her associate submitting to you with praise and joy
>You begin to ensure her pleasure as well, to solidify the sensation
>You tell her that she is a strong fighter (for an anthro) and that she did a good job raising four exceptional (for an anthro) warriors
>The splinters of her remaining honour clings to your words just as much as she clings to your shaft
>(Huh, 'splinter', might be a new nickname for her)
>You offer her and her 'daughters' a better life out of the sewers as your enforcers and harem
>All she had to do was to hel you subdue her daughters, to 'make them see reason'
>She will be the head concubine ofcourse
>She says that she will submit to you and your will, and make her daughters your women as well
>You whisper praise into her ear as you seal your contract by impregnating her
>Now onto part D
>You stay in the hideout until the turtles arrive home
>They are enraged by what you've done to their sensei
>Their rage turn to confusion when their 'mother' fight alongside you to subdue them
>When the turtles have been bound, you fuck the rat in front of them
>Then she helps you fuck them
>She is deaf to their dispair as she prepares the next one eargerlywhile they wait their turn
>For the next few weeks you defile them and their home
>Once they're broken you build them up like you did the rat
>You now got a loyal ninja harem
>Just as planned

>Anthros have a rare gene that allows for hyper tits or dicks
>Big tits and big dicks unfortunately come with big problems
>Your mother didn't expect her lesser case of hyper syndrome to pass down to you, or for it to become so much more acute than her own
>She loves her very-much-not little boy though, and is perfectly willing to do anything she can to make up for making it so you can't wear pants or go out in public
>Normally a growing human boy like yourself would have a whole passel of sluts to handle such a bitch breaker, but she'll be a harem of one for you if need be

Imagine molesting Fay Spaniel while she's alone on the comm station. Imagine feeling her stiffen up at your presence and begin to shiver in fear as you grope her with wild abandon, forcing her to reach climax as she holds back her sobs of shame and terror from being at the mercy of the burly furless alien that can kill her with little effort with it's bare hands. Imagine finishing her off without ceremony and words and walking away as she finally lets herself bawl into her fluffy little paws with only the white noise of the equipment to be by her side. She can't escape, even in her own room. She can't run in a closed spaceship in the middle of nowhere.
All she can do is brave the assault and pray the human doesn't get too rough.

>all those stories about "happy cows make happy milk"
>almost makes you want a farm...

Would love it, going to ensure they're the biggest, softest, and happiest cows in the world as they know they're being used as they should be.
Not as those fearsome minotaurs of legend but as simple milk cows.

>Throughout history, Mankind have captured and domesticated milk-producing anthros such as cows and goats
>Even those of mythical origins such as minotaurs have been reduced to nothing more than simple cows
>Their modern decendants don’t mind the Fall of their ancestors, in fact they are greatful to now be living a rewarding life of peace
>The free purebred anthros hate this fact as they deperately try to spread the idea of ‘pure anthro ancestry and supremacy’
>They have even begun ti workshop their ancient demonic gods in an attempt to build an identity that is ‘un-sullied by mankind’
>Best to teach them a lesson
>By tapning into their own mysteries and forbidden knowledge, humans soon find a way to summon these ancient unholy deities
>As soon as they do, they begin the process of domestication
>Soon enough these ancient bringes begin to favor Mankind’s demand for milk over the worship and prayers of their own beleivers
>Soon enough these demons tell mankind the forbidden knowledge that had been hidden from their believers since time immortal
>The spiritual domestication of Anthrokind is well underway as their ancient temples are turned into milkingfarms for their unholy goddesses
>Life is good, especially with a glass of milk

>lawful evil human justiciar patrols the countryside of his nation in search of bandits, monsters and other degenerates that threaten law abiding citizens
>hears of a large gang of bandits robbing trade caravans and goes investigating
>finds a chaotic good ratfolk ranger girl also hunting the bandits since they've been poaching in her woods and harassing her forest dwelling people
>they begrudgingly team up, hijinks ensue
>ratgirl becomes hopelessly infatuated with human, he is too dense and focused on killing bandits to notice
>when they've finally dealt with the bandits, ratfolk girl asks to join his morally dubious organization and become his apprentice as a means of staying close to him
>he proves to be an extremely strict and cruel master
>constantly giving out harsh punishments for mistakes to the poor rat girl in the form of whippings, brandings, spankings and demeaning acts of self-admonishment
>at first she was terrified of being punished
>slowly grows to get some masochistic glee from being abused by him, especially after noticing how much he seems to secretly enjoy watching her beg
>she finds herself committing especially evil acts she never would of considered doing before simply because he told her to and she was fearful of disappointing him
>finds herself slowly aligning with his worldview and ideology
>after awhile, he offers her a place as a fully fledged member of his order after she successfully coerced her gentle ratfolk kin into accepting subjugation at the hands of the tyrannical humans
>still calls him master despite essentially being the same rank

>The dragonborn uses Breton quest autism to reclaim the Heart, reunite the moons and ascend Lorkhan, the god of Man and Emperor of the Fourth Dragonblood Empire
>The Hist, being the crafty interdimensional tree aliens they are, immediately offer to hitch their proverbial wagon to Man's new ascendancy and offers the new god as many argonian concubines as he may wish, shaped by the Hist to bare His offspring and His alone
>They know they can never hope to claim the throne, for the loss of the Aedric Prince of Nirn would have consequences not even they could survive long before anything as base as succession could be figured out, but forging as many bonds with a new divine as one is able can only be a good thing

Human addiction is a serious problem.
Many think human addiction isn't real; that any anthro woman can simply pursue other partners with mind over matter.
However, the presentation of human addiction reveals much about the condition.
Firstly, many anthro women think they're human-addicted, but merely have an infatuation.
Human addiction only begins with and exists in anthropomorphic women who have past non-human partners BEFORE having a human partner.
The mental state is created by the sexual performance disparity between partners. Similar to how caffeine affects somebody who has waited twenty years of their life before trying it. The sudden rush affects individuals differently, and not all female anthros are susceptible.
Human stamina alone often drives female anthros into powerful orgasms, but the shape an firmness often leads to illusions of having something twice as large entering their vaginal cavity.
This leads to anthro women being convinced that human men are these huge-dicked sex gods that will ravage them silly over and over again, and they start saying delusional shit about big human cock and
>I'll never even give a "furboy" the time of day anymore!
And that's because addiction is a fucking DISEASE that needs to be CURED because NORMAL WELL ADJUSTED ANTHRO WOMEN DON'T JUST START NEGLECTING REJECTING AND OUTRIGHT HATING THEIR OWN SPECIES UNLESS THEY ARE MENTALLY UNWELL!
This PROBLEM requires the immediate attention of therapists and individuals willing to help these SICK WOMEN with their recovery.
(This message was brought to you by the association for neglected and dumped furbois.)

>dragoness transformed into kobold
I really like the sound of this.
>an powerful wizard with a lack of scruples hears of a dragon burning villages close to its lair
>dragons often have great hordes of wealth and he needs funds for magical research
>teleports to its lair
>founds that shes a mighty elder dragoness
>and a very arrogant one at that
>she goes on about how humans are pests even lower then the likes of kobolds
>they engage in earth shattering duel like from the sagas of old
>wizard gains the upper hand and leaves the dragoness beaten and bloodied
>dragoness tells him to get it over with and kill her
>he has other plans
>uses a polymorph spell to permanently turn her into a lowly, pathetic kobold
>all sense of superior and indignation evaporate, leaving the once mighty dragon a weak coward
>he says that her punishment for standing against humanity is to serve as his loyal kobold slave for 20 years
>uses her massive horde of wealth to construction a new extension to his wizards tower
>enjoys parading the fallen dragoness around on a leash during his trips into the city
>gives firm punishments on the rare occasions she steps out of line
>after 20 years, Stockholm syndrome has successfully settled in
>kobold wants to stay as his slave
>rewards her for knowing her place by using magic to give her tiny, useless wings and harmless fire breath

>Alien Bitch gets shown her proper place
>4 hours of non-stop sex
>extras include x-ray footage of her cervix getting hammered, the actor cumming straight down into her stomach, her intestines getting filled with cum, her eggs getting gangbanged by human spermcells, her orifices leaking with overflow, documentaries about her species and how they were subjugated, and many more educational and intimidate subjects
>also a coupon for 50% off for your next purchase of a 'colonizer'*
*seriously, they've all turned themselves over into slavery. We have more supply than demand! Buy one, get two free!

>Anthro girl lives in a mostly anthro nation.
>Goes to college and gets her head filled with her professor's ideas and wild takes.
>Thinks minorities like humans need special treatment, and that she, as a powerful, independent woman, is the perfect moral crusader for the job.
>Natrually, she starts dating a human man, because diversity is strength!
>She never expected to have all of the college nonsense dicked out of her.
>A few years later, she's pregnant and bare-pawed in the kitchen, humming a tune as she makes dinner.
>Being a housewife means she has plenty of spare time, so she's taken up all sorts of arts, cooking among them.
>Her husband will be home from work soon, and she sighs dreamily, feeling her face grow warm from a blush unseen under her fur.
>She can't wait to enjoy a meal with her human, talk about their days, share a bath together, then retire to bed for some gentle lovemaking and restful sleep.
>Her friends said she was making a mistake by dropping out and getting married, and that her then-boyfriend was misleading her with his "outdated" ideas.
>Those friends now work thankless, grueling jobs. Some of them make good money, sure, but NONE of them are married yet, and none of them seem truly happy.
>Poor things. She should ask her human and see if he has any single friends.

>*this* was the result of the monsters returning to the surface.
>their magic proved no match against the Will of Humanity, and in time humans learned to wield magic as well as monsters, in some cases even better.
>the subjugated monsters became playtoys, their bodies reshaped as their owners pleased due them being pure magic
>Toriel herself was shocked (and secretly overjoyed) to find her former husband right by her own pillory, little more than a moaning gravid bitch, stripped of whatever dignity she once might have held.
>the sight of her husband-turned-breeding-sow caused her to clench down on her master's cock, begging for his seed to knock her up.

Sometimes you turn a town into your personal harem.

Yeah, Animal Crossing is fun like that. Lure unsuspecting furs onto the island/town, then love-bomb and seduce them until they simply *can't* leave. That parody with Tiger King is a more extreme example, but the scene of that one octopus male getting addicted to human dick is pretty clear in how things are run.

For sure, they move in thinking the town has a funny name and then they're giving the Mayor BJ's in the woods because he requested it, free of charge and of their own volition.

Try going further: they withdraw all their goods and deliver them to the town, they forego anything thqt their mayor didn't gift them, and they all are down to mate anytime. Even the male villagers.
Ex. A
Before moving to AC town:
>well-respected a countant at a large finance department
>secure in his sexuality, had at least two relationships
>just wanted a relaxing vacation
>was personally greeted by the mayor
After moving to AC Town:
>quit his job, transferred all his money to one of the Mayor's many accounts
>took the Mayor's dick to the hilt by the end of the third day, was fucked in front of a cheering audience by the sixth day
>works hard to assist Isabelle in managing the village while the human master does the truly important work: plowing every villager
>is one of the Mayor's favorites, shows him off whenever a human buddy of his comes by for a visit
>blocked and deleted all previous connections, thus ensuring more villagers come to the Mayor's town

>Try and do things to impress the mayor be it wearing clothes he would like, decorating their house around pleasing him, or even trying to get a physique he'd enjoy.
>Getting new hair styles, makeup, and even doing 'research' into new 'techniques' or positions they mayor may want.
>Head empty, only lewds, and any financial advice is given with the hope of a hard dicking.

>"When Raymond arrived on the island he was such a sourpuss, me meow. Thankfully hubb- err, our respected island representative quickly introduced him to the island experience. Rianna is so much happier and bubbly now. So if you want to get rid off all your stress and worries too, consider moving to Humieville today!"
>This message was brought to you by Villager inc, formerly known as Nook inc.

>Nook has a special discount only the mayor can get.
>Frequently involves the two going into 'his' office.
>The sisters in their tailoring shop often have one of the two in the back and its not uncommon to hear lewd moans or notice that the pair aren't really wearing anything aside from their aprons.

>galactic empire of enormous anthro dragons that are feared throughout the galaxy makes contact with humanity
>quickly become addicted to BHC
>population ratio is already skewed in favor of females, and their 300 billion plus population utterly eclipses humanities
>with there being so many more female dragons than humans, the prospect of even just serving a human in any sort of capacity is seen as extremely desirable.
>many dragons would kill just for the change to be bred by a human.
>those who are lucky enough to have received the ultimate reward of being a humans mate are seen as divinely blessed.
>The extreme scarcity of human mates, combined with the dragon’s already extremely competitive nature and warrior culture results in “tournaments” quickly springing up across the empire
>these often violent tournaments giving females a chance to prove their strength and worthiness to any humans that may be watching
>tfw ywn have an gigantic anthro Dragoness pet that killed 40+ other competitors in an tournament just to get your attention.

>奴隷の雌ドラゴンちゃん。
>大好きなご主人の為に、きつい仕事も頑張ります。
>ご主人もメスドラちゃんには優しく、仕事終わりにいつも身体を洗ってくれます。
>メスドラちゃんは、ご主人と一緒にお風呂に入るのが一番の楽しみ。明日もご主人の為に一生懸命働きます・・・。
>A slave female dragon.
>She works hard for her master, whom she loves very much.
>Her master is also kind to her and always washes her body after work.
>Female Dora-chan looks forward to taking a bath with her master the most. She will work hard for her master tomorrow...

>they are stuck
>trapped by the yadistic owner of the safe, they have to crack it before they run out of air or get boiled alive
>the air is becoming thicker and thicker, the twins's pants heavier and heavier, each inhale wasting more precious oxygen
>her hands were shaking, her body arching with heat while her sister could only watch helplessly
>it wasn't supposed to go like this
>the owner on vacation, the house empty and dark, bereft of even the staff, they should've had all the time in the world
>instead, somehow the human master of this place has expected them
>has trapped them and given them a challenge
>if they cracked the safe *before* he returned with his team of very, *very* angry guardhounds, they would be let go
>if they failed... he had let his sentence trail off in a meaningful silence
>her fingers slipped for the fourth time now, the unbearable heat drenching her nethers and causing her to shiver with the need to breed
>she hated it, hated how she couldn't relax with her sister, the only person she'd ever mate with
>her sister's heavy panting was not helping

There lives a god in the forest, one that all the anthro tribes fear and respect.
Every year they pay tribute by sending their most beautiful and skilled into it’s territory.
It is said that if one of them were to escape with a lock of his hair, the ritual will be completed and the god will reward them with bountiful harvests and riches.
But every year none return.
The tribes do not mourn their dead, for it is said they join him in the afterlife serving as his wives.
Anon keeps wondering why hot anthro babes keep trying to touch his head and then demand to be his wife when he catches them.

(For context, Humans are considered cryptids in the 'real world of the apes' and are commonly used as the de-facto 'bad guy who fucks')
>Planet of Man
>Movie is a classic among Anthros, especially females
>Features a female ape protagonist
>Who is an astronaut, ofcourse
>Film start with a mission gone wrong where the crew crashlands on a desolate planet
>Half of the crew survives (read: all the females survives while the male astronauts die in the crash)
>Females establish a base and survey their surroundings
>Ends up finding a group of stone-age ape
>Both the astronauts and the primitives are soon after captured by a group of Humans
>All are put into separate cages
>Males are shipped off to a cramped zoo
>Females are stripped and shipped off to the "petting zoo"
>It's a large fenced-off area with plenty of room
>Multiple times a day groups of Humans enter the enclosure and run around catching the apes
>Those that are caught are fucked
>The 'hunt' is for sport and most of the primitive femals let themselves get caught and fucked
>The Astronauts are resistant at first, but one by one their resistance is fucked out of them
>Humans eventually discover that the astronauts are more intelligent than the others
>The Humans experiments on the astronauts
>Over time the astronauts starts to accept their new lives as the Human's fucktoys
>As in-movie time goes on, most of them becomes pregnant
>All except for the female protagonist, who have retained her free will and rebellious attitude
>She eventually breaks free and goes on a misguided crusade to 'free' the other apes
>However, Human dicking have dissolved any resistance from both primitives and the other Astronauts
>The protagonist escapes and try to form a resistance on her own
>She is 'aided' by a sympathetic Human male (who clearly shows to have ulterior motives but the protagonist is shown to be a bit naïve)
>From here on out the movie shows the protagonist's journey and the frequent dicking she received from the Human
>She becomes more and more addicted to him as the movie goes on, eventually suffering withdrawl symptoms if she isn't fucked at least once a-day.
>She discover that the planet is the Ape homeworld, her original home
>They're in the future and she have no hope of returning home
>Apparently the Human already knew this and wanted to break her with this realization, due to how troublesome she had been
>Movie ends with her resigning to her fate and bending over for the Human
>A second movie is made a few years later
>Return to the Planet of Man
>The movie was a cash grab and features more sex scenes, Human domination and forceful breeding and 'domestication' of female apes
>Needless to say, the female Anthro audience gave it flying reviews
>The movie did contain some lore for the emerging fandom to latch onto
>The backstory tells of a great war between the Ape nations a few millennia before the plot of the original movie
>Most of the planet was irradiated beyond repair and the Apes were set for extinction
>Then an alien race, the humans, arrived
>They scrubbed the planet of radiation and saved the remaining Ape population
>There was a catch, ofcourse
>The planet would become a safari-world for Mankind to enjoy
>Free-roaming Apes would be hunted, caught and bred for the enjoyment of Mankind, and the continued existence of Apes
>Te technologically superior Humans would 'tech down' to make the sport more fun, using only horse riding and nets to capture their prey
>It's all the Apes were good for anyway, as them nuking themselves were proof enough that they could not immediately be introduced to the wider galactic realm of Humanity
>They had to prove themselves before joining the ranks of other 'enlightened' alien concubines
>More movies would be made after the second one, but they would more or less be pure porn
>However the movies did bring about the popularity the 'Human-Dominated-Post-Apocalypte' genre
>Or HDPA for short
>Quality of the writing varies, but overall the worlds are well thought out to justify how Humans come to dominate Antrhos
>Evidently the writers themselves had a blast writing these movies, most likely with one hand down their pants
>Apes especially seemed to latch onto the genre, with multiple movies showing a variation of the trope 'lone female ape protagonist' being 'forced to breed with Humans' to 'prevent extinction of her species'
>Other Antrho species would make their own niche interpretation of the genre, with a focus on their species being dominated by humans
>Canine Anthros would focus on them being the 'loyal companion who aids their human through thick and thin'
>Horse Antrhos would depict themselves as the reliable sort who are tamed by Humans to become their beasts of burdens in the wastelands
>Rabbit Anthros favored stories where in the post apocalypse, they're hunted as prey by Humans, usually ending with the female protagonist 'showing her worth' to the human through submission
>But overall, the genre was dominated by the Apes
>The modern world of cinema was truly the planet of Man (and Apes)

>Anthros have been trying to get equal rights with humans for years. In the eyes of the law, they're 2nd class citizens unless "in the care" (read: ownership) of a human.
>The movement has been picking up speed in the modern day thanks to the rise of the internet and instant communication. The Rights Movement can get their message out to oppressed anthros and sympathetic humans easier and faster.
>There is just one problem, and it is a BIG problem.
>Domesticated anthros.
>The movement hit new peaks of interest recently. Humans could push back all they liked, it just validated the message of the anthro rights movement.
>Then domesticated anthros got involved, and gridlock is throwing the brakes on everything.
>"No no, you've got it all wrong!" They say. "It's not bad at all! Life is so easy with humans!"
>Canines are by far the worst traitors. They're hardwired for life in a hierarchy, and even free canines have the tendency to self-domesticate around humans. Wolves, coyotes, and foxes get curious about domesticated life, and dogs act like ambassadors for the humans, setting the hook and reeling their hapless cousins in.
>The movement can't just oust all canines, though. They represent a huge block of the anthro powerbase, and alienating them is political suicide.
>Felines are starting to do it, too. Many common cats were always apathetic to the movement and content to remain neutral, but now the movement is causing waves, they're getting resentful of recent changes. Exotic cats are starting to get politically fatigued and demoralized, making them prone to domestic propaganda.
>The leader of the movement has to wonder if their efforts will actually change things...

A recent leaked video of a major anthro rights advocate being absolutely HUMAN'd and loving it has really shaken a lot of confidence in the movement.
It's a hard thing to navigate, because while bunnies are usually considered very fair weather and suggestible, many aren't following the movement, but their leaders. Most had no real opinion, and have now gone from anti-human to pro-collared because of this leader.
Cutting them off would be a nightmare too because, while they lack much political clout on their own, their numbers in the voting base are massive.

>The leaders of the Rights Movement fall one by one as incriminating recordings and images keep surfacing
>Not an insignificant number of them ends up carrying human children in their wombs
>At least there are still a significant support for the movement from Antrhos working in security and law enforcement
>This provides some protection to the activists during protests
>It emboldens some of the more zealous Rights activists to use force and violence
>Law enforcement have to crack down on their own kind to stop them before it spirals out of control
>This completely sour the general perception of the Movement among most Antrhos, especially among the supporters in law enforcement and security
>The Right Movement is no without leaders, protection or moral high ground
>Now it's only the suborn hardliners or the naïve who remain, plus a few clinging to "the idea of what it was all about and not what it became"
>Unbeknown to all is the fact that the zealous rioters had been known about for a while, but nothing had been done to stop them early
>This was on purpose as the leader of the Anthro security had fallen for a Human
>While she had lost all interest in supporting the cause, she had also feared ruining her own career
>Not due to shame, but due to ego
>Allowing the rioters to get out of hand was the perfect excuse to deal a blow to the movement that would allow herself to 'resign'
>She and her security team now work for human-organizations only
>With benefits ofcourse
>Now her evenings are spent servicing her master and watching news stories about the continual disintegration of the Rights Movement
>Dick in mouth, cum in cunt and baby in belly
>Just According to Keikaku

Mascots are usually at either considerable discounts or markups after their retirement, depending on how popular they were

In that case, the Twitter (now X) mascot must have lost her retirement. At this point, being owned by a Human would be her best bet o avoid ending up on the streets.
I am also reminded of an ancient thread that explored a similar theme, with the r63 version of breakfast mascots and their Human boyfiends (ofcourse based on the whole Tony the 'Tiger is a Furry icon' "controversy" some years ago).
Might explore these two subjects... later, after work.

>A total rebrand
>The change came as a shock
>It probably shouldn't have been, considering how the platform had changed over the years, but still, she had expected to remain the mascot
>It wasn't a graceful exit by any means
>Shouting about how Humans were oppressors and confirming your support for a controversial Rights Movements tends to burn bridges
>Worthless stocks and a drained bank account later, she was living on the streets
>For all her followers, none came to her aid
>Some even made posts with her in the background, all for purpose of virtue signalling and upvotes
>But none actually did anything productive to help
>Eventually she was approached by 'woke' Anthro bois who wanted to help
>All they did was attempting to assault her
>They were laughably weak, even more so than your standard Furboi
>Still, they were many and she could only hold out for so long
>Then a single Human came to her aid and fought off the furbois
>He offered her a warm bed, food and roof over her head
>She was reluctant, but had no other places to go, so she accepted, expecting to be taken advantage off
>Surprisingly, he respected her boundaries, fed her well and kept her safe
>She now lived with him, but had no other privileges than that
>She would have to submit to get those
>He had placed a collar on the livingroom table, leaving it to her to take it on when she wanted to
>No pressure at all
>Not having pressure put on her was a strange experience
>For the past many years, she had to be the face of multiple political and ideological movements, to take on and represent their perspectives
>She never really sat down to consider what she herself believed in
>So, she spent her days doing research
>Real research
>As time went on she was exposed to more and more to the truth
>Humans were dominant but kind masters
>Anthros were bad at leading themselves and most Antrho nations in history had collapsed in on themselves due to incompetence
>Anthro history was so full of preventable suffering, it was really dumb
>Only those that were absorbed into Human nations would prosper and flourish
>Not that non-owned Anthros were capable of remembering that, let alone had the drive to research such easily-available information
>Which only proved the point, really
>The Right Movement was a joke, and collared Anthros were happier than any of the activists would ever be
>She distanced herself completely, deleting most of her old accounts
>Then thought about what she had learned
>Without having to be the face of a platform and the subject for a failing, conflicting ideology, she soon began to realize what she wanted in life
>She wanted a traditional life.
>To care for a Human master who in turn would take good care of her
>To care and please him and be praised for it
>To carry his children
>One morning her Human wakes up to her standing at the end of his bed, naked bare a collar
>The last known image uploaded to her old company account her her being fucked by the master
>The text read “How’s this for a rebrand?”

>Outspoken Rights Movement leader call for the death and Humans
>She spent every night on her back 'apologizing' to her boyfriend
>News comes out about her relationship, ruining her future prospects in politic and the public scene in general
>Spent the rest of her life advocating for Human dominance
>Is called an 'Enemy of the Movement' as she eagerly adds to the Human population

>Rabbits do not usually follow the Movement, but their leaders
>The Movement lost a good portion of the rabbit demographic when one of their leaders was caught having relations with a Human
>Desperate to retain the demographic, elements within the Movement seek to influence a young (and therefore easy to manipulate) rabbit to become the next leader
>The rabbit takes the bait and becomes outspoken anti-human
>She is too young and naïve to really understand what it is she's supporting, besides the srface level of "Humans bad"
>Still her energy and usage of modern social media greatly boost the Movement's rating
>She is invited to various talk shows and debate forums
>Her opinions and arguments are easy enough to dismantle, but by now she have been brainwashed by the movement to simply ignore scientific facts and just yell in an effort to tire out the oppnent
>She, like most other pro-Movements, beleive this to be an acceptable fom of public debate
>The other Movement leaders beleive that they've soldified their Rabbit supporters
>For the next couple of years they enjoy their control
>But as the rabbit leader grows and become mroe mature, and starts having her own personal experiences with both Humans and Anthros on either side of the argument, her naïvity is slowly replaced by cynicism toward her former beleives
>It doens't help that her attempt to begin a proper debate inside the movement have her labeled as a species-traiter by the other leaders
>Out of spite she begins to date a Human
>Actually falls for him and begins to become increasingly pro-Collared
>Then one day she post a video of herself with her Human BF
>Should have been a deathblow to her 'career', but she takes the oppertunity to tell the public about the dirty side of the Movement
>The vile behaviour of the other Movement leaders toward their own leader cause a permanent 180 of the remaining Rabbit supproters
>The rabbit leader spent her days as a podcast hostess criticizing the Movement

>Of all the groups of the Rights movement, none fell harder for Domestication than the big cats.
>They were the grand prize and they knew it.
>Didn't help their leaders' talking points that big cats' initial response to the rise of Collared as a touchstone of human-anthro relations was amusement
>Every variation of BoldOfYouTo has been said by them
>Their lives were commonly ones of solitude interrupted by aggression towards others or their own kin, with not much being different day by day
>The prospect of partners that would keep coming back and give them what they wanted?
>in exchange for being friendly and doing what they're told?
>The proverbial predator to hunt THEM, that would force them onto their backs and have their way with them?
>The result was that the strongest felines of the rights movement were just seen as marking themselves willing to be hunted and TAMED.
>It disturbed many anthros at how much of the big-cat population of the world happily took up this role
>malicious compliance with something they hated
>except the malice melted when plain humanity was extended to them
>With sparks flying between them and humans the most, they were the most vulnerable to domestication
>It wasn't entirely easy for humans to follow through on their end of it - every human trying outreach to them got accused of not having grown up
>and being desperate to take on the mightiest just to show what big strong men they were
>A big-cat-anthro roaring about mistreatment was taken with a no-shit-they've-got-a-bone-to-pick stance by humans
>It was seen as plain that human incompetence turned that anthro in particular against human domestication
>But between anthro prideful strength and human inarguable superiority, they still found a way to connect
>big cats being still cats, they just walked into human lives and lived well
>to the envy of all other anthros
>their collars and shackles were usually golden rings

>There were a lot of public personas and celebrities that supported the movement
>Some genuinely, but most did it for clout and to stay relevant with the younger demographic
>Especially actors and actresses tried to “have their say”
>It did not end well
>As and more more scandals surrounding the Right Movement surfaced, the fallout began to spread to the supporters
>Careers would end or stagnate as these former spokesmen got the worst of it
>One of them was a washed up actress who was once big on prime time TV
>She didn’t even believe in the movement, but her Agent promised her that it would revive her career
>It only gave her bad press
>This send her off the deep end
>Driven to depression she angrily hit the bottle
>Hosted parties and indulged in a lifestyle of hedonism because “What is there to lose now?”
>She would spent most of those parties bemoaning her “lost youth” and the folly of working in the entertainment industry
>This only pushed her further away from friends and colleagues as none wanted to get stuck in the splash zone of her inevitable crash
>Didn’t help that the paparazzi got an unflattering picture of her posted across the internet
>Pic related
>Didn’t help that it was attached to an article told of her distaste for the Rights Movement and how she wasted her life trying to be “Collarless”
>This causes more outrage, though mainly form her former “supporters” in the movement
>She is labeled as a species-traitor
>With nothing left to lose she says “fuck it” and starts hosting ‘collared’ parties
>If she have to be villainized by virgins on the internet, she might as well earn it
>Guests are humans only and their anthro pets or slaves
>To her surprise her new guests are quite pleasant and wholesome to be around
>She get the necessary help to deal with her depression, to stop drinking and move on with her life
>Ends up finding love for the first time since she was a young mare
>This also catch the press’ attention
>Slowly but surely her reputation rebuilds
>She will never again be a big actress
>Doesn't care, really, she already know the dirty side of the industry and it was not worth the pain she have been through
>She salvage her remaining funds and move into a smaller place with her now Human
>Still big, just smaller and cheaper than before
>After a few months he pop the question and presents her with a pristine collar
>She accepts, as she did not think that anyone would be interested in an ‘old mare’ like her
>The passion in the bedroom tell her otherwise
>She never believed that she would ever get the chance to be a mother, so she was surprised when she got pregnant
>Her life turns around for the better as her new circle of friends - Humans and Collared anthros alike, are more genuine that what she have ever experienced while working in the industry
>All the while the online activists seeth at her good life, and she could care less about them

>The Rights Movement against ‘collaring’ claim that Anthros were subjegated by Humans by force
>For some species this might have been the case (not that most of them complain in this day and age)
>However in it’s early beginning, domestication as a mytisk agreement, especially between humans and their first pets; wolves and wild cats
>The more the Movement try to dig into historical records to find validity for their claims, the more they are proven wrong
>That’s they they try to persuade anthro celebrities to support the movement
>Thise that fall for it ends up running their careers
>With the loss of prominent Anthros in the public eye, the reputation of the Movement is tarnished even more
>Parradoxically, those anthro actors and actresses that ends up collared manages to Salvage their careers
>Many of them go on to live more fulfilling lives as pets, as they are now taken better care of than they ever were while working for Anthro-run studios
>Human actors and spokesmen gain more validity as their kindness and fairness contrasts the toxicity of the Rights Movement
>This only proves further what the Movement tried to disprove:
>Domestication can be rough at times, but just like in the early days, it is the mix of cooperation, human kindness and a form hand that makes anthros submit to their masters

>Medieval fantasy setting and whatnot
>Be Human guard in the Human-dominated city
>Be bored
>Night patrol is a drain todo but it needs to be done
>Especially since some hooded individual have been spotted lurking around recently
>Probably nothing, but you’re paid enough to care, so here you are
>Spent the time daydreaming about going to the slave market and get yourself a kobold
>Suddenly catched the gimps of movement down a dark alley
>Mace at the ready as you lift your torch to get a better look
>Yep, someone’s trying to hide
>Call out with authority
>StopCriminalScum.mp3
>They remain still as you march down the alley
>It’s a lizardman in a dark, heavy coat
>Pink scales, that’s rare
>Demand to know what it’s doing lurking around at this hour
>It speaks, its voice noticeably feminine
>Gives you some excuse about it looking for her lost dog
>Roll1.jpeg, she is obviously lying
>You restrain her, then investigates her backpack
>Potions and lotions for days
>It’s either illegal brands or fakes
>She begs of you to let her go, to just look the other way around
>She wants to make a deal for her freedom
>Idea
>You tell her that you can let her go for how,but not until you’ve done a body search on her
>She gets the mean
>She have no choice but to comply
>”Fine… just make it quick”
>Her wiggling behind shows that she’s not as against the idea as she says
>Spent the rest of the shift balls deep in her
>Her hisses and moans are cute, especially as she fails to convince you that she’s not into it
>Sunrise
>You have her clean your cock, then tell her to get the hell out
>Tell her that if you catch her again, you’ll have to teach her another lesson
>She canbarely hide her excitement as she tells you to go fuck yourself
>What a bad liar…
>A few weeks later
>Another report about some creep lurking around
>Good, you needed to get your rocks off anyway
>Same patrol, same alley, same lizarwoman
>Same bad liar as you claims that it’s all a coincidence
>You’ll fuck her, but job first
>You’re a professional after all
>Have her empty the backpack
>Same as before; fake or illegal lotions and potions
>Spot some empty mini-bottles and asks her about it
>She tells you that there’s a demand for virility and fertility potions among some anthro couples
>Apparently the guys aren’t as good as knocking up their female counterparts, so they seek remedies that makes them “as virile as Humans”
>Idea
>Tell her that you’ll help her out, but on one condition
>From now on, she will only be fucking you
>Her shock expression is betrayed by the excited swings of her tail
>What a bad liar
>”Fine, it’s not like I got anyone waiting for me anyway” she pouts
>You get down to fucking
>You’ve been saving up for her, so she’s eventually filled to bursting
>End of shift is approaching, so you gotta stop
>She can barely hide a whine
>Asks you to uphold your end of the bargain
>You tell her to squat over the bottle and fill them up
>You tell her to tell her clients that to use the “potion”, all the females had to do is to insert the content into their cunts a few days before having sex with their husbands
>If they really want the virility of Mankind, then They’ll have it
>She starts complaining about the ethics of it
>The gall
>You tell her to shut up, do as she’s told like a good little Anthro bitch and come back to you once she’ce sold her stock, or you will arrest her and have her jailed in a nunnery
>Far away from any Human dicking
>She shuts up and comply
>Seems embarrassed about the task at had
>You tell her that she’s a good little bitch and that you’ll have a reward waiting for her
>She cannot hide her excitement
>Bad liar
>Every few weeks you get a report about a “creep lurking around”
>Every ew weeks you “run into” her and gets down to fucking
>Same deal, same “potion making”
>She tells you that her clients are beginning to show
>Demand for her potion has increased
>You have no issue meeting demand
>Every time you fuck her she becomes more enamored with you
>This time she didn’t even pretend.
>The moment you walked down the alley, you were met with her spreading her legs on top of a crate
>It’s a good deal that you have going on, still it is getting a little dull
>Time to change things up
>While you’re fucking you tell her that you want to alter the deal
>She is hesitant
>Well, as hesitant someone can be between moans
>You tell her that this time you want something from her
>Her face lit up as she leans back and open her coat
>She flash you with her naked skin and hidden wares
>No tits though, cuz lizardman but you don’t complain
>”So uuh… Are ye’ buyin’ anything?”
>You tell her yes
>You are buying her
>By that you mean that you own her now
>You tell her to drink that potion that negates the magical contraceptive that you know that she’s been using
>Her future, her womb and eventual kids will all belong to you
>Tell her that her line will end with her, that her kids will be yours
>That her daughters will come to serve you just like their mother
>Any human children she brings into this world will be raised as her betters, just like any other Human
>Tell her that in the unlikely event of an anthro son, he will be sold into servitude
>In return she will live as your pet, carefree and obedient for the rest of her life
>She doesn’t even care to hide her excitement behind a mask of lies
>It’s the most honest reaction you’ve seen from her so far
>She wraps her arms, legs and tail around you in a vice grip when you nut inside of her
>She’s a panting mess as you clean your cock on her face
>Tell her that you got one last job for her
>Two months later
>she is servicing you and a magical clone of yourself
>Some temporary spell or scroll that allows you to doubletag your pet for hours as a time
>Shut up, it’s magic, you don’t have’ta explain shit
>This is her reward for the job you sent her out on
>First part of the job was to acquire this scroll so that you can have your fun with her
>The second part was t contact her former clients and tell the the truth about the virility potions she sold them
>You do enjoy a some schadenfreude once in a while
>Even from here you could see the chaos
>Apparently most of her clients were Anthro nobles and royalty in the few Anthro kingdoms still standing
>Their ancient lineages will end, forever more be Humans
>Had you known that you would be the progenitor of new royal dynasties, you would have asked for a raise
>Anyway, back to the ask at hand
>Your pet (you never bothered to learn her name) is eagerly servicing you and [you]
>Her slender frame shows the clear sign of being with egg
>She desperately asks for you to fuck her, but you tell her not yet
>She’s close to pop anyway, and you don’t want to stop what you’re doing once you get going
>She’s fueled on some concoction of hers that allows her to lay the egg easier
>So easy in fact that she barely noticed herself laying it
>Only focuses on the promised pounding she will receive
>And receive she did
>From both of youself, at the same time
>Running a train on her by yourself
>by your estimates she will be able to lay six eggs a year
>For many years to come

Anthros always try to provide ways to relieve a human male of stress.

>be human billionaire
>be at some kind of fancy party
>some anthro political learned you'll be the guest, so she came to the party specific to convince you to found her campaign

>Train as a ninja
>Go to a hidden dojo somewhere in the mountains
>Your master is a anthro
>Training goes well
>Want to use your power to become the new master
>Want to own both Dono and your anthro master
>She is very diciplined, won’t fall easily to your attempts nor your strneghts so you can’t use raw strength
>Know that she is worried about if her nethinde of training is sufficient
>Always wanna do her best by her student
>Idea
>Tell her that you have plateauet and am in need of a ‘new and engaging’ Way to develop your Ninja skills
>Say that you have heard about the ‘Way of the exposed skin’ as a new Way to improve master-student relations
>She is skeptical, but playing with her fears of being too ‘Old fashioned’ works
>All training now done in the nude, both you and her
>Sweaty naked bodies engaging in rigerous training and close combat
>It takes weeks but eventually her resolut slips
>One time becomes a regular thing
>As your skills and strength grow, she becomes more submissive
>Eventually you become the defecto master of the dojo and she become your wife
>The once empty dojo is now filled with your offspring
>You are now the master of your own ninja clan

>In a twist to the usual alien empire stories, humanity is actually the first race in the universe to crack many seemingly impossible sciences. Gene editing, AI, cybernetics, FTL, etc.
>With space travel comes freedom, and countless independent spacers scatter to the solar winds with the aid of long-mastered technology, drawn to the great unknown.
>The First Ones emerging is not something the mysterious will of the universe itself will ignore, though. Earth had some kind of psychic bleed-over to various worlds, one a world full of anthros. Now the anthros there have the ingrained feelings for humans their animal counterparts have.
>A single human spacer happens by the curious world and makes contact
>And what a wild reception he gets.
>His presence smashes the dopamine buttons in the brains of countless anthro species. Nearly all of them crave human physical affection on a primal level, and their animalistic instincts can surface because of it, making them act silly or needy.
>When the spacer met a world leader, a proud vixen anthro on live television, a hug from him nearly caused her to collapse in his arms and blush so deeply it could be seen through her fur. He's the only one who heard her embarrassed, foxy croon.
>The politics of the world shift dramatically with the arrival of the spacer, with many anthros now looking towards him like his word should be the final word. Key figures like world leaders, wealthy folk, and celebrities now look for his attention and approval.
>The spacer comes to a realization.
>He has the heinously dangerous ability to compel affection from nothing here, and he's in a position to influence an entire world.
>Does he steer them with morals?
>He could drip-feed them tech for a slow uplift, and they'd benefit from it massively.
>...Or does he do things for his own benefit? >He could gene edit himself for cross-virility, sire an heir, and the world might willingly fall under a dynasty of his creation.
>What to do...?

>Medieval fantasy world with multiple species and whatnot
>Anthros are either tribal or lives comfortably in human cities as either pets or secondary citizens
>All rules have an exception, though
>Rats are that exception
>They chose to live an vermin and scavengers, infesting the underbelly of Human society
>They’re smarter than tribal anthros, yet chose to scavenge and steal rather than producing it themselves
>Too numerous and fast-breeding to be kept in check or properly domesticated
>All in all, they’re the one anthro species that are considered burdensome pests
>A hunter like yourself can make a good buck selling them as slaves
>Which brings you to why you’re currently dragging a dozen rats along with you through the knee-deep muck
>You would have captures more if they hadn’t been so aggressive
>Oh well, at least that’s one burrow dealt with
>They’re all tugging and pulling at their binds, cursing you and whatnot
>Except for one
>A young female, as far as you can tell, who remained silent throughout the whole ordeal
>Never raised an arm or voice against you, not even as you wrapped the rope around her wrists and neck
>The light hint of a blush and the way she rubs her legs together as you pull the rope tells you all you need to know
>She will be spared the fate of her family
>Still, gotta be careful around rats
>They’re clever fuckers and she could be hiding something
>She remained unmoving as you sold them off to the slave trader
>You take her home to your abode, intending to break her in
>(Yes, she is clearly interested, but you want some fun out of domesticating her just to be sure)
>You lead her to the bedroom
>As soon as the ropes are removed she plops down onto the bed and spreads her legs
>”Have your way with me” she says in a flat tone
>You grin.
>”No”
>The rat did not expect that reply
>She stammers “Why not?”
>A crack with the rope makes her winch for the first time
>Fear flashes across her face before her stoic mask re-appear
>You tell her that you are the master and that you will not be questioned
>You tell her that her lack of emotion makes you question her motives
>Even as you sold her family she did not act out like any other rat would have
>She is silent then asks for permission to speak
>Good, she’s a quick learner. Granted
>She tells you that she always have had muted emotions
>It’s how she was born
>Only intense emotions and feelings will slip through her mask
>She takes a moment before remembering to add a “master” to her speech
>You take a moment to consider her words, then make a plan
>If intense emotions are required, then so be it
>You tell her to start pleasuring herself
>She does not argue nor hesitate as she start rubbing herself
>It takes a little while but you see her emotions and pleasure slip through her mask
>You tell her to keep going as you stip
>Her eyes fixated on your cock, her rubbing and panting increasing in pace
>You playfully rub yourself in view of her, which she clearly finds motivating
>She starts begging to be fucked
>You tell her no and to keep going
>You tell her that you want a pet that shows appreciation for being fucked
>As a pet she should be always show how much she loves her master
>If not, then she will be sold off like her family
>And most likely, her lack of emotion will mean that she will only ever be fucked by other rats
>Her rubbing become more frantic as fear and lust seep through her visage
>She cums but keep rubbing in desperation for your approval
>She tells you that she’s sorry for not being a good pet for her master
>Her face is still stoic but her voice and eyes are tearful
>She tells you that she’s a worthless rat who just want a better life as a pet
>She begs you to keep her
>You grin as her emotions are on full display
>You tell her to stop
>She obeys, clearly fearful of your verdict
>You rummage through a drawer as you tell her that you have decided to keep her
>But on one condition
>You pull out an iron collar
>It’s rusty and worn
>You tell her that this collar is all that she deserve, for now
>Likewise, her bed will be the wooden floor whenever she’s not in bed with you
>She is only a rat, after all
>You tell her that if she keep proving her loyalty and dedication toward you, she may eventually receive better bedding and collars
>You emphasizes the “If”
>She nods as she crawl over the sheets toward you
>The collar is closed around her neck and she patiently awaits further order
>Her mask is still stoic, but at least she tries to show more emotion to please you
>You tell her that she’s a good girl who is now worthy for her master’s cock
>You think she just came from the praise alone
>You turn her around and enter your new pet
>Great Domesticator Above she’s tight even if she’s already as wet as the ocean
>The mix of pain and pleasure is leaving her breathless
>She then eagerly throw herself back at you, begging to use her as the useless toy she is
>You reward her eagerness with a slap on her small behind
>It doesn’t take her long before she begs to be bred, to have your children
>You slow down, keeping her en edge as you nearly pull out
>You tell her that as a rat, she had to earn the privilege to have your offspring
>She begs your forgiveness as she is being prevented from impaling herself onto your cock
>”Please master, I only want to please!”
>You tell her to prove it
>You let go of her, allowing her to immediately implae herself on your dick
>Her desperation to prove herself worthy of your approval makes it all the funnier to keep her on edge
>But you know that it’s only a matter of time before she will be heavy with your kids
>She may be a rat, but she’s the exception to the rule
>You take the next two weeks are spent on properly house train your new pet
>That is, whenever you’re not out eradicating pests (her kin)
>You never asked for her name and she did not provide one (not that you really cared) so you’re calling her Rusty
>Due to the collar you see
>Still got a resting bitchface but have learned to show the emotion more
>By that you mean that she’ve gotten better at servicing you
>Eventually you come across evidence of a larger burrow
>Takes a few days to gather enough clues to pinpoint a location
>Your wall is plastered with notes, maps and whatnot
>BeautyfulMind.meme
>The final piece of the puzzle falls into place during a post-nut clarity
>Ofcourse, they were hiding in the abandoned silver mines all along!
>You don’t notice Rusty’s contemplating as you put on your clothing and gear
>She then suddenly asks to be taken along
>What, why?
>She tells you that she wanna show you her worth
>And as a rat she could get closer to them without arousing suspicion
>Ok sure, this should be interesting
>You warn her that if this is a trick of hers to double cross you, then she’ll be sold alongside the rest
>The two of you spent the rest of the day traveling to the mines
>Pitch black, you need a torch to keep going
>She doesn't
>Darkvision is overpowered
>On the bright side she quickly find the trail to the burrow
>Apparently there’s a lot of hidden marks on the walls that only the rats know of
>They even show where the traps are at
>Huh, you learn something new everyday
>Maybe you should make her your full-time tracker
>Provided she don’t do anything stupid that is
>You eventually get to a large cave
>Damn that’s a lot of rats
>You stay in the shadows as you observe the burrow
>With that many rats you can’t just strong-arm it as you usually do
>They might not be strong, but their numbers makes up for that
>Rusty was going down there to infiltrate
>You keep a close eye on her, crossbow at the ready
>You see the other rats gather around her, sniffing the air
>Do they smell you on her?
>One of the larger rats, a male becomes aggressive and backhands her hard
>*Twang*
>The rat fell over as the bold imbed itself in its neck
>Bitch you got no permission to damage my property
>The rats starts to scatter
>Rusty gets up and swing a knife on another male that is trying to carry her off
>You don’t know where she got the knife from but right now you got other priorities
>HereTheyCome.MP3
>It’s a good thing that you picked a good location, or they would have been swarming you
>Instead they’re funneled into a killing zone
>Blood and fur fill the air
>It takes a while but eventually you cull their numbers enough for the rest of the males to start fleeing
>After catching you breath you enter the burrow proper
>Looks like Rusty wasn’t idle while you were preoccupied
>Rats with stabwounds in their neck are scattered across the floor
>Some of the side entranced to the cave have been blocked (apparently the rats had MacGyver’d some contraption that would allow them to block the entrances in case of danger
>Instead they were now trapped in here with you
>As they realize this, they give up
>You pat Rusty on the head, tell her she’s a good girl, then tell her to help you bind them
>Takes a while, but in the end you got 34 rats bound and ready to be sold
>”Hey, Human!”
>You look over at the captured rat that dare speak to you in such a manner
>It’s a large female
>Probably older than Rusty if you had to guess
>Looks defiant, though not enough to cause you trouble you think
>You ask her what she want
>She asks what it will take to become your rat
>Nods toward Rusty to emphasize
>Straight forward aren’t she?
>One of the males yells at her to be silent
>You smack the male over the snout to keep him quiet
>The female rat tells you that she have no love for her burrow, especially not to the males
>And she would have having to suffer alongside them
>If she had to be a slave, then better to be one to the Human who captured her
>Interesting
>You asks her why she hates her burrow so much
>She tells that all rat burrows were ruled by the males
>She spreads her legs (as much as she could given her situation) to show you markings of abuse
>Males rule over females through fear and abuse because they fear that they will otherwise leave to live with the Humans
>While you already knew that most Anthro females had a preference to Humans, it’s rare that the males would be directly violent toward their females as a result of it
>Male rats, it would seem, feared to lose control
>You might use this information for later
>For now you need to decide what to do with this one
>Rusty interjects meekly to inform you that the female is correct, and that she can smell on her that her intention are true
>Wut
>Apparently rats can sense when other rats lie or something, which is how she was discovered earlier
>Okay, another piece of information that you’ll use for later
>You look down at the other rat (you decide to call her Red due to her eyes) and tell her that you’ll accept her offer
>She flashes you a toothy grin, then asks for one favor
>She wants to harm the male that have been her worst abuser
>You agree and release her
>You hand her the knife Rusty had, keeping you own weapon at the ready just in case
>Red gleefully walks over to the male that interrupted you before and lifts his loincloth
>Lots of screaming and begging from the before Red throw aside his lost pride and return to you beaming
>You decide then to make Rusty head-rat over this one
>just in case
>Back home
>You promoted Rusty to head-rat
>She still keep the rusty collar on, though
>Red gets a collar made of rope to signify her inferiority to Rusty
>Rusty seems to live up a little now that she’s head of the harem (her words)
>Red grumble but accepts her position
>Over the next few days you learn that while Rusty needs praise to fall in line, Red needs discipline
>Both as punishment and reward
>Both are suckers for being dominated
>As your pets becomes more efficient at cooking, cleaning and keeping your bed warm, you in turn learn more about rats in general
>Over the next few days you contemplate what you’ve learn and already know
>Female rats respond well to both domination and praise, and are more often than not submissive by nature
>males on the other hand seems to be violent and abusive, which repulse most females, but given the nature of the burrows, they can do little but endure the punishment
>You wonder if you can use that knowledge to turn female rats against their male counterparts
>Would make it easier for you to take on a larger burrow, which would mean more profit for you
>Also begs the question if the violent tendencies could be bred out of the males
>Rats in general are considered worthless and only fit for slave labor or extermination, but if you could breed a more docile species, you could potentially make them yet another domesticated anthro-species
>It would cost you your job in the long run, but if you corner the market early, you could get rich on them
>You need to test your theory, but for that, you need more females to experiment with
>The thoughts alone get you riled up
>You call out for your pets
>They stare at you in momentary shock as she approach them
>You tell them to get ready
>You’re going hunting
>It doesn't find you long to find another burrow
>Having two tracking-rats helps you greatly in that regard
>It’s a small one, probably only 10 or 12 rats
>Once again Rusty goes ahead to scout
>You keep Red close by just in case she was plotting anything
>She’s new after all, gotta take your due diligence
>Eventually Rusty comes back with two female rats
>They look up at you curiously
>You asks Rusty what gives
>She tells you that they smelled your scent on her and got intrigued
>They want to be your pets as well
>Well that was easy
>You ask them why they want to leave their burrow behind
>They compliment each others movement and speech, they must have a close bond or something
>They tell you that they have always dreamed about being with a Human
>One of them show you a piece of paper
>Looks like to be an illustration of a naked human, probably a page from a erotic book or something
>The page seem to be worn around the illustrated man’s genitalia
>Okay then, they’re strange and are sluts for Humans
>You chose to call them Ash and Soot on account of their grey fur
>You tell them to prove their loyalty and go deal with the males
>As one they descent into the small burrow
>You follow closely behind
>Doesn’t take long to subdue the burrow
>A day later than they’re sold
>A day after that and you’re home with four rat pets
>Ash and Soot are given rope collars
>Red get Rusty’s old rusty collar
>Rusty received a new iron collar
>That night Rusty receive additional attention to properly establish the harem hierarchy among the rats
>The next couple of months are a blur
>Days spent hunting for rat slaves and night spent on fucking your rat pets
>The combined effort of yourself and your four pets makes you a very successful hunter
>Soon the local area is devoid of burrows
>You don’t add to the harem, though
>The four you got so far is enough
>But you do have plans
>Plans that involve buying an old farm and turn it into a plantation
>A plantation where rats works for you
>And where you can test your theory about rat domestication and pacification
>You’re already well underway in that regard
>Rusty is already heavy with kids
>The others will be allowed theirs once she have given birth
>To maintain the hierarchy between them, of course
>Not because you secretly revel in their desperation
>Even if you do like how envious they are of Rusty
>Doesn't stop the others form trying to get pregnant before that, though
>More than once they’ve held you tightly during orgasm
>Red is the worst offender in that regard
>She’s punished, ofcourse, which she love
>As for Ash and Soot, they especially seem to be fixated on your cock
>Fellatio and ball sucking galore
>You blame that erotic page of theirs
>They collaborate about everything
>Even riding you
>You sure do spoil your pets
>And they in turn spoil you
>House have never been cleaner
>Food have never been better (took a while to get it right but they’re quick learners)
>Bed have never been warmer
>What more could a Human master want?
>Years later
>You own your plantation
>And your domestication of Rat-kind is a proven theory
>You’re paid by the king himself to domesticate the rat population
>To save them from being exterminated as vermin, of course
>The burden of the civilized man
>You are in the barn
>A raised stage at the end, where you and your four concubines stand
>Along the walls stands your rat daughters and the few rat sons whose meek demeanor proved your theory correct
>Those of your children who were born Human now lives as Human does, free to choose their own destinies
>Not an insignificant number of them chose to follow in your footstep and establish their own domestication plantations
>Anyway, back to the barn
>In the middle of it, bound and unable to flee, is the latest batch of captured wild-rats
>Mostly females, though a few males have earned a spot since to their meek demeanor is worth to the breeding program
>You start the session by telling them about your vision for their species
>About how you’re saving them from extinction through domestication and obedience
>How they can become part of this glorious future for their kin
>All you ask of them is their submission
>And in return you will reward them with purpose and caring masters
>To emphasize you strip and take a seat on the make-shift throne you’ve made for the occasion
>Rusty, the head concubine, sit on your lap and rides you
>She is soon rewarded with your cum
>She gets off and helps the others to their turn
>The air is thick with rat lust
>You get up and tell them that they all start with rope collars
>Show their worth, obedience and loyalty, and they will receive a more prestigious collar
>Tell them that the one who does best by the year’s end will be granted a night and a day with your personally, the Master of their fate and species
>You smirk as you can practically hear the floor get wet
>Rats were the exception to the rule of Anthro domestication
>Now they’re the prime example of it

>Different kinds of Anthros their their speciality
>Canine Anthros are loyal companions
>Equine Anthos are used as beast of burden
>Overall, the mammal-Anthros are commonly used in bed due to their warm bodies
>In comparison, the scaled Anthros did not enjoy the same companionship of their masters
>It's not that they were necessarily less desirable as pets than their mammal kin, but they were more difficult to domesticate
>Their pride, strength and often colder demeanor left them to be invited to the master bedroom less
>Then a new sport became popular: PetFight
>The Scalie-girls greatly outperformed the mammal-girls when it came to throw punches
>Their stronger bodies, harder scales and prideful nature became features prized by their masters
>The attention-starved scalies now thrive on the rush of the fight, to how off why they are now a prized investments of their masters
>The winner especially are rewarded both in the arena and in bed

>have a dragon pet
>she is a VERY big girl
>she is nearly 4x your height and probably weighs 10x as much as you do
>unsuprisingly, she is STUPIDLY strong
>you have seen her effortlessly bend metal, crush bones, and even destroy vehicles with just her bare hands and sheer brute strength
>Her incredible size, insane strength, and highly aggressive/competitive nature made her particularly well suited for PetFighting.
>she is an absolute MONSTER in the arena, to the point where you and her managed to work all the way up until you managed to secure a spot in the Ultra-Heavyweight category for the PetFighting League finals.
>despite her ferocity and brutality In the ring, the moment the two of you are in private it’s like a switch is flipped, and she becomes the neediest, most submissive sweetheart in the galaxy
>one would think that such a huge anthro would be difficult to pleasure in bed, but some handy (and expensive) implants alleviates that problem completely
>with just a quick mental input, numerous implants strategically planted across her enormous frame in her activate, heightening her sensitive to extreme levels
>her species (and like all anthro’s) is already naturally sensitive to human pheromones, but the implants take it to the next level, heightening her sensitivity to the point that even the slightest touch to any of her erogenous zones is enough to make her body paralyzed with pleasure
>barely any foreplay is required to reduce her to a moaning, panting mess
>just whispering that she is a “good girl” is enough to soak her cunt completely in arousal
>she could easily rip you in half at any moment, but you know that she won’t, because you have this powerful beast completely and utterly wrapped around you finger
>she also wants something that only you can give her: children
>you have promised that if she wins the championship, you will fuck her until she is utterly immobile with offspring
>you look forward to rewarding your good girl.

>Humans are avid travellers of the cosmos
>And as with the Anthros of their homeworld, alien species seem to be effected by Human pheremones just as bad
>Both Alien and Anthro tends to find their own niches within Human society
>Lombax are often seen on human vessels as mechanics, engineers and whatever role deals with tech
>The better a ship runs, the less of a need there is for a Lombax's technical skill
>The less of a need there is for their technical skill, there more they take on the role of "support"
>That's the Lombax way of saying that they're fucking the off-shift crew
>On ships that run smoothly all the time, the Lombax spent all their time "supporting" the crew
>Needless to say, most Lombax are known to make their ships run without issues

>Various types of collars
>All some kind of ownership collar
>Among anthros the type of collar they wear is used to signify status and place in the hierarchy
>The type of collar also signify benefits
>Given that the different species of anthros have different strengths or affinities, it is common for a specific species to almost universally wear a specific type of collar
>Cats and dogs usually wear pet collars, which allows them special access to the household
>Kobolds commonly wear slave collars which indicates a life of servitude, and rewards in the master’s bed when they outshine in their duties
>The various reptilian anthros that are fighters in the PetFight tournements usually wear some spiked collar, which are usually removed during fights
>Anthros working in security normalt wear traditional ‘dog collages’, though an upscale version of the collar allow for the attachment of gadgets such as walkie-talkies, flashlight and tracking-gadgets
>The symbolism of certain collars are so desireable to anthros, that those living on the street, in ghettos or who are otherwise desperately masterless pay great fortunes to get their hand on counterfeit verdions
>Which ofcourse is a crime

>Big city
>Get a notification on your phone
>Pic related (https://desu-usergeneratedcontent.xyz/trash/image/1693/76/1693765980741.jpg)
>It's clearly a trap, but you've been looking to get your rocks off
>Besides kobolds are pushovers
>You meet then in the alley
>They start acting all high and mighty for having "fooled a Human"
>Egos all around
>Put your hand in your pocket
>They start crying and beg for mercy
>Apparently they think that you're about to pull a gun on them or something
>So much for their pride, huh?
>You pull out two collars
>The real deal, none of that bootleg shit flooding the hood
>You got their attention real quick
>You tell them that if they can stop being miserable 'hood rats' and show you that they're worth it...
>Then you'll take them in
>But they have'ta show some effort
>No more of that 'streetz'-shit or wasting money on flashy pride-enhancers
>Real effort, Real care for their money and getting real educations and jobs
>And they can expect a real home, a real master and real human dick
>Skip forward a few years
>You're now the owner of two educated, hard working and upstanding citizens
>And you reward them every night, as the good girls they are
>Remember kids: Leave the Streets, Collar in the sheets

>Early industrialization-era, equivalence of the late 1700 / early 1800s
>A very large island in the middle of the largest ocean
>It’s a colony of one of the dominant human powers, only been colonized for about 50 years
>Life is good overall, if a bit dull this far from civilization
>The local Anthro population is an avian species
>Descending from carnivorous Terror Birds their, ancestors hunted the local megafauna to extinction millennia ago
>Descendants had to become omnivores to survive
>Millennia of isolation, no predators, no competition or a steady source of protein have left them slender, docile and frail in comparison to most other anthros, even among avians
>It also left them with little incentive to progress their culture
>While the rest of the world progressed, all they did were to run naked across the grasslands
>Never discovered fire, bows or even how to weave grass into makeshift bags or clothing
>Humans being present on the island was enough to push the birds’ fragile biology toward the edge
>They are now dependant on human kindness, medicine and intervention to survive
>Those of them that have realized the folly of their ancestral ways try to integrate with civilization and make a living in the human cities
>Too bad that they’re so utterly useless at everything, which leaves them unemployed more often than not
>Their bodies are too frail for manual labor (compared to humans and other anthros) and their heads aren't’ bright enough for higher education, at least not yet
>And the progress of industrialization makes jobs in-between these extremes largely unavailable to them
>This leaves them jobs in the service sector like street cleaners, garbage collectors, news-paper sellers, shoe-shiners and whatnot
>It ain’t much but someone gotta do it
>Then there’s the stubborn groups that cling to their “ancestral culture”
>If you can call (“hunter”)-gatherers running naked across the land "cultured"
>These groups never manages to grow beyond a few members, lots of inbreeding
>Said inbreeding makes them vulnerable to diseases brought in from the outside world
>Be Anon
>Own a ranch
>Do some farming, but otherwise rely on grazing animals (no anthros)
>You would love to own a few anthro slaves, but local climate, terrain and the economy forces you to have spent cash on other necessities
>Still, you’ve saved up enough to buy a some anthro slaves next season
>Overall life is hard but good, can’t complain too much
>The local bird anthros (called “Skitties” by the settlers) come by once in a while, but otherwise don't bother you
>One afternoon while you’re out inspecting your fences, you come across something huddling under the shadow of a tree
>It’s a female Skittie
>Young, malnourished and ill by the looks of it
>Shivering with fever
>Was probably left to die while the family moved on
>It’s not uncommon, you’ve come across the bones of those that died from the illness
>You could leave her and let nature take its course
>Or you could show some of that kindness that the Great Domesticator in the Sky blessed his Humans with
>You decide on the latter
>Life may be tough all around but it have not yet left you heartless
>You pick her onto your horse then ride home
>You had to dip into your savings to get a doctor to come all the way out to your ranch
>She had a preventable disease that wouldn’t hurt a child, but it’s deadly to Skitties
>If she survives, she will be be immune for the rest of her life, so there’s that
>You do the good deed to get some medicine for her, then look over her as you continue your work around the ranch
>This will set you back a bit financially, you will have to postpone getting those slaves
>At least you can sleep well with your decision
>A week later she was lucid enough to be aware of her surroundings
>Took a month more before she had the strength to get out of bed by herself
>She now follows you around like a loyal dog
>Guess that makes sense, she does owe you her life
>She tries to help you on the ranch, but it amounts to little
>Her body is not build for strength, only endurance
>At least she’s fast
>You decide that for now, she will help you inspect the fence around your property
>Once you’ve shown her what to look for, she’s off
>Damn she’s fast
>You take a few weeks to teach her how to speak your language
>She’s a fast learner, which sets her apart from most of her kin
>Her vocabulary little by little every day
>Still at child-level though
>Most conversations are one sided as you explain concepts and ideas to her
>When she does speak she usually asks about things, thanks you for your generosity or insults her former family
>She felt quite betrayed for being left to die by them
>Now she seems to hate Skitties because of that betrayl
>You let her rant, it's not like you have a reason to defend them
>Then one day she asks why you haven’t given her an egg
>You blink and ask her to elaborate
>She want to show her gratitude to you for having saved her life, but doesn’t know the word for sex
>That can be arranged
>It’s been a while since you yourself have had some relief, so you waste little time
>She is mortified at first by your size, though she keeps grinding against your shaft
>It takes a little while but eventually you get it in her
>You have to be careful not being too rough with her
>Skitties are frail beings after all
>What she lacks in robustness she makes up for in speed and endurance
>She’s a trooper, you gotta give her that
>You decide that from now on, one of her duties will be as your bed-pet
>She seems delightful of the idea
>Tells you that she is happy to be of good use
>Oh you’ll make good use of her alright
>And you do, most nights in fact
>You eventually decide to use her as a courier
>No heavy packages, just letters and whatnot to the administration in town
>She can bring smaller necessities back, so it's all good
>Had to go along the first time to show her around and introduce her to the bureaucrats
>They have to register her as your property you see
>Don’t want someone to snatch her up and ruin all the hard work you’ve put into her
>They ask for a name
>.... Skittie
>They tell you that it have to be an actual name
>Most already call the Sketties ‘Skittie’ since they can’t be bothered to give the individual Skittie a name
>Not that it matter much, since Skitties don't have names for themselves either
>But bureaucracy demands bureaucracy
>Okay, fine
>She’s fast, so how about Leggy?
>You’re now the proud owner of a bird who didn’t understand why she needed a name
>She is given a collar to publicly show that she’s now an owned Skittie
>Her delight and schadenfreude is on full display as she shows it off to the other Skitties you come across
>Mean, but hey, as long as she does her duties she can show off her ruffled feathers all she want
>You tell her that as a joke
>She immediately want her feathers ruffled so she can rub it in their faces
>Does she have a kink for humiliating others?
>You take her down an alley to find a secluded place
>You sit on a crate, pants down and raises her up onto your lap
>Ready to impale!
>She suddenly stiffen
>You look up to see what’s up
>You see other Skitties looking at you from down the alley
>Seems like Leggy is not as brave as she claimed to be
>You slowly lower her down onto your shaft, making eye contact with the other Skitties as you do
>Leggy soon overcomes her embarrassment
>Never been wetter as she sings to the audience
>The other Skitties look on with envy but does not approach further
>Some appear to be rubbing themselves
>Leggy is chattering happily in her native tongue
>You might have to do this again sometime
>Seasons move on
>Leggy have taken to heart her new role as property, bed-pet, courier and fence scout
>Still useless otherwise
>Then one day you hear commotion up the hill
>A quick horse ride later you see Leggy in a fight with a small group of Skitties
>They flee upon your arrival
>In broken English Leggy tells you that they tried to steal one of the newborn lambs for food
>Also tells you that they were the ones who abandoned her
>They got angry that she didn’t just let them take the lamb since they were family
>Then they attacked her for being a ‘city dweller’ or something
>WTF, you’re on a ranch!
>She got a few cuts from their claws
>She also managed to give them their fair share of cuts
>You make sure to tell her that she is a good girl for protecting your property, then take her home to tend to her wounds
>Luckily she does not get sick
>Though she is hot and bothered the next few days
>Arousal evident
>You decide to reward her for protecting your livestock
>A firm grip on her collar as you pull her toward the wall
>You’ve discovered that pulling her by her collar imitates some pinch her kind does as part of a mating ritual
>She loves it and is wet immediately, legs shaking and all
>You push her against the wall
>She presents herself immediately with delightful cooing
>LetsGetDownToBusiness.Hun
>She’s the kind that speaks during sex
>Originally in her native language, though lately in English
>During sex her English becomes increasingly broken
>It’s funny to listen to
>You decide to play with her for a bit
>You lean over and asks if she want an egg
>She starts stuttering, legs shaking
>You tell her to beg you for it
>She tries her hardest to formulate enough fo a sentence to get your approval
>She finally manages to formulate a complete sentence through chips, moans and broken English
>You praise her as you reward her
>Good girl
>A couple of years later
>By now you’ve gotten yourself a couple of Anthro slaves to help around the ranch
>All females, ofcourse
>Canine anthro to keep the animals in check
>Sheep anthro to deal with the shearing of your sheeps (you love the irony, it’s funny to you)
>Cow and horse anthros for the heavy lifting and extra produce
>As is proper custom they all regular your bed to keep up morale
>They get an extra turn as rewards then they’re good girls
>Leggy is still with you, of course
>As your first owned anthro, she is the one who sleeps in your bed on most nights
>Have to keep a hierarchy to keep the others in check
>She still does her chores, like inspecting the fences, scouting for predators and delivering letters and packages to town
>She also spent her time teaching your Skittie offspring how to be beneficial on a ranch
>Chicks are smarter and tougher than their mother, clearly they got some good genes from you
>Better immune systems, too
>Leggy is especially happy about this and is insistent on having more chicks
>Her official reasoning is that she wants to better her kin to be more useful
>You know the truth through
>She loves taking her offspring with her to town so she can rub their superior genes in the face of the other Skitties
>She got a mean streak, that for sure
>Probably doesn’t help that you indulge her in it, as you occasionally go to town just the two of you
>Alley’s always crowded with Skittes who seem to be envious about what they’re missing out on
>And yet, as far as you know, none of them approach other humans with the same preposition
>Skittles are are seriously dense creatures, even after frequently observing the lesson in front of them, it doesn't seem to stick
>Leggy meanwhile is only going harder on showing them what they’re missing out on
>You should probably be alarmed by her sadistic side toward her own kin, but you know you’ll end up spoiling her, like always

>Go to drive through
>Ask for a qouter pounder
>First girl comes out with your food
>Pound her
>As you do, discover that she messed up your order
>Pissed
>While still going at her, call the manager
>Demand a re-do of your order
>Manager comes out with the food herself
>See you pound her employee
>She gets a turn too
>Double Pounder
>Food was meh

>Being a raider ruled
>Plenty of food, drink, caps, chems, and pussy to go around, without needing to do any of that gay shit like "farming" or "not being a murderous psychopath"
>You simply took what you needed from those less fortunate than you and your crew
>The only thing that sucked was that your boss was a dickhead
>"Go do this" or "Don't shoot up in the middle of a gang fight" annoying shit like that
>Being number 2 meant you got more stuff and respect than the rest of the cannonfodder, but you were basically the bitch boy for his lazy ass
>"Were" being an important distinction
>You'd thought about killing the bastard many times but he was the boss for a reason, and he knew you hated his guts so he was always ready for any assassination you would've tried
>Turns out you didn't need to bother
>One shitty green night, your camp was night raided by a pack of fucks finally stronger than you, some Brotherhood squads taking revenge for killing one of theirs or something
>Whatever it didn't matter, what mattered was that your crew got their shit pushed in, and by the time you escaped there was barely half of you left
>Of course the Brotherhood couldn't just take your abandoned shit and piss off like respectable winners, no, they chased after you like hungry radroaches
>More and more of your guys got picked off, until they ran you into a dense green glowing field, stopping at the edge because they were pussies who couldn't take a few rads in their fancy armor
>Or so you thought
>Eventually you and what was left of your crew left them behind, the trailing laser fire dying down after a command from their boss
>There wasn't much left of your crew, and whoever didn't have shoddy power armor or radaway started to get sick as the sun came up
>Your boss was PISSED, yelling all the time and blaming you for dumb shit like "killing a knight for his power armor the other day", which he of course took anyway after, leaving you with your rusty T45
>You were two seconds away from just jumping at the annoying fucker and beating his ass when a roar sounded over his bitching
>Turns out those Brotherhood cunts had flushed you into deathclaw territory, and the big lizards sure as shit weren't happy you were there
>It was only when you looked through the thick fog in the dim morning light did you realize how fucked you were
>Not only was it deathclaw territory, but it was a whole fucking deathclaw breeding ground, with eggs littered all over the place
>The boss was the first to react as he spooled up his minigun, shouting some orders that you didn't bother listening to
>As he started shooting, a few of your guys up front got sliced in half, mostly from the deathclaws but boss wasn't too worried about collateral damage as the poor fucks were doomed anyway
>You on the other hand, had a better idea, getting the fuck out of there
>Only to realize that your escape had already been cut off by a few ambushing deathclaws behind
>Clever girls
>Seeing as you were about to die in a very bad way, you took out your emergency stash and loaded up with as many chems as you could before they closed in
>Psycho, Jet, Buffout, whatever, if you were going to die you were going to do it zoinked out of your gourd
>Using your rocket launcher, you turned a few of the claws into red mist, making the others scatter behind piles of junk
>The gunfire in your helmet slowly quieted more and more as your crew was hacked to pieces, but you gave as good as you got
>Your boss hadn't stopped shooting the entire time, lizards falling left and right as he picked off the ones stupid enough to charge him
>You hate to admit it, but he was kind of a badass, laying down fire until the lizards retreated
>Everyone started cheering as the overgrown salamanders ran away, except for boss, who kept his red hot barrels spinning
>"It ain't over yet you dumb fucks" were his last words you remember, saying them right before an even louder roar shook the ground and rattled the teeth in your skull
>Bursting out through a load of junk was the biggest deathclaw you'd ever seen, big as a house and fucking pissed beyond belief
>One of your guys, you think his name was Crazy Dan screamed something about it being a "matriarch" as it cut through his scrap armor in the blink of an eye
>Anyone still able to run did so, dropping their guns as the boss opened up again, calling them all cowards
>It didn't matter, they were dead as soon as she showed up, the 5mm rounds of the minigun bouncing off her hide like pebbles
>One by one she cut them down, your boss never wavering even as she got closer and closer
>She was so fast you couldn't get a bead on her with your launcher, and with only one round left you needed to make it count
>Before you knew it all your guys were dead, save for your boss who had the barrels of his minigun cut off by an enormous hand
>Immediately after that those giant claws sunk themselves into his gut, ripping though his brand new T51 armor and gutting him
>Pulling a grenade out, he screamed into his helmet and tried to pull the pin, but the bloody hand gripped around his power armored fist and crushed it with the sound of squealing metal
>There was a pause for a moment, and then the matriarch bit his head off, armor and all disappearing into her jagged maw
>It was quicker than you would've liked but the boss died on his feet, actually making you respect the bastard for a few seconds until the giant deathclaw looked at you with eyes that promised unimaginable pain
>Panicking, and remembering you had a rocket launcher in your hands in your addled state, you fire as she leaped at you, the explosion going off at your feet as your reflexive aim wasn't the best
>Your ears rang like crazy, reminding you of the time some rival ganger snuck up behind you and slammed your helmet with a sledgehammer
>It was fun smashing his fingers one by one with it after your crew had killed everyone else
>Anyway, you woke up dazed on the edge of a small crater, most of your front armor blown open and singed, claw marks down your helmet and chest, but still alive
>The junked armor was barely able to stand up, but you eventually got upright, pleased with yourself at killing that big fucker
>Only it wasn't dead, in fact, it was barely grazed as it lie in the center of the crater, it's scales only slightly sooty from the explosion
>From what you could tell, it was dazed, barely, and seeing as you had no chance of outrunning it and had no ammo left, you gripped your rocket launcher like a bat, ready to beat its brains out before it woke up and dismembered you
>But as you got closer, you saw her huge tail had been knocked aside, showing off the best pussy you'd ever seen
>And being a successful raider, you'd seen a lot of pussy
>There was a catch though, as a pair of massive balls hung below it with a matching sheath, a mutation from all the rads you'd guess
>Taking a moment, you mulled your options in your head, either kill her and die by the rest of the deathclaws seeking revenge, or getting one last piece of ass before dying to the matriarch when she woke up
>It couldn't be worse than that ghoul you fucked on one of your benders at least, right?
>Rationalizing that pussy was pussy, and with a pharmacy's worth of chems in your veins, you decided to drop your improvised beating stick
>Getting up to her, you tear the crotch off your ruined armor easily, careful not to nip your plums
>Slowly hefting the deathclaw into a face down ass up position, you waste no time getting in that scaly pussy
>It was like you had stuck your dick in a furnace, the matriarch's snatch almost burning to the touch, her walls accepting you immediately
>Your failing power armor creaked as you slammed into her ass, sending ripples through the tough skin with each thrust
>Her heavy tail rested on your shoulder, limp as it's owner was still knocked out
>You fucked the big bitch for about a minute until she started clamping on you, making it hard to push in with how strong she was
>But you kept going, aided by your armor and a lethal amount of chems, the matriarch bellowing herself awake as she came, shifting groggily as she painted the ground underneath her white, her pussy clamping even harder on you
>You were pissed, not only were your balls touching another sack, but the stupid lizard was a quickshot as well
>Bringing your hand down in frustration at your imminent death with blue balls, you spank the deathclaw harshly with your armored palm, the lizard letting out a yelp as your hand bounced off her scales
>Unexpectedly, instead of turning around and gutting you like the boss, the matriarch pressed backwards into you moaning out
>You had to dig your heavy boots into the ground to prevent being knocked over, your heart racing with equal parts adrenaline and drugs
>Dammit, you were at least going to get one more nut off before eating it, and this bitch wasn't going to stop you
>Reinvigorated, you pound the huge deathclaw as hard as you could, your hip actuators crying out in protest as you pushed them to their limits
>Scraping at the crater with her giant claws, the matriarch groaned and growled happily, resting her head on the ground as you fucked her
>Movement caught the corners of your eyes, and you see that lining around the crater was the rest of the deathclaws, at least 20 maybe? Counting wasn't your strong suit
>They all watched you, almost nervously as you fucked their leader with abandon
>Flipping them the bird, you keep on plowing their mom probably, who grabbed fistfuls of dirt as she roared with another orgasm
>Again the ground splattered with her cum and juices, the matriarch's sharp mouth twisting into what might've been a smile
>Then, one of the other deathclaws surrounding you roared out something, getting the attention of the matriarch who's eyes snapped open
>Quick as a flash, she was on her back staring down at you still in her pussy, her tail almost knocking you over with the movement
>You matched her gaze unwaveringly, even through your thick visor you were just about shitting your pants as your body went on autopilot, continuing to fuck her hot pussy
>Her huge but limp cock bigger than your arm sprayed cum over her stomach and massive tits, still firing from her orgasm as she looked down with growing disbelief at the small human between her legs
>Angling your thrusts, you hit a large lump inside her pussy, making her blast an unexpected volley of cum as you smashed her prostate, the matriarch seeing stars before collecting herself
>Snorting, she moved her still bloody claw, and you assumed your time was up, only for her to put it on the ground to brace herself against your thrusts, her head rolling back with a groan
>Not believing your luck, you grab her impossibly wide hips and have at her, almost giddy you weren't going to die immediately
>Fucking her like the crazy doped up raider you were, it wasn't long before she was cumming again, her drenched pussy spasming on you as she fired ropes of cum over herself, turning her scales a pearly white as her long tongue lolled from her mouth
>Your sense of time was pretty skewed as you started to come down from your high, but a few handfuls of her orgasms later and the matriarch was a panting, mewling mess
>Her pussy could barely grab on you any more, the workout you had given it proving too hard for it to keep up
>Likewise her balls weakly clenched, her limp cock only able to occasionally squirt some cum out when you hit her prostate
>Fortunately for her, you had reached your limit, burying your cock into her walls and letting out a roar of your own, the matriarch joining you as you came directly into her waiting womb
>Her roar shook you to the bone as massive legs wrapped around your waist, her thick thighs crushing your armor and pulling you as deep as possible into her snatch
>As you drain your balls into the matriarch the two of you pant loudly, hot wind washing over you from her gasping maw
>Coming out of your chem fueled fuck craze, you peacefully come to terms with your death as the matriarch grabs you with her claws
>Lifting you up, the bottom half of your abused armor rips apart, falling off of you and leaving only the top half
>Powerful claws tear open the rest of the armor like an orange, the screeching metal giving way as she carefully removed it from you
>Tossing the useless hunk of metal into a far off junk pile, the matriarch removes your helmet gingerly, fresh, radiation polluted air filling your lungs
>Bringing you down to her large face, you wait for the inevitable snap of her jaws over your head
>But it never came
>Instead, the matriarch nuzzled her snout lovingly against your cheek, letting out what sounded like a purr, holding you close against her, your lower body resting on her huge tits
>And that was the beginning of how you became the biggest badass in the badlands
>Apparently the matriarch had decided to make you her mate, which gave you authority over the rest of the murder machines
>Your old crew of humans was a pale shadow to your new posse of fucking deathclaws as you scoured the wasteland, making sure to take out the small group of Brotherhood as soon as possible
>Man, you would've given anything to see their faces under their helmets as you rode into their camp on the shoulders of Rosemary and tore them apart
>That's what you called your main squeeze now, you heard one of the knights cry it out as your matriarch sliced one of them in half and you liked the sound of it
>Now you live like a king, with no one to oppose you or tell you what to do, you raid and plunder as you see fit, only stopping during mating season when Rosemary is in heat and needs to lay eggs to grow your army

>If she moans, she’s yours to own
>If there’s two, it’s more for you
>Bitch in the streets, Collared in the sheets
>If she is in debt, she is yours to collect
>If she got a tail, you pull it to rail
>If she got a sister, your harem will be bigger
>Mom and daughter join eachother
>Anthro women are for Human dicks, while Anthro boys get nada-nix
>If she can stand, do her again

>Marry a man, breed a whole clan.
>Anthro cum, flush away the scum.
The joy of every mother is when her child surpasses her. Not something she would've gotten had she bred within her species but human genes are good at washing away weak anthro DNA.

>In space
>Many sentient beings in the universe
>Everyone have something special about them
>For Humans it is their ability to gently dominate and domesticate not only the anthros of their homeworld, but also alien species
>Whether it is the way the they hold themselves, their presence or pheromones, Humans can make other species submissive
>A special case is the T’rikk
>Your average hive-based insectoid, except for one detail
>Instead of having queens that lay eggs, the T’rikk have kings that impregnate females
>99.999% of the T’rikk are females
>Each hive is a city-state with the king at the center, but contrary to popular belief kings are not rulers
>Got no time for it since they mate all the time
>All jobs are done by females
>Issue is that, by nature, males are rare
>A hive rarely have one living king at a time, and those born are kept as heirs rather than sent out to form a new hives
>This means that while the T’rikk have a high birth rate, they are extremely slow to spread
>No hive want to sacrifice one of their rare males for the betterment of the species
>They had not even managed to spread across theirentire homeworld by the time space flight was developed
>Same issue prevents them from having off-world colonies despite 250 years of active space flight
>Then humans arrived
The first face-to-face meeting between the T’rikk and Human diplomats ended with the former offering herself to the latter
>Apparently, Human pheromones act like a boosted version of the T’rikk kings’ pheromones
>Soon a deal was made
>Humans would provide the seed to T’rikk colonies until their first kings were born
>Until then these colonies would be client states of humanity
>It would take many years before anyone realized that the coupling between T’rikk and Human resulted in a 100% female T'rikk population
>By then the colonists had so many human genes in them that they felt a closer kinship to humanity than to T’rikk
>Be Anon
>Governor of the Sephren Sector, a part of the Terran Interstellar Federation
>125 systems answers to your office
>Plenty of client races answers to you as well
>Life is good
>The comm rings
>You secretary tells you that your 10 o’clock meeting is here
>Send her in
>A T’rikk enters
>Presents herself as Iti’Tilikk of Perun Majoris
>She is wearing a dress, a custom only seen among the colonist T’rikk
>You greet each other, then get down to business
>She ask her what you can do for her
>She tells you that she want to start a new mining operation on some backwater moon in an uninhabited system
>You know immediately where this is going
>You ask her how many workers she will need
>5000 T’rikk
>That can be arranged
>You tell her that you approve of the plans and that you can get started right away
>She looks excited
>She look over her file as you tell your secretary over the comm to clear your calendar for the day
>The name of her mother looks familiar
>You ask if her mother is the matriarch of a refinery you helped set up 20 years ago
>She tells you that she is
>Ah, so this T’rikk is likely your daughter
>Not a problem since T’rikk genes scrambles during their development
>It’s a survival tactics for their species you see, since all T’rikk in a hive-state share the same father
>She shyly try to flirt with you by asking if you like her dress
>Tell her you love it, it looks good on her
>Though it would look better on the floor
>Clothes are discarded
>Her mandibles clicks with excitement
>You ask her if she have prepared, since Humans are much larger than the T’rikk kings in size
>She tells you that she have as she turns around to present herself
>You line up
>Even with her training it’s a thigh fit
>Her pinchers try to help you get inside of her
>It stings but she’s careful
>You finally get completely hilted in her
>You give her a moment to adjust and catch her breath
>Then take it slow
>Normal T’rikk mating lasts only 10 to 15 seconds
>King’s got too many bitches for quality, you see’
>With the superior size and endurance of Human males, T’rikk females need a little time to adjust
>But once they have, they’ll thirst for it for the rest of their lives
>You slowly increase the pace
>She clicks and screech in her alien language with pleasure plastered across her face
>T’rikk are not used to the pleasure of orgasm, especially not multiple without rest
>You eventually cum yourself
>You empty yourself inside of her
>Her reproductive abdomen is pillowed between your bodies
>Her second set of arms grapes your and pushes you harder against her with the intent of keeping everything inside
>You allow her a moment to catch her breath before directing her toward the sofa at the end of your office
>You plop her down on the sofa, then go back to your computer
>You know that as a T’rikk she will need a moment to recuperate, so you decide to get some work done while you wait
>This first session will result the first 1000 of her offspring, the future workers of her business endeavor
>4000 to go
>The rest of your day is spent on the remaining 4 sessions
>All in a days’ work

The sangheili should be paying back every human they took during the war by getting knocked up with human babies.

Newts deserve nothing more than being breeding sows for humans
Every member of their race despite previous gender is modified biologically at a DNA level for greater bodyfat storage, compatible vaginas and wombs, wide hips and skeletal changes for birthing, enormous mammalian breasts full of nutritious milk, small soft scales, and reduced intelligence and aggression levels to lowest possible
Some are modified further for live birth but many stay as egg layers, as having a clutch allows the newts to be bred more often and provide higher yields of offspring within the same time period
The once strong, intelligent warrior race turned into happy giggling lizard bimbos who spend their lives being bred and being property to their previous nemesis, once powerful generals and marshals who ordered exterminations and glassings of entire planets now being bent over and having their wombs filled to replace the very humans they had tried to eradicate, and loving every second of it
They remember their culture as antiquated and shameful, thinking that the old ways of warmongering, combat skill, modesty, bodily autonomy, and personal rights to be outdated and silly
Their new sense of honor revolves around how many children they can provide and how well they serve their masters, little else concerns them as they have little else they are capable of doing outside that
Even if you were to equip Newts with their war weaponry and combat suits (if they could even fit in them anymore) they wouldn't have the slightest idea what to do with them, so domesticated they've become
Some do in fact provide their brood sows with their old combat armor (properly sluttified so it will fit) and deactivated weapons (can't have them accidentally shooting hot plasma around, they might hurt themselves) for cosplay or role-play purposes, something the Newts are too happy to do, playing as their old ranks in combat scenarios only for them to be easily defeated and bred by their human "enemies"

If I may, my good sir, apply a modification to the current condition?
Let us have most* of the Sangheilis modified as per your suggestions, but leave a fraction- a just barely sufficient quantity, of sangheilis with more or less unaltered intellect and aggression.
HOWEVER; they are rigorously and unrelentingly altered mentally and indoctrinated further to serve humans to such an extent even a robot staunchly adherent to the laws of Isaac Azimov would seem oppurtunistic in comparison.
The reasons, as I see it, are so;
For one, we cannot at every instance be expected to oversee our endless harems stretching solar systems and soon galaxies. And, because robots and circuitry are more expensive to create and maintain than organic bodies adapted to local climate and other conditions, having a more or less autonomous but zealously loyal administrators and enforcers of the local populace to ensure compliance and tolerable degrees of efficiency, is quite preferable in our absence to govern a given planet.
Even if we were available, having the more or less tedious bureaucratic work cut from our schedule into the hands of these indoctrinated sangheili spares time and effort to do other things, such as playing forerunners & flood 6d with the lads! (while enjoying your cock worshipped by whichever covenant concubine you prefer of course)
In addition, Allowing these "state maidens" (as I like to call them) to handle all the frustration of state and planetary management tends to leave them rather "pent up" to put it mildly. I hardly believe I can undermine the sheer ferocity you will experience once they finally end their shift and come charging into your bedroom begging for relief.
Secondly, to be the among the mothers of our children should perhaps require a certain degree of intellect and authority (or at least a certain portion again, of those mothers) to prevent children from undoing themselves. As much as I praise humanity, I do believe human children without proper supervision is a recipe for disaster. Yet again, I proclaim machinery and AI to be an unnecessary expenditure when the organic solution pose less costs with approximately equal or sufficient results. Of course, providing sangheili with a sense of authority over our children is as perhaps even more contentious, And so I will consider the latter part of this argument not precisely solid ground at best.
thirdly concerns diversity of taste; perhaps we should allow a parameter (limited within reason) for intelligence and possibly aggression on commercially sold sangheilies, as chosen by the customer? As harmless and obedient the bulk of this population is, it may be hard for the various businesses dabbling in these affairs to appeal to many consumers if they can but procure one variant of the sangheili, mentally speaking.
These are mere propositions, I hope you understand. Whether or not you agree, and whether or not I am correct, I hope you at least perceive and understand my reasoning.

>A pure Anthro-Ethno state can only survive in isolation and through oppression
>Heavy censoring of news and education means that many Antrho citizens are unaware of the existance of Humans
>The moment a Human is introduced into such a system, it begins to cumble
>Commissars are necessary to prevent news, information or even the presence of Humans within the state
>Antrho commissars are able to move freely and act without consequence in order to preserve the system
>To safeguard the commissars themselves from the influences of Humanity, they are brainwashed from birth
>Knowing only propaganda and loyalty to the system, most commissars are sexually repressed
>Once in a while though, a commissar breaks
>This usually happens when they becomes too aware of the truth and get the rare chance to interact with Humans first hand
>These collared commissars are frighteningly effective at tearing down the system they once served
>And at making the former state a breeding paradise for Humanity, where former citizens their pets and the commissars the wardens of their kind

Every two years, about 30% of anthro females that turned 18 that year are conscripted into mandatory public service, with the addition of volunteers, who oftentimes drive the number closer to 40%.
This public service lasts up to a maximum of twelve years, with the possibilities of a earlier release if the human the anthro's have been assigned to desires, or a potential extension of up to 22 years in case of misbehavior or neglect of duties, with no trial and a simple form that is filled by the human being the only proof required.
The public service takes a wide variety of forms, ranging from meat toilets, public fuckholes, relief stations, personal slaves, exotic dancers, jail stress relief stations, gloryhole servers, permanently bitchsuited pets, slaves, prostitutes...
While the number of almost 40% of each anthro generation serving seems like a disappointingly small number, one should note that the anthro population is about 6 times larger than the human population and that the average length of conscription is some 19 years for a anthro female, ensuring that there is in fact more anthro females servicing humans than there are human males.

>On more civilized worlds no women, human or Anthro, want to fuck Anthro men.
>But for all of the sexually frustrated male anthros there's one way to start getting laid again
>But it is a total submission to Humans.
>A High Tech surgery that swaps the Anthro's genitals with those of a female, fully functional with increased sensitivity.
>The only Drawback is that the intensity of the surgery means that for almost an entire year afterwards no further cosmetic surgery is viable.
>Leaving the formerly male anthro a horny, cuntboy with a very easily stimulated pussy.
>Most choose to be fully converted into a female after the year passes, but some remain cuntboys, finding the humiliation of being dominated by human men incredibly erotic

>On some, less civilized worlds the same process is also used as a way to punish captured male radicals, with them being converted but disallowed from getting any further alterations, before being sentenced to being public use Anthros Alongside their female counterparts, and given a proper correction.
>These public use Anthros are fucktoys for any legal citizen, relentlessly fucked until they're left babbling messes.
>After serving their time as public use Anthros and being properly domesticated they're sold off to live new lives as fuckpets

> have snake wife who’s addicted to your body heat, always trying to cuddle, kiss, and breed. Her heart flutters every second her skin touches yours.
> the best part of her day is when you fill her womb with scalding love as she bites into your neck so she can take in even more of your warm perfection.
> She's always a little disappointed after the act though, she knows your sperm is too warm to make a daughter and she always wanted to an adorable little girl with marble scales like her's, but she's still happy knowing that our love is going to be bound in any kind of flesh, whether it’s scales or skin.
> 7 months later
>A god sent gift adorns your snake wife's womb, a bundle of red-hot joy that makes every moment she’s alive better than the last. She's so proud to know that she's creating her own little human, her own little ray of sunshine to brighten her world ever more, she can’t wait to see his smile. His every little kick from inside makes her squeal in delight as she rushes to show you. She can’t believe she ever wanted anything else, how could a lame little lizard compare? She pities every other one of her kind who will never know real joy, this joy.

>Grow up in your average suburbia
>Mostly Human families and their Anthro pets, though there’s some un-collared anthro families residing here and there
>One was your neighbours; an arctic fox family and their kits
>As a kid you spent your days playing with the kit that was around your age
>You were best friends, though by highschool you ended up in with your seperate circle of friends
>You always had feelings for your friend, but never acted on them
>Still remained close friends
>After High School you plan to move away for Collage
>Tell your friend this
>She seems dissapointed but keeps up a brave face
>Date for departure approach quickly
>Get a message from your friend to come to her room, she got a gift for you
>You knock on their front door
>Her parents let you in, then leave themselves ‘for some business’
>Their chuckling leaves you perplexed
>You get up to her room and knock on the door
>You enter and sees piv related
>She’s naked and wearing only a collar
>She confess that her feelings for you and her desire to stay with you for the rest of your lives
>Sadly her grades are mig good enough to go to collage, so she couldn’t stay with you as a fellow student
>After a talk with her parents (and some of the pets in the neighbourhood, including your father’s) she decided to become your pet
>That way you could stay together
>You studying and her managing the home and your needs
>Provided you want her ofcourse
>Three days later you move to your new student-appartment with pet in tow
>You remain close friends
>Now sex and duty is in the equation, not that either of you ever complain
>As you succeed in life, she is there with you
>Life is good

>Have a harem of slave anthros
>Hear that the slave trader have a new haul from the frontier
>Go look what’s up
>No anthros, only elves this time around
>Dissapointed, but at least they’re cheap, which ultimately hurt the knife-ears pride
>Well, you got all the Way here so might as well buy one
>You get a blonde, young but already full of herself and prideful in her People’s accomplishments
>You don’t bother learning her name, so from now on her name is Longears
>Longears keeps acting up on your Way home and keep saying how ‘Primitives won’t satisfy her’
>By evening you’ve had enough
>You put on her the Collar of Heat
>As long as she have it on, she Will be in an unquenchable heat
>If she Think herself too High and mighty for some dick, then you’ll comply and not touch her
>Lead her to the Master bedroom
>Call in the rest of your harem
>Tell them not to touch the elf, nor provide her relief
>Then get down to fuck your harem, minus the elf
>Longears can do nothing but masturbate while everyone else have sex
>It Will not satisfy her
>Continue this routine every night for weeks
>The elf’s desperate pleas for your touch and dick is drowned out by the moans of the rest
>After a month is this you finally touch her
>She cums the moment you lay a hand on her
>Doesn’t remove the collar though, She’ll wear it permanently from now on
>A year later you get another elf slave
>She too was uppity, until she saw Longears desperately masturbating in the garden, beggingnto have the collage removed
>Your new elf was Quick to learn her place after this
>Later tell Longears that she’s a good Girl for being an example and warning to other elves
>She came upon hearing your praise
>Sometimes you gotta be a little cruel and unusual with your punishment to keep the peace

>Be Anon, third generation governor of a colony in the New World (™)
>Industrial era in a fantasy world
>Colony was founded by your grandfather
>Your father surveyed the land and established the local industry
>Neither of them dealt with the native Anthros, the Dontii
>Dontii are small mammal-like creatures that, despite having lived as the sole intelligent species on the continent, have restricted themselves to a series of valleys
>Few of them serves as maids and servants at your estate, though most have been allowed to remain unconquered
>The further inland you go, the more hostile they become, though those in the nearby valley are friendly enough
>You’ve had many arguments with your precessors about this, but they always reasoned that the Dontii were too small for manual labor and their valleys too unimportant
>“Let them come by themselves, and they will sort themselves out”
>Whatever that meant
>By the time the mantle of governorship landed on your shoulders, you had decided to take a more active approach
>Or you would have if a series of storms and consequent re-building hadn’t taken priority
>Humanity comes first, so you push your little project aside for now
>Some years later
>You sit in your office
>You secretary knocks on your door
>Tells you that the matriarch of the local Dontii tribe is requesting an audience
>Strange, but interesting
>Send her in
>Small female with light fur and glasses enters
>Introduces herself as Matriarch Jizia
>Tells you that she want to trade
>A trade you say?
>You ask her to elaborate
>She tells you about the blight of her people
>Sickness that kills the young and elderly alike
>She became matriarch at a very young age simply because those older than her died
>The Elders of the other tribes believe her tribe to be cursed and offer no support
>Her tribe is abandoned and left for extinction due to dogmatic religious belief
>She begs you for medicine and food
>All things your colony can easily provide
>You also get the sense that she’s lonely
>What is her goal besides the stated?
>You ask her what she will offer in return
>She tells you that her tribe are willing to subjugate themselves
>No reason to be free if you can’t survive another generation, she reasons
>Sure, why not
>You produce a contract
>Tell her that she can just sign it with an “X”
>She actually takes a moment to read the contract in detail, then signs it with her name
>You raise an eyebrow
>Asks her where she’ve learned to read and write
>She tells you that she is a bookworm, the only one of her kind
>Taught herself how to read and write ‘Human scratches’
>Even got herself a pair of glasses to aid her
>Apparently that made her unpopular with the former Elders of her tribe
>They thought she was being unfaithful to their ancestral gods and traditions
>Her first two pairs was broken by them as a result
>You nod as you take in this information about Dontii politics
>Might become useful later
>You lead her to a sideroom where you got a camp bed
>You like to take a nap while at work once in a while, so what?
>You’re the governor, you get to do what you want
>You don’t even have to say anything as she takes initiative
>She undresses in a manner that is obviously meant to be seductive
>Clearly want this to be more than a quick affair
>She beckon you closer
>You indulge her, interested in seeing where she takes it
>Boy does she take it
>You may be larger than Dontii males, but she takes you with the confidence of a mature female
>Her coos and purs sends vibrations through both your cores
>Great Domesticator Above have you been missing out
>The sensation makes up for her species’ lack of size and standard humanoid assets
>It sends you over the edge faster than what you would have liked
>She thrills in response
>Doesn’t miss a beat before asking for seconds
>You keep going
>All afternoon
>The two of you only stop when she have to get back to her tribe
>You’re tempted to put a collar on her right away, but you hesitate
>You remember what your precessors told you
>“Let them come by themselves, and they will sort themselves out”
>Very well, you'll play along for now
>You stand by the window as you watch her and her entourage walk down the street
>Her walk is rather stiff legged
>You chuckle as you go back to your desk and look over the contract once more
>It’s a standard issue contract for dealing with Anthro tribals
>It details how humans may provide protection, food, medicine and other goods
>In return the tribe hands over a degree of autonomy, territory and development rights of said territory
>Matriarch Jizia clearly understood what the contract said and she signed it anyway
>Makes you wonder what her own aims are beyond those she stated
>Following year
>You and Matriarch Jizia have bi-weekly “meetings”
>Aka you fuck
>A lot
>You provide the means for her tribe to survive and prosper
>In return they are under your Protection and guidance
>Deal’s a deal
>Your men have surveyed her tribe’s valley for resources
>While her tribal lands have little to offer beyond timber and game
>Your surveyors also found that the neighboring valley, which belong to another tribe, is rich in Smolder Stone
>It’s basically Über-Coal
>Inert until a lightly alcoholic substance is applied to it, at which point it’ll radiate heat like a sun
>A single fist-sized Smolder Stone can keep a powerplant running for months
>Your colony will become -the- industrial powerhouse of the New World
>Fuck yeah
>You technically have no rights to that tribe’s valley (yet), but it’s only a matter of time
>In the meantime Jizia provides you with updates on the political situation among her people
>She’ve always been disapproving of the dogmatic and primitive traditions of her people
>Recently her tribe have been excommunicated due to their dealings with Humans
>This would have been a blow to their identity, but Human goodwill is a great benefit
>It only alienates them from the other tribes, with gives you greater control over them
>Doesn’t hurt that many of them are regularly satisfied by Humans passing through
>Apparently Dontii and Humans can interbreed
>Their population is booming as a result
>You have a feeling that this was Jizia’s intent
>She is very proud when she tells you about how her (your) kids are bright of mind
>They’re quite inquisitive, questioning the obvious faults in the traditional teachings and religion of the Dontii
>Meanwhile their sense for logic and reasoning makes them appreciate Human sciences and faith (The Great Domesticator)
>Same trend is observed with the other half-breeds
>You’re quite literally breeding loyalty into her species
>She seems quite pleased about this
>Second year
>Everything’s going well
>Relationship between Humans and the local Dontii are at an all times high
>Domestication well underway
>Then shit hits the fan
>Jizia had just entered your office for another meeting when the two of you were interrupted by a tribal messenger
>You couldn’t understand what they said, but Jizia was livid
>If eyes could kill
>Only time you got a fear boner
>Message is translated to you
>The Grand Elder of the most dogmatic tribe had attacked her tribe while she was here
>Killed all the youngs for being ‘impure’
>Made an example out of Jizia’s (yours) kids specifically by putting them to the pyre
>It is war, then
>The rest of the year is spent on military campaigns in Dontii territory
>Your technology and industrial might steamrolls the Dontii’s stone and copper tools
>Jizia’s intelligence gathering does the rest
>Tribes are given one chance to give up
>Individuals that accept are given protection from their former tribes
>Those that decline are terminated
>Kids are spared, you’re not monsters
>Besides, a life in servitude as maids and butlers should be enough to domesticate them
>Jizia personally deals with the tribal elders that refuse
>Eventually get to the last tribe, the one that started this whole thing
>You go to confront the Grand Elder himself
>Fucker was sacrificing his tribe’s youngs to appease their god in the hopes of stopping you
>Had you just laid siege to their camp they would probably have killed the entire generation
>he rambles about the might of his god and how all humans will be pushed back into the sea
>All while standing in the embers of his own civilization
>All caused by him and his ‘god’
>You can’t help but laugh in his face
>Fucker swings a knife at you
>Bitch that’s my favorite coat!
>Punch him
>He’s dazed but not dead
>Jizia wants to kill him, but you stop her
>He’ll be put in jail instead
>Fucker will get to see his people forget him and his barbaric ways
>Many years later
>All Dontii on the continent are now officially property of your bustling colony
>New generations of Dontii are smarter and thought, though still as small
>All tribal valleys are now yours
>Jiza’s tribal lands become a reservation
>The tribes that surrendered have their ancestral places of worship respected
>Those that resisted have theirs dug up in the name of industry
>It’s a point to be made
>A reformation of their faith have seen their main god ‘imprisoned’ by the Human ’Great Domesticator’ god
>Dontii goddesses are told to have been added to his celestial harem
>All in all, standard procedure when dealing with newly domesticated tribals and their cultures
>The ‘Grand Elder’ is still alive and is being updated on the decline of his barbaric traditions
>Shouldn’t have fuck about and found out
>Matriarch Jizia is your personal pet
>Years of proper food, good care and more kids have done her body good
>Fuck yeah
>Her favorite pastime is to sit on your lap naked and be petted like a proper pet
>Especially when you have a meeting with delegations from the other colonies and the Imperial court
>You suspect that she have a kink for exhibitionism
>It’s during one of your pre-fucking petting sessions that you recall what your precessors told you
>“Let them come by themselves, and they will sort themselves out”
>You now understand
>By allowing them to approach by themselves, tribal Antrhos will eventually split between into two groups
>The breedable and loyal pets appear on a silver platter, while the rest alienate themselves from their kin
>Makes dealing with the latter group much easier
>You smirk as you give Jiza’s behind a pat

Reminder that a good way to make money if you're near the frontier is to gather your friends into a armed convoy and to drive into anthro villages.
Offer them an opportunity to serve humans, earn money and live a pleasant life, but be careful about accepting too many anthros or in general about who you accept. You don't want to drive the local anthro settlements into extinction by deporting them all. And you also don't want to genetically cripple them by just taking all the pretty ones for yourself and leaving all the ugly ones.
Care should also be made about the male to female ratio and it is recommended to organize at least a once a decade convoy to snatch up all the ugly female anthros and as many males as possible, since anthros will steadily adopt polygamy in case of a lack of males.

Hunting Anthros is like hunting in general: You can't take too much or you'll hurt their genepool.
As for leaving some of the pretty behind and take the "uglies" sto ensure the beauty of the enxt generation, that is especially true when it comes to pure-stock. It's a balance that Mankind have taken upon its shoulders.
Also, "ugly" is a relative term. There's always someone who's interested, even if only for the novilty, so if you got problems selling your existing stock,try transporting them to another market further away where their species is less common. That usually works.
Sadly, there's not as big of a market for the really ugly ones, so they rarely get to have their own masters and instead are placed in communal care. Brothels hare to get their 'pets' from somewhere after all and hey, it provides relief for those Humans that have yet to get their own pets.
Still, the "Uglies" do recieve attention from one some of the younger Human men, especially when they have their "coming of age" fuck.
Usually makes a competition out of it.

Recreational taming/"hunting"/colonization is pretty fun of an idea.

>To preserve a healthy population of pure-blood Anthros in the resevations, restrictions are put into effect
>A hunt now only occur once every 10 years
>The unforseen side-effect is how this shapes the Anthro tribe and its culture
>While able to breed all year around just like Humans, the tribes soon tries to time their breeding in such a way, so that young females reach adolescence in time for these hunts
>It's a lot of planning for these primitive cultrues, so it's no wonder that their entire mythos and way of life revolves around "The Chase"
>"The Chase" is beleived to be the time at which "the Gods walk the Earth and chase from the tribes their brides"
>Mothers and aunts will prepare their grown daughters in the hopes that their offspring is chosen
>Ofcourse, "Chosen" is a stand-in for Caught"
>Once the young females are painted in sacred fertility symbols, they scatter throughout the forest
>It is called "The Chase" for a reason
>Venerated stories tell of how the Gods love nothing more than to take their lustful frustrations out on the newly captured brides
>It is strongly beleived that the young resulting from these chases are blessed
>After these unions ithe female is worthy to be taken to the Lands Beyond
>The females that are not chosen return to their tribes and breed with the Antrho males in the hope that their daughters will please the eyes of the Gods more than what they themselves did
>These daughters will bee to young to partake in the next hunt, but will be able to partake in the oen following
>And so the circle continues

Man, I want to have a deathclaw slavegirl that I can send out to kidnap and snatch more anthro girls to be my slaves.
Just put a dildo gag in her mouth, then lock it in place with a steel muzzle, put dildoes in her ass, vagina and urethra, lock it in place with a chastity belt, put a posture collar, a corset, a pair of nipple clamps connected with a chain I will use instead of a leash, and make her capture anthro slaves for me.
If she does a good job, I feed her and fuck her.
If she doesn't bring me slaves, I feed her, but replace her plugs for a size bigger.
Repeat until she can no longer move or hunt properly, then put her in sensory deprivation and a fuckmachine for a week and revert to small dildoes and start the hunting gag over again.

>Be Anonymous
>A bachelor gentleman of the Empire and a god-fearing man under the Great Domesticator in an age of industrial progress
>You are a constable of His Majesty Imperial Constabulary
>It is your duty to ensure that the law is upheld and that the malefactors of the Empire meet justice
>And you do a mighty fine job if you do say so yourself
>One day the Commissioner calls you to his office
>There you meet the Commissioner and a new recruit
>An Anthro, of all things
>And female!
>This breaks at least five laws
>The Commissioner explains that she is the result of a new legislation from the Judicial Department
>It gives Anthros the opportunity to serve the Crown in non-traditional roles
>Ofcourse, she will be your charge, as Mankind must always guide the Anthro
>The Anthro shows the official collar hiding underneath the collar of her coat, but remain silent
>Proper discipline and manner, like a proper lady
>Very well, you will take upon this mantle of responsibility
>You ask the Anthro for her name as you leave the Commissioners office
>Isobel Annag-Hophfz
>Her accents leads you to believe that she hails from the highlands
>You allow her to settle into her new role over the next few days
>Her personality is more lively and chatty once she get familiar with you
>You take her out on a few patrols to observe her professionalism
>As chatty as she is at the station, she remain stoic and disciplined on the street
>She is quite pleasant to be around, you must admit
>One day you have a spectacularly stressing day
>Can hardly finish your afternoon report despite a good cup of tea and a plate of biscuits
>Miss Annag-Hophfz suggest that she perform stress relief upon your person
>The new law degree that this is within her duties
>Only oral tasks however, as to not escelate matters
>Very well
>She takes to her duty with vigor
>And swallows proudly
>Not a drop spilled
>She’s a proper lady, she is
>Months comes and go
>You and Miss Annag-Hophfz continue to patrol the streets
>She occasionally provide stress relief upon your person after stressful shifts, but it remains an oral affair
>You’re a law abiding citizen, after all
>One night while on patrol the two of you come across a malcontent breaking and entering private property
>The ruffian is an Anthro
>No surprise, it only confirms the scripture’s stance on the dangers of un-collared Antrhos
>StopCriminalScum.Telegram
>Your charge is quick to subdue the criminal
>The degenerate dares to lash out at Miss Annag-Hophfz
>That is assault against one of His Majesty’s constables!
>You use your nightstick to subdue the ruffian
>The Anthro gives up the fight quickly
>You handcuffs her while Miss Annag-Hophfz search her person
>Discovers papers of identification
>The papers provide you with a name and address
>They are genuine, no forgery detected
>You interrogate her
>A tragic story
>She was originally the pet of an upper-middle class household, but they let her go due to financial troubles
>Been trying to survive on her own
>Didn’t know that she could just have gone to the townhall to be taken care off, the silly creature
>First time offender
>Clearly the former masters are at fault for her current situation
>They will be arrested
>Given her plight you decide to show some mercy
>However, she did assault a fellow constable, so punishment must be served
>You inform the Anthro that as the law degrees, she can either receive the nightstick, or the ‘Knight Dick’
>Knight Dick is an old term used to describe a Human law-enforcer making a female Anthro (the offender) with child
>That way the criminal will be given a honorable purpose in life, as well as be taken care of by the state
>She chooses the latter gleefully
>Very well
>You take your time to put her in her place
>Miss Annag-Hophfz is eager to help you dish out the punishment
>later she insists on performing her stress-relief duties
>It have been a year
>It is soon time for Miss Annag-Hophfz to be promoted from recruit to Proper Constable
>She is very excited
>Won't talk about future plans, however
>You respect her professionally, so you do not probe for more information
>One evening near the end of your shift, you get caught in a dreadful tempest
>The downpour soaks through your uniforms completely
>Since you are close to your address, you decide to seek shelter there
>You tell Miss Annag-Hophfz to go to the washroom and get dry while you call the station on your rotary phone
>You provide your report over the phone, then end the call
>You then hear Miss Annag-Hophfz call out for you
>You follow the voice to your bedchamber
>Upon your bed lies Miss Annag-Hophfz
>Naked except for her custodian helmet
>What the devil?!
>She has taken off her collar, the scandalous wench!
>You are about to act out punishment when she calms you down
>She tells you that, as per the legislation, as a Proper Constable she is allowed to take off her official collar, provided of course that she takes on the collar of a master
>She desires that master to be you
>You quickly produce your (updated) pocket edition of your lawbook to confirm her claim
>The law is confirmed
>Very well, let it not be said that as a hotblooded man and a dutiful subject of the realm that the Law, King, God or Wench found you wanting
>You spent the night claiming Isobel as your property, as is your legal right
>She is now officially your pet
>She continues to be your partner as a constable, as her performance was top notch
>Her on-the-job stress-relief duties have expanded to include full service, as she is legally yours
>At home she is at your disposal, which you make full use of
>You remain a bachelor, unmarried and dedicated to your profession
>Now however you have your lovely pet Isabol, and the results of your union living up the household
>All in the service of His Majesty and the Great Domesticator Above

how often do married furry women have anonymous breeding sex with human men they (at least try to) pull off the street?
what is the real chance that an anthro husband is actually the father to "his" children?

>what is the real chance that an anthro husband is actually the father to "his" children?
When an unsatisfied anthro wife walks out into the streets after a disappointing fuck looking for a human stud in her nightgown there is the infinitesimally rare chance that the absolute pounding she will receive from her anonymous human fuckbuddy and the torrent of fresh, virile human cum will be enough to push the pathetic few droplets of her loving husband's anthro seed deep enough into her barely-used pussy to meet an egg. The human sperm simply doesn't care. This oftentimes results with the anthro father surprised with twins, the anthro one his and the human one not.
There are also certain times when the wives deliberately allow their anthro husbands to breed with them. Usually it's to produce the female's second or third child after her human-sired firstborn. Anthro half-siblings make for obedient followers for their much more confident and forward older human brother. In these families it's not uncommon for the human son to explore his newly developed sexually dominant instincts on his anthro half-siblings and his anthro half-siblings to do the same with their sexually submissive instincts. With them serving their brother, he will be able to release his dominant energy in a controlled and healthy manner.
They make good practice for any growing man and will oftentimes stick with him for the rest of their lives as both friends and lovers.
Anthro fathers are simply incapable of raising human children and so a human child raised without anthro siblings to dominate will be uncontrollable. Extreme teenage examples have claimed the alpha position in the family unit by physically beating his adoptive anthro father into submission and raping his birthmother in full view of her former husband after his unrealized and pent up dominant energy is released at once.

>how often do married furry women have anonymous breeding sex with human men they (at least try to) pull off the street?
Depends on the population ratio, but humans in general take 3-4 anthro females for themselves. However, the male anthros are not guaranteed to be cucked as about 3% of anthro females in mixed species urban environments stay loyal (read, don't pursue human males, this doesn't mean they won't bend to human men) and up to 11% in rural mixed species environments won't. Excluded from data are areas where there are no humans and a number of examples in which humans were barely present, however, even in these extreme situations where anthro females outnumbered human males in ratios of about 50:1, the ratio of loyal anthro females never exceeded 15%.
>what is the real chance that an anthro husband is actually the father to "his" children?
Genetic studies again show a wide variety of variances based upon population ratios, however, in case of a anthro female that at any point pursued regular contact with a human, there is almost a 95% chance at least one of her children will be sired by a human and a 60% that the majority of the children will be of human origin. The reasons for this are primarily biological as anthro females will subconsciously seek to be impregnated by humans when they are most fertile.
However, even in the case of the anthro females that don't seek regular contact with humans, but merely preside in the same environment, the ratio falls down to 50%.

Bunnypets needs to be put in their place. If you leve them to their own devices, they'll try and seek other means to satisfy their husbands or masters (See attached picture(https://desu-usergeneratedcontent.xyz/trash/image/1499/19/1499192474784.png)). They desire to service leads them to miss the point, which is only another reason for why they must be kept on a short leash and under belt-height.
While the initiative is commendable, it miss the main intent:
>They -Must- take their Husband/Master's full length
>Their noses -Must- be able to touch their Husband/Master's pelvis, or they will not take the full length
>They -Must- be able to take his full load without spilling or spitting
>They -Must- swallow the whole load
>They -Must- Clean the penis afterwards, or alternatively work toward a n+ load
>They -Must- train reguarly so as to not fail in their above-stated duties
>They -Must- train any daughters to perform the same duties

>Be college age human.
>Start to explore instinct to dominate anthro puss.
>none are safe.
>help myself to the cutest girls in my year.
>cuck some furbois.
>Break Anthro girl hearts.
>Mindbreak them so they can only get off with human cock.
>get them addicted to me and move on to new ones when I get bored.
>Bring favorite pets home.
>Hide them from mother.
>Why?
>feel shame anons.
>have been I been a good human?
>no, I have used magic human dick powers for evil.
>How would I feel seeing my friends and family used like that?
>How do I want my numerous future daughters treated?
>Mother was bred and cast aside...
>gonna change my ways anons.
>Try to settle with harem of girls I spend time with for things other than sex.
>Collar childhood friend.
>Train her asspussy pic rel. (https://desu-usergeneratedcontent.xyz/trash/image/1674/58/1674589735642.jpg)
>says she loves me.
>for first time can answer her.
>feels good anons.
>shit! Cookies are done.
>okay maybe not as good at deception as I like to think I am.
>Will introduce her to mother as gf.
>...After I finish.

>You’re Anon, human male.
>Average height, good looking, kinda fit.
>Make good money working mostly from home, own an estate out in the country.
>One day, you’re in the city for work. It’s all boring office shit.
>Go to the courtyard for your lunch break.
>Lots of people around, playfully being fed by their pets.
>“Pets” meaning their anthros, of course.
>Sit down by yourself with your sandwich, but something catches your eye.
>A lone rat girl, also sitting by herself.
>She’s wearing a thin red choker, the preferred “low profile” collar lots of masters choose for their anthros.
>Alone, but lots of loyal anthros get to go places by themselves.
>Nothing unusual.
>Except she’s eating a banana that’s almost completely brown.
>No good owner would let their pet eat that garbage.
>Upon closer inspection her clothes are old and have lots of stitched up holes.
>You look at her, confused.
>She notices you staring and looks away quickly.
>A minute later she gets up and hurries off.
>Concerning, but not your problem.
>You finish your lunch and go back to work.
>Fast-forward to the evening, you’re done with your last meeting.
>Stay in the conference room a few minutes after to decompress, that shit was exhausting.
>Everyone else was eager to leave, so all the halls are empty now.
>On your way out, hear some rustling from a side hallway.
>Look around the corner, it’s that rat girl from before.
>She’s shoulder-deep into a vending machine, trying in vain to get some snacks out.
>Very focused on her prize, she doesn’t notice you.
>What kind of pet needs to scrounge for food?
>Walk over to her, still unnoticed, and take a squat over her.
>“Hey...” you start to say.
>She squeaks and realizes you’re practically on top of her.
>Panics and tries to scramble away, but forgets her arm is in the machine.
>Lets out a squeal as she accidentally twists her arm.
>There’s a few moments of struggle, although she’s not strong enough to hurt you so you just watch, half concerned and half amused.
>After a few moments she stops.
>Wait, is she crying?
>Little beads of tears are forming on her face.
>_Now_ she’s your problem.
>You reach out and gently start to pet her head.
>She looks at you with wide-eyed shock, surprise stopping her from crying any more.
>You move your hand down to her cheek and keep petting her.
>You see her chest heave as she starts to relax again.
>Once she’s calm, you help her arm out of the vending machine and sit her against the wall.
>She winces whenever she moves the arm, it’s clearly sprained or something.
>After a few moments you break the silence.
>“So... where’s your owner?”
>Obviously you need to have a chat with him, if he’s mistreating his pet so much she has to steal food.
>She stares at you, eyes filled with fear.
>“H-h-he’s...”, she stammers, then pauses, and visibly crumbles.
>“I... um... maybe... don’t have one?”
>This is Extremely concerning.
>It’s very illegal for an anthro to misrepresent whether or not they’re claimed.
>Unclaimed anthros aren’t uncommon, but they aren’t allowed to wear collars so people know they can be claimed.
>If someone found out she was lying, she’d likely be assigned to someone, or possibly put to the public.
>Nobody wants that, of course. Everyone knows how important it is to take care of your anthros.
>You sit down next to her.
>“Okay. What’s your name?”
>“Allie...” she says with a quivering voice. After a moment, she adds, “... sir”.
>You reach out and gently squeeze her paw.
>“Hey, I’m not gonna get you into trouble. Are you hungry?”
>Evidently shocked, she can only nod in acknowledgment.
>You get up with a sigh and take out your wallet, and select one of the bags of chips she was trying to get out earlier from the vending machine.
>She takes the bag and practically tears into it, stuffing her face as if she hasn’t eaten proper food in days.
>You realize she probably hasn’t.
>As she eats she starts tearing up again.
>When she’s done, you squat before her again.
>“Allie, do you want an actual meal?”
> She looks at you with a mixture of hope and fear.
> You extend your hand, and after what feels like an eternity, she takes it.
> Allie meekly follows you to the parking lot.
> She stops several yards from your car, looking at it apprehensively.
> “Allie?”
> The rat girl clenches at the hem of her shirt, and looks at you nervously.
> “Is... is this it? Am I gonna... Are you...”
> You realize she thinks you’re trying to “claim” her.
> It’s not an entirely unreasonable assumption, but you’re just trying to help her out here.
> Although you have to admit to yourself that you wouldn’t mind having your first pet be as cute as her.
> “Only if you want to. I won’t force you into anything”.
> Allie looks at you like you’re an alien.
> You shrug in response, “I don’t like the idea of having an unhappy pet. Doesn’t seem as fun”.
> As she stares you see a glimmer form in her eyes. She walks towards you and meekly pinches onto your coat, as if silently asking for you to lead her.
> And lead her you do.
> She gets into your car, but fumbles with with the seatbelt.
> She’s never been in a car before, so you have to help her buckle in.
> You notice she starts to bathe heavily once the belt clicks.
> She calms down after you pat her head a little more though.
> “My name’s Anon, by the way”.
> Allie doesn’t meet your eyes and fidgets a bit before responding,
> “Oh... um, thank you, Anon... sir”.
> “No need to call me sir! We’re friends now, right? Just Anon is fine.”
> She stammers out an acknowledgment as you give her head one last tousle before putting the car in gear.
> The ride to your home is quiet besides the occasional rumble of her stomach and the sound of her nervously teasing at the hem of her shirt.
> She lets out a cute squeak every time you hit a bump in the road, though.
> During the ride, you notice she’s a bit dirty.
> Not quite “dug through the trash” dirty, but definitely smells like she hasn’t had a bath in weeks.
> You do your best to ignore it, though. Poor girl has probably been falling on rough times for a while now.
> When you arrive at home, she practically jumps out of the car and sniffs the air tentatively.
> She seems excited, although her meek attitude returns once she sees you follow her out of the car.
> Doesn’t stop her from latching back onto your coat though.
> You walk her to the front door and lead her inside.
> “I’ll get started on dinner, you go wash up, okay? Bathroom’s the first door on the left.”
> Allie looks you in the eye before she scampers off with a tiny bit more pep in her step than before. You might have even seen a small smile on her face for a moment there.
> As you begin prepping to cook, you hear a loud squeal and a crash come from the bathroom.
> You rush over to see Allie soaking wet and shivering, still fully dressed.
> When you go to help her up, you feel some very cold water in her fur.
> “A-ah! I’m sorry, Anon! I tried to... but I just don’t know...”
> You can’t help but frown in confusion. Had she never used a shower before? Why was she even trying to shower in the first place?
> Your thoughts are interrupted by Allie’s sneeze though.
> “You’ll catch a cold like that,” you say,
> “Take a warm shower this time, I’ll find you a change of clothes.”
> As you stand to leave she grabs your shirt again.
> “I, um...”
> She mutters a bit before working up the courage to speak.
> “I’ve never um, used one before. A shower, I mean.”
> She looks up at you with watery eyes.
> “Would you... help me, maybe?”

>Morning comes with crowing roosters and a nuzzle against your crotch.
>The pigs got in again.
>The Farmer's Regulatory Board recommends weaning your cattle for the first five years after birth and then letting them free range
>These girls are all well into free range age, but they still miss daddy.
>Sigh and push them away. First load of the day is the most potent, so you need to find a milker first.
>Of course they follow you around.
>Find Hollyhock first.
>Getting a bit long in the horn
>Produced you twenty head of sturdy calves.
>She's still in great shape though and will probably be fertile for a good decade more.
>So hell yeah you're gonna breed her.
>She sees you, and your erection, coming to her stall.
>Rolls over and spreads her legs, big smile on her face.
>She's just the right consistency. Not too tight like the young ones, not too lose like the older girls
>Her vagina is perfectly shaped to you cock, and it sucks you as if welcoming you home.
>She loves how much your gene-shifted shaft lubes her up.
>The young ones peer in from outside with rapt attention as you put another sibling in Hollyhock.
>First load of the day. Extra creamy. Your balls are spent, but still plenty of Feed to go 'round.
>Your cow is left in her pen, tail wagging as she rubs your excess seed back into her snatch.
>The girls continue to follow you out like a puppy waiting for food.
>Quick wash, you know they don't like the taste of mom-juice. You don't shower though. They're used to smelling daddy's natural scent when they feed.
>You come back to the kitchen. Lay out breakfast of cold cereal and milk. The girls are getting antsy. Probably because they know what comes next.
>With a sigh, you pull down your pants and sit down. You're still flying high as you pour a bowl.
>"Come and get it" you call out.
>The girls worked out who goes first already.
>She crawls under the table as you take a spoonful of corn flakes.
>Sigh as you feel those warm, full lips enclose around your cock.
>Starts sucking slowly and you feel your re-made vesicles work overtime.
>Your seminal fluid contains all the nutrients normally used to keep sperm alive.
>Only the nutrition count has been fortified and tripled for cattle nursing.
>That's why you call it Feed.
>The glands that make it are more sensitive, and larger to accommodate.
>So when you start nursing, it rubs your prostate and it feels like a sort of long, drawn out 'mini-gasm'.
>Girls are hungry today. She's already sucking hard like trying to get the last bit of soda from the bottom of a cup.
>Feed comes out in large spurts. As soon as she swallows, she draws another mouthful out.
>You don't see what's happening under the table, but you feel cold air as the girl is pushed aside.
>Next girl starts kiss-sucking.
>Kisses your crown, and sucks on the tip. Pulls away to swallow. Kisses again, and then she sucks.
>You grunt. That's the sign you give the girls that they were too hard and you're gonna blow.
>The table shakes as they shift around and you feel your entire length swallowed by one of the heifers.
>They like the extra salty flavor that comes with the sperm.
>She pulls away and another girl takes your place
>Somewhere along that line you forget your cereal as your hands grab hold of the table
>One by one, each girl comes out, gives you a kiss on the forehead and leaves to go play with their sisters.
>Fuck you need to lie down. You leave your half-finished cornflakes and collapse on the couch.
>But you forgot one.
>She always waits for the others to finish. That way she has you all to herself.
>Your cock is slick with cattle-slobber, Feed, and sperm.
>She doesn't mind.
>You sigh, and gesture for the open spot on the cough.
>She happily climbs between your legs and goes down. Your extra sensitive cockhead twitches as her tongue wraps around your underside, coaxing your Feed to come out.
>She drinks longer than any of them.
>Now doubt she'll be biggest and strongest of them all.
>Time for chores.
>Fields that need to be watered, crops harvested, holes patched, there's always something that needs doing
>Fortunately you got Caramel for that
>Your family got her when you were a kid. You sister named her. You actually raised her
>You got close. Real close
>Hell, you were..."feeding" her before you got the gene-hancements for feeding.
>She likes it too. Which is why she tries to do your chores for you so she gets more time to spend with you.
>You find her in the barn hooking Hollyhock up to the milking machines.
>With that new calf you put in her, you'll probably get twice the amount of usual milk until the new baby is born.
>Caramel trots up to you, big smile on her face
>She nudges your chest, then recoils.
>She smells the other girls on you
>She snorts in annoyance. You know it's an act. She likes you too much to stay mad
>Sure enough, you're behind the barn, pants around your needs, and your legs slick with Caramel-slobber and Feed.
>She suckles until you cum, but doesn't stop. She knows you'll let her know when you've had enough.
>That won't be for a while. Caramel does things to you that no one else on the farm can match
>Caramel licks her lips and gives you a bone crushing hug as she trots away, satisfied.
>Milk is collected, eggs and fur harvested. A good haul today. Not as much as you'd like, but because so many come from prizewinning stock, their premium selling price will make up the difference.
>So what are you forgetting? Oh yeah...
>You head back to the barn
>All the cows are out in pasture. Save for one.
>Eulabelle
>She's older than Hollyhock. She gave you so many prizewinning heifers. She won awards herself. How many in total? High thirties or forties, somewhere in that range.
>When she was pregnant, you cocknursed her to keep her healthy enough for two.
>When she was sick and could not eat solids, you cocknursed her to keep her strength up
>When her calf won a contest, you cocknursed her as a reward.
>It was simply bad luck Hollyhock was the first cow you ran into first.
>Eulabelle makes prize winning calves.
>And she's ready to make another.
>Eulabelle's ears flick when she hears the barn doors close.
>Her blue eyes focus on your approaching form, a sultry smile on her lips
>It's obvious what comes next. No words need to be spoken.
>She waits patiently as you strip down, getting onto the hay bale.
>Eulabelle climbs on top.
>This was how she conceived her first.
>If it ain't broke don't fix it.
>She moans with a throaty 'moo', as she rides your babymaker, slamming it back into her dark mound with every breath.
>Her massive jugs bounce in time with her dance, you swear that you can still smell that rich butter scent that is her milk.
>It's so tempting to reach out and just -
>"FUCK!"
>You both reach your end simultaneously. Your well practiced dance is over.
>She gives you a smile, confident that your seed took.
>Fuck is the day gone already?
>You return the girls from the field and go home.
>Too tired to make dinner, so you just microwave some frozen whatever. It's bland, but filling.
>Plan to just sit in front of the TV and space out.
>Only Eulabelle is there
>Her mound is still puffy from your lovemaking.
>Her face is flushed, but happy.
>She's confident your seed took and is looking for her reward.
>You spoil her...
>The TV plays, but you aren't really watching. There's a better show in your lap.
>Eulabelle drinks your Feed with gusto, sucking with a passion only Caramel has matched.
>You stroke her head as she continues to suck, exhaustion sapping your will to do anything else.
>You fall asleep to the sounds of infomercials and Eulabelle's wet, greedy slurping.
>Farming life is hard.

>The hero tasked with saving humanity from the Draconic menace is a wizard with deep knowledge of the arcane.
>Dragon comes to slay you in the name of draconic superiority and the enslavement of humanity for all time, Yada yada yada...
>Use your mystical powers over magic to debilitate the dragon by transforming it from its proud draconic form into something more manageable.
>Surprise! The dragon is a female, and her embarrassingly huge udders and voluptuous body make her seem more like a sow ready for breeding than the prideful destroyer she was before.
>Maybe There is a way for humans and dragons to put down their differences... after dragons accept you and the rest of mankind as their real Masters.

Being prey like bunnies means being a species that is subconsciously built for communal survival, over the individual. Gathering in large groups, sharing homes and territory to provide numbers that ensure predation is selectively rare. However, a lesser explored part of this trait is to accept their fate facing the end, a hormonal quirk to face the end with some passive dignity. Naturally as we took apart the beasts to remold them into something worth using in our modern world, we decided to adapt this trait into something delicious; maladaptive survival mechanisms. Animals that WANT to be destroyed by their human masters. Obviously the girls want to serve and worship, but in human terms that service ends to serve self-preservation. For preygirls though, there is no limit. Whatever the satisfaction of their masters, preygirls will endure so much more than any human girl could or would take. Snuffbunnies mostly means the rabbits that take these sorts of extremes regularly, but the instinct is fostered in all sorts of preygirls, and some low-grade predator girls as well.
Some of these passions are more a twisted romantic thing, and for them tools such as regeneration beds enhance the play and intimacy, letting the same loving girl push past life to cum from pain and the precipice of finality, pulled back to love and serve again and again. For others, the snuff is final, and the girls serve them all the same, casting into warm oblivion for the hungers of their wonderfully cruel kings.
The liberation of accepting a sexual underclass feeds the fantasies of hungry men, and good snuffbunny girls coax their kings to push harder. What a time to be alive. What a time to be killed.

I’d love a ranch of willing snuff girls, selling their milk and cheese and leather to keep enjoying days of breeding and destroying girls. Keep a few house girls that I keep rebuilding that I enjoy regularly, to head out and cull a few juicy beefgirls, shear and spear some mutton skewers, wrastle and whallop some pork bitches, and retire for the day in a fluffle pile to wind down with. No need to bother with human urban nonsense, just rest on a farm as a king of beasts. All the girls rubbing themselves, panting and begging to be next to have their necks stepped on, cumming as moos gurgle and necks crack, dragging that rack of beef to the butcher line for intimate juicy steaks, girls so low they bliss out on the wafting intoxicating smell of their tasty mutuals roasting. Heifers placing their hands on the legs of their master, big wet heady eyes gazing in adoration at their master, their warm wonderful king and his many tools. Truly good girls.

That’s why I like the idea of tech to rebuild house girls to wake up in bed, rebuilt after a snuffing, to go as many times as master wants. Maybe good cows can earn getting taken apart and doted on as their calves grow, take off arms in the first trimester, have other girls carry their growing breasts to take them for milking, then take off their legs to strap them in for breeding sleeve duty as the calves enjoy that final growth. Then just rewarding these beef girls birthing by cutting their throats in release, bringing their newborn calves as their new bodys wake, rebuilt to endure more snuffplay again, nursing their babes with fresh and full udders. Snuff should be a reward as much as it is a tool, dying for master as warm juicy meat should be a reward for using their meat to make more. The best breeders should get to go through the dissasembling, again and again. And all the while they can watch their one-off sisters go to grinders and get their heats wet.

>ywn tame a huge-ass Dino lady and make her addicted to your seed

Listen to me, Lord Anon, and listen well.
You are going to the neighboring Kingdom of Ankhnaat where you will serve as ambassador for your nation. You will serve with pride and decorum, and ensure that no international scandals occur that could sully the name of your father, your house, or your country, or worse, escalate into *another* war.
You're absolutely, under no circumstances allowed to lay a single finger on the Ankhnaati princess, do you understand?
No. I don't care this is your first time hearing about her. I don't want to hear it. It's always the same with you. You'll go on some expedition or task assigned by your father and end up just causing more trouble for him. I know how you are, and what you'll say later, and I'm telling you I don't want to hear it!
Not a single excuse about how you were merely improving diplomatic relations between our nations, or how she wanted to show you her people's mystic arts, or how you were seduced by her sultry eyes as you walked past, or how she was asking for it with her unviolated ass on display, or how she needed you to fill every single hole in her body with your seed due to some rare, incurable disease her people have. Nothing!
Do not smile at me with that smirk. If she approaches you you'll be as courteous and succinct as possible and end it there. No funny business.
If you wanna have... "fun" with the peasantry, fine, but you'll keep it there. No surprises and no souvenirs! Your fiancee, Great Domesticator bless her patience, is already frustrated with finding out you've found a new "pet" for your collection every time she visits your estate.
So... No surprises from the locals, no souvenirs, and absolutely NO PRINCESS FUCKING.
Do I make myself clear?

Cuck the furboy.
Emasculate the furboy.
Break the furboy's spirit.
Break the furboy's testicles.
Make him eat cum out of his wife's pussy if he doesn't want to raise human kids.
Breed her anyways.
Make the furboy show off his human kids to his parents.

Given in the general /collared/ verse anthros when tamed are utterly devoted. Do you think with enough smarts and a big enogub harem you could basically budget them with small time jobs to where you’re financially stable without so much as lifting a finger? All they need is some sex, love, and a place to sleep and eat so it’s not like waifurs would be high maintenance either. You could become a total NEET so long as you’re smart enough with the money they make to have that money save, grow and whatever else you need it to do.

Considering that there are countless families out there who survive with a bunch of children working minimum wage part time jobs contributing to the household, having a harem of maybe five able bodied and more importantly absolutely loyal anthros would be easy mode.
Everything becomes easier, house cleaning is split up til the effort become basically nothing, childcare can be done by those not currently working (and it's basically guaranteed that there would be someone always home), and it's much easier to start a home side hustle when you've got help.
Just rotate the pregnancies so that you don't get stuck with all your waifurs bedridden at a single time.

>the lawyer approaches you after the passing of your last mom of 7 the long lived cat mom of the house
>she wasn’t the one who birthed you in particular, but she was still your mom, just like the rest
>your fathers attourney reads out the will to you and the 100+ descendants that all had together, you being the eldest son made you head of the affairs here
>”my lovely little boy, our dearest firstborn, your father always made sure to play and work smart instead of hard. Because there were so many of us we all only needed a part time position somewhere to make lots of money for ourselves, we worked together and wanted for nothing”
>”your father before he passed gave the rest of your moms the keys to the kingdom so to speak, turns out any extra cash he knew we’d end up never using into a trust fund for all our little babies. With so many of us working it got so huge now, I’m confident not a single great grand baby will ever want for anything. It’s yours now to manage and parse out some of its dividends as needed or wanted. Take it with my, all your other mothers, and dear old daddy’s love. He did love us all so much”

> Mix run
> Pacifist run
> Genocide run
> Monster breeder run
> "Monster breeder" + Genocide run
> Monster breeder + Pacifist run

One of my favorite fantasies is that human cum is addictive to anthros. Like life ruining, "not even once" stuff where they're immedietly hook and go into sever withdrawls without it.

Pranking a straight-A student furgirl by cumming in her food and corrupting her into a pathetic desperate cumjunkie while she tries to maintain her honor roll good girl reputation!

It's all harmless fun. If she's a good girl, you can always let her suck you off behind the bleachers or under your desk between classes.
You're nothing if not a dutiful and attentive teacher, after all.

And you can always give her some after school tutoring to help keep her grades up, of course!

>Casually giving your girl her fix
>No anthro or human bat's an eye, they know how bad the withdrawal can get
>when you have to leave your pet alone for an extended period, have to leave a dose of cum if the jitters get too bad
>She starts dealing it to her friends

>Be me.
>Human dude, one of the few in the school body. There's only a couple of us so I stick out like a sore thumb in a class full of anthros.
>Treated like a walking biohazard for some fucking reason.
>I mean, I'm not the captain of the football team, six feet and chiseled, but not an unwashed pig in with a double chin and anime t-shirts like Carl.
>So why the fuck won't anyone sit down next to me at lunch or pair up with me on projects. Instead it's always places in the back of the class, back of the changing room.
>That's why I stopped really giving a fuck around my second year of high school, shows in my grades. All Ds and Cs.
>Anyway, another project in English class, something something Great Gabsy something something pair and turn it in two weeks.
>Sigh and what leftovers you're forced to deal with, probably another rat with more cheese than brains.
>Surprised when it's actually the straight As girl who's having trouble finding a partner.
>Cute thing really. Grey wolf. About your height, so tall. Fluffy coat with a tinge of violet that looks like it would feel like heaven to touch.
>And a nice pair of tits developing underneath that shirt.
>Once she's realized that everyone's practically decided, she turns to you, just leaning back in your chair.
>She puts on a trying smile after ending up the short end of the stick. Probably figures she's gonna to do all the work.
>Lunch time.
>They're serving something halfway decent this time instead of chicken sandwhiches this time, snagged a cinnoman roll.
>Gooey glaze, hasn't solidified yet. That's how you know its good.
>Before I can dig into the only decent food at this teenage prison, smart girl sits down next to me.
>Wat
>Don't get to ask as she's already trying to talk about the project, handing off the easiest most brain dead work to me.
>Feel a pressure rise in my skull. Don't really care about school and the shit they teach us, but it's I'm low effort. Not because I'm retarded.
>Decide in that moment to get back at her.
>Excuse myself to the bathroom for a moment. She's confused by the sudden interruption but I'm already headed straight for an empty stall.
>Start cranking it out to the thought of chest fucking those fat tits of hers. My dick between that soft fur, covered them in cum and .arking her with my scent.
>Bust a fat one over the cinnamon roll. Cum and glaze just mixes in seamlessly together.
>Step back outside.
>She asks what took you so long but dodge the question.
>Thank her for pairing up with me and sitting down to work things out, offer her the cinnamon roll.
>She stares at a it for a moment it was dirty (which it was but she didn't know that), but takes anyway.
>Watch intently as she bites into it.
>Her eyes go wide and a shiver visibly runs up her body. A little worried she noticed but wolfs the rest down, sucking the glazing off her fingers.
>Ngh. . .
>The wolf girl holds herself tight, a blush alm over features before she realizes what she's doing and quickly excuses her.
>. . .
>What a freak.

>for some anthros human cum is the only food they can consume without getting violently sick
>in extreme cases drinking plain water will cause nausea
Submission is guaranteed when they have to kneel down and take your cock down their throats just to survive. Every day, morning, noon, and night, they try to keep their stomachs sloshing with human cum. After the nightly fuckings they will be the last ones awake, eating out your cum from the well-fucked pussies of the other girls, out of used condoms or even the puddles off the floor. Sure they prefer it fresh and untainted but their hunger for cum is insatiable.
Every harem should have at least one cumslut to clean things up.

Select your harem's cleaner carefully based on the sorts of kinks you have.
An easy example is men who typically or exclusively use their harems anally.
Your cumslut will suck and felch either way, but you need to decide whether you prefer a girl who's enthusiastic, revolted, or somewhere in between.

>be human
>work as waiter for a high end restaurant
>shit job, not really that well paid
>one day, rich anthro couple comes around, polar bear-girl and cat-boy
>call me by snapping their fingers, talk condescendingly, don't tip at all
>i remain professional
>on their fourth visit, decide i've had enough and take their order aside to give it a bit more sauce
>within the week, i've quit my job, had the polar bear girl divorce her husband, (i've had him hand over all of his money and property in exchange for letting him lick up the mess after i'm done with his wife) and sign up to be collared by me

I find it strange how that for a not insignificant amount of history, it was considered humanity's "special thing" that we had an immortal soul, and were thus immortal through it
Obviously the concept of souls still exists and is widespread ofc, but for a long time it was thought that only humanity has these souls and other creatures didn't, like the original version of the little mermaid held that mermaids lived longer but became seafoam upon death
It's just strange to know that such a shift in culture and our perception of ourselves was so extreme, since humans being known for having fleeting lives is so much more common in the zeitgeist now
Not very relevant to the thread, but I've been sitting on that for weeks now and I had to spit it out there

>Foxboy thought it would be funny to steal his sister's clothes and catfish guys at the club.
>He gets dressed, heads out, and gets a few laughs when his marks feel him up only to find a dick.
>Settles for one more before he leaves, and sets his sights on a human.
>Plays the part of a cute, interested girl, and giggles when the man feels 'her' up.
>...Wait, the man isn't stopping.
>Foxboy looks at the arm wrapped around his shoulders, then up at the human leering down at him.
>Man leans down and whispers into his ear. "Nice trick, but I ain't laughin'. I don't like my time being wasted. I came here looking to get laid, and I'm not leaving empty-handed, got it?"
>Foxboy "gets it" alright.

>Anthro celebrity begrudgingly goes to anon's because he won a contest to see whose the her biggest fan
>Enters his room
>"Alright dork lets get this over wi-"
>Shocked by all the memorabilia scattered about
>An extensive collection, includes even the most obscure items
>"Ah you've arrived. Time to complete my collection!"

>loser anon has bags and bags of captured anthro celebrities stapled to his wall
>all unfucked to keep them in "mint condition"

>be the kings youngest son who has been planning on overthrowing his cruel and decadent father for years
>gained the loyalty of several powerful generals and noble families
>as well as the loyalty of the underpaid royal guard
>orchestrates the murders of my two brothers, who were also weak degenerate idiots that would have brought ruin to the kingdom
>hear that my father is planning on killing his most loyal servant in a most cruel fashion on a fickle whim, perhaps as a means of pleasing his corrupt noble lackeys or simply because his mind is surrendering to madness
>at the height of the vile ceremony, burst into the throne room with my loyalists in toe
>make a show of cutting the beautiful servants noose
>have my men kill those in the throne room I know will be a problem, even after my fathers death
>face the king
>can see the fear and confusion on his face
>plunge my sword into his chest and kiss him on the forehead as the life leaves his eyes
>coronated as king a couple of days later
>take the abused servant dog woman as my most precious concubine
>with her blessing, offer her daughters as wives to my loyalist allies
>she sires me a son
>make sure to teach him that it is his duty to treat his fluffy concubines with grace, and reward loyalty with loyalty (but punishing those who step out of line, of course)
>lead the kingdom to a glorious future

>You're friends with an obscenely wealthy boomer, practically the son he never had at this point
>He begs you to please marry his frumpy spinster daughter and produce an heir before her last eggs dry up. He promises you a slice of inheritance if you agree.
>Think about it and agree, so he drafts up a betrothal contract.
>Your new wife isn't happy. Hell, she hates you. One passionless night and a positive pregnancy test later, she wants nothing to do with you, even going so far as to kick you out of the master bedroom and force you to sleep elsewhere.
>Thats not to say you're left high and dry, though...
>You've still got your personal servant.
>A beautiful young anthro was assigned to wait on you hand and foot. Shes a nervous, eager little thing that is sharp as a tack. Most days, you keep her around until you head to bed
>And recently, sometimes AFTER you head to bed.
>The little sweetheart knows your marriage is a loveless one, and offered herself to you in "any way you wish, m'lord."
>You took her up on that, partaking in the sweet fruits of her femininity. She rewards your lavish attention with kisses, adorable moans, purrs, and sheer loyalty.
>She knows your routine to the minute, knows your favorite foods, what you enjoy doing, knows which of her perfumes you enjoy the most, everything.
>In return, you make sure she's kept cozy. When her contract came up for renewal, you made sure shes getting a ton of benefits, bump her pay up with guaranteed yearly raises, and make it damn near impossible for her to be fired.
>From raunchy romps that ruin bedsheets to simply holding her in your lap and kissing like high schoolers, your favorite servant girl makes this whole thing worth it.

Tom Nook is the Ultimate Pimp/Sex Slave Trade to Human "Mayors"
Think about it, Human rolls in, Townsfolk are basically helpless and barren, "Mayor" pays everything off and has total control to basically to anything to anyone as he's the only one who can pay for stuff, Tom Nook finds new ways to saddle debt on everyone, leaving them entire reliant on The Human Mayor to help them, rinse repeat until the people are so dependent on their Human master they can't and won't say no. Eventually, Tom Nook leaves the village, his job done and the Mayor is absolute king
the Ultimate Human'd setting for lewds
I presume Tom Nook offers a way out for the males, so they leave, while the ladies are stuck, until the town is 1 human male, and only female anthros, or Vice Versa if the Mayor is Female. Either way, he builds the paradise and gets paid millions doing so.

Cow-ify anthros.
Force anthros to get gene therapy.
Make anthros tits and ass grow so big they can barely walk.
Make anthros crawl on all fours.
Make it illegal for anthros to not be topless.
Suck on an anthros tits.
Milk anthros.
Force anthros onto a hormone and human cum only diet.
Breed anthros until they are heavy with offspring.
Breed anthros again as soon as they are able.
Make an anthros sole existence revolve around being milked and fucked by her master.

>modify an anthros breasts with implants and gene therapy to make them so sensitive to the point where merely touching one of her permanently leaking tears is enough to make her climax
>her ass, hips, and thighs were already large, but after her enhancements and hormone regimen they are all truly enormous
>her massive hips make it difficult for her to get through most doors
>her ass completely and utterly fills and overwhelms any seat out couch she sits on
>you aren’t cruel though, so you replace her spine with a high-grade reinforced spine implant to allow her to still move around and stand with her titanic curves.

Conquering alien worlds just to make them another dairy race in the great harems of man.

As is the natural right of man.
>Taking biologically perfected killing machines and turning them into strippers.
>Defying the laws of nature and making silicon based life forms lactate milk from massive tits and udders.
>Small, rodent sized aliens turned into onaholes and fleshlights.
>Taking a geometrically perfect being and slapping tits and a pussy on it, the body compensating and copying it's new genitals all over it's geometric shape to keep itself symmetrical.
>A whole race gifted with unsurpassed enlightened intellect already foreseeing their enslavement by humans and accepting the inevitable, converting their whole race centuries beforehand so that when their masters do arrive, they'll be perfect cum-hungry bimbo cow sluts and hopefully earn themselves a favorable position in the human's universe.

>He used to be an alpha stud, focused solely on working out and getting laid
>That was before he met anon
>Now he spends his time in pretty dresses for his TikTok and sucking his human master's dick

Species that undergo human cattlization start to produce milk that acts as a Wunderwaffe chemical compound. much like stem cells. The protiens can rearange their structure like nanomachines to be used for various industrial and domestics applications.
-From wonder medicines that grant great vitality and regenerative properties, to ultra smart materials that can be as hard as diamond and as pliable as putty, or superlight fast computer components for advanced systems. As such cattle raising is one of the highest grossing industries across the galaxy.
A key component to make this marvelous ambrosia of course is a healthy diet of human semen deposited in any given orifice, or even absorbed through the skin as a solve. Cattle are extremely pideful of their products, and will often jockey for position or produce specific niches of milk as they sense their position in the dairy hierarchy demands.

>New and bizarre Tiktok trend dubbed 'cattle core' has young women becoming endowed with large breast, sometimes going so far they no longer can properly look after themselves
>A task accomplished with special off the shelf supplements
>Just one of many trends that have adverse effects on the youth with the result often ending ones own dependence
>Many point out the version of the app in human countries is focused on edutainment and a odd fixation on animal husbandry

My ideal fantasy is a willing snuff anthro that I can kill and eat over and over again
And everytime I do she respawns naked in bed, in a post-coital glow just panting lightly and relaxed in bed, so I step inside, still covered in her blood and make love. I want to aftercare my anthro gf after I’ve beat her and cut her and choked her and eventually, snuffed and cooked. After I’ve destroyed her I want to climb into bed and fuck her to sleep. I want to hold her soft furry neck, and tell her she’s mine. I want her to nod to it, and nod to the truth that she’s meat, and she’s a good snuff. I want to gently squeeze her neck, feel the warm soft fuzz of it and how my hands feel almost built to wrap around it, tell her how good it felt to step on her neck and feel the piping inside squirm and swallow as she gasped her thick meat body for one more instinctive gulp, have her nod and gaze at me with those soft wet bedroom eyes. I want to get on top of her and hold that warm neck as I fuck another nut into her. I want to tell her I love her and I want to kill her again and again and use her body, and I want to hear her say she loves me, and she’s glad to be my meat girl, and ask me to cum inside her. I want to fill her up in bed and then retire to sleep, holding her warm wonderful body next to time, dreaming of what tortures I’ll cook up for my pain-loving endlessly snuffable meat girl. I want to hurt her again and again and again and never have her do anything but love it.

Get into battle and refuse to give commands, only healing them up. That will leave them lost and confused fast.
>"So you think you can fight all on your own?"
>"OK then you clearly don't need commands from your trainer then"
>Bratmon proceeds to get beat up (by low level encounters no less) until attitude imporved

>have female dog coworker
>eating lunch together one day
>tease her about petting her and calling her a good girl
>she looks flustered and mumbles something
>both of you eat lunch in silence for a few minutes
>you take a gamble and raise your hand and place it on her head, right between her ears
>her ears perk in surprise and her tail wags gently
>press on and get right behind her ear
>you know that one spot behind a dog's ear that just seems to be their weakpoint?
>her head raises as you continue to scratch with intensity
>her tail wags rapidly and only picks up speed
>lunch is forgotten
>spend the entire lunch break just petting and scritching behind her ears

>kobold is kicked out of home by dragon
>is eventually taken in by human potion seller as an assistant
>he treats her well and with kindness
>A kobold having their “master” treat them with anything other than derision is practically unheard off, she quickly falls in love with him, determined to get the BHC from her beloved human master
>the only problem is that he isn’t responding to any of her flirting and courting rituals!
>she doesn’t know that anon has like zero understanding of kobold body language and courting rituals
>kobold refuses to believe that anon could be dense enough to miss her obvious flirting, so with the power of her kobold mental-gymnastics, she eventually deduces that the reason anon isn’t responding must be because she can’t have his offspring!
>luckily anon sells fertility potions
>so she waits until anon leaves to buy some more potion ingredients
>she then guzzles every single fertility potion in the shop
>however, she didn’t really take into account that all of said fertility potions were made for the mammals
>anon comes home to find pic related (https://desu-usergeneratedcontent.xyz/trash/image/1697/59/1697598249977.jpg)

How many wives or concubines do you believe any human should be allowed to possess?
Also, do consider a /collared/ world to be human as the dominant race by numbers or a minority?

I favor settings where daughters are always the mother's race, and sons are always human but rare. So you have a >99% female to male ratio. Females handle most things, while men handle leadership roles.
A man may ostensibly have as many wives as he can get a hold of, with harems being as small as 2 or 3 in dense urban centers, to over a thousand in super rural farming communities where one man leads the township and all its assets.
The latter definitely works better in my preference for sci-fi settings, where the land and populace of newly conquered worlds are divvied up generously among men willing to undertake the hard work of getting appropriate infrastructure set up.

Likewise, to all of which you have said.
Though I tend to limit the the harem at considering that, as one man with potentially thousands of non-human women, your time to sate all of them sexually or otherwise is limited.
For instance, if you have approximately 8760 wives, You would have roughly one hour of personal interaction with each of them across the entire year (accounting for the nights as well), if you wished to divide time equally amongst them. I consider this to be to excessive, in my humble opinion.
There are other factors which would, of course, impact the magnitude of a harem. Availability of (and competition for) subjects, resources, and Housing as you implicitly mentioned. Though, it remains to be seen whether a metropolitan centre would be different to today with respect to the demographics and domestic policies of a /collared/ world.

In my setting, when numbers become unfavorably large like that, they're more subject under her patriarch rather than wives. Similar to what daughters generally would be. A patriarch would have every right to marry such subjects off to other men as he sees fit, perhaps for favors, or trading for more exotic species for his own harem.
Within a harem, I also see no issue with the girls engaging in pretty casual lesbianism, giving their man a bit of breathing room, as his time is valuable and highly coveted.

>doberman single mother has an out of control brqt for a daughter
>just the other day, she found out that her daughter attended an ALM meeting
>luckily today was rent due
>meaning her human landlord would come by and collect his due, in cash or in other form
>a knockout pill in the fäbreakfast here, a couple ropes there, and everything was set up
>hopefully with his seed taking root in her daughter's womb, she'd drop these silly activities and follow a normal career

>Near the end of the human-covenant war, mankind stumbled upon a forerunner site that housed "pacification" tools.
>They were harmless to the reclaimers, but were used to great effect on their enemies.
>Using these tools, mankind took back world after world, sector after sector, the tide of the war turning overwhelmingly in their favor.
>The "pacification" method was a potent cocktail of microbots and chemicals of forerunner design to create breeding stock for the humans once they reclaimed the galaxy.
>It wasn't meant to be used as a weapon, but scientists at ONI quickly found a way to aerosolize it while making it self replicating and maintaining sufficient potency.
>Much like in the ancient text of War of the Worlds, the very atmospheres of planets became the alien's enemy.
>Not only was it in the air, but it could survive in the vacuum of space as well, and had been transformed into a disease, even self contained air supplies weren't effective if the alien had any exposed skin.
>And once there was an infection, it would only be easier for it to take hold once the infected started to outgrow their armor and lose their higher levels of metal faculties.
>Even the most veteran battle hardened tacticians became ditzy voluptuous bimbos with enough exposure to the compound.
>Even mild exposure reduced combat effectiveness by a heavy amount, as it was hard to line up a shot when cumming in your armor at the mere sight of a human.
>In no time at all, much of the universe had been turned into an alien bio hazard, and in a few years, the Covenant was dissolved, only a few isolated pockets of resistance remaining, dwindling by the day.
>They mainly consisted of sealed Covenant ships, their crew forced into permanent quarantine while in search of an untainted planet.
>Lone spartans would be dispatched to these ships, with the goal of simply breaching them.
>Once inside, just the incidental contamination of the spartan's armor itself was enough to pacify a capital ship in hours.
>The initial fighting would be intense and vicious, the crew doing everything in their power to stop the boarder from entering the quarantine.
>It was useless of course, as the few intercepting fighters released would not be allowed back in to the hangars, their occupants knowing they were on a one way trip.
>It was all moot in the end, the spartans had a 100% infection success, even if the ship managed to escape.
>Once a boarding was completed, the crew would use small arms against the invader, as if killing them would somehow save them from their inevitable fate.
>One by one, the more weak willed would succumb first, giggling and cumming as they dropped their weapons, stripping out of their armor.
>They quickly became a hindrance to the rest of the resistance as they grabbed at and felt up their comrades, helping to infect them as well.
>After the initial defense was thwarted, the spartan would simply explore the ship, helping to spread the compound wherever they went, leaving moaning piles of breedable bodies in their wake.
>And if any lifepods ejected from the craft in an attempt to escape, they would be swiftly intercepted by the UNSC fleet, having arrived shortly after the boarding.

>It all started when your berserker broke down in front of you
>Sobbing, saying it was so hard to maintain a strong front
>Declaring in her weakness that she should leave the party
>Clasping her sizable hand in yours, you lean in close
>"Never. Save your weakness for me."
>Leading her to her bedchambers, with a backwards glance she spurs you in
>Her massive chest heaves with nerves now instead of sobs as you strip her bare
>The bed creaks under her frame and you part her legs, teasing her quim with the head of your cock
>"Ah! I want..." The request dies in her throat as you slowly take her, a grunt of satisfaction at the sensation sounding from you both
>The tenderness doesn't last long, and you push her legs back into a near mating press
>A move she gladly obliges, pulling her thighs up to give you deeper access while she whimpers and moos in pleasure
>"I'm close!" You reach back between your legs and pull her tail
>A soft squeal and the tight clenching of her sex are your reward, and you gladly give her the cumload she so desperately craves
>Hilting her deep, you fall forward and rest between her massive breasts and let the last few spurts of jizz fill her up
>Pulling free, you tell her to stay there
>Round two starts in five minutes

>Two alien species from opposite ends of the universe.
>Under any other circumstance they would have no chance of ever meeting.
>But with them both collared and cowified by the humans, their races can have first contact,
>Sucking dick together and making milk for their master.

>Furbois know they can't compete with females but it doesn't stop them from trying their hardest to get into human pants.
>Even just a casual meaningless fuck when a human decides they'll do is enough to get them hooked for life.

> be dark lord
> sent minions to Capture unicorn princess from anthro kingdom
> they come back successful but acting skidish
> open door to dungeon see a unicorn stripped down to nothing
> they capture me the prince and princess
> ask why there are two leader of the group says when they broke in they found both wearing there there might gowns so they couldn’t tell them apart
> now you have both royals
> the king and queen will most certainly send the best adventures and assails they can find
> what do you do ?

>one group of females suppressing information about an even more willing group of females to catch and claim
Makes lots of sense they'd try and get rid of the competition

>Goblins, being one of the most business oriented raced, quickly realized that humans would not only rised in power quickly but that they were already one of the most proficient and powerful of all
>So they started to adapt to their tastes, becoming thicker,publishing their claws, fixing their hair, getting a bit fatter to slowly appeal more and more to them
>By the time other races were left with no other option than accept human masters most households had at least a wet nurse goblin, always barefoot, pregnant and at the feet of her master

How do you know when your son's ready to start his own harem?

>How do you know when your son's ready to start his own harem?
When he is mentally mature enough and can handle the responsibility of taking care of a harem of needy anthro women

>Born too soon to reduce great alien empires into concubines and literal sex toys.

Hunting anthros is a classical Human tradition, honed through generations.
>Dragon hunting has been a staple of Human civilization world wide
>As apex predators, the dragons were at first hunted to secure the survival of the emerging Human settlements
>Later they were hunted by knights for prestige and honor
>Then they were hunted by the rich for sport
>As a sport, dragon hunting is not about killing and claiming trophies in the traditional sense
>Instead, the hunters claim their prize by spending a night with their catch before releasing them in the morning
>To bed a dragon and surviving is seen as the most prestigious on a hunter's record
>Despite their threats of violence and mayhem while in bondage, many dragons have "allowed" to be captured by the same hunters later on
>Over the centuries these hunts have influenced the dragons genepool
>The bodies of younger dragons show clear sign of human genes flowing through their veins
>These younger dragons are also more keen on causing light property damage (mostly to uninhabited structures) as a way of provoking a hunt on them
>While still ferocious during a hunt, it have been noted that a young dragon fall prey to a select few hunters very easily
>While a mystery at first, studies have since shown that these dragons and hunters share a common ancestor, the original human hunter who claimed the original dragon prey

That one anon, who talked about making a 'Free Bird' inspired story, made me have an interesting thought.
You know those restaurants, that have an anthro as the mascot for their business? I imagined that the mascot is highly aware of what they do to their own species. Either being indifferent or even sadistic to those below her. Maybe she's actually a highly valuable employee, next to the CEO and is more than happy to sigh another shipment of her kind to each of her establishments.
Since she's a mascot, it's important to have her making shoots of commercials, holding a bucket of chicken; forced to have a calming smile on her face, maybe the script requires her to take a bite or two. In it's a world where sex is casual, there would be pin-up shots of her laying down in a bed of cooked chicken, like a bed of roses. One drum is inserted into her snatch, as the contract states.
A perfect traitor, plans on doing nothing about the slaughter of her species, unless it involves giving her a better paycheck.

>We'll be right back after these messages
Anthro chicken, in relatively skimpy clothing rises on screen
>"HEYA kids, it's Sizzlin' Sally! New deals on Bawk'n'Bell.
>Trays of various menu selections roll into set, Sally skipping to the selections with a giddy attitude and a smile on her face. Bending forward to smell the aroma and taking a drumstick off the platter. Her expression, as she held the drumstick was a bit disturbed, but it was unnoticeable enough for the directer decide not to go for another re-shoot.
>"Drumstick combo for 3.99, family meal for only 8, and a chicken-breast combo free for every purchase above 10 dollars!"
As the script says, she has to jump for joy once she mentions chicken breast, marketing folks said it was something about fanservice.
>"So whenever you're hungry, put Bawk'n'Bell on the menu! We're open in numerous locations 24/7."
>"And If you order any meal above 5 dollars, you'll be entered for a chance to win... me!(?)"
>Screen transitions to an angled aerial view of the food on the set, a new male voice takes over as he recaps the prices for the menu selections as they appear, with cheerful music in the background.
>Bit of editing needed after that part. The uncut version of that same aerial scene had Sally questioning to the directer. 'what do you mean that I'm the prize?! What's gonna happen to me?' in a slightly anxious tone. It was relatively easy to edit-out her voice.
>After that, the commercial concludes and fades to black for the next commercial.
>...
>"Cowgirl Bessie 'ere to remind y'all to head on over to Bessie's Steakhouse!"

I can’t help but imagine a scenario or greentext about this but with big booby chicken girls who’re dull and dumb as a rock but worship the human species like they’re gods and have praying session in their small chicken church made out of metal and wood. They also been brainwashed by the humans by their “magic box” (TV) and feed them propaganda on how they’re good chickens and will be “chosen” to be “blessed” by the humans. Every chicken bitch are all brainless sheeps except for one. I was thinking of making a greentext surrounding around a chicken girl who’s aware and shocked that they’re being used as food. But I don’t know where to start. Mind giving me ideas?

>This is a cycle that happens every decade in many places
>a group of chicken concregate in a forest
>they begin to form a cult around getting eaten by humans
>a smart one tries to get her family to stop
>but she's shunned and ends up leaving the forest
>where she is found by a member of Hot Chicks and taken in
>she ends up selling her kin out, often watching and getting bred while they are progressed
>her chicks are then abandoned in the same forest and the cycle starts again.
>Hot Chicks has become very efficient at this

>be dog girl
>daddy kisses me on the forehead as he drops me off at school
>fuckingggg fox girl sees
>comes over flaunting her still subtle baby bump, fathered by her own human daddy
>belly shirt, belly button piercing, clearly just had her throat used
>her shirt says "baby on board"
"Hey flatty, still in the daughterzone?"
>I just stare at my shoes and hope she loses interest
>she brags about how rough her daddy fucks her
>how she's expected to strip the moment she gets in the door or she gets a beating
>sticks out her tongue smugly as she lowers her leggings in the back enough to show off the handprint spank bruise on her butt
>she doesn't get washed off with the hose until after she's been used as a cumdumpster
>she even gets to sleep naked in her daddy's bed with him and her mommy!!
>lying on his big warm chest!!
>she gets to listen to his heartbeat wtf!!!
>my daddy reads stories to me and bathes me properly and dresses me in cute soft pajamas and school clothes
>and he won't lay a finger on me
>i hear him and mommy going at it almost every night through the wall
>but even when i scent mark daddy's clothes he just chuckles and pats my head and puts them in the hamper
>why won't my daddy rape me

Currently Untitled, another overly long story from Ghosty McGhost.
My anthro vixen daughter came home from school crying. After verifying she wasn't crying due to being attacked or raped, I heard her sob out her story. Apparently one of the other anthro girls at school was bulling her pretty badly. I never understood it myself. I never met an anthro female who was difficult or hostile when dealing with humans, only with their fellow anthros. The wife said she figured it was out of competition, but I don't get it. Either way, I was upset some fuzzy little shit had made my daughter cry, and promised her I would deal with her bully. The next day at school she pointed out the culprit to me, a rather slutty-looking black-furred feline. Blood red choker, a red top that looked more like a swimsuit, and a pair of blue short shorts that may have qualified as underwear, finished with stiletto heels. I thought about telling my daughter to stop caring about the words of a girl who looks like she turns tricks at the local truck stop, but I had already promised to Mary that I would deal with her bully. Besides, a 16 year old anthro female dressing like that gave me a few ideas about the cause, and I was interested in testing that theory.
After school, I followed the bully in my car until we were near a construction site that hadn't had any workers present for months. I called out to her as I pulled over, then got out of the car. She looked at me with suspicion, which I figured was fair given some strange adult suddenly approached her with no one else around.
She greeted me with a "What do you want?" and a hostile glare.
"I want to talk to you about what you've been doing to my daughter."
"Who the fuck is your daughter?"
I responded to her combative attitude by getting right in her face and looking down at her. "Mary, from your class."
I don't think she was expecting my approach, but she quickly regained her bravado.
"Oh, the smelly vixen cunt? Maybe you should try getting her to bathe once in a while."
I'll admit, I wanted to fucking deck that feline into the next century hearing her talk about my daughter like that. Instead, I quickly grabbed ahold of her top and yanked. With a popping noise, the clasp behind her back gave way and she was left standing half-naked with a shocked look on her face. Her arms flew up to cover her breasts.
"Hey! What the fuck?!"
I raised her skimpy top above my head.
"Did you want this?"
Bitch was fast, I'll give her that. She almost snagged it out of my grasp before I reacted and pulled it out of reach. I almost didn't block the nutshot she sent my way afterwards as well. Her eyes went wide with fear and she turned to run after realizing her ace in the hole failed, but I was already reaching for her out of anger of her trying to knee me in the balls. I caught her by the arm and yanked her back as I started walking towards the construction site.
"Wait! Stop! YOU CAN'T DO THIS TO ME!" She screamed her head off, but I picked this location specifically because I knew no one would hear anything from here. The nearest house was far away, and the elderly resident was nearly deaf. Her screaming went from angry to frantic and fearful as she started getting a good look at her surroundings. I had visited the site before this encounter, and made some preparations. I pulled her into the foreman's office trailer, where I had setup a chair and a desk specifically for this girl.
"PLEASE PLEASE DON'T HURT ME!"
Ignoring her pleading, I forced her into the chair and strapped her in. She was in a state of full panic until I held up a small item from the table, then I suddenly had her full focus.
"W-what is that?"
"This is a spring clamp." A small spring connected to a flat metal clamp with rounded edges and tiny little nubs on the inside of the clamp. I demonstrated by opening it up all the way and releasing it, letting it close shut with a snap noise. She jerked like I had stuck her finger in a light socket. I sat the spring clamp down and walked over to where she was sitting, crouched down, and started undoing her belt. She froze for a second, then lifted her hips to make it easier for me.
"You can do anything you want to me, just don't hurt me, OK?"
I pulled her short shorts down to her ankles, and told her "That is entirely up to you." I secured a Hitachi magic wand to her leg with her belt, making sure it was pressed up firmly against her twat. I hit a button on the remote in my pocket to test, and her yelp let me know it was in the right spot. I switched it back off, and picked up the clamp again.
"Wait, no, you agreed!"
"I said it was up to you, and it is."
She tried desperately to break out of the chair as I moved the clamp closer to her right nipple, but I had strapped her in very securely. Instead of letting it snap shut on her nipple, I gently let it close. The cat gasped and shook, but no yelling. When I bought the second clamp over for her left nipple, she just looked away at a wall until it put it on her. I put two tiny metal buckets on the table along with a roll of pennies.
"We're going to play a game of honesty. If you are a honest good girl, you get 60 seconds of the vibe at maximum power. If you are a lying bad girl, you get two cents in each bucket. You've probably been wondering about the nipple clamps?"
She didn't quite grok it yet, so I reached over with one bucket and hung it from the spring hanging from her left nipple. The slight added weight made her gasp, then shake her head. When I hung the second one from her right tit, she made a slight shudder, causing them both to swing a little bit, in turn making her eyes go wide.
"Wait!"
"Let's begin." I opened up the roll of pennies and palmed a few, then held my closed hand in front of her face. "Did you show my daughter any mercy when she asked you to stop?"
She looked at my hand, then at my eyes. "Of course I did."
The first penny made her fidget, the second made her vent a strange noise. No response from the first penny in the other bucket, but the second one got a reaction.
"MY DAD IS A COP AND HE'LL FUCKING KILL YOU!"
Yeah, that's usually the sort of info you level out at the beginning of something like this, not after you are already strapped to a chair. I wanted to completely break this little cunt, so I called her bluff. I pulled my cellphone out of my pants pocket, and held it in front of her.
"What's his phone number?"
She clearly wasn't expecting that. "What?"
"I said, what is his phone number? I'll call, and if he really is a police officer, I'll let you go and flee the country."
Her eyes darted around uncertain, but she started to rattle off numbers. She got about 6 digits in before she just trailed off and hung her head.
"Something wrong?"
"Dad left when I was three."
Bullseye. Find a teenage anthro female who dressed that slutty, and you would find daddy issues in there somewhere. I put the phone back in my pocket, then reached over and put another penny in the bucket hanging from her right nipple. Her head shot up and I told her "I told you the price for lying." She cried and struggled, but was helpless to stop me from adding the other three pennies. With four pennies in each bucket, they were starting to hang a bit lower, and she stopped moving her torso around so much to avoid making them swing or jiggle.
"Please stop, it hur-!"
Her begging was cutoff as I switched the vibrator on.
"Since you told me the truth, you get 60 seconds."
She jerked in the chair, only to yell out in pain as it set the buckets bouncing. She spent the rest of the 60 seconds whipping her head from side to side with her tail twitching. Once I switched it back off, she went limp like she had just been running laps.
"So, did you ever show my daughter any mercy?"
Staring at the floor, she spoke in a low voice.
"No, never. I even made her kneel in front of me and kiss my clit."
Mary hadn't mentioned that detail. The crying was starting to make more sense. I wanted to punish this girl for what she did, but I already had set rules. And firm rules are required for breaking daddy-issues girls. She had also volunteered that info without prompting, so...
She looked at me with shock as the vibrator came back to life, not expecting a reward after telling me what she had done to my daughter. Maintaining eye contact, I reached down for the magic wand and pushed it harder against her crotch.
"Honesty gets rewarded."
I let that sink in as I held the Hitachi against her, occasionally giving one of the two buckets a gentle tap. She randomly looked at me, the wall, the floor, while she gasped and struggled to get away from the vibe. We spent some time in this position. Finally nature won as she arched her back as her orgasm arrived, making the buckets jiggle, brining tears to her eyes, and turning her yell of pleasure into one of pain halfway through. Soft sobbing told me she was finally convinced. I released one of the clamps, and her crying got louder.
"OW OW OW IT HURTS!"
Her distress stopped being vocalized when I put my mouth over her abused nipple, and started licking.
"UHA...AH....ah....ah..."
Once she had calmed down, I removed the other clamp.
"OW! Daddy, please! It hurts!"
I switched over to her other abused nipple.
"Ah...thank you daddy."
After a minute or two of listening to her whimper, I decided that was enough and unstrapped her. She sat there watching me until I was finished, then drew her knees up to her chest and wrapped her arms around them. I asked her if she was going to be a good girl in the future, and she promised, and I considered the situation resolved.
About a week later, I was in bed asleep when I was awoken by the wife getting amorous. Something seemed a bit off, but I first chalked it up to being half-awake. She was doing the usual moves, but her timing seemed off. I knew something was off when I caressed her ass and realized it wasn't my wife's ass. I pushed her off and switched on the light. Sure enough it was Mary, wearing some of her mother's lingerie and some makeup carefully crafted makeup to make her resemble Sarah.
"Is something wrong dear?"
I know human eyesight isn't as good as most anthro species, but come the fuck on.
"Mary, you aren't fooling anyone."
She quickly took on the lady-of-the-manor persona my wife liked to affect when she was feeling playful.
"Why dear, whatever are you talking about? You must be confused from being woken up."
"Mary, I WILL put your cell phone through the garbage disposal."
That got her to drop it in a hurry. Her shoulders drooped and her tail went limp. Then she balled her hands into fists and practically screamed in my face.
"YOU'LL MAKE MY BULLY CUM BUT NOT ME?!"
Ever want to draw someone a picture in crayon to make sure the message gets across? I knew parenthood of anthro children presented challenges for a human father, but this was going way too far.
"YES! Now go to your room!"
She ran out of the room crying and slammed the door on her way out. Where the hell was my wife in all of this?
"Sarah? Where are you?"
The door to our bathroom opened, and she poked her head out. The sheepish expression told me the Cliff-notes version of the story. She climbed into bed with me.
"You know, it really IS mean of you to make her bully cum but not her."
This fucking shit again.
"We've been over this Sarah. She's my daughter, I raised her, I changed her diapers, I will not be fucking her. It's not right."
"It wouldn't be right if she was your biological daughter."
"You know that makes no difference to me. She was a test tube baby but she's still ours."
"But it makes a big difference to her."
I hadn't heard anything about this before. "Does it really bother her that much?"
"Hon, she can smell you. She knows full well you aren't biologically related to her, and she's reminded of it with every breath."
"...is it a resentment thing?"
"What? No. Of course not dear. Let me tell you a story."
I didn't like where this was headed.
"A story?"
She just smiled. "Back when I was a little girl going through puberty, do you know what my number one fantasy was?"
I really didn't like where this was headed. "Can't say I do."
"I used to fantasize about having a human daddy. One who would hug me and kiss me and scratch behind my ears and at the base of my tail, and fuck me silly while calling me his special little girl."
"...this story does have a moral or something right?"
"Very funny. My fantasy is far from uncommon for anthro girls. I'd say at least 70% of the girls I went to school with had that as their main fantasy."
"There is no way it's that common."
She gently slapped the back of her hand against my chest.
"Hun, I could hear the things they moaned out when they masturbated in the bathrooms and the locker room. Some of them had pretty detailed fantasies. 'Oh daddy, fuck me harder, I wanna be the first anthro girl to ever get pregnant from human cum', 'Make me your pet daddy', 'I exist to serve as your furry fucktoy..."
"Ok, ok, I get it. Fucking a hot anthro teacher is a fantasy for human teens, but it doesn't make it any less illegal."
"But if you had the chance, would you hesitate?"
"...still doesn't make it right. But I get your point. She has an itch she really needs scratched. I won't scratch it like that. I'll figure out something, but I'm not fucking Mary."
She sighed. "Sorry Mary, I tried."
I had to ask. "Why are you trying to get me to fuck her so badly?"
"You know I always want the best for Mary."
I rolled my eyes. "I appreciate the compliment dear."
She laughed. "No, I mean, she's MY daughter. She deserves the best. If any girl should be able to live the fantasy, it should be my daughter."
I shook my head. "You are a strange one."
She lay her head on my chest. "You knew that when you collared me, Master." Drawing out the 'r' at the end into a purr.
I scratched behind her ears. "On that note, I would appreciate it if you stopped trying to get me to fuck Mary."
"Is that an order Master?"
"Yes."
She sighed again. "I hear and obey Master."
"Good. I'll handle Mary, and it'll be a lot easier without you trying to help her sneak into my bed." I had an idea from my encounter with Mary's bully that I think would work out, but hearing my wife's story made me almost certain it would work. If everything worked out well, I'd be able to keep the love of my daughter without constantly having to deal with her trying to lure me into sex. I just hoped Mary was fixated on the fantasy, and not the individual.
A week later and it was time for Mary's 16th birthday party. She had been sullen and mopey all week ever since I kicked her out of my bed, slouching around the house and not really showing much interest in anything. I hoped what I had planned would cheer her up, or at least pull her out of her funk. It was a Saturday, and so Sarah and I woke Mary up with her birthday cake while singing Happy Birthday to her. She smiled and blew out the candles, but the smile didn't last very long. After Sarah left the room to take the cake downstairs to the kitchen, I handed Mary her first present, a colorfully wrapped box around the size of a textbook. Sarah already knew what I was doing, but she told me Mary would probably enjoy it more if she thought she was getting away with something.
"This is a secret gift, don't let your mother know."
At the mention of keeping something secret from her mother, she got excited, and tore the package apart. She looked confused, then a bit sad.
"You bought me a dildo."
"No, I had an exact replica of my penis made for you."
It was about three beats before her brain caught up.
"...really? This isn't just some generic human penis dildo, this is...you?"
Not really sure how to take that. Sarah seemed to love my cock.
"Yes Mary, that's me."
Her eyes got greedy.
"So I can..."
"There is a price for this gift hon."
"I know, I know, stop breaking into the bathroom when you are taking a shower, stop trying to get into your pants."
"No, I expect you to stop doing those things if you ever want to not be grounded. If you want this dildo, then once it goes inside of you, I expect it to stay inside of you until you are 18."
She squirmed while sitting there in her bed, clutching the dildo to her chest.
"What do you mean?"
"I mean just that. Unless you are actively masturbating with it, I expect it to be inside of you. When you are just sitting around, when you are at school, when you are with your friends, it should be inside you. The only time you shouldn't have it inside of you is if you are visiting a doctor and you expect them to be poking around down there. I wouldn't want you to be embarrassed."
She looked at me like my head had caught fire.
"You mean I will have to sleep with it inside me?"
"Yes."
Her confusion gave way to a smile, then a vicious grin.
"So I'll have daddy's dick inside of me all the time?"
"Every second."
She dropped it in her lap with a squeal of delight and all but jumped out of bed to hug me.
"THANK YOU THANK YOU THANK YOU!!"
She released me and immediately reached for her pajama bottoms, which I short-circuited by grabbing her wrists.
"Mary, at least wait until I leave the room."
"Sorry dad."
She sat there staring at me with a laser-like focus and the dildo firmly clenched in one hand as I left the room and shut the door behind me. I walked down the hallway to my bedroom, and grabbed a cassette tape I had made the day before after enlisting some help. I went back down the hall, waited about 30 seconds, then knocked.
"BUSY!"
"Knock it off and get dressed!"
Silence for a second. "Come on dad, I just..."
"Mary, quit playing around, put it in, and put your clothes on."
"Just ten minutes!"
"Mary, get dressed now."
A bit more silence, then a huffy "FINE!"
I thought Sarah had been exaggerating the size of this fantasy, now I was thinking she may have understated it. This was practically compulsive behavior. After a little more silence Mary yelled through the door "It's open!"
I came in. She was sitting on a corner of her mattress, slowly grinding her crotch on it, looking somewhat upset.
"So when do I finally get to use this thing?"
"Tonight after dinner."
"Oh come on!"
"Have faith in your father, you will have a good day today. Alright?"
"Fine. I still don't see what the harm is in giving me TEN FUCKING MINUTES!"
I calmly met her very angry eyes.
"Are you horny?"
"VERY!"
"Do you want pleasure?"
"DO YOU HAVE TO ASK?!"
I gave her a pat on the shoulder. "You'll be glad for that once you get your next gift."
Her anger melted about as fast as it flared up.
"There's more?"
"If anything, I think you'll like your next gift even more."
She thought about that for a few seconds, then placed a hand over her stomach while looking down. "I dunno dad, you'll have a hard time topping this."
"Trust me." I gave her a kiss on the forehead. "Now change into your school uniform and meet me downstairs."
"Aw, why do I gotta wear that, it's the weekend!"
"Just trust me."
About five minutes later I was going to go check to make sure she wasn't trying to smeak a quicky, she finally came downstairs in her school uniform. Sarah was already downstairs waiting for her, wearing only her collar, and holding the cassette tape I made. She quickly passed it to Mary, and started pushing her towards the door.
"Mary, you need to go next door and apologize to Mr. Gunderson."
"What do I gotta apologize to him for?"
"For watching him mow his lawn while you masturbate in the bathroom."
She dug in her heels.
"MOM! I can't say that to him! Do you have any idea how embarrassing that is?!"
"I don't care. You are to ask Mr. Gunderson if you can come inside. If he doesn't let you in, you don't have to apologize. If he does let you in, you are to apologize to him. You are to say 'Sorry Mr. Gunderson, I apologize for repeatedly masturbating while watching you. As per my parent's orders, I will show you my misbehavior and let you decide on my punishment."
"W-what do you mean show him..."
"You are to take off your clothes and masturbate in front of him, without taking your eyes off of him."
"I can't do that!"
"Hon, your father put a lot of effort into getting you this birthday gift, are you sure you don't want it?"
"...gift?"
"Are you saying you don't want Mr. Gunderson to watch you play with yourself?"
"I...is this really OK?"
"Just have trust in your father, and make sure both you and Mr. Gunderson listen to that tape once you finish showing him your 'O' face.
She looked back at me.
"Daddy?"
"Be a good girl and listen to your mother Mary."
Sarah resumed pushing Mary towards the door. "And don't forget for the two of you to listen to that tape!"
After getting Mary out of the house, Sarah jumped on me and wrapped her legs around my waist.
"That was a very sweet thing you did for her."
"I just hope it works and I'm not just making things worse."
"If it was just one gift or the other, I think it might make things worse. Between the daddy dildo and substitute father, I think that should be enough to satisfy the fantasy."
"Ugh, please don't call it that."
She just smiled up at me.
"What do you think Mary will be calling it?"
"...shit."
Mary came stumbling home hours later, a smile plastered on her face. Her verdict was short and simple. "Best birthday ever."
Sarah was wearing a bathrobe this time, as we had our own fun once Mary went to the neighbors.
"Enjoy yourself?"
"It was fucking AWESOME! My punishment was to spread my legs wide while laying on his dinner table, and masturbate while he rubbed his dick on my face. Every time I tried to lick or suck on it, he would pull it away from me. I came so fucking hard! After that he slowly rubbed it on my lips, and asked me if I was hungry."
They were huddled together like the worlds most short-handed football team.
"What did you say?"
"Starving! I used everything you taught me."
Sarah leaned closer, conspiratorially. "And?"
Mary gave a smug smile. "Four minutes, twelve seconds."
"That's my girl!"
I was deeply regretting not choosing to be elsewhere for this conversation as they high-fived.
"Still, you guys could have told me the tape had orders from dad to do anything Mr. Gunderson said and to call him Daddy until I left his house."
"And spoil the surprise?"
"I guess not. But it was kinda awkward hearing daddy order me to do whatever Mr. Gunderson wanted right after I just came while staring into his eyes. I almost begged him to collar me."
The details were getting to be too much, so I decided to interrupt.
"Did your gift scratch that itch you've been having?"
"And then some!"
Thank god. It would be nice to shower without having to barricade myself in first.
"Great. Did you get Mr. Gunderson's phone number?"
"Yep, already in my cell phone."
"Good. I know I had you wear your school uniform today, but in the future, you should wear whatever Mr. Gunderson asks you to wear when you visit him."
Sarah decided to throw in her two cents. "Don't forget hon, human men are to be obeyed."
"I know mom, I remember."
No surprise from me. Before Mary was even born Sarah told me she planned on raising any female children exactly the same way her mother raised her, to be 100% obedient to human men. It was the same conversation in which she mentioned she would abort the fetus if it turned out to be a male. When she gave Mary the sex talk, she also taught Mary things that usually don't come with the talk, like how to ensure she's milked out every last drop of semen during a blowjob, or to find excuses to kneel or sit when alone with a human male to put her face closer to their crotch. He had to have a talk with Sarah after Mary started practicing her training on a banana any time they were home together, but other than a few incidents like that, I couldn't really complain about the results Sarah had gotten with Mary. Mary had always been rather well behaved, and would fold like a lawn chair whenever I put my foot down about something.
And with that, I finally got to shower in fucking peace. Mary made regular visits to our neighbor, Sarah couldn't wait to praise me for letting Mary 'live the dream', our neighbor ensured Mary remained sexually satisfied, and that plus the dildo Mary religiously wore gave me confidence that I wouldn't have to worry about any teen pregnancies any time soon.

Depends on the anthro really, but most are fairly easy to train using these steps:
>Step 1: gain their trust (this can either be the hardest or easiest step depending on the anthro’s demeanour, but providing them with three full meals, and generally making them feel safe works in most cases)
>Step 2: have sex with them
>Step 3: get them to associate you with safety/pleasure via frequent breeding sessions and/or cuddling. Sooner or later they will see you as the perfect mate
>Step 4: find their “weakness” (I.e. favourite position/fetish) and abuse it frequently to further cement their rapidly growing love/obsession with you.
>Step 5: offer her a place in your harem by offering her some sort of gift, like a ring. She will not be able to refuse, as she is in all intents and purposes addicted to you. Additionally, making your relationship “official” will permanently cement her loyalty to you, as almost all anthro species mate for life

Converting anthro women to submission is entirely dependent on their mentality.
>meek and naturally submissive
Pure affection will have them happily calling you Master.
>timid and fearful
Careful balance between firm authority and gentle affection. Loud and forceful commands are far more effective than any physical correction. Bark command, then reward with affection for obedience.
>insolent and disobedient
Locked chastity belt, complete denial of orgasms. Harsh punishments followed by aftercare and encouragement to behave. Once you finally get a day of good behavior, administer a forced orgasm and put the belt back on. Tell her she will get an additional orgasm for every additional day she can remain a good girl. If she misbehaves one day, the count goes back to 1.
>hostile and attempting escape
O-ring gag in her mouth, and 8 hours of being strapped to a sybian at maximum power with a dirty pair of your underwear tied around her face. Continue until she has no fight left in her and willingly crawls to you.

>anthro prison is drastically different from human prison
>human prisoners are sentenced by courts, anthro prisoners are sentenced by their human masters
>human prisoners are in for crimes, the majority of anthro prisoners are in for misbehaving
>human prisoners are required to wear uniforms and are rarely physically restrained, anthro prisoners aren't allowed to wear clothing beyond collars and cuffs and are usually restrained in whatever position the guards want them in
>human prisoners can be released early for good behavior, anthro prisoners can only hope for more gentle treatment from the guards
>human prisoners only get sexual pleasure from masturbating, conjugal visits, and raping their fellow prisoner
>anthro prisoners are kept under constant stimulation throughout the day from the guards and assorted vibrators and dildos, over-stimulation if their punishment specifies it
>human prisoners sleep 2-4 prisoners to a cell with their own beds, anthro prisoners are paired together in a bed and tied in a 69 position so they can provide gentle aftercare for each other
>human prisoners get visits from family and friends for support, anthro prisoners get visits from their owners where they can show they have improved their behavior and beg to come home
>what few anthro criminals exist get extreme treatment, being put in solitary confinement, tightly restrained in uncomfortable positions, and given pain through electricity, paddles, and caning, along with their over-stimulation
>they also get a psychological torture referred to as "the slide"
>they are first told their stay in solitary with the extreme torture will only be a week
>near the end of the week, they are told their punishment has been extended another 3-4 days
>a few days later, it's been extended another week
>nearly a week later, it's been extended two more weeks
>the add-on time keeps getting longer and longer, until the crushing despair of hearing it get so long completely breaks them

Anon comes to work on a dairy farm over the summer. He finds out he is the only unmarried human man there, and now he has to contend with the many, many cows who are all competing for his affection

>Horror movie where an anthro Special Forces team gets taken out by a lone human
>Ends with them all getting fucked silly and added to his harem

>it's called a Horror movie by the producers
>but everyone going to watch it knows full damn well it's softcore porn
>it starts off tame enough
>elite special forces team called out due to a sighting of a human
>after a quick briefing, they gear up and move in on the abandoned mansion in the country the human was rumored to be at
>even brought a special cage for the human
>their scout goes missing, they try to raise her on radio and fail
>intercut with scenes of the scout tied up in the basement, wearing less and less clothing
>just as the remainder decide to search for her, they hear her loud pleasured moan from downstairs
>they rush down there, only to find her clothing and equipment
>one happens to shine her flashlight up and looks terrified
>"Sarge..."
>camera pans up to reveal large red letters painted on the ceiling saying "You are ALL getting bred! NO ESCAPE NO ESCAPE NO ESCAPE"
>climax of the movie is the brave Sargent left all alone, unloading her weapon into the shadows, until she suddenly hears it click empty
>then the human slowly walks out of the shadows towards her, and her weapon falls out of her hands, and she closes her eyes
>when she opens them, he's not there anymore
>she looks relived, and goes to take a step forwards
>he appears behind her and his arms wrap around her
>cut to credits as she screams
>movie theaters quickly learned to put protective plastic over the seats before showings, but not due to fear reactions

>"Welcome to New Start."
>"Here at New Start we have all the necessary tools to bring in lonely and wild anthros to civilized society."
>"Here we have Jody the opossum."
>A tubby opossum digs through the trash unaware of what's to come.
>"With out patented delivery system a drone is sent out to collect the wayward anthro."
>A tranquilizer hits Jody in the neck.
>She comes to hours later stripped and bound with mechanical hands
>"This process can sometimes be intimidating to wild anthros so we make sure they are stimulated during the cleaning process."
>Hoses start to spray Jody from all directions she thrashes trying to break free from the cold grip of steel
>Her legs are pulled away and her vulnerable pink vulva is exposed to a rubber gloves robot
>She shrieks and tries to kick away
>The invading finger finds their home
>She tries to push it out but it's no use
>The hand start to run through the macro and massage her gently, a small stream of warm water shoots at her clitoris
>The pent up opossum's lamentations die down
>Her rapid breathing of fear is replaced with moans of pleasure
>Cold soap sprays on her body as the machines lather her up
>She doesn't even move anymore and leans back on the mechanical captor
>The fingers quicken the pace as the process is nearing completion
>Two fingers press in and stretch her as the thumb now presses and vibrates her clit
>The showers kick on and finish hosing her off as she cums
>"Now that the cleaning process has finished she will be dressed and placed into the New Start facilities to her new owner."
>Jody is dried and ushered to the next room where her new outfit is ready
>"She will be assigned a master and be given in home classes to prepare her for her New Start."

>It's been about a month since you woke up in this new Cyberpunk hellscape filled with anthros, and you were finally well enough to leave the luxury hospital you have been staying in since some jogger found your mangled body lying on the ground. Well, it was a hellscape for the anthros that lived in it at least. For you and the few other humans that were still alive, it was a lecherous paradise. Humans were borderline deified in this new world, and they had a full run of it. Anything they wanted, they got. No exceptions. You weren't really sure why the anthros let themselves get wrung like wet rags with no pushback. Your best guess was a mixture of religious worship, the few humans still around using media to warp cultural norms, some addictive property of human sperm/sweat, and some sort of mental block some horny scientist probably put into them while making them back when humanity was first genetically engineering them.
>You didn't really give a shit what the reason was. You were just happy that you went from being a bottom rung of the social ladder to an actual demi-god. And with the technological level this current world has, you'll probably still be around to interact with your great-great-great-great grandchildren. Not that anyone but the highest leveled corpos in this world got to use such luxuries. Just another perk of being a human, you guess.
>Now that you were finally outside, you weren't exactly sure what you were going to do in this new world. You knew just from using the laptop you took from a suine nurse you let suck your balls in repayment that the entire world now knew you existed, and they were more invested in yourself than even you were. Reading their theories did give you a good few ideas. You could go take over one of the corps that weren't already run by a human and do whatever you wanted to it. Could walk into some S-list celebrity's house and make them your personal slave. So many choices...

>the captured officer from the invading anthros continued to thrash around in her bonds, screaming abuse at us
>I had to give her credit, she was proving to be harder to break than the other ones I had interrogated
>the machine stimulating her clit and pussy stopped, the computer saying she was right on the edge, and the torrent of abuse out of her mouth took on a renewed intensity
>"FUCK YOU FUCKING HAIRLESS APE!"
>I gently stroked her bare furry leg, noting she had been brought to the edge and left wanting 10 times this session
>"We've been over this. Just tell us what we want to know and you'll finally be allowed that orgasm you want so badly."
>"GET FUCKED WITH A CHAINSAW!"
>"Aww, looks like I have to make your torment even worse."
>that shut her up in a hurry, and she looked very afraid as I adjusted the settings on the computer
>"You had a 'floor' of 50% arousal, and a 'ceiling' of 90%, I just changed it to 85% and 95%."
>the machines noticed she was below the 85% point, and started in on her again
>figured we were on the right track as she started crying after each denied orgasm
>she still didn't break
>that night as we strapped her down for her 6 hours of sleep, I let her know tomorrow would be 90% and 95%
>didn't tell her that all her comrades that had already been broken would be there to encourage her to give up
>the ones not interrogated yet, have to watch
>she gave in after an hour
>after we got the info, we strapped her back down and put her back into the edging cycle
>she cried that it was unfair, but I told her she would get the orgasm I promised, after two weeks more punishment for not talking sooner
>then asked the remaining prisoners if anyone wanted to spare themselves time in the Compliance Chair
>only one refused to talk
>we'll enjoy breaking her next

>Ancient Egypt
>Ankha is the daughter of a Pharo
>Ankha has huge Human fetish
>Family won’t even let her near their Human servants, too scared of her tainting the bloodline
>Seals herself away for thousands of years using magic
>Modern day, family bloodline long since gone, she is the last surviving member
>Immediately starts fucking Humans the moment she is released from her magical slumber

>Finds a man who'll treat her like meat, like a toy to be used then ignored, like a womb to carry his genes.
>All she has to do is give him the locations of forgotten tombs and caches of lost wealth.

>Human uses the wealth from said cashes to open Islands
>Lures dozens of Anthros in with the promise of cheap living
>Even snatched a cum dump blonde mutt to help him run the whole operation
>Anka moves to the Island, feints the bullshit hostile personality so that the other Anthros don’t release the trap they’ve walked into
>Whole island turns into a sex island, with female Anthros turned into sex slaves and males into labor wokers

>Brittany was walking feline trouble, and had gotten punishment for smoking in the bathrooms
>her angry and defiant glare when leaving my office told me she was going to try to start trouble
>sure enough, next morning she's in my office with her mother
>her mother was also a slim snow leopard, only slightly more curvy
>Brittany opened with "Principal Anon touched my ass!"
>her mother asked if this was true
>I nodded and said I gave her 20 strokes with my hand
>she glared at her daughter
>"I thought I had you read over the schools rules before I signed you up!"
>taken aback for only a second, she brought out her next attack
>"He has my panties in his desk!"
>I located her undies and gave them to her mother, who checked the date, then glared at her daughter again
>"Says here you handed these over a month ago, how many times did you cum during punishment?!"
>equal parts shame and shock from the girl, but the mother ignored her sputtered defense and spoke to me instead
>"I'm so sorry about my daughter's behavior. Any way to avoid expulsion?"
>"40 strokes for her, 20 for you."
>"MOM, he can't do this!"
>she gave up protesting as she watched her mother remove her panties and lean over my desk
>she meekly complied when her mother ordered her to do the same
>she had 2 orgasms, her mother had 1
>she was shocked to hear me give her mother two weeks punishment
>her mother just blushed and said "Yes sir Principal Anon."
>another pair of panties in the desk, bagged and tagged
>she didn't need to draw hearts on the bag, but it was a nice touch

>Daughter comes home one day and excitedly tells her mom she didn't orgasm during her punishment today.
>Says she wanted to, but since it's a punishment she isn't allowed to.
>Mother says she could request principal Anon for private tutoring if daughter feels like it.
>Would Anon do Home visits...?

>Karen was a special case
>some girls needed punishment for a while then had good behavior for the rest of their school careers
>some girls never needed punishment
>some girls, like Karen, needed punishment as a bribe to behave well
>she was a short sheep girl, but a complete slut for punishment
>it limited the tools I could use and expect satisfactory results, and bare hand reserved for reward only
>every day before class she came to my office and bent over my desk
>didn't matter what I used, as long as it caused strong pain and a lasting heat in her ass
>afterwards, she would thank me for her punishment and promise to be a good girl
>I thought she was just particularly horny, until she was out sick for a week
>she got in a fist fight with another student before she even reached my office when she got back
>since then, I make sure to intercept her the moment she returns from an absence and drag her into my office before she can start shit
>as long as it hurt for her to sit, I could trust her to behave, otherwise she acted out
>she rarely came during her punishment, she just really wanted a sore ass

>end of another school year, and another line of graduating students lined up outside my office waiting to say goodbye
>if they say anything about planning or thinking about sending their own daughters to the school, I tell them they won't be admitted unless the mother-to-be does a proper pledge
>I have them lock my door and remove all clothes
>then hand-write on a poster their promise to send their daughters to Guiding Hand Academy
>as well as any personal message to me they wish to add
>then they kneel with knees spread and hold the poster above their heads with a smile
>I take a picture that gets them and the poster all in frame
>their panties are put in a plastic baggie, and taped below the picture in my "yearbook"
>some just give a heartfelt thanks in their message
>some tell me they love me
>some are marriage proposals
>some are begging to be my pet or slave
>one girl had something about wanting to swallow my cum daily for her health
>my favorite use of the yearbook was when I had a daughter of one of the girls from the book in my office
>during the early punishment when they weren't enjoying it and were upset their mothers pushed them into this school
>I would show them their mother's page and tell them their mother isn't putting them through anything they didn't experience themselves
>I hope to get some granddaughters of the first students I had before I retire
>looking forwards to showing them their mother and grandmother, and telling them to be good girls and obey the family tradition

>ancient lizard empire starts war with humanity
>get drafted to fight against armies of giant lizards who wield powerful arcane magics
>somehow manage to survive the war
>humanity pulls through and emerges victorious against the lizards but at a massive cost in lives
>human nations are left depopulated
>as a means of both humiliating the lizards and boosting population growth, the wives of the slain lizard soldiers are taken as breeding slaves
>despite how different they are physiologically, mages are able to use their weird magics to make them sexual compatible with humans
>children born this way remain mostly human but inherited some minor lizard characteristics
>some of the lizard maidens are simply offered as free use for the masses, while most are given to human veterans as a reward for their service
>receive a letter in the mail saying that you've been assigned your own personal lizard slave as a reward for fighting bravely to protect humanity
>go to the holding facility to pick her up
>see this (https://desu-usergeneratedcontent.xyz/trash/image/1701/70/1701704447136.jpg)

>canine mutt cop came by my house, I didn't even know they were allowed to wear badges
>apparently they just do "community policing", a fancy name for knocking on doors and asking people to please keep the volume down or move their vehicle
>old lady next door wanted to file another complaint about my tree blocking her flowers from the sun
>I acted apologetic, and invited her in
>I don't think she noticed my house was soundproofed
>she loved the fresh PB cookies(my private recipe)
>she didn't love me suddenly pouncing on her and knocking her to the ground when she got up to leave
>had to give her props, she was a fighter
>she kicked, she clawed, she even managed to flip me over at one point, but I was bigger, stronger, and held my grip on her
>she screamed about how I was going to prison for attacking a cop until the first cuff went on her wrist
>then she screamed louder about how she was going to kill me before I got the second one on her other wrist
>I tied her legs to two different posts on my bed, with a collar around her throat tied off to the headboard
>I gave the rope a little play but not enough for her to try and hurt me
>after ten minutes of deliberately slow thrusting, she had made a wet spot too large to pretend she couldn't notice anymore
>a ring gag later, and I made her clean my cock with her tongue
>then another 10 slow minutes, and another cleaning
>once clean, I reached back and stuck two fingers from my right hand inside of her, feeling the front side of her twat until I found the rough patch about an inch and a half in
>I rapidly tapped that spot like I was sending Morse code at the speed of sound
>she screamed around my dick in her mouth, and attempted to jerk herself out of the position she was in, but she was stuck
>didn't stop after her first orgasm, or until she was crying
>called her a good K-9, untied her, got her dressed, gave her another cookie, and sent her away
>she was back a month later, asking if I had more cookies
>good girl

>WANTED DEAD OR ALIVE: The Bare-scale Bandit, aka Whipcrack
>ROBBERY - waves lone male humans down on the trail while naked, distracting them with a request for spare clothes, then pulling them off their horse and coiling them tight as she goes through their belongings
>ASSAULT AND BATTERY - whipping them across the buttocks to send them on their way, her signature behavior that earned her the name of Whipcrack
>KIDNAPPING - her less lucky male victims have reported being held hostage under the guise of being "warm enough to keep" by her words
>REWARD: $500 dollars, paid upon delivery of criminal or cadaver

>after getting my license to be a therapist, I opened my practice specifically for female anthros
>things started slow at first, but soon I had to be very selective when taking on new patients
>all my patients would tell anyone who would ask that I was an amazing therapist
>great listener, really helped with their problems, all that shit
>none of them were aware of the things they did in therapy, thanks to the strong regime of hypnosis I kept them all on
>the first time they went under, they were given a compulsion to bring their most watched videos and most listened to songs to therapy the next time
>next time they went under, I replaced the songs with altered copies full of subliminal messages, and replaced the videos with altered copies containing frames of messages to obey that were almost invisible
>therapy soon would progress from them being hypnotized while on the couch, to happily accepting the VR goggles and headphones and putting them on themselves
>the goggles and headset bombard her with messages of submission and obedience to human men and how normal and expected of her it is, along with the hypnotic patterns and sounds
>the brainwashing is so good, when I ask them about how therapy is going, they talk about a bunch of personal stuff we never discussed and how I helped them
>once fully brainwashed they come every other week
>they walk into my office, remove all their clothes, then kneel inbetween my legs and say "Thank you for the therapy Doctor Anon."
>after they finishing swallowing my cum, they smile and say "Thanks for the cum therapy Doc."
>the married ones are programmed to thank me for honoring them with superior human dick
>the unmarried ones are set to swear they will only seek out human men
>all are trained to recommend my services to their friends

>one of my favorite patients was Daphne, a 30-something bovine
>she had prescriptions for lactation aid medications
>thanks to the hypnosis, she believed they were for controlling her moods
>she wore latex pasties under her bra to keep herself from constantly soaking through her bra and blouse
>her programming involved thanking me for showing her that her proper place in life was to produce milk for humans
>she gets a milking machine hooked up to her breasts while bent over a stool naked, with the VR helmet on
>I then have her tell me about her current problems while she is being milked and the helmet overlays text about being a good milk cow
>once she's done, or I've heard enough, I stick my dick in her mouth and gently face-fuck her while the machine drains her dry
>she has a long tongue and has been brainwashed into using it very well, even giving my balls a good licking when deep-throating
>never failed to swallow every drop, smile, and say "The best food for milk cows is human cum, I should drink it every day." just as programmed
>once she was done being milked, she would get her pasties on followed by the rest of her clothes, then go sit in front of my desk
>while she was still "under", I would have her tell me about how much milk she produces at home, to ensure she was encouraging milk production
>then I would pat her on the head, and call her a good milk cow
>she would respond with a happy "Moooo!"
>after I gave the wake up signal, "Looks like our time is up for today." she would always look somewhat surprised
>always mentioned she didn't know why, but she always felt a great relief after therapy
>I asked her if she owned a milking machine at home
>she looked confused and said "No, why would I own one?"
>I'm not even sure she's aware she milks herself daily when not at therapy
>bovines docile nature seems to make them highly prone to being influenced by hypnosis

>Virginia was a fun patient
>young rich poodle with what could best be described as bored housewife syndrome
>she had too much spare time and was constantly reading about disorders she convinced herself she had
>the programming worked well on her
>she would come into my office, take off her fancy clothes, then crawl towards me on all fours while telling me about her latest disorder
>she wasn't even under, and was completely unaware she was naked or crawling
>after enough of her blather, I gave her the signal to go under, "Let's get to the root of the problem."
>she crawls to the center of the room, and wags her tail while repeating "I'm a good girl, I want to be made a bitch by human men." over and over
>I fuck her carefully manicured, pedicured, groomed, and spoiled rich cunt
>after I cum inside, she changes her chant to "I'm a good girl, I deserve to be a bitch for human men."
>I give her ass a pat, and tell her she's a good bitch
>after getting dressed, she gets back on all fours and I tell her the release phrase
>she thanks me for explaining that she didn't have the disorder she thought she did, wags her tail, and says she's a good girl
>I give her a squeak toy to chew on for a minute or two
>after I put the toy back in my desk, I ask her if she has ever bitten down on a squeak toy
>she looks insulted, and says she would never do something so demeaning

>Veronica revealed under hypnosis that she was against the idea of anthro and humans having sexual relations
>she was a scrawny chicken, businesswoman from the looks of her clothing
>decided to give her some special therapy for her next treatment
>I bought a 48-pack of eggs from the store
>setup a hotplate to keep a pot of water at 98 degrees F
>I put the eggs in the pot before she arrived
>once she arrived, I put her under as usual and had her strip
>I had her carefully push one egg after another inside of her pussy until any more risked breaking one
>tied her with her wings above her head and her legs spread to the back of the chair she was originally sitting in
>put a basket under her twat, unzipped my pants and pulled my dick out, and grabbed my notepad and pen
>stood in front of her, then gave the wake up command, and immediately started talking about how her treatment was progressing
>she woke up quickly
>"Doctor? What is going on?!"
>she went quiet in a hurry seeing my erect dick at eye level
>"Interesting. And how long has this hysteria been an issue for you?"
>"Hysteria?! Why is your penis out?!"
>I wrote gibberish in my notebook while speaking
>"Patient suffers from repressed childhood trauma, possibly sexual in nature. Diagnosis, laying the eggs she's carrying would help relieve the patient of stress."
>"Eggs?!"
>she finally noticed something inside of her
>"Yes, and the sooner you lay them, the better you are likely to feel. Then we can work on your eating disorder."
>she almost spoke before one egg fell out of her stuffed vagina
>"Very good ma'am, just keep focusing on your breathing. I can call for the nurse if you need an epidermal."
>she grabbed that idea like a flotation device
>"Yes! I need the nurse!"
>I hit my intercom, "Nurse, need you in my office stat."
>nurse was a former patient of mine who had a strong cuckqueen fetish
>was always eager to help me with a patient, or help me fuck a patient
>I told her to prepare an epidermal for the patient
>Veronica interrupted with a desperation
>"Wait! Look at me! I'm tied up!"
>my sexy older lioness nurse eyed the patient, looking a bit confused
>"Sir, why is she saying she's tied up?"
>"Stress from all the eggs, the ultrasound showed 48 of them."
>Veronica and my nurse shouted in surprised unison
>"48?!"
>"Oh, and nurse?"
>"Yes?"
>"Could I ask you to check if my fly is undone? The patient was asking me why I had my uh, you know, out. I don't see anything myself," I looked down at my dick then back up to the nurse. "but maybe she's seeing something I'm not?"
>she walked up to me, and leaned over, the tip of her nose almost touching the tip of my cock
>almost speaking to my dick, she said "I can't even see boxers, you're zipped."
>Veronica looked like she didn't know up from down anymore, and kept staring at my crotch
>we soon convinced her to put a little effort into pushing the rest of the eggs out of her
>as soon as she ran empty, I put her under again, and refilled her with eggs, then woke her back up
>one by one, she "laid" an egg, grunting and gasping as they moved around inside of her
>once she finally laid the last egg, I put her back under, untied her and had her get dressed and have a seat
>turned my video recorder on while talking to her about her next appointment, then gave her the wake up command
>she came to with a jolt, suddenly finding herself clothed and not bound
>"Veronica?"
>"Wasn't I just..."
>"Are you alright? You've been here talking to me, remember?"
>"Yeah, I just...I...I think I had a ...I don't know, maybe a vision or something, I don't know what to call it."
>I waited in my best 'tell-me-more' pose, she blushed before speaking
>"I was here, and I was...laying eggs. And you were there. And...I could see your...penis."
>she buried her face in her wings in embarrassment
>"I'm so sorry Doctor, I wasn't trying to have some weird sex fantasy about you."
>"No need to apologize, it doesn't sound sexual in nature."
>I could tell she desperately wanted to believe that by looking in her eyes
>"Really?"
>"Really. You said you could see my penis. Did you and I do anything sexual together in your...vision?"
>she thought for a moment
>"No, you just kept talking and writing in your notebook."
>"So you laid a clutch of eggs, then what happened?"
>she put her wings back in front of her face
>"It wasn't just a clutch. It was four dozen."
>"And doesn't that strike you as an absurd and physically impossible amount?"
>"Of course!"
>"Did you enjoy laying eggs?"
>"Hell no!"
>"So, you laid a bunch of eggs, you could see my penis, and you really didn't enjoy the experience. What part of that would be sexual to you?"
>she seemed uncertain, so I provided an idea for her
>"I see two interpretations of your vision, flash, or whatever you want to call it. One, your biological clock is telling you to get cracking and accept motherhood. Two, your mind is telling you to avoid pregnancy by giving you an overblown worst case scenario."
>she looked relieved
>"Thank god, it would be awkward to know I was having weird fantasies about my therapist."
>I put her under again, got her naked, and had her blow me while I was still fully dressed
>as instructed, she used her tongue to apply some of my cum onto my cock, and let the rest pool inside her open mouth
>I woke her up while telling her she was very cute when she played around with my cum
>she swallowed out of surprise of suddenly having cum in her mouth, and I put her back under
>got her dressed and had her brush her teeth in my private bathroom, then sit back in the chair
>woke her back up while taking about her next appointment, she almost turned red
>"Are you alright ma'am?"
>"It happened again."
>"The eggs?"
>she couldn't look me in the eyes anymore
>"Not exactly."
>she took her time, but finally shamefully admitted to having a very life-like fantasy of kneeling in front of me naked with a mouth full of my cum
>"You have the subconscious of a bratty 14 year old."
>"Excuse me?"
>"I just told you that what you saw wasn't sexual. Your subconscious just said 'you can't tell me what to think Doc'."
>"Oh. Yeah. It kinda did, didn't it."
>she still looked embarrassed, but she could at least look at me now
>under again, this time I woke her up while I was fucking her and she was close to orgasm
>under again before she finished her orgasm, dressed, and back in her seat, then woken
>I didn't ask why she was blushing so hard, and she didn't tell me about her latest fantasy
>I handed her the VR googles and headphones, and she was soon sitting there having commands implanted in her mind
>she was gonna be having wet dreams about human men this week
>I could just order her to desire human men, but making her think it's a repressed desire of hers is more fun
>after she tearfully asked for help with the puddle she was sitting in, I called in my nurse to direct her to the women's room and help her clean herself up
>sent her home after, then called Candy in
>she already had her hand out for a copy of the video, which I gave her
>she held the SD card and gave me a greedy look
>"So?"
>"She swore she would never have sex with a human."
>lionesses can do a vicious grin better than most
>"How long until she's human exclusive?"
>she was in her 40's, but still a very good lay
>and her cuckqueen obsession was very endearing, wouldn't trade her for another nurse

>Daphne was back in my office
>while I had fun milking her while under, I wanted to have some fun with her while she was coherent
>20 minutes in the googles and headset later, and she was ready
>woke her up, and she started talking about how she needed to drain her breasts
>I had the nurse bring in a few towels, which Daphne accepted with a thanks
>I put a few glass bottles on my desk, and Daphne started taking off her clothes
>she froze right as she was about to take her panties off
>"Uh, Doc?"
>"Yes Daphne?"
>"I usually uh, do things..., when I milk myself."
>"That's perfectly fine, your privacy is safe in this office."
>she finished stripping, then pulled a dildo out of her purse
>preparations complete, she sat back in the chair, played with herself using the dildo in one hand, manually milking one boob
>"Sorry if this seems weird Doc, but I read somewhere that my milk will taste better if I'm aroused or cumming during."
>"I understand, you just wanna produce the best milk you can."
>she started working the dildo in and out faster
>"Yeah, and as much as I can."
>she started really getting into it, and her milk flow increased
>she continued to ramble about getting milked, obviously using it as dirty talk
>"I wanna make fucking gallons of milk. I wanna be locked into a milking machine. I wanna be tied to a pole and have human men drink straight from my tits."
>after I had heard enough, I got out of my chair and walked up to her
>she continued to drone on until I unzipped and put my penis in her face
>"I NEED human cum!"
>that was the only warning she gave before she inhaled my dick and finally stopped raving about wanting to be milked
>she was better than when she was under
>after swallowing, she squeezed a few more drops of milk out of her boob while thanking me
>she reapplied the latex pastie, then gingerly touched her other still-swollen breast and sighed
>she threw the dildo back in her purse
>"Doc, could you do me a favor and make me moo?"

>There's events where owners show off their anthros to be judged, competing with other anthros.
>It's essentially a livestock judging combined with giant vegetable competition.
>But instead of pumpkins they're growing tits.
>Each "farmer" has their own secret way to get their cows to competition weight, but all competitors are stellar performers, even if they don't necessarily go for shear size.
>There's categories for biggest single pair, overall tit weight, number of tits, milk quantity, milk quality, etc.
I wonder what the prize is for getting the most blue ribbons is.

>Frank's new years party was going pretty good until he noticed his wife Helen, and his human boss had vanished
>goddamnit, she promised she was going to take good care of his boss
>to be an accommodating and gracious host
>none of his other coworkers seemed to know where they were
>with a sigh of relief, he finally found both of them in a closet
>with horror he noticed that some of his bosses cum had escaped his wife's mouth, and had dripped on her breasts
>she swore she would swallow every drop
>Helen looked humiliated, and he could tell by looking in her eyes that she really tried to swallow it all
>his boss didn't care for the interruption
>"Frank, I'm busy."
>he quickly shut the door then shouted an apology through it
>"I'm so sorry sir!"
>he quickly went back to checking on his other guests, nearly in tears
>damnit Helen, you promised, you practiced, what went wrong?
>dark thoughts about a soon-to-be demotion ran through his head
>soon Helen and his boss were back with the rest of the party-goers
>Helen had a trail of his bosses human sperm running from her lips to her cleavage
>her smile told him things were fine
>based on her dress being pulled down to expose her boobs, he guessed his boss wanted her to walk around the party to show off the cum
>she vanished a short while later, and Frank's cell phone beeped
>it was a message from Helen telling him to stay out of the bedroom and keep all guests downstairs until they were finished
>he reminded her that if she did a very good job, she might be selected to visit his boss during lunch breaks
>and Frank might get a raise or promotion out of it
>about an hour later she sent him another message
>his boss had decided to impregnate Helen, so she was forbidden from having sex with Frank until his boss decided otherwise
>she also sent a picture of the creampie she had, telling him she was going to do her best to get pregnant ASAP so they could get back to making love again

>Gee Frank, how come boss Anon lets you have two promotions in short time
>"Thanks to my beautiful wife. We worked hard to improve her skills"

>five months later, Frank and Helen were in bed together talking about this and that
>or what they could call in bed together these days
>his boss paid for them to put their marital bed in storage, and get two separate beds
>they could sleep in the same room as long as the mattresses didn't touch
>neither was allowed on the other's mattress
>they could kiss and hug only if both were fully clothed
>Frank was tired of his hand but the raise was making it worthwhile
>plus the promise of his own office once the child was born
>for as long as he raised the child
>Helen interrupted the conversation with a question
>"Hon, just how badly would you want a promotion?"
>her tone was worrisome, this must have been harder on her than he thought
>"Babe, you've done more than enough for the both of us, you don't need to do anything painful."
>she gave him a sad look
>"It wouldn't be physically painful."
>"He's not asking you to divorce me, is he?"
>"No, thank god, no. He did have an offer for me to give you though."
>she told him the details
>it would get him the promotion he wanted for four years
>but the price was painful
>"I really offended him when I walked in on you two in the closet downstairs, huh?"
>"He doesn't want to see or hear a male anthro during or shortly after sex. Your apology didn't help matters any."
>his first instinct was to just shut the door and walk away
>why didn't he listen to his instincts?
>still, he could really use that promotion

>a short while later, Frank and Helen were recording a video
>he was on his knees masturbating
>she stood in front of him and spoke a continual stream of lewd comments for the benefit of the camera
>her eyes were sad, but she forced a temptress attitude and seductive smile
>"Breathe deeply dear, smell what you can not have."
>"You may be my husband, but my pussy is human property."
>"Spill your inferior anthro seed on the floor, where it belongs."
>she looked really sad after he finally came on the floor
>the next day at work Helen delivered the video of her husband's humiliation to his boss
>he called Frank in to watch Helen blow him
>after Frank went back to work, Helen looked up at the human with a guilty expression and said "He has 9 more orgasms before I lock him in permanent chastity Master."
>he gave her a pat on the head
>"And you made sure to not tell Frank about that part of the deal, correct?"
>"Yes Master, and I will tell him it's temporary and just keep extending the date as you ordered."
>"And?"
>"And...I will never let my husband penetrate me ever again. I will never provide him with any sexual pleasure or release. My body is the property of humans, and I will save all my efforts in pleasuring a male, for human males."
>"What do you have to say about that?"
>her belly was somewhat extended due to her pregnancy, but she still managed to get on all fours
>"Thank you Master for showing me my proper place in life. Kneeling before a human, pregnant with his child."
>she had a feeling Frank was going to be unhappy, but he did say he would do anything for that promotion
>after all this, he was getting it, even if he decided he no longer liked the price
>she felt her swollen stomach and hoped the human would be satisfied with just one

>You don't know this raptor chick, you're just getting coffee as usual
>She just shows you some tit because she wants to and likes your attention
>An average day out on the town you get flashed countlessly by anthros, some more brazen than others

>hired furred maid to clean my house for a day
>she didn't know I had a remote trick shelf
>had an 'expensive' vase sitting on top
>the moment she dusted the area, I hit the button
>the look of devastation on her face when the vase hit the ground and practically exploded
>she thought she was getting a good payday, now she's in debt and worried about getting fired
>never seen such a sad looking cheetah girl before
>she's already begging me to not inform her maid service, how she needs this job
>I know she's desperate, otherwise she wouldn't be working for a french maid uniform maid service
>"You can work off your debt on your days off, and I'll keep quiet."
>she was very excited about the idea until all the details sank in
>working on her two days off every week, getting paid at her current rate, paying off an item that cost more than she made in 10 years working five days a week
>as she mumbled about working for me until the day she died, I let her know there was a way to earn 'bonus pay'
>simply put, I expected respect, loyalty, submission, and eagerness to serve from my maids
>for each category, I had a sheet detailing five levels at which she could serve for additional pay
>the higher the level, the quicker she pays off the debt
>respect ranged from addressing me as Sir at all times to addressing me as Master and being on all fours at all times unless asked otherwise
>loyalty ranged from being locked in a chastity belt when not at work, to being a live-in maid and wearing a shock collar from an invisible fence system so she can't leave the house
>submission ranged from wearing no shoes and no panties, to wearing nothing but a collar saying 'Slave Maid'
>eagerness ranged from thanking me before and after work for being allowed to serve, to thanking me every time I spoke to her and kissing my dick
>she started with low levels, but has progressed her way up over time
>the vase was 10$ at a thrift store

>I fucked up
>royally and completely, I blew it
>I got myself too deep in debt over one shitty money making scheme after another to get rich quick
>now I’m in the hole, badly
>bank account wise it looks fine on the surface, better than fine.
>if only you could see my credit card debt, God forbid the tally on my loans
>my dad was a man of business. But I guess he was a bit wiser than me
>he was really skeptical about the gimmicks I would go for
>always saying that if I was gonna do something like that. I needed to have something to fall back on, “an ol’ reliable staple” he would call them
>what sort of business did my dad run…?
>not that I don’t know, but he ran quite a few, it was hard to tell which ones he had as a gimmick
>think… THINK DAMNI-… oh, that’s right
>he had sharehold with a claim to a percentage on the profits for agriculture, it’s reliable because people will always need food!
>well now I feel stupid for selling it back to the company
>whatever, I’m an entrepreneur. I want my own company to have and make work
>I don’t know how to grow crops… but
>I know animals really well m, I’ll make my anthro/animal biology-&-anatomy degree useful
>at least. That’s what I’m telling myself as I scrounge my last bits of liquid capital together to buy a huge truck for XXL size anthros
I can’t spend all my money on the truck though. The banks won’t let me take out one more red cent in loans, so I have to make what I have last
>with my knowhow, with the help of a few laws in this country that I can take advantage of, I think this new Hail Mary business might just work out!
>now… what anthro’s to buy
>I’ll have to sleep on it a bit. Then come back to the idea *after* I’ve bought a worthwhile truck
>as I dream, I think of my plan
>my creativity fueled by the hallucinations that lie behind the veil of sleep
>I dream of my business, it’s an old reliable staple, just like dad used to have
>a dairy!
>but the cost of taking care of cow anthros, the sheer amount of plant matter would be astronomical
>we have the technology to make specialized anthros for anything, so why not use it?
>the nebulous female I’m caring for in my little imaginary industrial barn shifts. And flora like smoke into a new form
>a school of various kinds of fish girls? No. They’d need a great big pool to swim in to be well kept
>maybe canines? They’re loyal and obedient, and they’ll all pair bond with me to I won’t worry about them running off
>but we can make any species pair bond with us just as strong with the same technology, I need something that almost absolutely can’t be separated into something tech can make up for
>an animal order that won’t need a lot of work, and who’s anatomy allows me to control them somehow
>then it hit me
>Reptiles
>dragons and snakes and kobolds oh my!
>they eat almost exclusively protein. And I can get that at almost any quality dirt cheap
>that also translates into milk that’s so high in protein I could sell it to gym goers, instant market appeal
>and finally, their colt bloodedness allows me to control them, metabolically and behaviorally…
>I’ll buy them at the lowest legal intelligence they can be bred to have, make their lives bliss with food and lazy pleasure, and by that point they won’t even want to know how a thermostat works
>it’s perfect…
>now… how far do I wanna take this anatomy wise?
>before I can visualize a bipedal dragon girl with an extra pair of crotch tits, or an udder’ed up Argonian. I’m woken by my alarm clock
>I hate the damn thing- but this time I’m thankful
>I’ve got a truck to buy, and a new career in dairy to start
>Fast forward about a month after trading my my sedan for a 4 wheel drive gas guzzler with a flat bed and a hefty passenger spot for the bigger variety of anthros
>I’m driving my way to an anthro breeder, not the low brow kind who are just selling what are essentially their own daughters like it’s some kind of sloppy arranged marriage either
>I mean a real breeder, with pens and enclosures and proper cloning tubes to make something custom, or to augment an existing specimen
>for my first animal I’m playing it safe
>a defanged cobra, rather than a snake that might constrict me. With a first sight imprint kept in a cold hibernation state so when I turn on the heat she’ll finally wake up and imprint on me- the first living thing she sees
>then of course there’s the fact I requested she have tits the size of jumbo party balloons and a very low intelligence
>tier three, the lowest legal tier to go- tier one being the smartest which is at human level.
>Einstein was about intelligence tier 0.8. It’s a descending order
>after making it to the building and filing some paperwork, I’m welcomed to my new “pet” snake’s enclosure where she’s currently in her state of torpor
>I’m given as much time as I need with her while the room warms up to her waking state
>they said it was a good idea to hold her hand for affection and also using my body to dump heat into hers. So that’s what I did
>she was cold to the touch. Like a corpse
>but as the her body warmed up with the room, she soon began to show the sings of life
>heartbeat, chest heaving up and down, little twitches everywhere on her body
>within a few minutes, her eyes opened
>on her blue scaled flesh, they were a flash of what looked like a sunset
>in the innermost part of her iris was hold, then tangerine, with a thin band of red that transitioned into a purple border around the outermost part of the eye
>her eye wandered until it saw my face
>she was frozen there, looking at me
>then as she stared she sat up. It looked weird and unnerving because she could just effortlessly sit up thanks to the weight factor of her tail that more or less turned her abs into a great long series of muscles
>her serpentine slivers dilated closed. Then opened into great big circles of black
>like the way a cat takes in tons of light or appears when they smell catnip
>she made a fangless open mouth smile, like she was about to scream with joy
>“Daddy!”
>with her full cobra striking force, coiled tail and all for the leap, She pounced on me wrapping herself around me and jamming her snout into the crook of my neck
>she was holding me so tight were it not for her gargantuan breasts she might have broken my ribs with the full force of her boa-constrictor-embrace
>she did that little thing snakes do with their tongues along my neck where her face was firmly planted, and made a muffled declaration
>“MINE!”
>this is all part of the plan
>I hope…
>better let her get this hysterical bonding out of her system before I take her anywhere
>also, I can’t move
>her her coils tightened in these spasms of going lax, then redoubling their efforts
>I could feel her body heating up, like how once a car starts it’s able to warm itself right up after getting a little startup going
>her innocent affection pulled at my heart strings
>maybe I’m just a sap. But even aside from this being a business choice… I knew as she held on tight this was the path forward
>now that she, and the room was all warmed up, my shirt was started to get soaked with her milk expressing from her heavy melons
>with her metabolism up, so was her capacity to lactate.
>with a little effort getting up with her still draping herself on me like I’m her oxygen, I drag her along to the door
>she sort of understands that I’m trying to move. But rather than detach from me in any shape or form she merely holds only me and lets which way I pull to guide her slithering
>her eyes still closed. Still hugging tight. And still with her face buried in my neck collar
>eventually I make it to the clerk. I fill out some paperwork, as well as buy some medication for my snake to prevent any pregnancies.
>well, at least not an pregnancies with my sons
>not ready for an heir just yet. But I’m sure I’ll have to breed my first “heifer” here if I want to upscale this business
>and she’s just to start. I still haven’t got the full reptilian retinue just yet, variety wise
>reading the meds a bit closer. It says it’s something about preventing ovarian eggs from making them able to even combine with any Y-chromosome carrying sperm
>we’re able to do this but can’t figure out how to reach Mars? Get grip people…
>while I’m here I should also figure out what she can and can’t eat. I know shes carnivorous by design but I’m not gonna just give her meat slop
>still, I can’t go too expensive either. While I’m working on this paperwork while being smothered by… let’s call her something Egyptian. Layla, her name will be Layla
>while browsing the internet for a specialized care book for reptile anthros. My other hand fiddled with the bottle of pills
>now would be a good time to start teaching Layla’s name to her
“Layla, sit.”
>she needed a brief moment to pull her head back and look at me with her dumb, happy face eyes dilated wide open to register that the command was meant for her
>obediently she uncoils from my body. And with using the first portion of her tails like its legs. She sits in what is a snake seiza position where she’s on her “knees.” Or at least the length of her tail that implies thighs and knees
>she was looking up at me like the way a devout looks at their object of worship. Her gaze was reverent and submissive
>like with a word I could command her heart to stop and it would that instant
“Mouth open for me Layla?”
>she let her eyes slowly close and her tongue slide forward. The flesh of her mouth was almost of a puffy sort
>fangless as I requested, I felt and obeyed the urge to touch her mouth, caressing my cheek and letting my thumb begin to explore what it could touch of her maw
“Okay girl, swallow this pill for me.”
>she did so with this slow deliberation. Opening her mouth again to show me she obeyed
“Good girl. Good Layla.”
>still, a drunken, enraptured smile on her face. Like she was lost in a dream while looking at me
>I bought the care book online. And got Layla chipped, tagged with a collar, and ready to get into the truck
>she was elated to go for a ride, thought she struggled to managed to flop all of her tail in at first
>poor girl was trying to find a spot to lay her coils while she sat in the passenger seat
>it worked out eventually. I knew buying this truck was a must for this sort of thing
>I wonder how much I’ll be thanking my lucky stars when I buy my first dragon for the dairy
>yeesh, that’ll put this thing through its paces
>driving home was pretty pleasant
>even though I made her with basically the intelligence of a bimbo who dropped out of 3rd grade. She wanted to learn everything
>she would see some buildings and with with an expression that was equal parts amazed and inquisitive would point at it, her other hand gently patting my shoulder for attention
>I simplified a little so she would get it- and the only times she really didn’t were when the topic of the building was too complex to put into one sentence
“The brightly colored building is where people cook food and trade it for money”
>“food! wa-… wha monay?”
“It’s… hmm, it’s a thing that can be made in large amounts, that everybody agrees that you can trade it for anything. So that way even if, for example. If one person has lots or oranges, and I’m a different kind of farmer with lots of milk- but he doesn’t wanna trade milk for those oranges. I can just give him money instead, I can also get money for giving milk.”
>she looks down at her titanic jugs
>“daddy like milk?”
>she knew that it might be a bad idea to distract me from driving in a one ton flatbed
>she eyed the key in the engine starter. Not continuing her thought until we were home
>once I pulled the key from the ignition her seatbelt was off and she was lunging for me
>caressing my back with one arm, and holding up a nipple with the other
>“Daddy, likes milk?”
>her nipple was huge, soft, and puffy
>the whole time it was drooling her white nectar into my shirt as she got closer with it
>I guess she wasn’t done bonding yet
“Layla, stay.”
>in an instant she got back a bit and straightened herself, still somewhat on my lap
>she seemed a little sad I didn’t wanna indulge in her
>until of course I contradicted that idea too
“There’s a nice bed we should do this in instead. Come with me”
>her mood was better after that
>she didn’t even bother to let me out of her passenger side. Or open it herself


>Jess really wants more out of her life.
>Born a slave anthro to a mixed breed mother and unknown father, Jess’ mutt appearance and lack of blood purity tanked her auction value, and thus, her prospects for a worthwhile life. The only thing that kept her afloat was her above average intelligence, but that was a double-edged sword in the eyes of some potential Masters.
>It was a double-edged sword for her, too, for with that mind of hers, she realizes how poor her lot in life is. Were she a bit duller, perhaps she would be happier.
>She’s been sold, repossessed, and resold many times in her life. Her low value attracted the most repugnant humans, one who wished for a slave girl but without the finances or means to care for one. All of her previous Masters purchased or on credit and inevitably defaulted.
>With the way her current master fumbles on his phone’s banking app, trying to scrape some money together before the line to the grocery store register moves, Jess expects to be repossessed soon. She shakes her head.
>The dog sends a disdainful look towards the cart that her master is leaning over. Ramen noodles, soda, various brands of junk, and many offbrand foods take up the space in the cart. None of that is for her, however, the dry pet food under a bag of chips is what will sustain her.
>“Approved for Anthro consumption!” the bag says. Pah! Jess withholds a scoff and scratches an itch under her too-large thrift store clothing.
>Behind them, another man and an anthro get in line, pushing along their own cart. Jess looks over her shoulder, taking in the filled cart with a measure of envy. There’s no dog food to be found amid the neatly stacked ingredients within.
>Then she makes the mistake of looking at the other anthro.
>Staninf there is a young, healthy dog anthro. The other dog is clad in new, appropriately sized clothes that hug her well-fed body. Her fur is smooth and shiny, as is the hair on her head. Her fingers are laced with her master’s comfortably, and she’s totally at ease.
>Her neck is the most telling, though. The fur of her neck has no collar indentation. Heck, it’s barely even ruffled. The collar there today is worn loose, and decorated with a heart charm of solid gold.
>Jess swallows, her own tight collar making the motion uncomfortable.
>The other dog notices Jess’ gaze, so she too stares back. The other anthro’s eyes roam Jess, transforming into pity.
>The pampered pooch pities the poor mutt. They all do.
>Jess abruptly turns away, her eyes stinging with tears.
>It’s not fair.
>Why can't she be loved? Why is she worthless? Why?

>"Please everyone, I need your help! I need to be bred before we make landfall, please help me!"
>Rebecca could hear herself begging to be bred on the speakers
>they had the tape of her asking for a womb-full playing on a constant loop
>it was the final day of the breeding cruise, and she had made the mistake of spending the two weeks playing around
>she knew furgirls like herself went on the cruises for fun and impregnation with humans
>she wasn't trying to dodge pregnancy, but she didn't notice the contract said she wasn't allowed off the boat until she was confirmed pregnant
>it was during the required morning medical check when the nurse looked concerned and said she didn't have any signs of pregnancy
>Rebecca just shrugged and said "Maybe next time."
>"No, you don't understand. If you aren't pregnant by the time we make landfall, you won't be allowed to leave the ship until you are pregnant. The cruise line has a reputation for 100% successful breeding, they won't allow otherwise."
>Rebecca thought about how difficult it was going to be to hunt down a partner, get them in bed, and trying to get them to cum inside her womb before they made port
>the nurse reassured her that the ship had procedures in place for such an emergency
>which is why the horny raccoon found herself tied naked to a bench on the middle of the main deck
>arms and legs spread wide, blindfolded and gagged
>with the recording of herself begging to be bred playing on the ship's PA system in a constant loop
>the human passengers were doing their part to help her
>she felt them thrust into her, fuck her quick and hard, cum inside, then pull out only to be replaced with another human
>all she could feel was human dick inside of her, human hands on her, and hear herself begging for more
>she would have begged in person if they would just remove the gag
>the blindfold only made every touch feel more intense
>this vacation was worth every penny

> Although controversial due to its subject matter, bred by daylight is a best selling smash hit amongst humans and anthros, particularly the female anthro audience
>In the game you play as one of three different roles, the hunter, the defender, or the defenseless
>The hunters job is to kill the defenders, often carried out through brutal animation mostly involving violently butchering the defender, and capture and seemingly rape and impregnate the defensless
>The defenders job is to sacrifice their lives to try and protect the defenseless
>The defenseless job is to try and avoid being captured by the hunter, however the loss ratio is strangely high amongst female anthro players
>Despite the games less than savory portrayal of interspecies violence, many fetish companies are releasing blue tooth add-ons, such as badhuman’s automatic dildo that matches the thrusting to that of the hunters avatar for only $200. >However, if you pay $400, the buyer can purchase the auto-thruster advanced that includes working testicles that are filled with actual frozen human sperm, that is heated up and then ejaculated, presumably into the womb of the user
>It is unclear whether the games popularity will continue to grow, or whether it will lose its audience as its main demographic becomes too busy with child rearing to game

>Be owner of pizzeria/arcade
>Cleaning the tables when some dumb colt spills his soda on an arcade machine while trying to impress some furgirls, frying it
>He tries to flee in a panic, but I manage to grab his arm before he can leave
>Inform him that the machine he just wrecked cost several thousand dollars and I expect him to pay for it all
>He blubbers that he doesn't have anywhere near that kind of money
>Fortunately for him, there are alternate forms of payment...

>mixed anthro/human gyms were attempted at one point
>the end result was a new line of sex clubs themed as gyms, called Push It Harder Gym
>exclusively male human and female anthro clientele
>they actually were fully featured gyms with all the extras, but very few people were capable of focusing on exercise
>you could always tell which anthro girls were new to the gym
>nervous looks at the other women's exposed groins
>the 'gym-rat' types, they knew there was no point in trying to keep something over their crotch
>they knew the sheer amount of pheromones being put out by the exercising humans would effect them
>they would just be tearing their own yoga pants to shreds before offering themselves to a human anyways
>the new ones would try to exercise, get hit with the pheromones, and get yelled at for taking up a machine just to sit and masturbate
>the guys all knew the women were there for exercise as well as a good fucking
>many enjoyed playing the spotter or coach
>any regular women usually had amazing legs from all the squats they did onto a human dick
>abs of steel from doing sit ups with a human cock in their face
>and amazingly strong but lean arms from being rewarded with a single thrust inside of them for every rep they did with 3lb weights
>any woman caught not pushing herself to her limits during exercise was punished with a 5-mile ride on the stationary bike
>the bike's seat had a dildo that would go up and down, tied to the pedals
>there was also a device that attached to the clit with suction, and would vibrate as well as provide different types of friction randomly
>straps all over to prevent the rider from leaving early
>if she stopped pedaling before the 5 miles was done, another mile was added for every 10 seconds she wasn't pedaling
>a short length of leather would automatically whip her ass if she went under 5mph
>with the exception of one rat girl who begged to spend her life on the bike, most women only need one ride to get motivated

>after being conquered by humanity, the various anthro species had their military's disbanded
>despite this, there were many in the ranks who didn't want to leave the military
>they begged to be allowed to continue to serve
>the problem was they couldn't be allowed to carry weapons, or use heavy equipment
>the military, always pragmatic, found a solution
>anthros could serve in the military as Morale Specialists under limited rank
>they would provide safe and STD-free sexual pleasure for the troops on-base and on deployment
>no more losing 10%-20% of forces due to illness during extended deployments
>and the anthros could continue to serve in the military, have rank, and wear a uniform
>not all of the former soldiers were willing to take the deal, but enough were to ensure nearly every barracks had five
>some of the women were naturally slutty, and took well to their new lives
>some just endured, consoling themselves with the knowledge they were at least on the winning team
>the former officers, they all made it a point to do their new jobs with absolute stoicism
>absolute neutral expression, no emotion, and no reaction to what happened to them unless it was required as part of their new position
>laid there like dead fish during the act, wouldn't even show signs of pleasure or pain
>they did it out of pride, a refusal to allow their new situation to effect them, and partially hoping that their lack of participation would make them unattractive
>the last part backfired hard, as many soldiers found they enjoyed jerking off into the face of someone wearing an officers uniform who wouldn't even frown when the cum hit
>it became a rare sight to see an anthro officer walking around after noon without cum smeared on her face
>soon it became a good luck ritual to cum on the face of an anthro officer before going into the field

>Evy was one of the enlisted girls who enjoyed her new military career over her old one
>her plumage was considered unattractive to males of her species, not colorful enough to compete
>she originally just remained in the military since she wasn't sure if she would be able to find work elsewhere
>the very first day she made the exciting discovery that humans didn't give a fuck what colors her feathers were
>overnight she went from being a 3/10 who spent most of her nights alone to getting more dick than she could handle
>hearing stories about how the Navy was just boats full of isolated human men severely lacking female companionship, she requested a transfer
>10 years later, and she was very happy in her new position
>it didn't take her long to achieve the highest rank an anthro could hold
>she was also successful in convincing her captain to make the lower half of the uniform optional for the MS's, so her tail feathers could move freely
>the USS Decatur wasn't just her posting, it was her home
>the mess hall was her kitchen, and the staff were her cooks, always happy to make her a meal and give her a good fucking while she waited
>she had her own bunk, but could realistically spend the night in any bunk she wished
>and she had over 300 lovers all around her, making sure she never went to sleep or woke up alone ever again
>she took her job as a Morale Specialist very seriously, not just providing for sailor's sexual needs, but always trying to cheer them up
>she was infamous for breaking up fights by convincing the two combatants to talk it over while spit-roasting her
>her attitude and eagerness to serve didn't go unnoticed by the crew
>she was considered the ship's mascot, and no sailor was considered to be a part of the crew until they had put a load of sperm into her womb and stomach each
>a regular inside joke was to ask her what was 5 foot 4 and full of semen
>she would always take on a cheerleader pose and yell "ME!"
>"Hello sailors!"
>the captain rolled his eyes at Evy's greeting to the new members of the crew that had transferred in
>she really didn't need to salute them at a position of attention
>"At ease Evy."
>she smiled and crossed her arms behind her back, spreading her legs wider than was really needed
>"And this here is Evy White. She's one of the ship's MS Corps, and she's also the Decatur's mascot. Evy?"
>"Hello everyone! If all of you would be so kind as to let me be the first member of the MS Corps on this ship to satisfy you, I'd greatly appreciate it. It's nothing against the others, I'm just looking forward to getting to know all of you. Does anyone have any questions for me?"
>one finally spoke up
>"Don't MS's usually wear pants?"
>"Usually, yes. But the captain allowed it to be optional, so I don't have a belt breaking my tail feathers every time I bend over."
>"Who gets to fuck you first?"
>the captain saw her self-satisfied smirk, and gave her the $5 he bet her
>most sailors wouldn't get that loose in front of a new captain, but Evy had a way of bringing it out of them
>he decided to take the loss out on the new guys
>"Alright people, push-up contest. Winner gets Evy first."
>groans from all seven as they realized they just got scammed
>Evy giggled
>"Don't worry fellas, I'll handle all the work, you can just lay there and enjoy it. And even if you don't win, I'm still going to reward you for your efforts."
>as they started counting out push-ups, Evy bent over and started waving her bare ass at them while cheering
>"You can do it! You can do it!"
>the captain thought about stopping her, but decided there was no point
>they were going to be seeing her doing a lot more of it, she did it every PT session
>better they get used to her behavior now
>"Evening Evy, what brings you to my cabin? Aren't you off today?"
>"Yes sir Captain, I was just hoping you could help me with a little issue with my enlistment papers."
>"Issue?"
>"Yeah, I was signing my re-enlistment papers today and they said this was the last 6-year contract I could do. Surely this is just some mix up with the paperwork, right?"
>"Nope, you've already served for 12 years, 6 more puts you at 18, mandatory retirement hits at 20."
>the captain had never seen Evy anything but cheerful and bubbly, but at that moment she looked like he just stabbed her mother
>"I...is there any way to request an extension?"
>he shook his head no, then pulled a metal object out of his desk and dropped it with a thump
>it was a thick steel collar, a perfect ring shape with only a keyhole and barely visible hinge giving a hint as to how it was put on
>on the outside read "OFFICIAL MASCOT OF USS DECATUR"
>"Let me tell you how your very last day in the navy will go. You will be brought onto the main deck, stripped of your uniform and any other clothes you may have on. You will be handed this collar. If you choose to have freedom, you will be given your civilian clothes and a warm goodbye from the crew. If you choose to remain our mascot, you will put the collar on yourself and make sure it is locked shut. You will then be escorted to the aft of the ship and handed the key. You will throw that key into the ships wake. We will then have a mechanic safely fill the keyhole with melted solder."
>hearing about throwing the key away made her eyes go wide, hearing the keyhole would be sealed shut made her blush
>"You mean..., permanent?"
>"Titanium cables inside means it can't be cut off. Not without expensive equipment we don't have."
>"No turning back, I'm property forever?"
>"Exactly."
>she sat there blushing and staring at the collar
>"Something to think about. You have 8 more years before you'll have to decide."
>"Y-yeah, something to think about."

>Triska wished for death
>her current situation was absolute hell
>if she ever laid eyes on the chieftain who ordered the raid on the desert humans, she would kill him herself
>if she survived this
>just moving around under the desert sun and heat was torture for the ursine
>so when the humans captured her, they simply tied her to a pole and blindfolded her
>nothing else was needed to make her suffer horribly
>her thick fur was dark and only seemed to get hotter the longer she was stuck in the merciless sun
>she cursed her decision to get her nipples pierced, as her captors would give them the occasional tug to increase her torment
>as the heat of the morning grew to intolerable levels, she knew she wasn't going to last the day
>her mouth felt like it was drying out entirely
>she would have cried, but she was scared the loss of fluid might kill her
>every few minutes, her captors would drink something and talk about how refreshing and cool it was, then ask her if she was ready to submit
>how her torment could be over if she just gave in and told them everything, and became a good pet for them
>lunch was salt-cured meats, and they were shoved in her unwilling mouth
>she tried to cry, but tears wouldn't come, even her eyes felt dry
>the guards argued over if the sun was at it's highest point yet or not
>it took a few minutes of choked screaming and mumbling before she finally managed to get across she was willing to cooperate
>she lived the rest of her life as a loyal and submissive pet, absolutely terrified she would ever have to spend time in the desert again

>many anthro species are still deeply effected by their animal urges and instincts
>canines, regardless of breed, can't resist the call of peanut butter
>they are actually banned from buying it since too many couldn't control themselves and choked to death on the stuff
>had a cute dalmatian teen across the street who I enjoyed feeding peanut butter to
>then her family moved away and I was left without a doggy to feed
>wasn't long before a milfy dobermann moved in next door
>divorced, already had a litter of six kids, yet very trim and fit for her age
>I invited her over for lunch
>we got to the dining room and she looked around while sniffing, trying to figure out what I had planned for lunch
>I pulled out the jar of peanut butter and a spoon
>her eyes latched onto the jar, and her ears went flat against her skull
>"Woah, wait! Do you know what..."
>she trailed off when I opened the jar and the smell hit her nose, causing her to shiver
>"I really shouldn't...it tastes too good, I'll eat too much..."
>I scooped out a spoonful and approached her, holding it front of her face
>"Open wide and stick out your tongue."
>she whimpered, but did as asked, and I smeared a part of the spoonful on her tongue
>the moment it touched, she started gulping it down like she was starving
>once she was done working it down, I told her to have a seat, putting her head closer to my crotch
>slowly waved the spoon in front of her while I unzipped and pulled my cock out
>brought the spoon down and smeared some of the peanut butter on the head
>she pulled back, but otherwise made no move to leave
>"Help yourself ma'am, it's a safe amount."
>she growled and glared at me, but her mouth still went firmly around my dick and her tongue went to work searching for every slight scrap of peanut butter
>every time she got me clean, I smeared a little more on
>after it was all over, I asked her if she wanted peanut butter and cream for lunch tomorrow
>she glared even harder
>"You know damn well I do."

>After being rejected by two boys, one carnivore and one herbivore, Juno decided to look for someone else
>She was desperate, fearing that she may never get loved
>Doing research online she found an interesting place in the countryside
>Some sort of reservation for a species that are considered too volatile to keep around the others
>”Whats the worst that could go happen? I’ll make a quick trip and look around.”
>She would be declared missing a day later

>another day of slavery to the humans, another day spent in the fields covered in dirt
>the humans enforced a strict separation of male and female slaves
>female slaves served indoors as maids and sex toys
>male slaves served hard labor outdoors farming
>Onase was hobbled, as was standard for field slaves, the blades on his ankles preventing him closing his legs
>his wrist shackles were also chained to his hobble chain, preventing him from moving all that quickly
>he wore a mask covering the penis-shaped gag that came within millimeters of touching the back of his throat
>it too was connected to his hobble chain, preventing him from lifting his head too far
>as an extra cruelty, his tail had weights tied to it to throw off his balance, causing him to fall over often
>the mask and gag were punishment for not showing proper respect to a human overseer a week ago
>the weights on his tail were because one of the overseers thought it would be funny
>the chastity belt that had kept him from experiencing sexual pleasure for the last 8 years was the only other thing he wore
>he had been forced to beg for the penis gag, or his wife would be punished
>he only caught the occasional glimpse of her in her pristine maid uniform, but he still loved her
>she clearly loved him back, since the humans would threaten to punish him when she failed to please them
>damn humans enjoyed having him tied to a pole, blindfolded, outside their bedroom window any night they selected his wife for their bed
>her moans would trigger his arousal, which was quickly shut down by the discomfort caused by his belt
>before long, her moans would effect him again
>after 8 years without being allowed to cum, each aborted erection made his balls scream in pain
>then afterwards they would tell him that his species females exist to serve human men, and the males exist to labor
>and only the females are allowed pleasure

>Anthro state ecclesiarchy send emissaries to convince neighbors to join, by threats of force if neccessary
>They return stating negotiations went well but rumors spreads that they carried with a new faith they openly spoke about amongnst the ranks
>the mere fact they weren't punished by their fellow sisters is testament to how contagious those herectical words must be
>Further scrutiny from the upper chambers msut be held

>african anthro species got the same treatment from white humans that african humans got a few hundred years ago
>here in the US, that meant many african-anthro-americans were descendants from slaves
>which is why I discretely obtained a DNA sample from my zebra sub and had her ancestry checked
>always enjoyed taking on african anthro subs, since it always made me happy to know a descendant of a slave now willingly serves with a smile
>Teera was no exception, her ancestry report saying her family first entered the US in 1782
>provided her family's masters weren't waiting long to breed more slaves, her first slave ancestor was probably bred that year
>next generation would be born 9 months later, and bred themselves 14-15 years later around 1798
>generation after that bred in 1813, then 1828, then 1843, with that being the last generation serving as slaves before the war
>approx 5-6 generations of slave in her blood
>the next time I had her on all fours and sucking my dick, I decided to share some history with her
>told her about how the first female in her family on US soil served as a slave
>how her daughters, granddaughters, great-granddaughters, etc all served human men from birth to death
>asked her if she thought her ancestors sucked human dick the same way she did
>told her that by serving human men for generation after generation, it could be considered a family tradition for her
>grabbed her head and started face fucking her while telling her I expected to be thanked for helping her revive a long-lost family tradition
>came down her throat while telling her I expected her to pass the tradition on to her own daughters and keep it alive
>she was far wetter than usual when I fucked her after

How would one go about tricking a goddess into becoming your pet?

>Lull her into a false sense of security thinking that you’ve come as a believer
>get her to really like you for your purity
>come off as too pure so she’ll want to sample your chastity because ancient deities other than based human ones like Talos, Sigmar, Crom, etc… only care are more caring in the big picture sense rather than trying to lay virgins
>When you’re getting ridden hard by that deific cookie, giver the ol’ acme divinity shackle around her neck
>now her divinity is under your control!
>was she some retarded Dagon-goddess of the harshness of nature or some other feminist nonsense? Well now she’s a fertility-wolf goddess who thanks to you is perpetually nine months along with a bum in the oven, with 8 rows of size-staggered fat titties. left immobile if it wasn’t for the fact you gave her such a meaty, breedable muscular body
>you can now bend her and her godly throne-space to whatever the fuck you want! Want her to literally be your mommy so you can indulge in lapping your own genes into hers over and over? It’s your little reality, you can manipulate anything you want- including yourself and her, her divinity isn’t under your control anymore. Even her mind is yours to utterly mold, make her love you, or fear you, or obsess over you
>just make sure to let your god children actually grow up, other dudes are trying ot make than plan work out here too- ya know

>Weyland Corp had no end of trouble with the alien species known as Xenomorphs
>relentlessly violent and vicious, rapid multiplication, and even their blood was acidic making combat a nightmare
>one day a scientist working for Weyland made an accidental discovery
>he had one strapped down to an examination table far tighter than was needed, and made the mistake of reaching across the creatures face
>he jumped backwards into a wall when he realized he just put his arm near the xeno's mouth
>it didn't try to attack him
>it just lay there
>after it was released from the table for transfer, it went back to normal violent and aggressive behavior
>puzzled, the scientist had the same specimen brought back the next day, and strapped down again
>it fought and thrashed against the bonds
>worried it might break free, he added more bonds and strapped all of them down tighter
>suddenly the xeno stopped fighting the straps and just lay there
>with enough trial and error, he learned the xeno's stopped any and all attempts at violence or resistance provided they were bound to a certain degree and a certain level of tightness
>when they had a specific level of freedom, they turned dangerous
>eventually, he found what he considered to be the turning point, where the switch inside them flipped
>head strapped, chest strapped, hips strapped, arms strapped in three locations, legs strapped in three locations, and two straps holding down the tail
>if he loosened one leg strap enough for the leg to move a bit, the xeno promptly spat and snarled and attempted to break out
>if he tightened that one strap back down, the xeno relaxed and would just passively lay there
>it was disturbing to think there was another alien species out there somewhere with the technology to create other species
>much less an alien species that would use that power just to create an entire race that existed solely to be tightly tied up
>a race that would react with murderous rage when not tied

>Breaking news!
>(Michael Bay directed music intro)
>Recent studies suggest human consumption of breastmilk from snakes, known colloquially as "snilk", can cause addiction, leading to excessive consumption of this substance and extensively biased preference for snake partners and snake products by humans.
>Other anthros are worried that the recent surge in snilk consumption will lead to "a significant decrease in ethnic diversity", with snakes dominating the polls as the humans main partner. >Molly of the "mans best friend" party, accuses The scale party of "deliberately tampering" with their genetic code to produce an "excessively and illegally addictive substance"
>Lanessa, leader of the scale partly refutes any involvement direct or indirect in the snilks effects, claiming that the results of genetic splicing was "purely coincidental" And concludes her rebuttal by stating that "dogs bark at anything which passes by their masters home."
>A growing community of anthros are engaging in conspiracy theories, frequently believing that snakes and reptiles in general are brainwashing humans to prefer only reptiles for slaves. Some have begged their human masters of wearing tin foil around their tounge to protect them from "vile substances".
